k-punk (The Collected and Unpublished Writings of Mark Fisher)"
See other formats
MARK FISHER 


| : » | 
i. al | 2 


THE COLLECTED AND UNPUBLISHED 
WRITINGS OF MARK FISHER FROM 2004 — 2016 
MARK FISHER, DARREN AMBROSE (ED.) 
FOREWORD BY SIMON REYNOLDS 


—_ 


k-punk 


Mark Fisher 
(1968 - 2017) 
Was a CO- 


founder of 


Zer0 Books 
and, later, 
Repeater 
Books. His 
blog, k-punk, 
defined 
critical 


writing for a 


generation. 


He wrote 
three books, 
Capitalist 


Realism, Ghosts 
of My Life and 
The Weird and 
the Eerie, and 
was a Visiting 
Fellow in the 
Visual 
Cultures 
department at 
Goldsmiths, 
University of 
London. 


Darren 
Ambrose is a 
freelance 
writer and 
editor from 


the North- 
East of 
England. 
Simon 


Reynolds _ is 
the author of 
Retromania 


and Rip It Up 
and Start 
Again. 


k-punk 


The Collected and Unpublished Writings of Mark 
Fisher (2004-2016) 


Edited by Darren Ambrose 
Foreword by Simon Reynolds 


Repeater 


CONTENTS 


Foreword by Simon Reynolds 
Editor’s Introduction by Darren Ambrose 


Why K? 


PART ONE 
Methods of Dreaming: Books 


Book Meme 
Space, Time, Light, All the Essentials — Reflections on J.G. 
Ballard Season (BBC 4) 

Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan 

A Fairground’s Painted Swings 

What Are the Politics of Boredom? (Ballard 2003 Remix) 
Let Me Be Your Fantasy 

Fantasy Kits: Steven Meisel’s “State of Emergency” 

The Assassination of J.G. Ballard 

A World of Dread and Fear 

Ripley’s Glam 

Methods of Dreaming 

Atwood’s Anti-Capitalism 

Toy Stories: Puppets, Dolls and Horror Stories 

Zer0 Books Statement 


PART TWO 
Screens, Dreams and Spectres: Film and Television 


A Spoonful of Sugar 


She’s Not My Mother 

Stand Up, Nigel Barton 

Portmeirion: An Ideal for Living 

Golgothic Materialism 

This Movie Doesn’t Move Me 

Fear and Misery in the Third Reich ‘n’ Roll 

We Want It All 

Gothic Oedipus: Subjectivity and Capitalism in Christopher 
Nolan’s Batman Begins 

When We Dream, Do We Dream We’re Joey? 

Notes on Cronenberg’s eXistenZ 

I Filmed It So I Didn’t Have to Remember It Myself 
Spectres of Marker and the Reality of the Third Way 
Dis-identity Politics 

“You Have Always Been the Caretaker”: The Spectral Spaces 
of the Overlook Hotel 

Coffee Bars and Internment Camps 

Rebel Without a Cause 

Robot Historian in the Ruins 

Review of Tyson 

“They Killed Their Mother”: Avatar as Ideological Symptom 
Precarity and Paternalism 

Return of the Gift: Richard Kelly’s The Box 

Contributing to Society 

“Just Relax and Enjoy It”: Geworfenheit on the BBC 

Star Wars Was a Sell-Out From the Start 

Gillian Wearing: Self Made 

Batman’s Political Right Turn 

Remember Who the Enemy Is 

Beyond Good and Evil: Breaking Bad 


Classless Broadcasting: Benefits Street 

Rooting for the Enemy: The Americans 

How to Let Go: The Leftovers, Broadchurch, and The Missing 
The Strange Death of British Satire 

Review: Terminator Genisys 

The House that Fame Built: Celebrity Big Brother 
Sympathy for the Androids: The Twisted Morality of 
Westworld 


PART THREE 
Choose Your Weapons: Writing on Music 


The By Now Traditional Glasto Rant 

Art Pop, No, Really 

k-punk, or the Glampunk Art Pop Discontinuum 

Noise as Anti-Capital: As the Veneer of Democracy Starts to Fade 
Lions After Slumber, or What is Sublimation Today? 

The Outside of Everything Now 

For Your Unpleasure: The Hauter-Couture of Goth 

It Doesn’t Matter If We All Die: The Cure’s Unholy Trinity 
Look at the Light 

Is Pop Undead? 

Memorex for the Kraken: The Fall’s Pulp Modernism 
Scritti’s Sweet Sickness 

Postmodernism as Pathology, Part 2 

Choose Your Weapons 

Variations on a Theme 

Running on Empty 

You Remind Me of Gold: Dialogue with Mark Fisher and 
Simon Reynolds 

Militant Tendencies Feed Music 


Autonomy in the UK 

The Secret Sadness of the Twenty-First Century: James Blake’s 
Overgrown 

Review: David Bowie’s The Next Day 

The Man Who Has Everything: Drake’s Nothing Was the Same 
Break it Down: DJ Rashad’s Double Cup 

Start Your Nonsense! On eMMplekz and Dolly Dolly 
Review: Sleaford Mods’ Divide and Exit and Chubbed Up: The 
Singles Collection 

Test Dept: Where Leftist Idealism and Popular Modernism 
Collide 

No Romance Without Finance 


PART FOUR 
For Now, Our Desire is Nameless: Political Writings 


Don’t Vote, Don’t Encourage Them 

October 6, 1979: Capitalism and Bipolar Disorder 

What If They Had a Protest and Everyone Came 
Defeating the Hydra 

The Face of Terrorism Without a Face 

Conspicuous Force and Verminisation 

My Card: My Life: Comments on the AMEX Red Campaign 
The Great Bullingdon Club Swindle 

The Privatisation of Stress 

Kettle Logic 

Winter of Discontent 2.0: Notes on a Month of Militancy 
Football/Capitalist Realism/Utopia 

The Game Has Changed 

Creative Capitalism 

Reality Management 


UK Tabloid 

The Future is Still Ours: Autonomy and Post-Capitalism 
Aesthetic Poverty 

The Only Certainties are Death and Capital 

Why Mental Health is a Political Issue 

The London Hunger Games 

Time-Wars: Towards an Alternative for the Neo-Capitalist Era 
Not Failing Better, but Fighting to Win 

The Happiness of Margaret Thatcher 

Suffering With a Smile 

How to Kill a Zombie: Strategising the End of Neoliberalism 
Getting Away With Murder 

No One is Bored, Everything is Boring 

A Time for Shadows 

Limbo is Over 

Communist Realism 

Pain Now 

Abandon Hope (Summer is Coming) 

For Now, Our Desire is Nameless 

Anti-Therapy 

Democracy is Joy 

Cybergothic vs. Steampunk 

Mannequin Challenge 


PART FIVE 
We Have to Invent the Future: Interviews 


They Can Be Different in the Future Too: Interviewed by 
Rowan Wilson for Ready Steady Book (2010) 

Capitalist Realism: Interviewed by Richard Capes (2011) 

Preoccupying: Interviewed by the Occupied Times (2012) 


We Need a Post-Capitalist Vision: Interviewed by AntiCapitalist 
Initiative (2012) 

“We Have to Invent the Future”: An Unseen Interview with 
Mark Fisher (2012) 

Hauntology, Nostalgia and Lost Futures: Interviewed by 
Valerio Mannucci and Valerio Mattioli for Nero (2014) 


PART SIX 
We Are Not Here to Entertain You: Reflections 


One Year Later... 

Spinoza, k-punk, Neuropunk 

Why Dissensus? 

New Comments Policy 

Comments Policy (Latest) 

Chronic Demotivation 

How to Keep Oedipus Alive in Cyberspace 

We Dogmatists 

London Litened 

No Future 2012 

Ridicule Is Nothing to Be Scared Of (Slight Return) 
Break Through in Grey Lair 

Real Abstractions: The Application of Theory to the Modern 
World 

No I’ve Never Had a Job... 

Fear and Misery in Neoliberal Britain 

Exiting the Vampire Castle 

Good for Nothing 


PART SEVEN 
Acid Communism 


Acid Communism (Unfinished Introduction) 
Notes 


Acknowledgements 


foreword 


The strange thing is that I encountered Mark’s mind long 
before I actually met him. In a way, I knew him before I even 
knew of him. 

Let me explain. In 1994, I wrote a piece for Melody Maker 
about D-Generation, a concept-laden outfit from Manchester 
whose line-up included Mark. But I only ever spoke on the 
phone with another member, Simon Biddell. Because I was so 
interested in D-Generation’s ideas, it never even occurred to 
me to do the basic journalistic procedure of asking who else 
was in the group. So it was a full decade later that I learned 
I'd effectively written about Mark, when he shyly revealed 
this fact in an email to me. And sure enough, digging out the 
yellowing clip — D-Generation as “Pick of the Week” in the 
Advance section of Melody Maker — there was Mark right in 
the centre of the photo: his hair in a vaguely Madchester- 
style bob, his eyes staring out at the reader with a searching, 
baleful intensity. 

D-Generation were one of those groups that are grist for 
the mill of the music press, catnip to a certain kind of critic: 
the conceptual framing was piquant and provocative, the 
sound itself lagged slightly behind the spiel. Rereading the 


piece and listening for the first time in many years to D- 
Generation’s EP Entropy in the UK, it’s fascinating just how 
many of Mark’s signature fixations were already in evidence. 
There’s the centrality of punk in his worldview: D-Generation 
described their music as “techno haunted by the ghost of the 
punk” (literally, in “The Condition of Muzak”, which sampled 
Johnny Rotten’s Winterland 1978 kiss-off “ever get the feeling 
you've been cheated?” and turned his bitter jeering laugh 
into a riff). There’s the love-hate for Englishness: hating the 
hale ‘n’ hearty, artless and anti-intellectual side of the 
national character (“Rotting Hill” sampled “Merrie England? 
England was never merry!” from the film version of Lucky 
Jim), loving a darkly arty deviant tradition that included the 
Fall, Wyndham Lewis, and Michael Moorcock (all referenced 
in D-Generation’s press release). There’s also early evidence 
of Mark’s virulent contempt for retro: “73/93” targeted what 
D-Generation dubbed the “Nostalgia Conspiracy”. And there’s 
even flickering ectoplasmic portents of hauntology, that 
twenty-first century current of music and thought and 
sensibility that Mark championed so compellingly. 

Beyond those specifics, though, it’s the structure of the 
encounter itself that is revealing and prefiguring. Here’s a 
music journalist (in this case, me) hungrily on the look-out 
for a group with ideas, and, having found one (in this case, D- 
Generation), forming a symbiotic alliance with musicians who 
themselves think like critics. That’s how Mark would operate 
when he got to the other side of divide. In his fruitful 
relationships with Burial, the Caretaker, Junior Boys, and 
other artists, a mutually intensifying feedback loop between 
the music-theorist and the music-practitioner was set in 


motion. The borderline between the two fronts of activity 
dissolved. Both critic and artist contributed equally to the 
scene, pushing it ever forward in a dialectic of advance, 
counter-reaction, swerve, clash. 

Raised on the British music press of the Eighties 
(primarily NME) and fuelled further by what survived of its 
approach and spirit into the Nineties (primarily Melody Maker 
and the Wire), Mark Fisher was possibly the last of a 
disappearing breed: the music critic as prophet. The primary 
mission was identifying the leading edge and proselytising on 
its behalf, while simultaneously directing laser beams of 
negativity to discredit the wrong paths being taken and to 
clear space for the true music of our time. But alongside 
weaponised praise in support of the new and radical, the 
messianic critic also set challenges for music — and for 
listeners and readers too. 

Mark Fisher became the best music writer of his 
generation. But that is just one of his areas of achievement. 
Mark wrote brilliantly about the arts adjacent to popular 
music: television, science fiction, mainstream movies 
(particularly the pulp end of the spectrum — it always 
amazed me that he would routinely check out things like the 
CGI-bloated 2005 remake of King Kong, just on the off chance 
there was something salvageable there, something he could 
recruit to his “pulp modernism” concept). Mark wrote 
rivetingly about high culture too — visual arts, photography, 
literature, highbrow cinema. And he wrote penetratingly 
about politics, philosophy, mental health, the Internet and 
social media (the phenomenology of digital life — its peculiar 
affects of connected loneliness and distracted boredom). 


Often, and most crucially, Mark wrote about many — 
sometimes all — of these things at the same time. Making 
connections across far-flung fields, zooming in for vivid 
attention to aesthetic particulars and zooming out again to 
the widest possible scope, Mark would locate the metaphysics 
in a TV show like Sapphire and Steel, the psychoanalytic truths 
lurking in a Joy Division song, the political resonances 
stitched into the fabric of a Burial album or Kubrick movie. 
His subject was all of human life (even though he would 
characterise himself as neither a humanist nor a vitalist). The 
ambition was vast; the vision was total. 

The exciting thing about Mark’s writing — in his blog k- 
punk, in magazines like the Wire, FACT, Frieze, and New 
Humanist, and in his books for Zer0 and Repeater — was the 
feeling that he was on a journey: the ideas were going 
somewhere, a gigantic edifice of thought was in the process of 
construction. You sensed, with mounting awe, that Mark was 
building a system. There was a feeling too that while the work 
was rigorous and deeply informed, it was not academic, 
either in terms of its intended audience or as an exercise 
done purely for its own sake. The urgency in Mark’s prose 
came from his faith that words really could change things. His 
writing made everything feel more meaningful, supercharged 
with significance. Reading Mark was a rush. An addiction. 


After that odd not-quite-encounter with D-Generation, the 
first time I came across the name “Mark Fisher” was a byline 
in the strikingly designed periodicals that emanated from an 
enigmatic entity known as Ccru. I can’t recall whether they 
sent me their tracts or whether it was our mutual friend 


Kodwo Eshun who turned me on. Right from the start, Mark’s 
work stood out. Much of the output of the Cybernetic culture 
research unit, a para-academic organisation loosely tethered 
to Warwick University’s Philosophy Department, was wilfully 
hermetic, closer to experimental fiction than academic work. 
Practically writhing on the page, Mark’s prose wasn’t 
scholarly either, but it was always lucid. Oh, he was partial — 
as we all were in those days — to gnomic neologisms and 
portmanteau terms; there was an exuberant play with 
language in amidst the apocalyptic sobriety and urgency of 
the tone. But —and this would characterise his entire career 
as a writer — Mark hardly ever made his writing more dense 
or difficult than it needed to be. He had the zeal of the true 
communicator, someone who believes that the ideas and the 
issues being addressed are simply too important to be 
obfuscated. Why put obstacles in the way of understanding? 
I’m sure this is why Mark’s work found a readership that 
extended beyond the narrow field of scholars and the 
university-educated that some of his more arcane and 
abstruse interests might have indicated. He didn’t talk down 
to anyone, ever, but he always invited the reader in, pulled 
them along with him. 

I met Mark for the first time in 1998, having persuaded 
the academic magazine Lingua Franca to assign me a lengthy 
piece about Ccru and its allies in renegade academia like 
O[rphan] D[rift>]. Compared with the deranging strangeness 
of their texts, Ccru in person were surprisingly mild and, 
well, British. But again, Mark stood out a little from his 
comrades, for his sheer intensity. I remember the way his 
hands shook with passion as he held forth acerbically on 


everything from the cyberpunk aesthetics of jungle to the 
decrepitude of socialism. Although soft-spoken, you could see 
already a distinct flair for public speaking, the aura of an 
orator in the making. 

After that, Mark and I rubbed shoulders online as 
contributors to the post-rave music theory site Hyperdub, 
founded by Ccru member Steve Goodman, aka Kode9. But full- 
blown friendship really came when Mark hurled himself into 
the blogging fray in 2003, starting k-punk a few months after 
I launched my own Blissblog. With incredible speed, a rough 
equivalent to the old UK weekly music press reconstituted 
itself online. Or so I liked to think, anyway: that this was the 
music press in exile, a reactivation of all of its bygone best 
aspects that you could no longer find in the surviving print 
remnants (what passed for NME by then, monthlies like Q). 
Well, all except for the getting paid aspect. But on the early 
2000s blog scene, the broader perspective that the golden-era 
rock press had — where music held a privileged status, but 
film, TV, fiction, politics bubbled in the mix too — was 
miraculously and unexpectedly resurrected. 

“It wasn’t only about music and music wasn’t only about 
music”, is how Mark put it, talking about what NME had 
meant to him growing up, a working-class boy with limited 
access to high culture. “It was a medium that made demands 
on you.” The same applied to the blog circuit, whose 
population of autodidacts, independent researchers, 
disenchanted academics (like Mark) and assorted oddballs 
formulated theories and ransacked the works of famous 
thinkers for concepts and analytical tools to misuse. In 
compensation for not being able to make a livelihood off your 


ravings and rantings, the blogging platform afforded extra 
powers: incredible speed of response, flexibility of format 
(you could blog extensive think-pieces or miniature thought- 
bombs), and the ability to illustrate the writing using images, 
audio, video. Best of all, there was an interactive and 
collective aspect to blogging that had only ever been 
glimpsed in the music press (with the readers’ letter page, 
writers arguing amongst each other week by week, and the 
regular uptake of malcontents from the fiery fanzines). The 
blog circuit was a true network. 

Fizzing with fervour, k-punk soon became the hub of the 
community. Mark was a dynamo, hurling out provocations, 
ideas that demanded engagement. He became a cult figure. A 
catalyst. He was also the perfect host, convening a salon-style 
energy in the k-punk comments section, igniting debate and 
defusing dispute when things got a little testy (as they 
inevitably did). That amiably fractious spirit would then 
inform the message board Dissensus that Mark co-founded 
with Matthew Ingram (whose Woebot was our community’s 
other hub). In some ways, it was in these comments sections 
and message board threads that Mark was in his truest 
element: arguing, sometimes agreeing, but always building on 
his interlocutor’s point, pushing the conversation further 
along. Some of his best insights and lines emerged out of this 
back-and-forth: jewels that are hard to disentangle from the 
discursive thicket of their moment, countless brief exchanges 
and interactions in which his mind flexed itself most playfully 
and merrily. 

During this whole period of the early-to-mid 2000s, I 
found myself in a pleasantly disorienting situation: someone 


whom I’d influenced became someone who influenced me. 
There was a certain edgy excitement to turning on the 
computer every morning and immediately checking to see 
what Mark had thrown down in terms of an ideas-gauntlet — 
a definite feeling of having to keep up. We would often 
operate as a long-distance double-act (with a five-hour delay, 
Mark being in London and me in New York). One of us would 
pick up on something the other had written. It was a 
complementary (and complimentary) relationship, like a 
baton being passed back and forth, but it also fairly 
frequently involved respectful disagreement. Others joined in 
as well, of course; it was an omnidirectional free for all. 

As much as it was a cooperative endeavour, this blog 
circuit and in particular the dialogue between Mark and 
myself, there was also an undercurrent of competition. (No 
doubt this is the case with writers in many different fields). 
An unusual sensation, for me, of being outflanked and out- 
done, and having to repeatedly raise my game. In some of our 
exchanges, Mark had the advantage of seeing things in 
starker, more black-and-white terms, whereas I tended to see 
shades of grey, or recognise that there were things to be said 
in favour of the opposing view. That might be a virtue in real 
life, but in writing it definitely softens your attack. 

Mark could access greater resources of “nihilation” — his 
term for a ruthless drive, on the part of a critic or an artist, to 
reject other approaches and condemn them to history’s 
trashcan. (This dismissiveness was a feature of his print 
persona, I should add; in person, he was generous and open.) 
The improviser John Butcher described this mindset from an 
artist’s point of view in a 2008 interview with the Wire: 


This music is here in opposition to other music. It 
doesn’t all co-exist together nicely. The fact that I have 
chosen to do this implies that I don’t value what you’re 
doing over there. My activity calls into questions the 
value of your activity. This is what informs our musical 
thinking and decision making. 


For Fisher and Butcher alike, severity towards “the 
opposition” is the mark of seriousness, a sign that something 
is at stake and that differences are worth fighting over. Above 
all, it is this negative capacity — the strength of will to 
discredit and discard — that keeps music and culture rattling 
along furiously in a forward direction, not wishy-washy 
tolerance and anythinggoes positivity. If music-making can 
be a form of “active criticism”, then criticism could equally be 
a sort of soundless contribution to music. 

To gather my thoughts and clear my head before writing 
this, I went for a walk. There was something of an English feel 
to the bright and beautiful February morning in Southern 
California — a blustery breeze sent huge clouds skidding 
across the sky, their tufty whiteness shot through with 
piercing sunlight, creating that somehow crazed quality I 
associate with partly-cloudy summer days in the UK. I would 
love to have shown Mark around Los Angeles, shown him 
some of its other sides (he had some fixed ideas about the 
city, largely derived from Michael Mann’s Heat and 
Baudrillard’s America!). And I would love to have been shown 
around Suffolk, the coastal landscapes Mark loved. 

But the amount of time we spent in each other’s physical 
company was painfully small. It’s possible that the number of 


meetings is in single figures. Mark and I lived on different 
continents most of the time we knew each other. That lent a 
kind of purity to the friendship, based as it was almost 
entirely on the written word: there was a lot of mental 
communing via email, inter-blog debate, message boards... 
but not much hanging out. 

That means that what I’ve written here can only be a 
partial portrait of Mark, as both a public figure and as a man. 
We knew each other mostly as virtual colleagues and 
unofficial collaborators (we never co-wrote anything, but we 
formed a united front in various joint campaigns, like the 
hardcore continuum, hauntology, and a general anti-retro 
polemic). Above all, I knew him as a reader. (Again, the 
disconcerting thing was to become a fan of someone who had 
been a fan of me). But I know that there are many other Mark 
Fishers. Mark the teacher, Mark the editor, Mark the son and 
spouse and father. I encountered him almost entirely in the 
rarefied realms of discourse — usually fairly fevered 
discourse — and didn’t get to see that much of him in more 
casual, everyday modes. I would love to have known better 
these other Marks — Mark at play, Mark having a laugh, Mark 
relaxing, Mark with his family. 

The last time I saw Mark in the flesh was in September 
2012, at the music festival Incubate in Tilburg, Holland. The 
theme of the festival was do-it-yourself. I gave the keynote, 
interrogating certain aspects of DIY ideology and wondering 
whether it had outlived its usefulness as a cultural ideal. 
Mark was set to follow and spontaneously decided to drop 
what he was going to say and improvise a new talk, building 
on my argument. It was like the old blog days, except this 


time happening in real-time and real-space. Where I had read 
from a pre-written text that I laced with the occasional ad lib, 
Mark spoke completely off the cuff, pulling riffs from the 
formidable arsenal in his brain, generating new thoughts and 
making electric connections. The performance was typical 
both of his collegiality and his mental agility. Mark likened it 
later to a stand-up routine — adding that it was becoming a 
problem that institutions and individuals were video- 
recording his talks and putting them up on YouTube, because 
people would become overly familiar with his material. But I 
can’t imagine that was really ever going to be a problem: 
Mark was an inexhaustible font of insight and overview, 
bubbling over with fresh perceptions and _ original 
articulations, memorable maxims and acute aphorisms. He 
was never going to run out of things to say. 

But then Mark ran out of time. 

I feel his absence as a friend, as a comrade, but most of all 
as a reader. There are many days when I wonder what Mark 
would have had to say about this or that. I hadn’t realised 
how dependent I had become on the surprises and challenges 
that Mark would throw out there at regular intervals: the 
spur and spark of his writing, the clarity he could bring to 
almost anything he shone his light upon. I miss Mark’s mind. 
It’s a lonely feeling. 


Simon Reynolds, 2018 


editor’s 
introduction 


“We have to invent the future.” 
— Mark Fisher! 


Mark Fisher (k-punk) was not, and never wanted to be, a 
conventional academic writer, theorist or critic. His writing 
was too abrasive, polemical, lucid, unsentimental, personal, 
insightful and compelling for that. Despite displaying the 
most acute understanding of the physical, psychological, 
economic and cultural consequences of contemporary 
capitalism, his work was also optimistic and strategically 
operative. A great deal of his writing was undertaken in 
vehement opposition to the all-too evident PoMo dissociation 
and collective alienation around us, and as a response to what 
he termed the “boring dystopia” of our shared present, to the 
increasingly depthless present of this new millennium. Mark 
provided original, savage and stylish dissections of our 
moribund culture, and continually observed how popular 
modernist films, books, television and music that had had a 


lifelong effect on him continue to “haunt” our collective 
present. 

In the 1990s Mark studied for a PhD in philosophy at the 
University of Warwick, successfully completing his thesis in 
1999 titled “Flatline Constructs: Gothic Materialism and 
Cybernetic Theory-Fiction”. Whilst at Warwick he was one of 
the founding members of the Cybernetic culture research 
unit (Ccru), along with others such as Nick Land, Sadie Plant, 
Kodwo Eshun, Steve Goodman (Kode9), Robin Mackay and 
Luciana Parisi. Several years later, whilst working as an FE 
teacher in Kent, he began his blog k-punk. k-punk emerged in 
the early days of blogging, where it quickly became an 
important part of a community of emergent bloggers, 
including music journalists Simon Reynolds, Ian Penman and 
David Stubbs, philosophers Nina Power, Alex Williams, Lars 
Iyer, Adam Kotsko, Jodi Dean and Steven Shaviro, writer and 
activist Richard Seymour, writers Siobhan McKeown and Carl 
Neville, and architecture critic Owen Hatherley. One of the 
most vital aspects of blogging for k-punk during those early 
days was the simple element of re-connection, of becoming 
involved in a new online collective at a time in his life, after 
Warwick, Ccru and the PhD, when he was perhaps at his most 
isolated. As he recalls in a 2010 interview: 


I started blogging as a way of getting back into writing 
after the traumatic experience of doing a PhD. PhD 
work bullies one into the idea that you can’t say 
anything about any subject until you’ve read every 
possible authority on it. But blogging seemed a more 
informal space, without that kind of pressure. Blogging 


was a way of tricking myself back into doing serious 
writing. I was able to con myself, thinking, “it doesn’t 
matter, it’s only a blog post, it’s not an academic 
paper”. But now I take the blog rather more seriously 


than writing academic papers.” 


And in a post written exactly a year after launching the blog, 
he writes: 


It’s been my only connection to the world, my only 
outside line... It’s reinvigorated my enthusiasm for so 
many things, and pricked my enthusiasm for things I’d 


never previously considered...° 


The early years of the k-punk blog were ones marked by 
intensity and informality, with regular swathes of writing and 
numerous dialogues. k-punk traced the positive effects of 
regular writing, enabling Mark to access the depths of his 
own obsessions and interests and refine his own powerful 
style. As he developed he began to connect into a kind of 
thematic rhythm, and over the years, one begins to see his 
thoughts coalesce around the themes of hauntology, popular 
modernism and capitalist realism. As he acknowledges, k- 
punk was written as a way for him to escape from the 
imposed bonds and pointless strictures of academic writing. 
Dense, allusive, theoretically rich and abrasive posts were 
written in response to a consistent set of personal obsessions 
and external stimuli (a film, book or album to be reviewed; an 
event to be contextualised or theorised) and were often 
written with a real sense of urgency, by the need to 


participate in an ongoing dialogue, or by a self-imposed 
deadline. These k-punk posts encapsulated an intellectual 
moment of reflection on the world: they are responsive, 
immediate, and provide an affectively charged perspective. 
Some of his references and allusions are undoubtedly 
challenging and potentially intimidating — Spinoza, Kant, 
Nietzsche, Marcuse, Adorno, Althusser, Deleuze and Guattari, 
Baudrillard, Jameson, Zizek, Zupan¢cié, Berardi, Badiou, Lacan 
— but his writing is never marked by the zealous pedantry 
exhibited by so much academic writing in the theoretical 
humanities. Mark has faith in the intelligence and rationality 
of his readers; he trusts their capacity to be challenged by 
unfamiliarity, complexity and the new. He consistently 
displays the courage to take up a strong theoretical and 
practical position. His work rows against the tide of anti- 
intellectualism in the present which has tried so hard to 
flatten things out to a level of cretinous instrumentality and 
utilitarian stupidity. 

For us, the readers of the k-punk blog, his writing always 
gives us reasons for continuing, against the odds, to hope for 
an alternative to the dystopian present. This is not just a 
consequence of the specific content of his writing, but is as 
much to do with the fact that he was there at all, for the 
persistence of his provocative and challenging voice. That 
voice — strident, angry, fiercely intelligent, sophisticated and 
enthusiastic, serious and animated — is so close to the way he 
actually spoke in person. There is always a real intimacy to 
his writing, and he possessed a unique and rare talent to be 
able to articulate his thoughts and ideas without the written 
words diminishing, softening or reducing them. Mark’s voice 


is preserved in his work, and it is preserved online. 

The first two k-punk posts in this collection, “Why K?” 
and “Book Meme”, both written in 2005, offer us some precise 
insight into Mark’s reasons for blogging as k-punk, together 
with an understanding of his operative objectives and 
ambitions. 

One of these is the ongoing belief in simply grasping the 
new technological democracy of blogging and using it as a 
“kind of conduit for continuing trade between popular 
culture and theory”. k-punk’s belief in the importance of 
outsider forms of discourse never wavered. There is a 
consistent belief in the operative effectiveness of fugitive 
discourses which have been legitimated by neither the official 
channels of the establishment (via academia or mainstream 
media outlets) or traditional forms of publishing. In the early 
days of k-punk this was something he particularly came to 
associate with blogging: 


All that is lacking is the will, the belief that what can 
happen in something that does not have 
authorisation/legitimation can be as important — more 
important — than what comes through official 


channels.4 


Another is his declared fidelity to the ideas of Kafka and 
Spinoza, along with his allegiance to a whole host of things 
which, by articulating and confirming his own perceptions, 
modernist sensibilities and thoughts of existential 
detachment, alternative possibilities and perspectives, he felt 
had first brought him to a degree self-awareness: Joyce, 


Burroughs, Ballard, Beckett, Selby. The early books, the 
music, the television, the films, the ideas, the events. The 
Miners’ strike, the Falklands war, Thatcherism, Blairism, 
post-punk, Joy Division, the Fall, Scritti Politti, Magazine, acid 
house, jungle, Goldie, Deleuze and Guattari, Marx, Jameson, 
Zizek, Foucault, Nietzsche, the Ccru, Cronenberg, Atwood, 
Priest, M.R. James, Nigel Kneale, Marcuse, Penman, Reynolds, 
Batman, and in later years The Hunger Games, Burial, Sleaford 
Mods, the Caretaker and Russell Brand. The performativity of 
the k-punk blog was, at least in part, undertaken as part of a 
personal survival strategy, to regain and persistently re-state 
fidelity to those things in which he had discovered the 
original ideas that had animated and inspired him. He says as 
much in “Book Meme”: 


The periods of my adult life that have been most 
miserable have been those in which I lost fidelity to 
what I discovered then, in the pages of Joyce, 


Dostoyevsky, Burroughs, Beckett, Selby...° 


This fidelity is key, because it provides the animating fibre 
that underpins the vast collage which he somehow 
synthesises into an effective and operative worldview 
opposed to the tedious banalities of a present ruled by the 
merciless logic of what he came to term “capitalist realism”, 
where alternative possibilities have become increasingly 
proscribed and reduced to almost nothing. His forensic 
attention was so brilliantly attuned to those often unnoticed 
traces of modernism in texts, music, films and television 
programmes, and he repeatedly worked out acute readings of 


popular culture as if piecing together, one by one, the 
fragmented pages of a lost manifesto of cultural alchemy 
necessary for challenging the disastrous tyranny of the 
present. For more than a decade, k-punk served as a critical 
epicentre for hauntology and counterculture, highlighting 
the latent radical potential of a lost and receding twentieth- 
century modernism. The k-punk blog warped the reality field 
by repeatedly and incisively piercing through the drab fabric 
of the early years of this new millennium. k-punk brought 
important, uncomfortable and original challenges to the 
present, interrupting it with shards of difference, elements of 
the past that remained out of joint with the present, that 
disrupted the inertial logic of our times. At its very best it 
served to effectively resist the tendency for things to settle 
into a hazy homogenous present where time equals capital, 
and where everything is flattened out into commodified and 
easily digestible consumables. It did this by keeping open a 
space for alternative possibilities, and by refusing to allow 
important things to become reduced to the mediocre, the 
banal, the downright stupid, and the boring. 

Finally, there is his exemplary antipathy and negativity 
towards PoMo hyper-ironic posturing, dreary hopey-feely 
liberal leftism, delibidinised culture, upper-class superiority, 
vampiric trolls, vitalist positivity, and Deleuzo-creationism, 
which was always evident on the k-punk blog. The sentiments 


and positioning of his challenging and controversial piece 


116 


“Exiting the Vampire Castle”® in 2013 is no less evident in 


earlier k-punk posts like “New Comments Policy”’ in 2004 


18 


and “We Dogmatists”’ in 2005. His savage, cold-rational 


polemics are often in full force throughout the life of the k- 
punk project. Take this for example from “Noise as Anti- 
Capital”: 


THERE IS NO DIGNITY. Don’t confuse the working class 
with the proletariat. Thatcher inhibits the emergence 
of the proletariat by buying off the working class with 
payment capital and the promise of owning your own 
Oed-I-Pod. The comforts of slavery. She gives the 
replicants screen memories and family photos. So that 
they forget that they were only ever artificial, factory 
farmed to function as the Kapital-Thing’s self- 
replicating HR pool, and begin to believe that they are 
authentic human subjects. The proletariat is not the 
confederation of such _ subjectivities but their 
dissolution in globalised k-space. The virtual population 
of nu-earth... The heroism of the proletariat consists 
not in its dignified resistance to the inorganic- 
inhumanity of the industrialisation process... but in its 
mutative Duchamp-transformation of its body into an 


inhuman inorganic constructivist machine.? 


In 2007, Mark left his teaching job in Kent and moved to 
Woodbridge in Suffolk, where he began working on what 
would become his first book, Capitalist Realism: Is There No 
Alternative?, published in 2009 with Zer0 Books, the 
alternative publisher he had helped to co-found with his 
friend Tarig Goddard.'° This book, which synthesised some of 
his strongest early posts on k-punk, firmly established Mark’s 
reputation as one of the important contemporary theorists. 


The publication of Capitalist Realism crystallised new forms of 
collective connection for Mark at the very point the original 
blogging community had begun to fragment and become a 
much more fractious and difficult space in which to operate. 
Although Mark continued to blog as k-punk, it became less 
and less frequent as he pursued his work, thought and 
activism in the form of invited lectures, talks and Q&As, as 
well as the pieces he wrote as a freelance writer having to 
earn a living. Mark’s frustration with the direction that blogs 
and forums had taken is clearly evident in a number of 
charged and polemical k-punk posts regarding the etiquette 
of comments and discussion, as well as his numerous 
interventions found on online forums. 

After a precarious period of freelance writing Mark began 
to teach again, teaching courses in philosophy for City Lit and 
the University of East London, and later had a permanent 
position at Goldsmiths. He went on to produce two further 
volumes of published work, Ghosts of My Life for ZerO in 2014 
and The Weird and the Eerie for his newly formed Repeater 
Books at the end of 2016. Both volumes cull work from k- 
punk and from his commissioned reviews and interviews for 
the Wire, a magazine he had acted as Deputy Editor for in 
2008. During this period he also published significant 
amounts of writing for online and print publications in the 
form of book chapters, music reviews, film reviews, opinion 
pieces, pieces of activism and theoretical essays, as well as 
continued posts for k-punk. It is the aim of this volume to 
bring together for the first time a significant portion of this 
writing. 

The editorial task of putting together this collection was, 


at times, akin to a peculiar form of digital archaeology and 
memento mori. It involved excavating a decade of digital 
layers, often confronting digital lacunae where the 
reconstruction of lost dialogues from online fragments, 
interlocutors having gone missing, became necessary. 
Sometimes the task was one of recovering lost memories 
from pages haunted by dead links, a task that felt oddly 
appropriate given Mark’s emphasis on hauntology. It was 
accompanied by a strange melancholy, contemporary since it 
had been birthed by the first layers of the online age, but also 
weirdly resonant with previous forms of melancholy and 
memory associated with found photographs, diary fragments, 
carvings, etchings, paintings. I will confess that I had some 
trepidation that much of the writing by k-punk from the last 
decade, once excavated, would have lost something with the 
inexorable passing of time. But I quickly discovered that this 
is in fact not the case. There is so much here that remains 
vital, fascinating, inspiring and insightful, and a great deal of 
this writing is gathered together for this collection. 

There were inevitably difficulties regarding the decision 
about what to include and exclude. It was immediately 
evident that there is a vast reservoir of writing, almost 
overwhelming in terms of its scale and scope. Yet, what also 
became sadly evident is its sheer finite quality. As one reads 
through Mark’s collected writings one is simply led to the 
incredibly sad realisation that this is all there is, and all there 


ever will be. As David Stubbs wrote for the Quietus, Mark’s 


death “leaves a gaping crater in modern intellectual life”.™ 


The loss of Mark’s voice from the present situation is 
incalculable, let alone his companionship, camaraderie, and 


friendship. I will now provide a few words about the working 
criteria for inclusion that governed the assembly of this 
volume. 

The first priority was to avoid any unnecessary repetition 
of previously existing published material in his three 
published books — Capitalist Realism, Ghosts of my Life and The 
Weird and the Eerie — together with his essays in the two 
edited and co-edited volumes on Michael Jackson and post- 


punk.!* As was noted above, he had culled material for all of 
these publications from k-punk and his writings in the Wire, 
and therefore much of that material is excluded from this 
collection. Where there are exceptions it was felt necessary to 
include original posts which had been either significantly 
truncated or modified by Mark for subsequent publication in 
these volumes, and these pieces have been clearly indicated 
in the endnotes. 

There was a clear need to reflect the full range of his k- 
punk writing on many different subjects from 2004-2016, 
rather than concentrate on just his music or film writing. The 
aim was always to provide as comprehensive a picture as 
possible of the blog throughout its lifetime by selecting pieces 
that reflect both its eclectic content, its theoretical pluralism 
and most of all its remarkable consistency. His earlier pre-k- 
punk writing, including that undertaken as part of the Ccru, 
is not included here. For this collection the decision was 
made to concentrate solely on his writing after the inception 
of the k-punk blog, and for his earlier work to be the province 
of another volume. A very small number of early k-punk 
posts, e.g. on antinatalism, were excluded by virtue of the fact 
that they seemed wildly out of step with Mark’s overall 


theoretical and political development, and because they 
seemed to reflect a temporary enthusiasm for a dogmatic 
theoretical misanthropy he repudiated in his later writing 
and life. There was also a need to represent the sheer breadth 
of Mark’s other writings — his freelance reviews, 
commissions and activism, including his writing for the Wire, 
Frieze, New Humanist, the Visual Artists’ New Sheet, Electronic 
Beats, the Guardian, etc. Sometimes these resonate with and 
reflect on pieces he published on k-punk, but more often he 
wrote on a range of subjects and themes not found on the 
blog. 

The pieces chosen for the collection needed be of 
sufficient length and depth to work in a published volume — 
there are so many insightful one or two paragraph blog posts 
on k-punk that are excluded for that reason. Their 
effectiveness is largely down to the context of the blog 
architecture and community, whether they are interventions 
in ongoing online conversations and dialogues, or immediate 
response pieces to something happening in the media, online, 
or in the everyday. There are, however, a few exceptions to 
this where it just seemed criminal not to include them, 
usually because they were exemplary bursts of critical 
savagery or brilliant pieces of brutal polemic. 

For the purposes of this single-volume collection, there 
was a need to abstract k-punk posts, to a certain extent, from 
the old blog community architecture, and yet, at the same 
time, try to retain a certain flavour of that community of blog 
writing. In abstracting posts it was important not to 
completely lose sight of the fact that they were originally 
written as blog pieces, and to try and retain a sense of their 


immediacy, informality, collaborative qualities and the sense 
of them as being part of an ongoing online continuum. This 
was a delicate balance to achieve, sometimes necessitated by 
the simple fact that many of his online blog interlocutors 
have long disappeared from online or abandoned their blogs, 
leaving them like ghost ships in cyberspace. Where this 
balance was simply not possible or unworkable, pieces have 
been excluded. The advantage of a collection of writings such 
as this lies in the fact that it allows readers to access a vast 
range of Mark’s work on a whole host of different topics and 
themes, all in one place. It allows for an appreciation of the 
sheer scale, depth and originality of his work. However, | 
have been conscious of the peculiar disadvantages of doing 
this with Mark’s writing, the vast majority of which appears 
on his k-punk blog, in that it extracts and abstracts his work 
from the very specific context of the blog — its immediacy, its 
dialogic nature, its hyperlinked architecture and its sense of a 
holistic continuum. I have tried very hard to retain some 
important aspects of that particular quality of his writing in 
transposing it to a collection such as this, and where possible 
I took guidance from the way Mark himself carried this out 
when he culled his k-punk writing for his published books. All 
titles of the pieces are either Mark’s own or those of the 
editors of the publications for which he wrote. Each piece 
includes a reference indicating when and in which 
publication it first appeared. The spelling and punctuation 
have, with some exceptions, been regularised and rendered 
consistent across the collection. 

Rather than simply arrange the writing in chronological 
order, the decision was made to separate the work 


chronologically into several different themed sections. This 
decision clearly has the advantage of thematic coherence for 
the reader, but the disadvantage is that it obviously creates 
an artificial division between the k-punk posts, articles, 
reviews and essays, and breaks up the hyperlinked quality of 
much of his writing. As one reads across these pieces one will 
discover the clear theoretical resonances between pieces 
written on say film, music or political activism in 2006 or 
2007, where Mark is weaving the operative influence of a 
particular theorist’s ideas or set of principles between a range 
of different topics and themes at the same time. There is a 
slight tendency for this quality to be lost in the thematic 
arrangement of this volume, but efforts to mitigate this have 
been made in the footnotes where possible. However, despite 
arranging the writing thematically, the sheer consistency of 
his work across the different topics remains absolutely 
evident. These include Mark’s ongoing fidelity to theory in 
order to provide different and challenging perspectives, 
alternative narratives, and for producing important truths. 
One also finds across all of the work a consistent 
concentration on the themes of class and collectivism, 
precarity and insecurity, depression and mental illness, 
dogmatism and purpose, attempts to trace post-capitalist 
forms of desire, the need to expose egregious forms of reality 
management, efforts to express forms of collective memory, 
and a nostalgia for popular modernism, hauntology and lost 
futures. I feel confident that the thematic arrangement of his 
work in this volume does nothing to diminish the sheer 
lucidity of his work in this regard. 

It is also the case that one of the most significant qualities 


of online writing, namely the ability to embed shortcut 
hyperlinks to references and sources, is somewhat difficult if 
not downright impossible to reproduce in traditional 
published form in a book. However, where possible, every 
effort has been made to track down and reproduce in the 
footnotes all of the surviving hyperlinks contained in k- 
punk’s posts and other online writing. 

Finally, it was important to include any unpublished 
work. What is included here represents all that is considered 
unpublished, and takes the form of the final and sadly 
unfinished k-punk post “Mannequin Challenge”, which 
addresses the US presidential election of 2016; a piece titled 
“Anti-Therapy”, taken from a talk Mark gave in 2015, which 
was then translated into German and published as part of a 
collection by Matthes & Seitz and appears here in English for 
the first time; and the unfinished introduction to Mark’s 
proposed book titled Acid Communism. The introduction to 
this final proposed work is extremely suggestive and 
significant. It is clearly the case that a great deal of Mark’s 
work was written in response to Fredric Jameson, in 
particular Jameson’s work on_ postmodernism (in 
Postmodernism or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism and A 
Singular Modernity). Mark repeatedly notes Jameson’s 
extraordinary prescience, back in 1991, in identifying and 
analysing the postmodern condition: 


Jameson [writes of] a depthless experience, in which 
the past is everywhere at the same time as the 
historical sense fades; we have a “society bereft of all 
historicity” that is simultaneously unable to present 


anything that is not a reheated version of the past. 
And: 


Could the only opposition to a culture dominated by 
what Jameson calls the “nostalgia mode” be a kind of 


nostalgia for modernism?1* 


What becomes evident in his late work on acid 
communism is how he became more and more drawn to a 
problematic identified by Jameson between Marcuse’s 
cultural exceptionalism or the “semiautonomy” of the 
cultural realm — “its ghostly, yet Utopian, existence, for good 
or ill, above the practical world of the existent” — and the 
question of whether this semiautonomy of the cultural sphere 


“has been destroyed by the logic of late capitalism”.° As 
Mark knew only too well, for Jameson this dissolution of an 
autonomous sphere of culture does not imply its 
disappearance. Rather, its dissolution is to be 


imagined in terms of an explosion: a_ prodigious 
expansion of culture throughout the social realm, to 
the point at which everything in our social life — from 
economic value and state power to practices and to the 
very structure of the psyche itself — can be said to have 
become “cultural” in some original and yet untheorised 
sense... Distance in general (including “critical 
distance” in particular) has very precisely been 
abolished in the new sphere of postmodernism. We are 
submerged in its henceforth filled and suffused 
volumes to the point where our new postmodern bodies 


are bereft of spatial coordinates and practically (let 
alone theoretically) incapable of distantiation... It is 
precisely this whole extraordinary demoralising and 


depressing original new global space which is the 
16 


“moment of truth” of postmodernism. 
And Mark, in his unfinished introduction to Acid Communism, 
insists upon revisiting the issue of the utopian vision that is 
the legacy of the Sixties, taught by Marcuse and raised here 
by Jameson: 


The ultimate political coordinates of the problem of the 
evaluation of postmodernism is one of the Utopian 
impulses to be detected in various forms of the 
postmodern today. One wants to insist very strongly on 
the necessity of the reinvention of the Utopian vision in 
any contemporary politics: this lesson, which Marcuse 
first taught us, is part of the legacy of the Sixties which 


must never be abandoned in any reevaluation of that 
£17 


period and of our relationship to i 
Here, towards the end of his life, in the unfinished 
introduction to Acid Communism, we find Mark reaching for “a 
new humanity, a new seeing, a new thinking, a new loving: 
this is the promise of acid communism”. 

Covering over a decade of writing, reading this collection 
is like taking a trip through recent cultural and political 
history with Mark as your guide. Hopefully these writings, 
together with his other published books, will serve as further 
reminder of Mark’s own utopian vision, how vital, necessary 


and exciting k-punk was, his fidelity to the possibility of 
alternatives, and simply of how much we all have lost. 


Darren Ambrose 
Whitley Bay, February 2018 


why k?? 


1. Why I started the blog? Because it seemed like a space — 
the only space — in which to maintain a kind of discourse 
that had started in the music press and the art schools, but 
which had all but died out, with what I think are appalling 
cultural and political consequences. My interest in theory was 
almost entirely inspired by writers like Ian Penman and 
Simon Reynolds, so there has always been an intense 
connection between theory and pop/film for me. No sob 
stories, but for someone from my background it’s difficult to 
see where else that interest would have come from. 


2. Because of that, my relation to the academy has always 
been uh difficult. The way in which I understood theory — 
primarily through popular culture — is generally detested in 
universities. Most dealings with the academy have been 
literally — clinically — depressing. 


3. The Ccru as an entity was developed in hostile conditions 
as a kind of conduit for continuing trade between popular 
culture and theory. The whole pulp theory/theory-fiction 
thing was/is a way of doing theory through, not “on”, pop 


cultural forms. Nick Land was the key figure here, in that it 
was he who was able to hold, for a while, a position “within” a 
university philosophy department whilst dedicatedly opening 
up connections to the outside. Kodwo Eshun is key as 
someone making connections the other way — from popular 
culture INTO abstruse theory. But what we all concurred 
upon was that something like jungle was already intensely 
theoretical; it didn’t require academics to judge it or 
pontificate upon it — the role of a theorist was as an 
intensifier. 


4, The term k-punk came out of Ccru. “K” was used as a 
libidinally preferable substitution for the California/Wired 
captured “cyber” (the word cybernetics having its origins in 
the Greek, Kuber). Ccru understood cyberpunk not as a (once 
trendy) literary genre, but as a distributive cultural tendency 
facilitated by new technologies. In the same way, “punk” 
doesn’t designate a particular musical genre, but a confluence 
outside legitimate(d) space: fanzines were more significant 
than the music in that they allowed and produced a whole 
other mode of contagious activity which destroyed the need 
for centralised control. 


5. The development of cheap and readily available sound 
production software, the web, blogs means there is an 
unprecedented punk infrastructure available. All that is 
lacking is the will, the belief that what can happen in 
something that does not have authorisation/legitimation can 
be as important — more important — than what comes 
through official channels. 


6. In terms of will, there has been an enormous retrenchment 
since 1970s punk. The availability of the means of production 
has seemed to go alongside a compensatory reassertion of 
spectacular power. 


7. To return to the academy: universities have either totally 
excluded or at least marginalised not only anyone connected 
with Ccru but also many who were at Warwick. Steve 


”? 


“Hyperdub” Goodman and Luciana Parisi are both Ccru 
agents who have managed, against the odds, to secure a 
position within universities. But most of us have been forced 
into positions outside the university. Perhaps as a result of 
not being incorporated (“bought off”), many in the Warwick 
rhizome have maintained an intense connection and robust 
independence. Much of the current theoretical drift on k- 
punk has been developed via a collaboration with Nina 
Power, Alberto Toscano and Ray Brassier (co-organiser of the 
NoiseTheoryNoise conference at Middlesex University last 
year). The growing popularity of philosophers like Zizek and 
Badiou means there is now an unexpected if rogue and 
fugitive line of support within the academy. 


8. I teach Philosophy, Religious Studies and Critical Thinking 
at Orpington College. It is a Further Education college, which 
means that its primary intake is sixteen to nineteen year- 
olds. This is difficult and challenging work, but the students 
are in the main excellent, and far more willing to enter into 
discussion than undergraduates. So I don’t at all regard this 
position as secondary or lesser than a “proper” academic 
post. 


PART ONE 


METHODS OF 
DREAMING: 
BOOKS 


book meme! 


At least two people have asked me to do this, so here — at last 
— goes. 


1) How many books do you own? 


No way of knowing. Certainly can’t count them and have no 
reliable way of calculating. 


2) What was the last book you bought? 
The Sex Appeal of the Inorganic, Mario Perniola. 
3) What was the last book you read? 


Read and finished: Michael Bracewell’s England is Mine — 
disappointing and frustrating. There are flashes of insight but 
the organisation of the book seems to change from chapter to 
chapter; at one moment the narrative is historical, the next it 
is thematic, and then regional. There is a sense of always just 
approaching the time when things are happening or just 
having missed it. Can’t help thinking that Bracewell will 
benefit from a more focused subject matter, which is why still 


I’m looking forward to his Roxy book, due out later this year. 
(And there’s way too much attention paid to Eng Lit: nothing 
will ever interest me in W.H. Boredom, for instance.) 
Finishing: Houllebecq’s Atmomised. No wonder Zizek likes 
this one. Is there a better savaging of desolate hippie 
hedonism and its pathetic legacy in New Age zen bullshit? 


4) Five books that mean a lot to me. 


(I hate all those surveys of best films/books/LPs which have 
the Latest Thing at the top, so I have only allowed myself to 
select books that have meant something to me for at least a 


decade.) 
Kafka: The Trial, The Castle 


Is it possible to reproduce, later in life, the impact that books, 
records and films have between the ages of fourteen and 
seventeen? The periods of my adult life that have been most 
miserable have been those in which I lost fidelity to what I 
discovered then, in the pages of Joyce, Dostoyevsky, 
Burroughs, Beckett, Selby... Any of those could have been 
selected, but I choose Kafka, because of all of them, it is he 
who has been the most intimate and constant companion. 

I actually encountered Kafka first in a Penguin 
compendium of The Novels of Franz Kafka that my parents, who 
knew very little about literature, bought me for Christmas 
because they thought “it looked like my kind of thing”. So it 
proved. 

It’s difficult for me now to remember how I first received 
the text. Whether I initially enjoyed it or was frustrated by it I 


couldn’t say. Kafka, after all, is a writer who doesn’t waylay 
you. He invades subtly, slowly. I imagine that at the time I 
wanted and expected a more straightforward statement of 
existentialist alienation. Yet there was very little of that in 
Kafka. This was not a world of metaphysical grandstanding 
but a seedy, cramped burrow, whose ruling affect is not 
heroic alienation but creeping embarrassment. Physical force 
plays almost no role in Kafka’s fictions — it is the ever- 
present possibility of social shaming that is the motive force 
of his winding non-plots. 

Remember the pitiful scenes in The Trial when K, looking 
for the court in an office block, knocks in turn on each door, 
making the pathetic excuse that he is a “house painter”? 
Kafka’s genius consists in banalising the absurdity of this: 
surprisingly, against all our expectations, it is indeed the case 
that K’s hearing is taking place in one of the apartments in 
the building. Of course it is. And why is he late? The more 
absurd K thinks things are, the more embarrassed he 
becomes for failing to understand “the ways” of the Court or 
of the Castle. The bureaucratic convolutions appear 
ridiculous and frustrating to him, but that is because he “has 
not understood” yet. Witness the comedy of the opening 
scenes of The Castle, which are less an anticipation of 
totalitarianism than of call centres, in which K is told that the 
telephones “function like musical instruments”. What kind of 
an idiot is he, if when he phones someone’s desk, he expects 
them to answer? Is he so wet behind the ears? 

It’s not for nothing that Alan Bennett, the laureate of 
embarrassment, is an ardent admirer of Kafka. Both Bennett 
and Kafka understand that, no matter how absurd their 


rituals, pronunciations, clothes might appear to be, the ruling 
class are unembarrassable; that is not because there is a 
special code which only they understand — there is no code, 
precisely — but that whatever they do is alright, because it is 
THEM doing it. Conversely, if you are not of the “in-crowd”, 
nothing you can do could EVER be right; you are a priori 
guilty. 


Atwood: Cat’s Eye 


A while back, Luke asked me what an example of “cold 
rationalist” literature would look like. Atwood, with her 
reputation for coldness, is an obvious answer, but in truth, 
more or less all literature is cold rationalist. Why? Because it 
allows us to see ourselves as chains of cause and effect and 
thereby, paradoxically, to attain the only measure of freedom 
available to us. (Even Wordsworth, who admired Spinoza, 
described poetry as “emotion recollected in tranquility”, i.e. 
not raw emotion expressed in some Dionysian ejaculation.) 

Cat’s Eye isn’t my favourite Atwood novel — that would be 
the stark Surfacing — but it is the one that means most to me. 
I don’t even remember all of the plot; what I will never forget 
are Atwood’s horribly vivid descriptions of the pitiless 
Hobbesian cruelty of teenage “friendships”. They walk behind 
you so as they can criticise your shoes, the way you walk... They are 
worse than your worst enemies. The long days, the breakfast 
toast turning to cardboard in your mouth, the anxiety so sharp 
and constant that you forget it is there, no longer even 
register it. 

Are your most formative years those of your early 


childhood or your early teens? Reading Cat’s Eye in my early 
twenties was a kind of auto-psychoanalysis, a way out of the 
legacy of misanthropy, suppressed rage and cosmic sense of 
inadequacy that had been the legacy of my teenage years. 
Atwood’s icy analysis beautifully demonstrated that the 
humiliations of those teenage years were a structural effect of 
teenage relationships, not at all anything specific to me. 


Spinoza: The Ethics 


Spinoza changes everything, but gradually. There is no “road 
to Damascus” conversion to Spinozism, only a steady but 
implacable deletion of default assumptions. As with all the 
best philosophy, reading it is like running a Videodrome 
cassette: you think you are playing it, but it ends up playing 
you, effecting a gradual mutation of the way you think and 
perceive. 

I'd been attracted to Spinoza as an undergraduate, but I 
only really read him at Warwick, under the influence of 
Deleuze. We spent over a year pouring over The Ethics in a 
reading group. Here was a philosophy that was at once 
forbiddingly abstract and immediately practical, pitched at 
both the largest conceivable cosmic scale and the minutiae of 
the psyche. The “impossible” bringing together of structural 
analysis and existentialism? 


Ballard: The Atrocity Exhibition 


If Spinoza and Kafka were slow-acting, Ballard’s impact was 
instant. He connected immediately with an unconscious 
saturated in media signal. 


That was partly because I had in effect encountered 
Ballard long before I had actually read any of his work: in Joy 
Division (though more in Hannett’s sound than in many of the 
lyrics; the song “The Atrocity Exhibition”, with its anguished 
pleading, couldn’t be further from Ballard’s dispassionate 
sobriety), in Foxx and Ultravox, in Cabaret Voltaire, in 
Magazine. 

The Drowned World is the best of his disaster novels, 
inundated London as a literalised surrealist landscape coolly 
surveyed by a latter-day Conrad, but it is The Atrocity 
Exhibition that is indispensable. Much more than the better- 
known Crash, The Atrocity Exhibition provided a conceptual and 
methodological repertoire for approaching the twentieth 
century assembled from the century’s own resources. It is 
austerely modernist, making little concession to either plot 
or character, more like a fictive sculpture than a story, an 
obsessively repeated series of patterns. 

Yes, Ballard has been accepted into the review columns, 
become an elder statesman, but let’s not forget how different 
his background was from the standard Oxbridge man of 
letters. Ballard rescued Britain from Eng Lit, from “decent” 
humanist certainties and Sunday supplement sleepiness. 


Greil Marcus: Lipstick Traces 


I’ve written before about the importance of this book to me. I 
read it when I had just finished university, no plans, the 
future collapsing into a grim attempt — bound to fail — to 
commensurate myself to the Thatcherite economic reality 
principle. Marcus’ vast web of connections opened up an 


escape route. It was a description of a transhistorical Event, a 
break-out embracing anabaptists, situationists, dadaists, 
surrealists, punks. Such an Event was the exact opposite of 
the Grand Spectacles of the Eighties, the scripted and 
organised Non events which played out on global television 
with Live Aid at their epicentre. It was fugitive, secret, even 
when — necessarily — massively collective. Lipstick Traces was 
sure that pop can only have any significance when it ceases to 
be “just music”, when it reverberates with a politics that has 
nothing to do with capitalist parliamentarianism and a 
philosophy that has nothing to do with the academy. 

Lipstick Traces is itself best read as part of a textual 
rhizome which attempted to register, a decade or more on, 
the impact of punk. See also Vague magazine (if you are 
looking for one of the most powerful triggers for Ccru-style 
cyberpunk theory, check out Mark Downham’s pieces in 
Vague), Savage’s England’s Dreaming. (This set not really 
complete until Rip It Up of course.) 


5) Tag five people. 


I can’t think of one other blog that hasn’t done this, so I’m 
stuck. 


space, time, light, 
all the essentials — 
reflections on j.g. 


ballard season (bbc 


four)! 


Like his admirer Jean Baudrillard,” Ballard has for a long time 
resembled a rogue AI, re-permutating the same few themes 
ad infinitum, occasionally adding a_ sprinkling of 
contemporary detail to freshen up a limited repertoire of 
fixations. Fixations, fixations. Appropriate, since, after all, 
Ballard’s obsession is... obsession. 

In the BBC Four profile — nothing new here, the old man 
gamely and tirelessly going over his favourite riffs, once 
again — Ballard repeated one of his familiar, but still 


powerfully sobering observations. People often comment on 
how extreme his early life was, Ballard said. Yet, far from 
being extreme, that early life — beset by hunger, fear, war 
and the constant threat of death — is the default condition 
for most human beings on the planet, now and in every 
previous century. It is the comfortable life of the Western 
Suburbanite which is in every way the planetary exception. 
Thus Home, BBC Four’s brilliant adaptation of Ballard’s 


short story “The Enormous Space”.’ Home is the kind of thing 
the BBC used to excel at: drama that was genuinely, 
unsettlingly weird without being insufferably, unwatchably 
experimental. Not that Home has much hope of appealing to 
popular taste stuck away on BBC Four, of course. A sign of the 
times. 

Home revealed itself to be a perverse cousin of the 
suburban drop-out situation comedy, The Good Life or The Fall 
and Rise of Reginald Perrin spliced with Polanski’s Repulsion. (No 
surprise to see director Richard Curson-Smith name-checking 
Polanksi as an influence.) Anthony Sher was superbly, 
charmingly unhinged as Gerald Ballantyne, an accident 
victim who, instead of returning to work after his 
convalescence, decides to embark upon an experiment. 
“Decides” is no doubt too active a word; in every respect the 
typical Ballard character, Gerry discovers rather than initiates, 
finds himself drawn into a logic he is compelled to investigate. 
(In many ways a faithful Freudian, Ballard has no doubt that 
obsession always has/is a logic.) 

The experiment, it turns out, has a simple premise. Gerry 
will stay indoors, indefinitely, living off the supplies of his 
well-stocked larder and freezer until... until what? Well, that 


is what the experiment will establish. Can he survive by 
“using his front door as a weapon”? What unfolds is the 
descent into the maelstrom Ballard has explored since High- 
Rise and Concrete Island, a quest to the outer edges of the 
human that follows a well-defined sequence, whose stages 
can be readily enumerated: 

A letting go of the old identity. This is given up easily. 
Ballard’s twist on the disaster novel as far back as The 
Drowned World lay in the readiness of his characters to 
embrace rather than resist the new conditions which 
catastrophe had visited upon them. Ever since High-Rise, 
Ballard has seen characters going one-step further, actually 
initiating disaster as a revolt, not so much against 
conformity, as against air-conditioned comfort. Here, Gerry 
burns all his correspondence, his photographs, then his birth- 
certificate and — in the most sacrilegious act of all, which 
made mortified my Protestant soul — his money. 

The loosening of the hold of civilisation [Bataille 
phase]. Ballard is endlessly rewriting Civilisation and its 


Discontents *, and his fictions are attempts to imagine a 
libidinal utopia in which the pay-off between survival and 
repression spelled out by Freud’s mordant pessimism is 
somehow circumvented. The return to savagery, even the 
experiencing of raw hunger pangs, are eagerly savoured 
opportunities to relax civilisation’s impulse control and 
neutralising of affect. In Home, when Gerry’s conventional 
food supplies are running low, he turns first to the flowers in 
his garden and then to his neighbours’ pets. The scene in 
which Gerry’s neighbour questions him — in that middle- 
class ever-so-slightly-insinuating way — about the 


disappearance of his dog “Mr Fred” and his wife’s cat is a 
masterpiece of grisly comedy. “Perhaps they’ve eloped,” Sher 
gibbers, by then constantly on the edge of all-but illegible 
hysteria. Laughter, a strange, snorting, sniffling chortle that 
he can barely contain: it is that laughter which signals, more 
than anything else, that Gerald has left polite society, never 
to return. 

The exploration of the transcendental beyond 
[Kant/Blake phase]. I mean transcendental in its strict 
Kantian sense, of course. Ballard likes to refer to this as his 
exploration of inner space, but I have always found this to be 
a profoundly misleading description. Much more than 
astronauts floating in empirical space, it is the “Outer” which 
Ballard’s suburban cosmonauts investigate: what they 
confront is time and space themselves, as preconditions of all 
perceptions and experiences, and what their explorations 
open up is an intensive zone beyond — outside — standard 
perceptual thresholds. Hence Home becomes an aberrant 
version of The Incredible Shrinking Man. Cut off from the world 
beyond his door — I refuse to call it the outside world — 
Gerry’s sense of space massively expands. “The rooms are 
getting bigger.” The attic becomes an antarctic “white world” 
of blank, freezer-burning vastness, the irruption of the 
transcendental outside into the empirical interior of the 
house, now a very cosmos, teeming with texture and 
previously unsuspected detail. “I feel like an explorer, or an 
astronaut.” 

Curson-Smith’s use of the video-diary format gave the 
film a queasy intimacy and a suitably unheimlich relation to 
Pop TV now, something underscored by Gerry’s sign-off 


remarks about undertaking the “ultimate home makeover.” 
Yes, that’s one way to make the most of your space. 

The man whose head expanded. “Are you on drugs, 
Gerald?” 

And self-denial, starving, the withdrawal from company, 


it’s all very topical. I wonder — I hope — something Gerald- 


like is going on in David Blaine’s head right now.° 


why i want to fuck 


ronald reagan* 


At the 1980 Republican Convention in San Francisco, 
pranksters reproduced and distributed the section of The 
Atrocity Exhibition called “Why I Want to Fuck Ronald 


Reagan”,” without the title and adorned with the Republican 
Party seal. “I’m told,” Ballard reports, “that it was accepted 
for what it resembled, a psychological position paper on the 


candidate’s subliminal appeal, commissioned from some 


maverick think tank.’ 


What does this neo-Dadaist act of would-be subversion tell 
us? In one sense, it has to be hailed as the perfect act of 
subversion. But, viewed another way, it shows that 
subversion is impossible now. The fate of a whole tradition of 
ludic intervention — passing from the Dadaists into the 
Surrealists and the Situationists — seems to hang in the 
balance. Where once the Dadaists and their inheritors could 
dream of invading the stage, disrupting what Burroughs — 
still very obviously a part of this heritage — calls the “reality 


studio” with logic bombs, now there is no stage — no scene, 
Baudrillard would say — to invade. For two reasons: first, 
because the frontier zones of hypercapital do not try to 
repress so much as absorb the irrational and the illogical, 
and, second, because the distinction between stage and 
offstage has been superseded by a coolly inclusive loop of 
fiction: Reagan’s career outstrips any attempt to ludically 
lampoon it, and demonstrates the increasing pliability of the 
boundaries between the real and its simulations. For 
Baudrillard, the very attacks on “reality” mounted by groups 
such as the Surrealists function to keep the real alive (by 
providing it with a fabulous dream world, ostensibly entirely 
alternative to but in effect dialectically complicit with the 
everyday world of the real). “Surrealism was still in solidarity 
with the real it contested, but which it doubled and ruptured 


in the imaginary.”* In conditions of third (and fourth-order) 
simulacra, the giddy vertigo of hyperreality banalises a coolly 
hallucinogenic ambience, absorbing all reality into 
simulation. Fiction is everywhere — and therefore, in a 
certain sense, eliminated as a specific category. Where once 
Reagan’s own role as actor-president seemed “novel”, his 
subsequent career, in which moments from film history 
become montaged — in Reagan’s own hazy memory and in 
media accounts — with Reagan’s role in particular movies, the 
ludic becomes the ludicrous. 

The apparent acceptance, by the Republican delegates, of 
the genuineness of the “Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan” 
text, is both shocking and oddly predictable, and both 
responses are in fact a testament to the power of Ballard’s 
fictions, which resides no more in their ability to mimetically 


reflect a pre-existing social reality than it does in their 
capacity to imaginatively overturn it. What Ballard achieves, 
rather, is what Iain Hamilton-Grant calls “realism about the 
hyperreal”, a homeopathic participation in the media- 
cybernetisation of reality in late capitalism. The shock comes 
when we remind ourselves of (what would seem to be) the 
radical aberrance of Ballard’s material. “Why I Want to Fuck 
Ronald Reagan”, like many of the sections of The Atrocity 
Exhibition, particularly in the latter part of the novel, is 
presented as a report on experiments into audience responses 
to prepared media stimuli. 


Ronald Reagan and the conceptual auto-disaster. 
Numerous studies have been conducted upon patients 
in terminal paresis (G.P.I.), placing Reagan in a series of 
simulated auto-crashes, e.g. multiple pile-ups, head on 
collisions, motorcade attacks (fantasies of Presidential 
assassinations remained a continuing preoccupation, 
subjects showing a marked polymorphic fixation on 
windshields an rear-trunk assemblies). Powerful erotic 
fantasies of an anal-sadistic character surrounded the 


image of the Presidential contender. 


But this shock is counterposed by a sense of predictability 
arising from the cool elegance of Ballard’s simulations. The 
technical tone of Ballard’s writing — its impersonality and 
lack of emotional inflection — performs the function of 
neutralising or normalising the ostensibly unacceptable 
material. Is this simulation of the operations of hypercontrol 
agencies a satire on them, or do their activities — and the 


whole cultural scene of which they are a part — render satire 
as such impossible now? What, after all, is the relationship 
between satire and simulation? To begin to answer that 
question we need to compare Ballard’s text with other, more 
definitively “satirical” texts. Before that, though, we need to 
bear in mind Jameson’s comments on the eclipse of parody by 
pastiche, which we shall examine, briefly, now. 

This is not the place to interrogate the differences 
between parody and satire; we shall proceed on the 
assumption that, whatever differences there are between 
parody and satire, they share enough in common so as to be 
jointly subject to Jameson’s analyses. Parody, Jameson argues, 
depended upon a whole set of resources available to 
modernism but which have faded now: the individual subject, 
whose “inimitable” idiosyncratic style, Jameson wryly 
observes, could precisely gave rise to imitations; a strong 
historical sense, which has its necessary obverse a confidence 
that there is a genuinely contemporary means of expression; 
and a commitment to collective projects, which could 
motivate writing and give it a political purpose. As these 
disappear, Jameson suggests, so does the space of parody. 
Individual style gives way to a “field of stylistic and discursive 
heterogeneity without a norm”, just as the belief in progress 
and the faith that one could describe new times in new terms 
wanes, to be replaced by “the imitation of dead styles, speech 
through all the masks and voices stored up in the imaginary 
museums of a new global culture”. Late capitalism’s 
“postliteracy”, meanwhile, points to “the absence of any 
great collective project.” What results, according to Jameson, 
is a depthless experience, in which the past is everywhere at 


the same time as the historical sense fades; we have a “society 
bereft of all historicity” that is simultaneously unable to 
present anything that is not a reheated version of the past. 
Pastiche displaces parody: 


In this situation, parody finds itself without a vocation; 
it has lived, and that strange new thing pastiche comes 
to take its place. Pastiche is, like parody, the imitation 
of a peculiar or unique, idiosyncratic style, the wearing 
of a linguistic mask, speech in a dead language. But it is 
a neutral practice of such mimicry, without any of 
parody’s ulterior motives, amputated of the satiric 
impulse, devoid of laughter and of any conviction that 
alongside the abnormal tongue you have momentarily 
borrowed, some healthy linguistic normality still exists. 
Pastiche is thus blank parody, a statue with blind 


eyeballs...° 


Despite what Jameson himself writes on Ballard,’ one of 
the important differences between the Ballard text and 
pastiche as Jameson describes it is the absence of “nostalgia” 
or the “nostalgia mode” — an insistent presence in other 
postmodernist science fiction texts, as Jameson shows — in 
Ballard’s work. Indeed, Ballard’s commitment to striking 
textual innovations — as evidenced in the layout of the pages 
themselves in The Atrocity Exhibition — mark him as something 
of an anomaly in Jameson’s terms; in this sense, at least, 
Ballard seems to be continuous with modernism as Jameson 
understands it. Yet in certain other respects — specifically in 
terms of the collapse of individual subjectivity and the failure 


of collective political action 

— Ballard is emblematic of Jameson’s postmodernity. But, 
unlike Jameson’s pastiche, Ballard does not imitate “a 
peculiar or unique idiosyncratic style”. The style that Ballard 
simulates in “Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan” — a style 
towards which the whole of The Atrocity Exhibition tends — is 
precisely lacking in any personality: if there are any 
idiosyncrasies, they belong to the technical register of 
(pseudo)scientific reportage, not to the characteristics of an 
individual subject. The fact that the text concerns a political 
leader draws attention to the lack of any explicit — or, more 
importantly when discussing satire or parody, implicit — 
political teleology in Ballard’s writing. It is in this sense that 
“Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan”, like Jameson’s pastiche, 
is “without any of parody’s ulterior motives”. 

Certainly, this is one way in which “Why I Want to Fuck 
Ronald Reagan” differs greatly from a classical work of satire 
such as Swift’s A Modest Proposal (1729). A Modest Proposal is a 
paradigmatic work of what Joyce called “kinetic” art, 
produced in particular political and cultural circumstances 
with a particular aim, to sway an audience into action. Swift’s 
political purpose — his disparaging of the cruelty of certain 
English responses to the Irish potato famine — is marked by a 
certain stylistic and thematic excess (an excess that famously 
bypassed altogether certain of Swift’s readers, who were able 
to take the text at face value), whereas Ballard’s text — which 
emerged, no less than Swift’s, from a very particular 
sociocultural situation — can be defined by its flatness. This 
marks a move on, (even), from Burroughs. For all their 
linguistic inventiveness, Burroughs’ humorous “routines” 


such as “The Complete All-American Deanxietised Man” 
remain in a classical tradition of satire through their use of 
exaggeration and their clear political agenda: using a series of 
excessive tropes, Burroughs mocks the amoral mores of 
American techno-science. By contrast, what Ballard’s text 
“lacks” is any clear designs on the reader, any of Jameson’s 
“ulterior motives”; the parodic text always gave central 
importance to the parodist behind it, his implicit but flagged 
attitudes and opinions, but “Why I Want to Fuck Ronald 
Reagan” is as coldly anonymous as the texts it imitates. 
Whereas we hear Burroughs’ cackling at the absurd excesses 
of the scientists in “The Complete All-American Deanxietized 
Man”, the response of Ballard to the scientists whose work he 
simulates is unreadable. What does “Ballard” want the reader 
to feel: disgust? amusement? It is unclear, and, as Baudrillard 


argues in relation to Crash,’ it is somewhat disingenuous of 
Ballard the author to overcode his texts — in prefatory 
authorial remarks — with all the traditional baggage of 
“warning” that they themselves clearly elude. The mode 
Ballard adopts in “Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan” is not 
that of (satirical) exaggeration, but is a kind of (simulated) 
extrapolation. The very genre of the poll or the survey, as 
Baudrillard shows, makes the question unanswerable, 
undecidable. 

Despite what Ballard himself suggests, (see above), what 
matters is less the (possible) resemblance of “Why I Want to 
Fuck Ronald Reagan” to (possible) reports than the 
circulation of simulation to which such reports already 
contribute. Writing on pastiche, Jameson comes upon the 
concept of simulation, but attributes it to Plato rather than 


referring — here at least — to Baudrillard’s reinvention of it. 
Yet Jameson’s intuition about the relationship between 
pastiche and simulation is important. We could perhaps 
suggest a correlation between Baudrillard’s third-order 
simulacra and Jameson’s pastiche, on the one hand, and 
Ballard’s text on the other. What simulation in Baudrillard’s 
third-order sense entails is, as we have repeatedly insisted, 
the collapse of distance between the simulation and what is 
simulated. Satire, in its classical sense, we would probably 
want to locate as part of “first-order simulacra” — a 
simulation that resembles the original, but with certain tell- 
tale differences. Ballard simulates the simulation (the poll, 
the survey). 


a fairground’s 


painted swings! 


Speaking of the pathology of amour, is it anywhere better 
exemplified than in the lyrics of “These Foolish Things” (the 
title track, significantly, of Ferry’s first LP of covers). 

What is fascinating about the song’s litany of lost affects 
(“wild strawb’ries only seven francs a kilo... the sigh of 
midnight trains in empty stations... a fairground’s painted 
swings”) is that the lover features in them only as a series of 
absences (“a cigarette that bears a lipstick’s traces... gardenia 
perfume ling’ring on a pillow”) and is never directly invoked. 
This, of course, is because there is no “loved object itself”. 
What is loved is the petit objet a, which is not a particular 
object, but the object as such, the “void presupposed by a 
demand”. The physical and psychical “presence” of the lover 
is required only as that which allows the assemblage of 
affects to be given an apparent cohering centre. But, in the 
end, the lover is just that: the space, the canvas, on which the 
collage of memories and associations can be arranged. 

Nevertheless, even though it is not the lover “herself” 


that is desired, the lover cannot be dispensed with altogether: 
otherwise we are in straightforward fetishism. Zizek 
illustrates the difference between “normal” pathology and 
fetishism by reference to that scene in Vertigo where Scotty is 
embracing Judy (re)made-over as Madeleine. The camera cuts 
away to show his pausing from kissing her to anxiously check 
that her hair colour is still blond. But this is NOT fetishism, 
since the fetishist would dispense with the woman altogether 
and derive his enjoyment from the lock of hair itself. 

Vertigo’s horror lies in its unstinting revelation of the 
artificiality of desire. Scottie can look into the void 
presupposed by his demands and still, grotesquely, make the 
demands. That is the difference between Vertigo and many of 
the film noirs it references, comments upon and surpasses: it 
is not, in the end, that he is being deceived by a femme fatale, 
duped into believing that she is something that she is not. On 
the contrary, he knows full well that there is no Madeleine. 
But knowledge is nothing, and the explanation for his 
continued fixation upon a Madeleine that is not even a ghost 
is the one provided by Zupancic: for Scottie to give up his 
object would be for him to give up himself, to die. 

There is no doubt a specifically male relationship to the 
objet petit a which Vertigo reveals. This goes some way to 
answering the question posed by 


1.T.2 a while ago, after Zizek: namely, why would men, 
given the choice of sex with a monkey or sex with a robot 
always choose the robot? The more disturbing thought is that 
men would always in practice prefer a robot to an actual 
woman — and this is why the libidinal economics, if not yet 
the technical feasibility, of The Stepford Wives are horribly 


credible. 

The text which most explicitly lays bare this male desiring 
mechanism is Villiers de l’Isle-Adam’s The Future Eve (1877), 
which anticipates both Vertigo and The Stepford Wives, as well 
as Metropolis and Blade Runner. 

The story concerns a dissolute decadent who is enchanted 
with his beloved, Alicia’s, form, but who detests what he 
considers to be the frivolity and shallowness of her 
personality. He is persuaded by an inventor-mentor figure 
(given the name, in some versions, incredibly, of the then 
still-living Thomas Edison) that he should simply accept an 
automaton-copy of his lover, prepared by the inventor, which 
will be a perfect replica in every respect, except that it will be 
programmed to be a stimulating companion. 

“Edison” couldn’t be more forthright, more 
demystificatory, more Lacanian: 


the creature whom you love, and who for you is the sole 
REALITY is by no means the one who is embodied in 
this transient human figure, but a creature of your 
desire. [...] This illusion is the one thing you struggle 
against all odds to VITALISE in the presence of your 
beloved, depsite the frightful, deadly, withering nullity 
of Alicia. What you love is this phantom alone; it’s for 
the phantom that you want to die. That and that alone 
is what you recognise as unconditionally REAL. In short, 
it is this objectified projection of your own mind that 
you call on, that you perceive, that you CREATE in your 
living woman, and which is nothing but your mind 


reduplicated in her. 


Of course, the “creative” force that really animates the loved 
object is not the freeplay of the Romantic imagination, but 
the implacable mechanism of the unconscious. It’s for the 
phantom that you want to die: but such a “death” would mean 
that the desiring frame that makes sense of the world would 
survive. The only real death would be one in which that 
whole framework was destroyed, and the subject was 
confronted with the “white space” of pure potential. 

This is what the subject slaved to the pleasure principle 
must avoid at all costs. The well-known tedium of Sadean 
desire is the inevitable consequence when this impasse is 
honestly confronted. If the object of Sadean desire is, as 
Zizek, says, the eternally beautiful undead victim, who can 
suffer all manner of privations and yet be magically renewed 
forever, then the subject of this desire is, as Burroughs knew 
very well, the vampire-junky. The vampire-junky must be 
insatiable and must pursue their desires up to the point of self- 
destruction, but must never cross the line into annihilation. 

The empirical narrative would have it that the junkie is 
gradually “drawn into” addiction, lured into dependence by a 
chemical need. But it is clear that the junkie chooses to be 
addicted — the desire to get high is only the ostensible 
motivation for the drive, just as “winning money” is only the 
official alibi for the gambler’s enjoyment. 

Burroughs’ paralleling of love with addiction is thus by no 
means cynical hyperbole. Burroughs understood very well 
that, if love is addiction (“If there’s a cure for this, I don’t 
want it”), then addiction is also a form of love (“It’s my wife 
and it’s my life”). There is always, as Gregory Bateson 
observed in his essay on alcoholism, a meta addiction to be 


dealt with: the addiction to addiction itself.* It is on this that 
Burroughs’ “control addict” Bradley Martin is hooked: “I am 
not AN addict. Iam THE addict.” 

The lyrical power of Burroughs’ writing — especially in 
the early cut-up novels, which are consensually dismissed as 
difficult and boring — is often overlooked. But much of its 
mechanical melancholia is generated from its displaying of 
the “foolish things” of desire, the heroin-hacceities of train 
whistles, radio jingles, billboard images and sexual contact. 
Although initially random, these affect-collages, when 
repeated and remixed by memory and desire, become 
necessary. Thus only THAT shade of blue for Madeleine’s suit, 
only THAT shade of lipstick on the cigarette tip, will do. 

Yes, the painted swings of desire’s cruel fairground... 


what are the politics 
of boredom? 
(ballard 2003 


remix)! 


“Prosperous suburbia was one of the end states of 
history. Once achieved, only plague, flood, or nuclear 
war could threaten its grip.” 


—J.G. Ballard, Millennium People? 


“].G. Ballard” is the name of a repetition. 

That’s very different from saying that Ballard repeats 
himself. On the contrary, it is Ballard’s formalism, his re- 
permutation of the same few concepts and fixations — 
disasters, pilots, random violence, mediatisation, the total 
colonisation of the unconscious by images — that prevent his 
name being easily attributed to any self. 


The obsessive quality of his preoccupations and _ his 
methodology is a sign that Ballard has never lost faith with 
his earliest inspirations: psychoanalysis and surrealism. In 
both, he found a rigorously depersonalised account of the 
formations of the person. The so-called interior had a logic 
that could be both exposed and externalised. 

Ballard’s career can be seen as a repeated rewriting of two 
texts of Freud, Civilisation and its Discontents and Beyond the 
Pleasure Principle. The environmental catastrophes in his 
earliest phase of novels (The Drowned World, The Drought, The 
Crystal World) tend to be greeted by the characters as 
opportunities, chances to shuck off the dull routines and 
protocols of sedentary society. The second phase of his work, 
which began in the mid-Sixties and to some extent continues 
to this day, follows this logic through so that the catastrophes 
and atrocities that afflict the characters in these fictions are 
actively willed by them. (Or is it that the humans seek to 
manage, through repetition, the originary trauma of their 
being?) Disasters are now the disasters of the media 
landscape — the space in which humans now primarily live, 
and one which is both shaped by, and manufactured from, 
their desires and drives. Once again, though, we must qualify 
this claim with the further observation that human beings 
are not the “owners” of desires and drives — they don’t 
“have” them. Rather, human beings are the playing out of 
these impulses, instruments through which trauma _ is 
registered. 

Since High-Rise in 1975, Ballard has directed most of his 
attention to the hyper-affluent and bored denizens of closed 
communities. If Ballard’s treatment of the mores of this 


population had begun to pall, it was refreshed by Millennium 
People, his latest and best rendition of this theme. 

The world of Millennium People is ruled, “for the first time 
in history” (but not for the first time in Ballard’s work), by a 
“vicious boredom”, “interrupted by meaningless acts of 
violence”. At first glance, the novel can look like a long 
overdue savaging of the middle class, in which the reader can 
revel in the brutal destruction of bourgeois sacred cows. Tate 
Modern... Pret A Manger... the NFT... all of them burn in 
Ballard’s Bourgeois Terror. 


“I’m a fund raiser for the Royal Academy. It’s an easy 
job. All those CEOs think art is good for their souls.” 


“Not so?” 


“It rots their brains. Tate Modern, the Royal Academy, 


the Hayward... They’re Walt Disney for the middle 
93 


classes. 
The novel’s middle-class insurgents seem, at first, to be 
merely the hard done-to whiners whose complaints about the 
rising expense of child care and school fees and the 
“inequity” of too high rents in their not quite luxurious 
enough apartments are the stuff of endless media columns. 
“Believe me, the next revolution is going to be about 


parking”*, one character announces, echoing the petrol 
blockades of four years ago and anticipating the Ikea riots of 
2005. Once their discontent is stirred up, however, the goals 
of this group of former professionals become less specific, less 
instrumentalist. 

Like the Situationists, the insurgents of Ballard’s fictional 


Chelsea Marina want to “destroy the twentieth century”: 


“I thought it was over.” 


“It lingers on. It shapes everything we do, the way we 
think... Genocidal wars, half the world destitute, the 
other half sleepwalking through its own brain-death. 


We bought its trashy dreams and now we can’t wake 
95 


up. 

Millennium People is in many ways Britain’s answer to Fight 
Club (though, needless to say, the chances of Britain 
producing Millennium People as a film that would even 
remotely do the book justice are not even slight — precisely 
because the British film industry is under the control of the 
same militantly complacent whingers that it attacks). Like 
Fight Club, the novel begins with a rage against the bullet- 
pointed, brand-consulted hyper-conformity of modern 
professional life, but ends up in surfascism. 

The most important figure in this respect is Richard Gould 
who, like most of Ballard’s other characters, is little more 
than a spokesperson for the author’s theories. (Which is fine, 
of course: we need more “well-drawn characters” like we 
need more “well-wrought sentences”. The UEA Eng Lit mafia 
are as ripe for immolation as are any of the other cosily 
depressing targets of Ballard’s pyromaniac prose.) 

Gould reiterates essentially the same attack on the “air- 
conditioned totalitarianism” of contemporary securo-culture 
that had been essayed by Nietzsche, Mauss, Bataille, Dada, 
Surrealism, Situationist theory, Lettrism, Baudrillard and 
Lyotard: 


We’re living in a soft regime prison built by earlier 
generations of inmates. Somehow we have to break 
free. The attack on the World Trade Centre in 2001 was 
a brave attempt to free America from the 20th century. 
The deaths were tragic, but otherwise it was a 
meaningless act. And that was its point. Like the attack 


on the NFT.® 


Gould re-states the Nietzschean claim that human beings 
need cruelty, danger and challenge, but that civilisation gives 
them security. Gould, though, is as reminiscent of Fukuyama’s 
rehearsal of Nietzsche’s discontent with civilisation as he is of 
Nietzsche himself. 

It is Fukuyama’s Nietzsche — the scourge of bland 
egalitarianism and empty inclusiveness — that is the most 
relevant Nietzsche today. As you read the appalled invective 
with which Nietzsche blasts the herd-cult of managed 
security (which is so weak and insipid that it can never utter 
its real rallying cry: “long live mediocrity!”) you can’t help 
but think of Blair and the Millennium Dome, whose pallid, 
paradoxically _ self-deprecatory pomposity contrasts 
unhappily with the cruel opulence of the monuments erected 
in Nietzsche’s beloved tragic and heroic aristocratic societies. 

“Democratic societies,” Fukuyama wrote in The End of 
History and the Last Man, 


tend to promote a belief in the equality of all lifestyles 
and values. They do not tell their citizens how they 
should live, or what will make them happy virtuous and 
great. Instead they cultivate the value of toleration, 


which becomes the chief virtue in democratic societies. 
And if men are unable to affirm that any particular way 
of life is superior to another, they will fall back on the 
affirmation of life itself, that is, the body, its needs, and 
fears. While not all souls may be equally virtuous, all 
bodies can suffer; hence democratic societies will tend 
to be compassionate and raise to the first order of 
concern the question of preventing the body from 
suffering. It is not an accident that people in 
democratic societies are preoccupied with material gain 
and live in an economic world devoted to the myriad 
small needs of the body. According to Nietzsche, the 
last man has “left the region where it was hard to live, 


for one needs warmth”. 


“We need to pick targets that don’t make sense.”® 


If the characters in The Atrocity Exhibition wanted to re- 
stage the founding traumatic moment of the media Sixties — 
the assassination of Kennedy — then Gould and his allies want 
to re-stage the founding traumatic moment of the media 
Noughties — 9/11. But where Traven/Tallis/Travis wanted to 
kill Kennedy again, “but this time in a way that makes sense”, 
Gould wants 9/11 to happen again, but in a way that doesn’t 
make sense. 

For Gould, the (post)modern world is oppressed by an 
excess of Sense, a surplus of Meaning. “Kill a politician and 
you're tied to the motive that made you pull the trigger. 
Oswald and Kennedy, Princip and the Archdukes. But kill 
someone at random, fire a revolver into McDonald’s — the 
universe stands back and holds its breath. Better still, kill 


fifteen people at random.” Thus, the Jill Dando murder is 
more of a template for Gould’s anti-political insurgency than 


1¢h whose violence was (still) too motivated, 


is September 1 
too freighted with Meaning. Dando’s killing however — 
brutal, meaningless, and without any apparent motive — was 


a direct attack on the BBC’s “regime of moderation and good 


sense”!° and the “castle of obligations”™ 


action like this, whose only motive is an attack on the concept 


it protects. An 


of motive itself, blows open an “empty space we could stare 


into with real awe. Senseless, inexplicable, as mysterious as 


the Grand Canyon.” 


Gould is an elegant and eloquent salesman of the Deleuze- 
Guattari “line of abolition”, the fascist drive to destruction 
which is ultimately a drive towards self-destruction. Ballard, 
who, to his credit has always refused to endorse facile 
moralising, would no doubt object to that characterisation, 
since to in any way condemn or censure Gould would be to 
confirm the very securocratic values he seeks to undermine. 

However, the most compelling aspect of Millennium People, 
politically speaking, is not the in many ways familiar 
asignifying violence, but its punk theory of class revolt. 


“Twickenham is the Maginot Line of the English class 
system. If we can break through here, everything will 
fall.” 


“So class systems are the target. Aren’t they universal 
— America, Russia...?” 

“Of course. But only here is the class system a means of 
political control. Its real job isn’t to suppress the proles, 


but to keep the middle classes down, make sure they’re 
713 


docile and subservient. 
The moment at which Ballard’s “new proletariat” (“furnished 
with private schools and BMWs”) become real political actors 
is when they cease to pursue their own class interests. Only 
then can they come to the Marxist revelation that bourgeois 
class interests are in no one’s interests. 


“They see that private schools are brainwashing their 
children into a kind of social docility, turning them into 
a professional class who will run the show for consumer 
capitalism.” 

“The sinister Mr Bigs?” 


“There are no Mr Bigs. The system is self-regulating. It 
relies on our sense of civic responsibility. Without that 


society would collapse. In fact, the collapse may even 
714 


have begun. 

Blairism has consolidated and outstripped the ideological 
gains of Thatcherism by ensuring the apparently total victory 
of PR over punk, of politeness over antagonism, of middle- 
class utility over proletarian art. It manages the tricky 
ideological dodge of reducing everything to instrumentality 
whilst at the same time dedicating all resources to the 
production of cultural artefacts of no possible use or function. 
From the Mayan codices to Mission Statements... Spin 
engenders a meaninglessness which, in the mandatory 
banality of its corrosive nihilism, makes Gould’s grand poetics 
of asignifying rupture seem quaintly nostalgic. 


Blair has made middle-class security the horizon of all 
aspiration. In this over-conscious, over-lit twenty-four-hour 
office of the soul, business, preposterously, is served up to us 
as the closest thing to anything animated by libido. Ballard 
knows that a break-out from this affective prison must 
involve the explicit de-cathexis of the “nice house, nice 
family” picture that bourgeois culture is still capable of 
projecting as ideal. 

In histories of punk, much is made of the role of the 
middle classes, but the crucial catalytic role of that particular 
kind of middle-class refusal remains under-thought. The 
middle-class defection from reproductive futurism into 
scarification and tribalisation did nothing more than state 
the obvious — middle-class careers and the privileges they 
bring are empty, tedious and ennervating — but, now more 
than ever, it is this obviousness that cannot be stated. 


The interesting thing is that they’re protesting against 
themselves. There’s no enemy out there. They know 


that they are the enemy.” 


let me be your 


fantasy! 


What Ballard, Lacan and Burroughs have in common is the 
perception that human sexuality is essentially pornographic. 
For all three, human sexuality is irreducible to biological 
excitation; strip away the hallucinatory and the fantasmatic, 
and sexuality disappears with it. As Renata Salecl argues in 


(Per)Versions of Love and Hate,” it is easier for an animal to 
enter the Symbolic Order than it is for a human to unlearn 
the Symbolic and attain animality, an observation confirmed 
by the news that, when an orangutan was presented with 
pornography, it ceased to show any sexual interest in its 
fellow apes and spent all day masturbating. The orangutan 
had been inducted into human sexuality by the “inhuman 
partner”, the fantasmatic supplement, upon which all human 
sexuality depends. 

The question is not, then, whether pornography, but which 
pornography? For Burroughs, pornosexuality would always 
be a miserable repetition, a Boschian negative carnival in 
which the rusting fairground wheel of desire forever turns in 


desolate circles. But in Ballard, and in Cronenberg’s version of 
Ballard’s Crash, it is possible to uncover a version of 
pornography that is positive, even utopian. 

Cronenberg’s work can be seen as a response to the 


3. Hardcore 


challenge Baudrillard posed in Seduction. 
pornography haunts late capitalism, functioning as the cipher 
of a supposedly demystified, disillusioned “reality”. “A 
pornographic culture par excellence: one that pursues the 
workings of the real at all times and all places.” Here, 
hardcore is the reality of sex, and sex is the reality of 
everything else. Hardcore trades on a kind of earnest 
literalism, a belief that there is some empirically specifiable 
“it” which = sex in/as the real. As Baudrillard wryly noted, 
this empiricist bio-logic is fixated on a kind of technical 
fidelity — the pornographic film must be faithful to the 
(supposed) unadorned, brute mechanism of sex. Yet, sign and 
ritual are inescapable: in hardcore, especially in bukkake, the 
function of semen is, after all, essentially semiotic. No sex 
without signs. The higher the resolution of the image, the 
closer you get to the organs, the more that the “it” disappears 
from view. There is no better image of this “orgy of realism” 
than the “Japanese vaginal cyclorama” Baudrillard described 
in the “Stereoporno” section of Seduction. “Prostitutes, their 
thighs open, sitting on the edge of a platform, Japanese 
workers in their shirt-sleeves... permitted to shove their 
noses up to their eyeballs within the woman’s vagina in order 
to see, to see better — but what?” “Why stop with genitalia?” 
Baudrillard asks, “Who knows what profound pleasure is to 
be found in the visual dismemberment of mucous membranes 


and smooth muscles?’ 


Cronenberg’s early work — from Shivers and Rabid 
through to Videodrome — is an answer to that very question. 
Cronenberg famously posed his own question, “why aren’t 
there beauty contests for the inside of the body?”, and Shivers 
and Rabid posit an equivalence between body horror and 
eroticism. The ostensible catastrophe with which both films 
conclude — the total degeneration of social structure into a 
seething, anorganic orgy — functions ambivalently. The 
disintegration of organismic integrity, the reversion to the 
condition of the pre-multicellular, is a kind of parodic- 
utopian riposte to Freud’s Civilzation and its Discontents. If 
civilisation and unbound libido are incommensurate, it is 
implied, so much the worse for civilisation. The apartment 
block taken over by mindless sex zombies at the end of Shivers 
is the Sixties dream of liberated sex come true... 

Crash is a sober retreat from all this, a model for a new 
mecho-Mascohistic mode of pornography in which it is no 
longer the so-called inside of the body that matters, but the 
body as surface — a surface to be adorned with clothes, 
marked by scars, punctured by technical machinery. 
Possessed by a mad passion to exchange biotic code, the sex 
plague victims in Shivers devolve beyond animality into a kind 
of bacterial replicator frenzy. By firm contrast, Crash is as 
passionless as a Delvaux dream. Sex here is entirely colonised 
by culture and language. All the sex scenes are meticulously 
constructed tableaux, irreducibly fantasmatic, not because 
they are “unreal”, but because their staging and their 
consistency depend on fantasy. The film’s opening scene, 
with Catherine Ballard in the aircraft hangar, is quite clearly 
an acting out of a fantasmatic scenario; it also functions, 


later, via its recounting, as a fantasmatic supplement to the 
first sexual encounter we see between Catherine and James. 
There is no “it” of sex, no brute, naked, definable moment 
when “it” happens, only a plateau that is (paradoxically) both 
dilated and deferred, in which words and memories 
reverberate more powerfully than any penetration. 

Crash is so indebted to Helmut Newton that it often looks 
like little more than a series of animated Newton images. Or, 
better: in Crash, the bodies attain the near-inanimate stillness 
of Newton’s living mannequins. The echoes of Newton are 


entirely fittingly, since Ballard regarded Newton as “our 


greatest visual artist”? a Surrealist image-maker whose 


vision shamed the mediocrity of those officially working in 
the fine arts. “In Newton’s work,” Ballard writes, “we see a 
new race of urban beings, living on a new human frontier, 
where all passion is spent and all ambition long satisfied, 
where the deepest emotions seem to be _ relocating 
themselves, moving into a terrain more mysterious than 


Marienbad.”® 

When Cronenberg talks about the future sexuality of the 
“new race of urban beings” in Crash, he tends to refer to it in 
negative terms: 


The conceit that underlies some of what is maybe 
difficult or baffling about Crash, the sci-finess of it, 
comes from Ballard anticipating a future pathological 
psychology. It’s developing now, but he anticipates it 
and brings it back to the past — now — and he applies it 
as though it exists completely formed. 


The Ballards’ marriage is to be understood as inherently 
dysfunctional: 


Some potential distributors said, “You should make 
them more normal at the beginning so that we can see 
where they go wrong.” In other words, it should be like 
a Fatal Attraction thing. Blissful couple, maybe a dog and 
a rabbit, maybe a kid. And then a car accident 
introduces them to these horrible people and they go 
wrong. I said, “That isn’t right, because there’s 
something horribly wrong with them right now. That’s 


why they’re vulnerable to going even further.’ 


Yet the Ballards’ “pathology” in Crash seems oddly healthy, 
their marriage a model of well-adjusted perversity. Theirs is a 
utopian sexuality, where sexual contact is voided of all 
sentimentality, stripped of any reference to reproduction, 
and unfreighted by any guilt. The lack of face-to-face sex in 
the Ballards’ marriage — which, again Cronenberg himself 
tends to talk of negatively, as if it were a deviation from some 
wholesome, facialised sex in which the partners achieve a 
harmonious oneness — points to an awareness that there is 
no sexual relationship. Yet, very far from being a difficulty 
for the Ballards’ marriage, the lack of a direct rapport, the 
recognition that any sexual encounter has to go via fantasy, is 
the basis of all their erotic adventures. Compare the Ballards’ 
marriage to that of the Harfords’ in Eyes Wide Shut. The 
Ballards’ using of their sexual encounters with others as a 
stimulus for their own — impassive, poised, oneiric — sex 
forms a clear contrast with the deadlock of the Harfords’ 


marriage, which is exposed in Bill’s failure to cope, or keep 
up, with Alice’s fantasy. While Bill is scandalised by Alice’s 
articulation of her fantasies, sex in the Ballards’ marriage is 
governed by the “feminine” drive to talk; it is almost as if all 
of the physical encounters happen only so that they can be 
converted into stories to be recounted later. 


The most charged scene in Crash takes place in the carwash, 
where James looks on through the rearview mirror at 
Catherine and Vaughan, who — in the words of Cronenberg’s 
script — are “like two semi-metallic human beings of the 
future making love in a chromium bower”. Deborah Unger, 
the film’s real star, is particularly impressive here. A kind of 
feline automaton, she “acts with her hair, minor adjustments, 


tosses of the head that advertise the transit of small 


emotions.’”® 


Who is using whom here? The answer is that all three of 
the characters are using each other. Catherine’s encounter 
with Vaughan stimulates James, just as Catherine is 
stimulated by the thought that James is watching her with 
Vaughan. Vaughan is using the couple as subjects of his own 
libidinal experiments, while the Ballards are using Vaughan 
as the third figure in their marriage. A mis-en-abyme of 
desire... 

Far from being some nightmare of mutual domination, 
this is Cronenberg/ Ballard’s sexual utopia, a perverse 
counterpart to Kant’s kingdom of ends. The kingdom of ends 
was Kant’s ideal ethical community, in which everyone is 
treated as an end in themselves. Kant reasoned that, from the 
point of view of his ethics, sex was inherently problematic, 


because to engage in sexual congress entails treating the 
other as an object to be used. The only way in which sex could 
be commensurate with the categorical imperative — which in 
one of its versions maintains that one should never treat 
others as a means to an end — was if it took place in the 
context of a marriage, in which each partner has contracted 
out the use of their organs in exchange for the use of their 
partner’s. 

Desire is construed here in terms of simple appropriation 
(this equivalence is yet another way in which Kant is in tune 
with Sade). But what Kant — and those who follow him in 
condemning pornography because it “objectifies” — fails to 
recognise is that our deepest desire is not to possess an other 
but to be objectified by them, to be used by them in/as their 
fantasy. This is one sense of the famous Lacanian formula that 
“desire is the desire of the other”. The perfect erotic situation 
would involve neither a dominance of, nor a fusion with, the 
other; it would consist rather in being objectified by someone 
you also want to objectify. 

Crash, of course, follows Masoch and Newton in 
delocalising sex from genitality. Libido is invested in the mis- 
en-scene more than in the meat, which draws its attraction 
almost entirely from its adjacency to the decorous 
nonorganic — to clothes as much as cars. Clothes differentiate 
glam’s cold and cruel cultivation of appearances from 
hardcore’s passion for the real. Without suits, dresses and 
shoes, without fur, leather and nylon, pornography might as 
well be arranging meat in a butcher’s window. Newton told 
Ballard that he “loved Cronenberg’s Crash”, but one thing 
bothered him. “The dresses,” he whispered. “They were so 


awful.” This strikes me as waspishly unfair to Denice 
Cronenberg’s elegant wardrobe selections. (One major 
problem with Jonathan Weiss’ version of The Atrocity 
Exhibition, however, is precisely the dreadfulness of the 
clothes.) Crash takes its cues from high fashion magazines, 
whose images are more sumptuously arty than fine art, more 
suffused with deviant eroticism than hardcore porn. Would it 
be impossible for there to be a pornography, sponsored by 
Dior or Chanel, scripted by a latter-day Masoch or Ballard, 
whose fantasies were as artfully staged as the most glamorous 
fashion photo shoot? 


fantasy kits:+ steven 
meisel’s “state of 


emergency” 


A few weeks ago, I asked whether it would be possible “for 
there to be a pornography, sponsored by Dior or Chanel, 
scripted by a latter-day Masoch or Ballard, whose fantasies 
were as artfully staged as the most glamorous fashion photo 


shoot?”> Steven Meisel’s Vogue photo-shoot, much more than 
Mike Figgis’ drearily vanilla promotional films for Agent 
Provocateur, suggests that such a pornography is conceivable. 

“State of Emergency” shows, once again, that it is left to 
high fashion to take up the role that fine art has all but 
abandoned. While much of fine art has succumbed to the 
“passion for the real”, high fashion remains the last redoubt 
of Appearance and Fantasy. 

The used tampons and pickled animals of Reality Art 
offer, at best, tracings of the empirical. Their quaint 


biographism reveals nothing of the unconscious. Meisel’s 
elegantly-staged photographs, meanwhile, drip with an 
ambivalence worthy of the best Surrealist paintings. They are 
uncomfortable and arousing in equal measure because they 
reflect back to us our conflicted attitudes and 
unacknowledged libidinal complicities. (In this respect, they 
form a sharp contrast with the infinitely more exploitative 
image being used to front the American Express Red 


campaign*, whose meaning is easily anchored to the 
coordinates of the currently dominant ideological 
constellation.) 

Reframed as Art, the Vogue photographs would no doubt 
be described — in the all-too familiar terms of art-critical 
muzak — as “negotiating with ideas of violence/ terror/etc.” As 
high fashion, they meet instead with a type of liberal 
denunciation that is no less familiar. In the Guardian, Joanna 
Bourke complained that, “It is no coincidence that the 
security forces are shown to be protecting us from a person 


who is neither male nor obviously Muslim”.? Would Bourke 
have preferred it, then, if the images did feature a Muslim 
man? 

Bourke continues: 


Instead, the terrorist threat is an unreal woman. In 
contrast to the security personnel depicted, she is 
placed beyond the realm of the human. Her skin is as 
plastic as a mannequin’s; her body is too perfect, even 
when grimacing in pain. When the model is depicted as 
the aggressor, she remains nothing more than the 
phallic dominatrix of many adolescent boys’ wet 


dreams. In both instances, the beauty of the 
photographs transforms acts of violence and 
humiliation into erotic possibilities. 


Again, what would Bourke have preferred: simulated snuff 
in which “reallooking” women were roughed up by security 
staff? Bourke’s hostility to the fantasmatic is oddly doubled 
by the aggression of the security personnel towards the 
“unreal” women. And what does it mean to substitute an 
“unreal woman” for an all-too-real Muslim male, in any case? 
What does the confusion of ontological levels — agents of 
reality conjoined with the waxy artificiality of Bellmer-doll 
fashion models — tell us? The photographs are fascinating 
and unsettling because there are no straightforward answers 
to these questions. 

Needless to say, Meisel’s photographs do find erotic 
possibilities in violence and humiliation, but this is not so 
much a “transformation” as a rediscovery. Two hundred 
years after Sade, a century after Bataille and Masoch, it 
appears that anything which publicly acknowledges that 
eroticism is inseparable from violence and humiliation is 
more unacceptable than ever. The issue is not how “healthy” 
sexuality can be purged of violence, but how the violence 
inherent to sexuality can be sublimated. Meisel’s photographs 
— which, we should remember, appear in a magazine the vast 
majority of whose readership is not “adolescent males” but 
women — are “fantasy kits” which offer just such 
sublimations, providing scenarios, role-play cues and 
potential fantasmatic identifications. 

“State of Emergency” demonstrates that, rather than 


simply retaining its capacity to shock, The Atrocity Exhibition is 
more disturbing than ever. The overt sexualisation and 
compulsory carnality of postmodern image culture distracts 
us from the essential staidness of its rendition of the erotic. 
As Baudrillard argues in Seduction, biologised sex functions as 
the reality principle of contemporary culture: everything is 
reducible to sex, and sex is just a matter of meat mechanics. 


Ours is an age of cynicism and piety, which, as Simon 


suggested in his initial post on “State of Emergency”,° primly 


and pruriently resists the equivalences between eroticism, 
violence and celebrity that Ballard explored: 


Entering the exhibition, Travis sees the atrocities of 
Vietnam and the Congo mimetised in the “alternate” 
death of Elizabeth Taylor; he tends the dying film star, 
eroticising her punctured bronchus in the over- 
ventilated verandas of the London Hilton; he dreams of 


Max Ernst, superior of the birds.’ 


To imagine the atrocities of September 11° and Abu 
Ghraib mimetised in the alternate death of Paris Hilton feels 
far more unacceptable, because contemporary piety has 
sacralised its atrocities in a way that the Sixties could not. In 
Atrocity, Dr Nathan’s reminder that, at the level of the 
unconscious, “the tragedies of Cape Kennedy and Vietnam... 
may in fact play very different parts from the ones we assign 
them” is extremely timely. (As Burroughs tells us in his 
preface to The Atrocity Exhibition, “Surveys indicate that wet 
dreams in many cases have no overt sexual content, whereas 
dreams with an overt sexual content in many cases do not 


result in orgasm”.) It is clear that the appalling Abu Ghraib 
photographs were already intensely eroticised stagings whose 
scenarios were derived from cheap American pornography. 
Love and Napalm: Export USA, indeed. Part of the reason that 
the Abu Ghraib images were so traumatic for a deeply 
conflicted American culture which combines religious 
moralism with hyper-sexualised commerce, and which is 
united only by a taste for mega-violence, is that they exposed 
the equation between military intervention and sexual 
humiliation that the official culture both depends upon and 
must suppress. 

It’s interesting to compare both The Atrocity Exhibition and 
“State of Emergency” to Martha Rosler’s series of collages, 


“Bringing the War Home”®. “Sixties iconography: the nasal 
prepuce of LBJ, crashed helicopters, the pudenda of Ralph 
Nader, Eichmann in drag, the climax of a New York 
happening: a dead child”: this typical section from The 
Atrocity Exhibition could almost be a gloss on Rosler’s images, 
with their irruptions of war and atrocity amidst domestic 
scenes. But in Rosler’s case, unlike in Ballard’s, surrealist 
juxtaposition has a clear polemical purpose. The Atrocity 
Exhibition, like “State of Emergency”, is devoid of any 
decipherable intent; the oneiric juxtapositions in Ballard’s 
and Meisel’s work seemed to be conceived of as neutral re- 
presentations of the substitutions and elisions made by the 
mediatised unconscious. 

Meisel’s fantasy kits, their narratives left implicit and 
mysterious, suggest ways in which Ballard might be adapted 
in future. Part of the problem with Weiss’ film adaptation of 
The Atrocity Exhibition is that it subordinated the fragmentary 


mode of the novel to the duree — the lived time — of the 


feature film.’ 


The most successful part of the film was 
perhaps the first few moments, where Ballard’s text was 
intoned over still images in a style reminiscent of Marker’s La 
Jetee (a film which Ballard adores, of course). That is partly 
because it is the profound stillness of the Surrealist paintings 
which The Atrocity Exhibition describes and appropriates — 
their beaches drained of time — which sets the rhythm of the 
novel. The most successful adaptation of The Atrocity 
Exhibition would, precisely, be an exhibition — not only of 
photographs, but also of newsreel footage, mandalas, 
diagrams, paintings and notebooks. It would be left for the 
viewer-participant to assemble their own narratives from 
these fantasy kits. 


the assassination of 
j-g. ballard? 


They wanted to kill Ballard again, but this time in a way that 
made sense. The British know how best to kill something, 
softly. Assimilation is sometimes the most effective kind of 
assassination. 


“You say these constitute an assassination weapon?” 


So here they come again — all the familiar profiles, all the old 
routines. All that over-rehearsed musing about the supposed 
contrast between Ballard’s writing and his lifestyle and 
persona. All that central London cognoscenti condescension: 
he lived in Shepperton, he wore a tie and drank gin and yet 
he could come up with this — imagine that. As if it isn’t 
obvious that English suburbs are seething with surrealism. As 
if you could think for a minute that The Drowned World or The 
Atrocity Exhibition were written by anyone wearing jeans. 
Ballard mapped another America, another 1960s, one beyond 
the pleasure principle of rock ‘n’ roll and its paraphernalia. 


(That was one of the reasons that Ballard should have been so 
integral to post-punk’s unlearning of r and r and to electro’s 
pursuit of a colder mechano-erotics outside rock’s passional 
regime.) As if Ballard’s works could be mistaken as anything 
other than the work of a bourgeois — Ballard’s was to have 
unashamedly fixated on the psychopathologies of his class (so 
no Keith Talents here, only a litany of deranged 
professionals), a class which he had a special insight into 
because he was always semi-detached from it. 


You: Coma: Princess Diana 


Assessing cultural figures by their alleged influence, their 
legacy, is an egregious postmodern tic — as if it reflected any 
merit to have inspired the Klaxons. Ballard is important 
precisely because it is completely unimaginable that any 
equivalent of his work could emerge from current conditions. 
As he made clear in his 1989 annotations to his most 
important work, The Atrocity Exhibition, he was a meta- 
psychologist of the pop age, his sensibility unsuited to the era 
of Reality, with its flattening fusion of celebrity and the 
hyper-banal. 


A unique collision of private and public fantasy took 
place in the 1960s, and may have to wait some years to 
be repeated, if ever. The public dream of Hollywood for 
the first time merged with the private imagination of 
the hyper-stimulated TV viewer. People have 
sometimes asked me to do a follow-up to The Atrocity 
Exhibition, but our perception of the famous has 
changed — I can’t imagine writing about Meryl Streep 


or Princess Di, and Margaret Thatcher’s undoubted 
mystery seems to reflect design faults in her own self- 
constructed persona. One can mechanically spin sexual 
fantasies around all three, but the imagination soon 
flags. Unlike [Elizabeth] Taylor, they radiate no light. 
[...] A kind of banalisation of celebrity has occurred: we 
are now offered an instant, ready-to-mix fame as 


nutritious as packet soup.” 


Ballard’s Sixties were inaugurated by the Kennedy 
assassination. The founding event of the media environment 
we live in now, in which consensual sentimentality has long 
since occluded Ballard’s death of affect, was Princess Diana’s 
car crash death in 1997. In his later novels, Ballard tried to 
get a grip on this mall-world of Ikea psychosis and shopping 
channel charismatics, but they never produced the same 
spinal charge as his encounters with the Sixties tele- 
cinematic arcades presided over by Elizabeth Taylor and 
Ronald Reagan. Ballard’s most probing contributions in later 
years came in interviews and articles rather than in the 
novels: it was here that he identified retail parks and 
anonymous non-places as the authentic landscape of the 
twenty-first century, but he was not able to poeticise this 
hyper-banal terrain in the same way that he mythologised 
the brutalist concourses and high-rises of the Sixties and 
Seventies. 


A Pulp Modernist Magus 


What better way to destroy something than send in Martin 
Amis to praise it? Ballard was never a “good writer” in the 


way that Amis and his admirers and cronies in urbane Brit lit, 
with their handcrafted sentences, their well-drawn 
characters, their concerned social commentary, were. The 
significance of The Atrocity Exhibition was to have obsolesced 
this machinery of mediocrity, which he eviscerated in his 
1964 profile of Burroughs. 


To use the stylistic conventions of the traditional oral 
novel — the sequential narrative, characters “in the 
round”, consecutive events, balloons of dialogue 
attached to “he said” and “she said” — is to perpetuate 
a set of conventions ideally suited to a period of great 
adventures in the Conradian mode, or to an 
overformalised Jamesian society, but now valuable for 


little more than the bedtime story and the fable.* 


But Ballard’s strategy in his best works was also opposed to 
that of another of his admirers and appropriators, Iain 
Sinclair. Whereas Sinclair transforms pop-cultural material 
into something opaque, obscure and hermetic, Ballard 
innovated a kind of pulp modernism in which the techniques 
of high modernism and the riffs of popular fiction intensified 
one another, avoiding both high cultural obscurantism and 
middlebrow populism. Ballard understood that collage was 
the great twentieth century artform and that the mediatised 
unconscious was a collage artist. Where are his twenty-first 
century inheritors, those who can use the fiction-kits Ballard 
assembled in the Sixties as diagrams and blueprints for a new 
kind of fiction? 


a world of dread 


and fear! 


“You couldn’t sleep. You had to work. 

Always light. 

Head against the window, sun coming up — 

The troops were gathering on the street below him. The 
Red Guard in good voice: 

SCAB, SCAB, SCAB — 

The dawn chorus of the Socialist Republic of South 
Yorkshire. 

Another cup of coffee. Another aspirin” 

— David Peace, GB84? 


David Peace’s GB84 is typed in prose as stark and unforgiving 
as motorway service station strip-lights. 

The harsh expressionist realism Peace honed over the 
course of the four books of the Red Riding Quartet is perfect for 
handling GB84’s subject matter, the events of the 1984-85 
Miners’ Strike. The Quartet counted forward — 1974-1977- 


1980-1983 — as if it is was approaching but would never reach 
the fateful date that will provide the title of GB84. From here 
we count backwards; GB84 “is actually the last of an inverse 
post-war trilogy which will include UKDK, a novel about the 
plot to overthrow Wilson and the subsequent rise of Thatcher 
and another book, possibly about the Atlee Govt.” From 


gothic crime to Political gothic...° 

The fiercely partisan novel ends with the incantation: 
“the Year is Zero”. But 1985, when both the strike and the 
book end, was very far from being a year of beginning or of 
possibilities for the novel’s “us”. (In fact, the very existence of 
that “us”, the collective proletarian subject, is itself in 
question by then. At the same time, however, this is the first 
of Peace’s novels in which the possibility of any sort of group- 
subject is raised. More typically, his characters are 
solipsistically alone, connected only by violence, their only 
shared project dissimulation.) On the contrary, it was a year 
of catastrophic defeat, the scale of which would not become 
apparent for a decade or more. (Perhaps it was only in the 
election of New Labour twelve years later that the defeat was 
both registered and finally secured.) 

We now know — although this cannot enter into the 
present tension of the novel — that the strike was about a 
failed Proletarianisation. After the events the novel describes, 
what awaited was fragmentation, new opportunities for the 
few, unemployment and underemployment for the majority. 
The technique of flying picketing that Scargill had pioneered 
so successfully in the late Sixties and early Seventies (and 
which had contributed to the humiliation and collapse of the 
Heath government) was combatted by a comprehensive range 


of strategies (including a _ highly-organised counter- 
subversion operation run by MI5) that were designed while 
the Tories were still in opposition. The aim was to fragment 
miners’ solidarity and to prevent support from sympathetic 
workers in other industries. In this, the creation of the 
Working Miners Committee and the Union of Democratic 
Mineworkers would prove crucial. The deterritorialisation of 
capital — its transmutation into “messages which pass 
instantaneously from one nodal point to another across the 


former globe, the former material world”* — was not to be 
met by a complementary deterritorialisation of labour. 
Miners were inveigled into identifying with their own 
terrirory rather than with the industry as a whole; hence the 
return to work of the Nottinghamshire and Derbyshire 
miners, who believed that they were safeguarding their 
future but in a satisfying irony found themselves no better off 
than miners from any other coalfield. Within a decade, the 
industry would be all but closed down in Britain, with 
members of the UDM no more likely to be in employment 
than those of the NUM. 

Yes, we know all this, now. But Peace restores drama by 
excluding any of the knowledge hindsights brings. The events 
come at you as if they were happening for the first time, and 
without the emollient shield of an omniscient authorial voice. 
As Joseph Brooker identifies in a lengthy piece on GB84 in the 


current issue of Radical Philosophy, the novel is bereft of any 
mediating meta-language. The tragic quality the novel 
possesses even in its earliest scenes comes courtesy of the 
knowledge we, the readers, bring — but which is, naturally, is 
denied to the protagonists — of the eventual course that the 


strike will take. 

Counterfactuals are largely the preserve of the 
reactionary right, and Peace refuses the temptation to change 
the facts. He writes his retro-speculative fiction in the spaces 
between the recorded facts, extrapolating, inferring, 
guessing. Yet the question the reader cannot help but pose is: 
what would have happened if the miners had won? (A 
question that has added piquancy since subsequent 
revelations have shown that the government was much closer 
to defeat than was ever suspected at the time.) The narrative 
in which the strike is now embedded — the only narrative in 
town, the story of Global Capital — has it that it was part of a 
receding ebb tide of organised working-class insurgency. 
Defeat was inevitable, written into the historical passage 
from Fordism to post-Fordism. The hard left are outflanked, 
fighting under the banner of the Past for “the history of the 
Miner. The tradition of the Miner. The legacies of their fathers 


and their fathers’ fathers.”° 

But such a narrativisation is question-begging, since the 
very credibility of this story relies upon the events of the 
strike unfolding as they did. What if they hadn’t? Under the 
aspect of eternity, everything is inevitable and we are all 
Spinozists. But life has to be lived “forward”, making us 
Sartreans. Reading the book now inevitably dramatises the 
tension between these two positions, between knowing that 
everything has already happened and acting as if it hasn’t. 

A gang of doppelgangers, near-duplicates, haunt the pages 
of GB84, this “fiction based upon a fact”. Peace writes an 
occulted history of the present by constructing a simulation 
of the near-past. The dramatis personae do not bear the 


names of their real-life counterparts, and sometimes don’t 
have names at all, merely titles designating their structural 
role: The President, The Chairman, The Minister. Sometimes, 
real world names are slightly altered; in GB84 the NUM’s Chief 
Executive Roger Windsor becomes the hapless Terry Winters. 
The relationship of these simulations to their real-life 
counterparts is complex. The President is not Scargill. But 
he’s not not Scargill. No doubt Peace changed the names in 
part to avoid legal action, but in an odd way the extra 
imaginative latitude he is granted by not being compelled 
into fidelity to actual biography gives the characters more 
reality. He is able to get inside their heads in a way that 
would not be possible with actual biographical individuals. 
The most controversial characterisation is that of Stephen 
Sweet, the professional strikebreaker based on Thatcher’s 
right-hand man throughout the strike, David Hart. Hart was 
the driving force behind the creation of the Working Miners’ 
Committee and the UDM. In the novel, Sweet is seen planning 
the crucial battle between police and pickets at the coking 
plant, Orgreave. (Devoting all its resources to Orgreave is now 
regarded as a major strategic error by the NUM.) Sweet is 
referred to throughout the novel as “The Jew”. Although this 
designation remains uncomfortable — as it is intended to be, 
Peace has said — suspicions of anti-semitism are immediately 
rebutted by any sort of close reading of the novel. Everything 
we see of Sweet is focalised through his chauffeur-factotum, 
Neil Fontaine. (This distancing is significant, since Sweet’s 
pomposity and grandiosity strike a slightly unconvincing 
note. It is almost as if Peace is unable to find the sympathy 
necessary for a convincing characterisation. On the other 


hand, perhaps Hart was the faintly absurd figure that Peace 
paints his fictional counterpart as. Peace does not make the 
mistake of portraying Sweet as a self-consciously evil figure; 
on the contrary, Sweet sees his efforts in a messianic light.) 

Fontaine, presumably a co-opted member of the working 
class who has worked for the security services, is a blank slate 
of a figure, a man reduced to function (he is doubled in the 
novel by David Johnson, The Mechanic, who becomes an 
antagonist but who was clearly an ally in the past). It is 
Fontaine, a man with right-wing affiliations and connections 
but few passions, who will never stop seeing Sweet as “The 
Jew”. That description foregrounds the provisional nature of 
the political alliance that Thatcher built: somehow, the 
Thatcher programme allowed fascists to consort with Jews, 
nationalists to find common cause with the agents of 
multinational capitalism. 

Fontaine is also the connecting link between the overt and 
the covert counter-“subversion” operations undertaken by 
the state in GB84. It is in the unraveling of the MI5’s role in 
proceedings that leads Peace into the territory of endemic 
corruption and betrayal that he staked out so viscerally in the 
Red Riding Quartet. Unusually for Peace, so skilled at putting 
himself (and therefore us) into the shoes of irredeemably 
corrupt power puppets, there is no major character in GB84 
who is a policeman. But there are state functionaries: 
Fontaine, Johnson, but, most vividly, Malcolm Morris, a man 
whose role is to be a shadow, a cipher, an expert phone- 
tapper who, in a Francis Baconoid delirium, fancies that his 
ears are always bleeding... 

In GB84, MI5 are the key players in organising Terry 


Winters’ spectacularly ill-judged trip to Libya. Who can forget 
the television images of Roger Windsor kissing Gadaffi in his 
tent? Winters/Windsor’s Libyan visit — only a few months 
after the policewoman Yvonne Fletcher had been killed by 
Libyan agents — proved an important, perhaps decisive, PR 
defeat for the NUM. (The actual role of Libya in the strike was 
somewhat different: the Thatcher government had illicitly 
increased oil imports from the supposedly outlawed regime 
so as to see off the threat of power cuts.) Peace deliberately 
leaves the degree of Windsor/Winters’ collusion with the 
security services unclear. He wanted the novel to be a “mess”, 
like the strike itself. 

The doubling of historical fact with Peace’s version of it is 
internal to the novel’s own structure, whose main fictional 
thread is cut through by a diary account of the strike by two 
miners, Martin and Peter. Martin and Peter’s accounts, 
rendered in the Yorkshire dialect Peace captures so ably, 
were “not fictionalised”, Peace has said. It is here that 
Scargill, Macgregor, Thatcher, McGahey and Heathfield 
appear in their own names. The first person accounts register 
the grim miseries of the strike, as well as its comaraderie, 
forming a contrast with the skullduggery, the corruption and 
the high-level meetings of the novel’s central narrative. 

Peace says that he first puts himself into the past, and 
then imagines. It’s like method writing, or time travel. Peace 
has tried and tested tricks to get back. He uses jaundiced 
newsprint, books but most of all pop — not the stuff he would 
have listened to himself, then, and has listened to ever since, 
but the songs that, ubiquitous then, forgotten now, can 
function as audio-madeleines. Digging through the carboot 


sale detritus of 84 and 85 pop, Peace finds a coded history of 
the strike secreted beneath the dull sheen of thrownaway 
post-new pop. GB84 begins with Nena’s execrable “99 Red 
Balloons”, which here becomes an apocalyptic carnival tune, 
bursting with all the hopes that will sag and bleed by the end 
of the novel’s gruelling, long, long march. “Two Tribes” 
soundtracks the next phase, the confrontation between police 
and miner (both this and the Nena song, of course, played 
upon Cold War anxieties when they were released. Another 
reminder, and there are many in this novel, that 1984 was a 
world away). The exhilaration and adrenalin of out and out 
confrontation, Us and Them, gives way to suspicion (who is 
with us, and who is against us?) “Two Tribes — Must have 
heard that bloody song ten times a day now for weeks. Ought 


to make it National Anthem, said Sean.”’ The songs that 
Peace dredges up for the final phase of the strike are 
“Careless Whisper” (“guilty feet have got no rhythm”) and, 
for the 84-85 winter that was cold, but not cold enough — the 
power cuts never come — Band Aid’s “Do They Know It’s 
Christmas”. Characters speculate that Band Aid is a 
government-backed scheme to distract from the plight of the 
miners, and the line that Peace selects for sampling is, 
naturally, “There’s a world outside your window, and it’s a 
world of dread and fear.” 

Sampling is precisely the right term, since pop, much 
more than literature, film or TV (Peace actively distrusts 
these latter two) provides Peace with a methodology for 
drilling his words into the repetitions and refrains that are 
his stock-in-trade. Repetition is a hallmark of Peace’s style; he 
has famously remarked that the strike was intensely 


repetitive and that the prose would reflect that. But in all of 
Peace’s writing, repetition is what substitutes for both plot 
and character. His crime novels make no attempt to interest 
readers in the intrigue and enigma of plots; the plot of GB84, 
meanwhile, is given in advance, a kind of readymade. And one 
strange quality of Peace’s writing that is not immediately 
evident is that, although it is unusually intimate — reading 
his novels is always like rifling through someone else’s most 
secret places — his characters lack what is usually called 
“inner life”. They are identified less by a reflexive vitality 
than by death-drive repetitions, riffs, echoes, habit-forms. 

In GB84 the result is more poetic than most poetry; it is, 
naturally, a poetry stripped of all lyricism, a harshly 
dissonant word-music. Peace is a writer particularly attentive 
to sound: the unsleeping vigilance of state power is signified 
by the “Click, Click” of the telephone tap, the massed ranks of 
the police by the Krk, Krk of boots and truncheons beaten 
against shields, both sounds repeated so much that they 
become background noise, part of the ambience of paranoia. 
The Telegraph review was right to observe that, “At times, the 
novel feels like an eardrum buzz, the literary equivalent of 
late-1970s Northern bands such as Throbbing Gristle and 
Cabaret Voltaire.” It resembles even more closely the two 
great post-punk responses to the strike: Mark Stewart’s As the 
Veneer of Democracy Starts to Fade (Keith Leblanc also produced 
the single “The Enemy Within”) and Test Department’s The 
Unacceptable Face of Freedom. Perhaps for this reason, Post- 
punk recedes as an explicit reference in GB84. It had been 
present in Nineteen Eighty Three in titles of sections of the 
novel: “Miss the Girl” (the Creatures) and “There are No 


Spectators” (the Pop Group). The tone for GB84 is in every 
sense set by the title of the last section of Nineteen Eighty 
Three: “Total Eclipse of the Heart”. 

Part of the reason that 1985 seemed like the worst year 
for pop ever was that it was the beginning of the restoration. 
Up to 1984, British popular and political culture was still a 
battleground. 1985 was the year of Live Aid, the beginning of 
a time of the fake consensus that is the cultural expression of 
global capital. If Live Aid was the non-event that happened, 
the strike was the Event that didn’t. 


Swords and shields. Sticks and stones. Horses and dogs. 
Blood and bones— 


The armies of the dead awoken, arisen for one last 
battle. 


The windscreen of the Granada lit by a massive 
explosion— 
The road. The hedges. The trees— 


Fire illuminating the night. The fog now smoke. Blue 
lights and red— 


Terry shook Bill’s arm. Shook it and shook it. Bill 
opened his eyes— 
“Where are we?” shouted Terry. “Where is this place?” 


“The start and the end of it all,” said Bill. “Brampton 
Bierlow. Cortonwood.” 

“But what’s going on?” screamed Terry Winters. 
“What’s happening? What is it?” 

“It’s the end of the world,” laughed Bill Reed. “The end 


of all our worlds.’ 


ripley’s glam! 


“He hated becoming Thomas Ripley again, hated being 
nobody, hated putting on his old set of habits again, and 
feeling that people looked down on him and were bored 
with him unless he put on an act for them like a clown, 
feeling incompetent and incapable of doing anything 
with himself except entertaining people for minutes at 
a time.” 


— Patricia Highsmith, The Talented Mr Ripley” 


We can learn a great deal about the glam impulse from these 
lines from The Talented Mr Ripley. 

Significantly, Highsmith wrote the first Ripley novel in 
1955 and only returned to the character in 1970. Tom Ripley 
was not a character that could fit into the rock and roll era, 
with its emphasis on teen desire, social disruption and 
Dionysiac excess. But Ripley’s “hedonic conservatism”, his 
snobbery and his facility with masks and disguise, mean that 
he would be perfectly at home in the Marienbad-like country 
estate of glam. If Sixties rock was characterised, on the one 
hand, by appeals made to the big Other (demands for social 
change and/or more pleasure) and, on the other hand, by the 


denial of the existence of the Symbolic order as such 
(psychedelia), then glam was defined, initially, by a 
hyperbolic/parodic identification with the big Other — by the 
return of Signs and/of Status. 

In the sentence cited above, there are, evidently, two 
Toms — “Thomas Ripley” the performed social role, and the 
Tom who performs that role; Tom the speaking subject and 
Tom the subject of the statement. At the outset of The Talented 
Mr Ripley both these Toms are “nobodies” — as a speaking 
subject, like all speaking subjects, Tom is ontologically 
nothing; and as the subject of the statement is socially 
nothing. At this stage, Tom is very far from being the 
insouciant, poised figure he will appear to be later; he is 
capable of simulating confidence only when taking on the 
role of Other people. It is not that Tom lacks status; it is that 
he has no place whatsoever in the social hierarchy. His status 
is not even low. His indeterminate social origins and his ability 
as a mimic and as a forger (skills upon which his anti-career 
as a fraudster are based) mean that he fits in nowhere (or 
anywhere). Tom experiences this nothingness in classic 
existentialist terms, feeling himself to be inchoate, a void, 
unresolved, unreal. 

But the novel is a kind of existentialist picaresque by the 
end of which Tom has the (financial) means to create a 
Thomas Ripley he will not hate being. At the beginning of the 
next novel, Ripley Under Ground, it is immediately evident that 
Tom has created/become such a figure. Tom has fashioned 
his best forgery — a Thomas Ripley who is independently 
wealthy, owns an elegant house in the Paris suburbs and is 
married to a beautiful, hedonistic heiress. From now on, 


Ripley’s anxieties will concern not the establishment of an 
identity, but the preserving and defending of the status he 
has acquired. 

Ripley’s trajectory is uncannily in sync with that of Bryan 
Ferry. Roxy Music and For Your Pleasure, those exercises in 
learning and unlearning of accent and manners, are pop’s 
equivalent of The Talented Mr Ripley. The clothes, the bearing 
and the voice are faked, but not yet perfectly. The roots still 
show, and the painful drama of becoming something you are 
not still carries an existential charge. Stranded and the 
subsequent albums, meanwhile, are the equivalent of the 
later novels; here, success is assumed, and the threats to the 
tasteful but banal idyll come from ennui, a certain unease 
with contentment, and — most ominous of all — the danger of 
the past returning. The vapid bucolia of Roxy’s Avalon — 
recorded when Ferry was himself married to an heiress and 
living on a country estate — would be the perfect soundtrack 
to Ripley puttering around in his Harpers and Queens dream 
home, Belle Ombre, with his wife, Heloise. 

The first step to Ripley’s becoming a Something turns out 
to be his vampirising of the identity of Dickie Greenleaf. I say 
“turns out” because, contrary to what Anthony Minghella’s 
film implies, it is clear that Tom does not to go to Europe with 
the thought of destroying Dickie already in his mind. Ripley is 
a brilliant improviser, not a planner; the plans he does make 
are short-term, often leading to more problems than they 
solve, and he derives enjoyment from cleaning up messes 
rather than from avoiding them in the first place. 

Initially, Tom’s attitude to Dickie is ambivalent and is not 
straightforwardly predatory — he is aggressive and envious 


but also affectionate. If Tom is Nothing, a turmoil of 
unresolved purposes, a tumult of shame and inadequacy, then 
Dickie is really Something, an Object, resolved and real, 
possessing “the solidity of a stone”. By taking the place of 
Dickie, Ripley can escape the pain, anxiety and awkwardness 
of being himself, a self. To become an Object — to be relieved 
of the pressures of subjectivity, untroubled by any interiority 
— isn’t this one of central fantasies of glam? 

Zizek is certainly right to argue that the sexualisation of 
the relationship between Tom and Dickie in Anthony 
Minghella’s film is a mis-step. Yet ZiZek’s interpretation is not 
fully adequate either. According to Zizek: 


Dickie is for Tom not the object of his desire, but the 
ideal desiring subject, the transferential subject 
“supposed to know how to desire.” In short, Dickie 
becomes for Tom his ideal ego, the figure of his 
imaginary identification: when he repeatedly casts a 
coveting side-glance at Dickie, he does not thereby 
betray his erotic desire to engage in sexual commerce 
with him, to HAVE Dickie, but his desire to BE like 


Dickie.° 


What is missing from ZizZek’s analysis is a recognition of 
the way that Dickie fails to serve as an adequate ideal ego. The 
pivotal moment of the novel comes when Ripley is no longer 
capable of sustaining his fantasy identification with Dickie. 
When Tom looks into Dickie’s eyes and sees not the windows 
of a soul with which he can identify but the dead, glassy 
surface of an inert and idiotic dummy, he falls (back) into a 


deep existential nausea and vertigo, experiencing a moment 
of profound cosmic loathing and miserable dislocation: 


He stared at Dickie’s eyes that were still frowning, the 
sun bleached eyebrows white and the eyes themselves 
shining and empty, nothing but little pieces of blue jelly 
with a black dot in them. You were supposed to see the 
soul through the eyes, to see the love through the eyes, 
the one place where you could look at another human 
being and see what really went on inside, and in 
Dickie’s eyes Tom saw nothing more than he would 
have seen if he had looked at the hard, bloodless 
surface of a mirror. Tom felt a painful wrench in his 
breast, and he covered his face with his hands. It was as 
if Dickie had suddenly been snatched away from him. 
They were not friends. They didn’t know each other. It 
struck Tom like a horrible truth, true for all time, true 
for the people he had known in the past and for those 
he would know in the future: each had stood and would 
stand before him, and he would know time and time 
again that he would never know them, and the worst 
was that there would always be the illusion, for a time, 
that he did know them, and that he and they were 
completely in harmony and alike. For an instant the 
wordless shock of the realisation seemed more than he 
could bear. He felt in the grip of a fit, as if he would fall 


to the ground.* 


No doubt this is partly a registering of Dickie’s rejection of 
Tom. But it also expresses Tom’s feelings of revulsion for 


Dickie. What has been “snatched away” from Tom is not just 
Dickie “himself”, but the fantasy of Dickie. It is as if Tom is no 
longer capable of pretending (to himself) that Dickie is 
anything other than a really rather mediocre person; as if he 
has encountered, for the first time, the brute, stupid 
physicality of Dickie — has seen Dickie, directly, without the 
screen/sheen of fantasy to beatify him. 

Tom’s break from Dickie is inevitable after the 
desperately painful scene, slightly earlier, when Dickie 
discovers Tom wearing his clothes and imitating him in front 
of the mirror. Dickie is disgusted and angered by Tom’s 
imitation (what is more horrifying than being someone else’s 
ideal ego?), just as Tom is utterly mortified by the fact that 
Dickie has discovered him in the act (what is more shameful 
than being caught by your ego ideal fantasising about them?). 
Significantly, Dickie makes the same error as Minghella, (mis) 
interpreting Tom’s behaviour in terms of sexual obsession, 
choosing this moment to emphatically deny to Tom that he is 
“queer”. But Tom’s wanting to be Dickie is far more obscene, 
far more deadly, far more Burroughsian, than his wanting to 
have him would have been. 

Once Tom can no longer sustain his fantasy identification 
with Dickie, the logic of his psychosis insists that he will only 
be able to resolve his existential crisis — his lack of Being — 
by killing Dickie. That is partly because, in Ripley’s mind, 
Dickie is already dead: a soulless shell who illegitimately 
possesses wealth and social status that the more tasteful and 
refined Tom feels that he rightfully deserves. Tom is sure that 
he can be Dickie better than Dickie himself could be, and 
Dickie will be the daub that Tom will use as the basis for his 


masterpiece, the new Thomas Ripley. There is also a sense in 
which, by killing Dickie, Tom “earns” his place in the 
unproductive leisure class. Even before he is elevated into the 
leisure class, Tom shares its disdain for “drudgery”. The 
difference between Tom the common thief and con artist and 
Tom the member of the leisured elite is a successful act of 
violence. Veblen argues that “leisure class society” is founded 
on the “barbarian” distinction between exploit — “the 
conversion to his own ends of energies previously directed to 
some end by another agent” — and industry (or drudgery) — 
“the effort that goes to create a new thing with a new, 


(‘brute’) material”.- The Masters must always vampirise, 
never produce. 


The performance of productive work, or employment in 
personal service, falls under the same odium for the 
same reason. An invidious distinction arises between 
exploit and acquisition by seizure on the one hand and 
industrial employment on the other. Labour acquires a 
character of irksomeness by virtue of the indignity 


imputed to it.® 


Hunting has always been one of the activities upon which the 
leisured elite has prided itself, and Ripley is a consummate 
hunter (prey is one of the meanings of Ripley’s Game). 

The use of homicidal violence to achieve and protect a 
position of privilege is very far from being aberrant, and Tom 
is no more likely to face justice than are the brigands of our 
real life ruling elites. (Highsmith’s refusal to impose a justice 
in the novels that is conspicuously lacking in the world is one 


of the most subversive aspects of her depictions of the 
character.) If Tom is pathological, his pathologies are the 
pathologies of a class; it is only the freshness of the blood of 
his victims (and his willingness to spill it himself) that 
separates Ripley’s exploits from those of his new peers. Yet 
Ripley is not a Slasher who enjoys killing. On the contrary, he 
is horrifying because he treats murder as a practical task 
devoid of any special existential or affective charge. Ripley’s 
commission of murders are remarkable for their their 
coldness and lack of cruelty; famously, Ripley only kills 
because he needs to, not because he enjoys it. Ripley kills out 
of cold, utilitarian logic, eliminating those who stand in his 
way or threaten to expose him. Again, far from being 
aberrant, a carefully maintained distinction between a 
violent, obscene underside and a bland, official front is the 
normal practice of power and privilege. It is not moral 
scruples that motivate Ripley (he notoriously has none), but a 
fear of humiliation. As Julie Walker argues: 


What Tom does fear is unmasking; not merely the 
unmasking of himself as Dickie or even the unmasking 
of himself as a killer but the unmasking of his lack of a 
real self and therefore his self-perceived inadequacy in 
the face of others — there is no appreciable difference 
between fear of discovery for his tax scam or for his 
murders. His main fear is that of socially not quite 
making the grade. 


This rendition of amorality is what is (post)modern about 
Ripley. Classic psychosis consisted in the confusion of the 


Real and the Symbolic (the most obvious example of which 
would be hearing the voice of God). But Ripley’s psychosis 
resides in his conviction that only the big Other exists. Tom is 
not troubled by specific, named others being aware of, or 
suspecting, his criminality, so long as his crimes are not 
Symbolically inscribed. What is distinctive about Ripley’s 
postmodern take on the big Other is that it is radically 
atheistic — he neither believes in God nor in any moral order 
written into the fabric of the universe. The postmodern big 
Other is a Symbolic Order stripped of its symbolisation of 
itself; it no longer poses as God or History and openly 
announces itself as a social construct — but this ostensible 
demystification does nothing to impede its functioning. On 
the contrary, the big Other has never functioned more 
effectively. 


methods of 


dreaming! 


Two novels that — purely by coincidence, or so it would seem 
— I happened to read one after the other which both draw on 
dreaming, but which emphasise opposite poles of the 
dreaming experience. 

Christopher Priest’s A Dream Of Wessex (1977) is about a 
collective dreaming project, a government-sponsored 
initiative to tap the unconscious in order to come up with 
solutions to the economic and political problems that have 
paralysed the society in the novel’s present day of 1985. In 
the projected future world, the USA has converted to Islam 
and the UK has been annexed by the Soviet Union. The result 
is a strange kind of utopia, in which the bureaucratic provides 
a background to the bucolic: the irritations of the Soviet 
official machinery seem built into the dreamspace as a 
necessary precondition for the aching languor of the Wessex 
idyll, where everyday life is suffused by a Mediterranean 
eroticism. Priest conjures the atmosphere of a gentle solar 
trance, broken, significantly, by small circular mirrors, which 


are used to trigger the dreamer’s return to the dismal drizzle 
of the novel’s real world. 

Once inside the Wessex projection, the participants 
cannot remember their real world identities. This means that, 
although they are referred to by the same name, the 
dreamers in the simulation are different entities from their 
real world counterparts (just as any dreamer is a different 
being from their double in waking life). A classic case of the 
Real (of unconscious wishes) versus reality. When they exit 
the Wessex simulation, the dreamers are replaced in the 
consensual hallucination by placeholder doppelgangers, 
programmed selves that, possessing no inner life, only exist 
for the Others in the dreamspace. Some of the participants 
come to recognise the points at which other dreamers depart 
from the simulation and come back to it: something in the 
other, that which is in them more than themselves perhaps, 
disappears or (seemingly miraculously) returns. What the 
novel renders especially powerfully is the overwhelming, 
intoxicating intensity of erotic connections with a dream 
Other, the uncanny sense of recognition, the deja vu of 
dreamlove. In the case of A Dream Of Wessex, the sense of 
recognition between the lovers can be accounted for by the 
fact that the two, Julia and David, know each other in the 
novel’s real world; and yet Julia and David are not in love in 
the real world, nor is there any suggestion that they would 
necessarily fall in love. It is their dream-selves that fall for 
each other. What ultimately unsettles the idyll is the kind of 
reality bleed or ontological haemorrhage which Priest’s later 
novels all turn around. A Dream Of Wessex looks forward to 
Gibson’s cyberspace, but it is also a vision of the Sixties 


recalled at the bitter end of the Seventies. 

Kazuo Ishiguro’s The Unconsoled (1995) makes contact with 
another kind of dream space-time altogether. The novel is 
well-titled since it plunges us, like Alice projected into 
Wonderland, into a world without consolation, a world of 
unrelieved urgencies. This is the first and most obvious point 
of contrast with A Dream Of Wessex, where the official 
imperatives, both inside and outside the dreamspace, operate 
as receding pretexts for libidinal trajectories which depart 
from “what should be happening” (this tendency puts the 
whole project at risk). In The Unconsoled, the official too 
recedes, but assumes now not the benign quality of the 
libidinal pretext (the ostensible goal which allows jouissance 
to happen precisely by being endlessly missed) but the 
tortuous, tantalising, thwarted object whose failure to be 
attained casts a pall of terrible anxiety over everything. 

Upon arriving in a nameless central European city to give 
a performance, the renowned pianist Ryder finds himself 
assailed by countless demands which distract him from his 
official duties, but which he seems powerless to resist. He 
must listen to young hopefuls playing the piano; he must 
speak at late-night meetings of which he was not previously 
aware; he must go to the outskirts of the city and be 
photographed in front of a monument whose significance he 
does not understand. New urgencies are embedded within 
older urgencies, endlessly. 

The Unconsoled is, in part, a pastiche of Kafka, and what 
Ishiguro borrows from Kafka above all else is his oneiric 
geography, at once bizarre and strangely familiar. Spaces 
which had seemed to be very far from one another are 


suddenly revealed to be adjacent; a meeting hall which Ryder 
has traveled to turns out to be the very hotel that he started 
from. This allows problems which had seemed intractable to 
suddenly resolve themselves; yet the solutions bring no relief, 
for by now Ryder has been gripped by another urgency. The 
previous imperative, once so overwhelmingly important, 
recedes into irrelevance at the moment the next one arrives. 

In The Unconsoled, as in Kafka, this perverse spatiality of 
contiguity without consistency arises because all space (and 
time) is subordinated to the urgency. There is no time except 
that of the urgency; and all space is curved by the urgency 
(and its frustrations). Obstacles suddenly emerge: most 
notably a wall that inexplicably looms up at the last moment 
preventing Ryder from getting to the concert hall where he is 
due to give his recital. The hectic pace is driven by the 
improvisational logic of retrospective confabulation, which is 
always making sense of things a moment too late. Ryder is 
perpetually noticing things that should have been obvious. As 
with Kafka, then, The Unconsoled is coloured by an ingenue’s 
sense of embarrassment. 

Two opposed methods of dreaming, then: the one languid, 
laconic, the other harried, harassed. 


atwood’s anti- 


capitalism+ 


“Regressive it all is”, Jameson remarks of the “God’s 
Gardeners” cult in Atwood’s The Year of the Flood, adding a 
provocative parenthesis: “it is always helpful to wonder what 


politics today could possibly be otherwise.”* The Year of the 
Flood is disappointing in part because it has no alternatives to 
regression — the only way forward, it seems, is back to 
nature. 

It isn’t the focus on religion per se that is the signature of 
this regression; rather, it is Atwood’s retreat from the 
questions about religion that Oryx and Crake posed so 
intriguingly. One of the climactic moments of Oryx was the 
foundation of religious feeling amongst the lab-designed neo- 
noble savages, the Crakers. As per Totem and Taboo and Moses 
And Monotheism, the religion emerges as a consequence of the 
death of the father figure. Ironies abound here: since the 
“Crakers” were made, not begotten, the “father” is actually 
their creator-designer, the misanthropic wunderkind Crake 
— who had precisely designed them without the neurological 


configuration which he believes gives rise to religion. Crake is 
not so much an eliminative materialist as a materialist 
eliminativist: “Crake thought he’d done away with all that, 
eliminated what he called the G-spot in the brain. God is a 
cluster of neurons, he’d maintained. It had been a difficult 
problem, though: take out too much in the area and you got a 
zombie or a psychopath.” If, at first sight, the emergence of 
religion amongst the Crakers appears to be a kind of miracle, 
in the end it is only a testament to the power of other 
(psychoanalytic and cultural) determining factors in addition 
to neurology. 

Crake’s experiments constitute a retort to the hoary old 
reactionary homily that utopia is alien to human nature. (For 
a recent version of this, see one of the antagonists in ZizZek’s 


latest book, the uber-capitalist realist Guy Sorman’, with his 
claim that, “[w]hatever the truths uncovered by economic 
science, the free market is finally only the reflection of 
human nature, itself hardly perfectible.”) If that’s the case, 
Crake concludes with the pragmatism of the autist, we should 
change human nature: the means are now available. Crake in 
effect responds to Freud’s argument in Civilisation and its 
Discontents that, even if property relations were made 
egalitarian, antagonism would continue to arise because of 
sexual competition. “Maybe Crake was right,” Snowman 
reflects, 


Under the old dispensation, sexual competition had 
been relentless and cruel: for every pair of happy lovers 
there was a dejected onlooker, the one excluded. Love 
was its own transparent bubble-dome you could see the 


two inside it, but you couldn’t get in there yourself. 
That had been the milder form: the single man at the 
window, drinking himself into oblivion to the mournful 
strains of the tango. But such things could escalate into 
violence. Extreme emotions could be lethal. If I can’t 


have you nobody will, and so forth. Death could set in." 


So Crake replaces what Toby in The Year of the Flood calls 
“romantic pain” with sedate animal courtship rituals. “Their 
sexuality was not a constant torment to them, not a cloud of 
turbulent hormones: they came into heat and regular 


intervals, as did most other mammals other than man.” It 
would have been fascinating for Atwood to have given a 
fictional testing to Crake’s claim to have eliminated 
hierarchy, hunger and racism amongst his genetic creations. 
There’s also the problem of language. The Crakers are able to 
maintain their genetically-designed innocence, Atwood 
suggests, because they lack the past subjunctive tense. (“[T]he 
idea of the immortality of the soul [...] was a consequence of 
grammar. And so was God, because as soon as there is a past 
tense, there has to be a past before the past until you get to I 
don’t know, and that’s what God is. It’s what you don’t know — 
the dark, the hidden, the underside of the visible, and all 


because we have grammar.”° But, this too, is fixable with a 
little genetic engineering: “[G] rammar would be impossible 
without the FoxP2 gene gene.”) 

Yet the loss of Crake — which is nothing less than an 
encounter with loss and negation itself — threatens to project 
the Crakers out of their animal-time into the wounded time 
of human abjection. But the Crakers recede from focus in The 


Year of the Flood: a sign, perhaps, that Atwood has lost interest 
in them, or — maybe — that such creatures cannot elicit 
much interest from beings such as us. What looms to the fore 
in the narrative is the progressive-regressive religious form 
that a less pacific group of humans cleave to in the dying days 
of the world. 

Atwood has said that one inspiration for the creation of 
the eco-religion was “the death of her father and mother [...] 
and the necessity to choose hymns for their funerals that 
would have been acceptable to them: both were scientists.” 
It’s easy to sneer at the difficulty that Atwood touches upon 
here, and the familiar problems of reconciling religion and 
science may ultimately be less intractable than the issue of 
symbolic deficit in contemporary secularism that she is 
pointing to. Atheism has yet to come up with rituals that can 
muster the symbolic weight of religion, and there are strong 
reasons to suspect that the failure is more than a contingent 
one. That’s because Atheism typically construes the death of 
God in terms of a disavowal of the Symbolic (=big Other) 
itself. There’s a close fit between this quintessentially 
postmodern disavowal — where official denial of the 
existence of the big Other is combined with a de facto 
observance of the symbolic at another level — and capitalist 
realism. As Althusser realised, the rituals of capitalist 
ideology function all the better for not being acknowledged 
as rituals at all. In place of the intransigent solemnity of the 
religious ritual, postmodern secularism presents us with 
either an eschewal of ritual altogether (no need for any kind 
ceremony), or “write-your-own-vows” personalisation, or a 
kind of ersatz humanist-kitsch, in which religious form is 


preserved even as belief in a supernatural God is denied. The 
problem is not a secular “lack of meaning”, but almost the 
opposite: it is religious rituals’ very meaninglessness, their 
lack of personal significance, which gives them much of their 
power. Partly, as Jameson suggests in his LRB piece on The 
Year of the Flood, the problem is time: any new “belief system” 
“demands a supplement in the form of deep time, ancient 
cultural custom, or revelation itself”. Time precisely allows a 
ritual to become a custom, an empty form to which the 
individual is subjected — and, very far from being a 
disadvantage, this is what yields funeral rites much of their 
power to console. 

Mourning and loss are not only at the origins of religion, 
but also, it goes without saying, at the root of much of its 
continuing appeal. One of the most contentious — and 
borderline acrimonious — discussions amongst students that 
I’ve seen for a while came up in a session on Philosophy of 
Religion that I taught earlier this year. What prompted the 
controversy was my contention that atheism has far more of 
a problem with evil and suffering than religion does — not 
least because of the suffering of those who are now dead. Ivan 
Karamazov’s howl of anguish can be directed at the atheist 
architects of the radiant city as much as at God, since what 
can any revolutionary eschatology, no matter how glorious, 
do about the agonies of those who are long dead? No amount 
of secular good will can guarantee any correlation between 
virtue and happiness, as Kant argues in an incendiary passage 
of “The Critique of Teleological Judgment”: 


Deceit, violence, and envy will be rife around [the 


righteous non-believer], even though he himself is 
benevolent. Moreover, as concerns the other righteous 
people, he meets: no matter how worthy of happiness 
they may be, nature, which pays no attention to that, 
will still subject them to all the evils of deprivation, 
disease, and untimely death, just like all the other 
animals on the earth. And they will stay subjected to 
these evils always, until one vast tomb engulfs them 
one and all (honest or not, that makes no difference 
here), and hurls them, who managed to believe that 
they were the final purpose of creation, back into the 
abyss of the purposeless chaos of matter from which 


they were taken.’ 


Note also that Kant’s argument here applies equally well 
to the neopaganism of God’s Gardeners as it does to 
“righteous non-believers”, for Kant absolutely refuses the 
equation of nature with beneficence that the Gardeners 
preach. On the contrary, Kant argues, God is necessary to 
make good a nature characterised by amoral purposelessness. 
The true atheist must be able to look this “vast tomb”, this 
“abyss of purposeless chaos”, full in the face — whereas I 
suspect that most (of us) non-believers manage only to look 
away from it. But Kant’s moral argument is less easily 
dismissed than it would appear, because it is far harder to 
eliminate belief in a providential structure of the universe 
than we first imagine — precisely because this kind of belief 
lurks far beneath anything that we would admit to accepting. 
(Watch an edition of Deal or No Deal, though, and it’s clear that 
many openly evince such a belief.) Perhaps it would indeed 


take a Crake’s genetic tinkering to eradicate it. 

The problem with The Year of the Flood is that politics and 
religion become synonymous — and while there’s every 
reason to be positive about politicised religion, there are deep 
problems with a politics which cannot shed the redemptive 
and messianic mantles of religious eschatology. It’s striking 
how much God’s Gardeners resemble the Greens as 
abominated by Sorman, in a passage quoted in First As 
Tragedy, Then As Farce: 


No ordinary rioters, the Greens are the priests of a new 
religion that puts nature above humankind. The 
ecology movement is not a nice peace-and-love lobby 
but a revolutionary force. Like many a modern-day 
religion, its designated evils are ostensibly decried on 
the basis of scientific knowledge: global warming, 
species extinction, loss of biodiversity, superweeds. In 
fact, all these threats are figments of the Green 
imagination. Greens borrow their vocabulary for 
science without availing themselves of its rationality. 
Their method is not new; Marx and Engels also 


pretended to root their world vision in the science of 
8 


their time, Darwinism. 

Atwood makes a case for such a religion. (Clarifactory 
note: just to be 100% clear — I in no way endorse Sorman’s 
views of the Greens. I just thought it was amusing that 
Atwood constructed an eco-cult which so closely fitted 
Sorman’s stereotype.) In an exchange with Richard Dawkins 
on Newsnight a couple of weeks ago, Atwood maintained that 


arguing against religion from the perspective of evolution 
makes little sense, because the persistence of religion itself 
suggests that it confers evolutionary benefit on humans. 
Given this, Atwood suggested, religion should be used as a 
tool for “progressive” struggles; and Adam One, the leader of 
God’s Gardeners, is interesting only when he sounds like a 
Machiavelli or a Strauss, who uses religion to manipulate 
popular sentiment — the rest of the time his ecopiousness is 
made bearable only by virtue of Atwood’s gentle satirical 
teasing (witness, for instance, the convolutions into which 
Gardener-doctrine is forced in its attempts to reconcile 
vegetarianism with both the carnivorebias of the Bible and 
the “amoral chaos” of a nature red in tooth and claw). 
Initially, what appeals about the idea of God’s Gardeners is 
the promise that Atwood will describe a new kind of political 
organisation. Yet the Gardeners’ doctrine and structure turns 
out to be a disappointing ragbag of stale and drab No Logo-like 
anti-consumerist asceticism, primitivist lore, natural 
remedies and self-defence that is as alluring as last week’s 
patchouli oil. Ultimately, The Year of the Flood feels like a 
symptom of the libidinal and symbolic impasses of so much 
so-called anti-capitalism. Atwood imagines the end of 
capitalism, but only after the end of the world. Oryx was like 
the first part of Wall-E; The Year of the Flood is like the second 
part, where we find that the last survivor was nothing of the 
sort, and there were existing bands of human beings already 
wandering around, mysteriously just out of sight. (At least in 
Wall-E the surviving humans were off-world, whereas in Oryx, 
we are now asked to believe, they had somehow remained 
just outside Snowman’s eyeline.) It has a retrospectively 


deflationary effect, subtracting most of the pathos and 
nobility from Snowman’s plight, and converting what had 
seemed like a cyberpunk-Beckett tragicomedy into mere 
comedy. (Incidentally, perhaps the greatest “achievement” of 
The Year of the Flood is that, by the end, it no longer feels like 
an Atwood novel at all. Instead, it’s written in the kind of 
functional prose of a middling Stephen King novel, and 
populated by cyberpunk genre-standard hardass women, in a 
post-apocalyptic setting which is surprisingly lacking in 
vividness. The result is what Robert Macfarlane memorably 
calls a “dystoap-opera”.) 

The question that kept recurring when I was reading both 
Oryx and Crake and The Year of the Flood was: why do these 
books not succeed in the way that The Handmaid’s Tale did? If 
The Handmaid’s Tale was an exemplary dystopia, it was 
because the novel made contact with the Imaginary-Real of 
neoconservatism. Gilead was “Real” at the level of a neo- 
conservative desire that was operating in the Reaganite 
Eighties; a virtual present that conditioned the actual 
present. Offred, the handmaids, the Marthas, the Wall — 
these names have the resonant consistency of a world. But 
Atwood does not have so assured a handle on neoliberalism as 
she did on neoconservatism. Atwood gives every appearance 
of underestimating the cheap poetry of brands, banal as it is; 
her corporate names are ugly and clunky, no doubt 
deliberately so — perhaps this is the way that she hears the 
absurd infantilisms of late capitalist semiotics. AnooYoo, 
HelthWyzer, Happicuppa, ReJoovenEssens, and — most 
ungainly of all — Sea(H)ear Candies: these practically caused 
me physical pain to read, and it is hard to conceive of any 


world in which these would be leading brands. Atwood’s 
mistake is always the same — the names are unsightly plays 
on the function or service that the corporations offer, 
whereas capitalism’s top brand names — Coca-Cola, Google, 
Starbucks — have attained an asignifying abstraction, in 
which any reference to what the corporation does is merely 
vestigial. Capitalist semiotics echo capital’s own tendency 
towards ever-increasing abstraction. (For the Imaginary-Real 
of neoliberalism, you’d be far better off reading Nick Land’s 
Nineties texts, shortly to be re-published.) Atwood’s names 
for genetically-spliced animals — the pigoon, the spoat/gider, 
the liobam — are also examples of linguistic butchery; 
perhaps she was trying to provide a parallel in language for 
the denaturalising violence of genetic engineering. In any 
case, these linguistic monsters are unlikely to roam far 
beyond Atwood’s texts (they certainly don’t have anything 
like the dark sleekness and hyperstitional puissance of, say, 
Gibson’s neologisms). 

But the principal failing of The Year of the Flood’s anti- 
capitalism consists in its inability to grasp the way in which 
capitalism has absorbed the organic and the green. Some of 
the strongest passages in Zizek’s First As Tragedy, Then As Farce 
keep reiterating this message. (One of my favourite lines in 
the book: “Who really believes that half-rotten and 
overpriced ‘organic’ apples are really healthier than the non- 
organic varieties?”) Needless to say, while any credible 
leftism must make ecological issues central it is a mistake to 
seek out an “authentic” organicism beyond capitalism’s 
simulated-organic. (Another of my favourite lines in First As 
Tragedy: “if there is one good thing about capitalism, it is that, 


precisely, mother earth now no longer exists.”) Organicism is 
the problem, and it’s not some eco-spirituality that will save 
the human environment (if it can be saved), but new modes of 
organisation and management. 


toy stories: puppets, 


dolls and horror 


stories 


“In many horror stories there is an assortment of 
figures that appear as walk-ons or extras whose 
purpose is to lend their spooky presence to a narrative 
for atmosphere alone, while the real bogey is something 
else altogether. Puppets, dolls, and other caricatures of 
the human often make cameo appearances as shapes 
sagging in the corner of a child’s bedroom or lolling on 
the shelves of a toy store [...] As backdrops or bit- 
players, imitations of the human form have a symbolic 
value because they seem connected to another world, 
one that is all harm and disorder- the kind of place we 
sometimes feel is a model for our own home ground, 
which we must believe is passably sound and secure, or 
at least not an environment where we might mistake a 
counterfeit person for the real thing.” 


— Thomas Ligotti, The Conspiracy Against the Human 


Race? 


So writes the horror author Thomas Ligotti in his recently 
published book, The Conspiracy Against the Human Race. The 
book is not a work of fiction — it is, instead, a work of 
amateur philosophy in the best possible sense, driven by a 
metaphysical hunger that is so often lacking in the work of 
professional philosophers. Ligotti is unembarrassed to return 
to those questions which academic philosophers typically 
disdain in favour of an entanglement in scholarly minutiae. 
Why is there something rather than nothing? Should we be 
glad to be alive? Ligotti’s answer to this latter question is 
emphatically in the negative. Possessed of a cold, sober 
seriousness that couldn’t be more at odds with the 
atmosphere of cheery vitalism and inane lightness that 
prevails in early twenty-first-century culture, The Conspiracy 
Against the Human Race has the feel of a nineteenth-century 
tract. 

Puppets are one of the leitmotifs of Ligotti’s work, but the 
terror that they cause does not primarily arise from any 
malicious intentions on their part, or from the suspicion that 
they might secretly move when we do not watch them. 
Rather, the puppet is an emissary of what Ligotti repeatedly 
characterises in The Conspiracy Against the Human Race as the 
“malignantly useless” nature of the cosmos itself. The 
painted-faced marionette is a symbol of the horror of 
consciousness, the instrument which, for Ligotti, allows that 
“malignant uselessness” to be perceived, and which brings all 
suffering into the world. 


The puppet is a figure which belongs equally as much to 
the children’s story as to the weird tale. Ian Penman has 
written of how the most famous puppet story, Carlo Collodi’s 
The Adventures of Pinocchio (1883), 


contains scarcely credible levels of cruelty and pain [...] 
Accusations of abuse. Thrown hammers. Burned-off 
feet. Children used as firewood: innocence kindling. 
Curiosity rewarded with concussion and _ kidnap. 
Hanging, amputation, suffocation. A snake laughs so 
hard at Pinocchio’s fear he bursts an artery and dies. On 
his way to school Pinocchio sells his schoolbooks to join 
a Street Theatre: forget education, become a 
marionette. A dancing fool. Apprentice Golem. 
Malignant clown. Neuter, castrato. 


(Penman’s remarks were made in the piece that he 
contributed to a book on Michael Jackson I edited last year — 
and Jackson’s own story is one in which kitsch and Gothic, 
puppet and master manipulator, frequently reversed into one 
another.”) 

On his blog on memory and technology, Bat, Bean, Beam, 
the theorist Giovanni Tiso recently noted the echoes of 
Pinocchio in the Toy Story films.* For the Marxist Richard 
Seymour, 


Toy Story 3 is a story of how freedom is achieved 
through commodification, and how “the consent of the 
governed” roughly equals the willing embrace of 
bondage [...] Everyone, and everything, has its place in 


the Toy Story scheme of things. That scheme is a 


hierarchy of commodities with toys near the bottom, 
5 


subordinate and devoted to their owners. 
Yet, at an ontological level, the Toy Story films constitute 
something of a “tangled hierarchy”. The toys that are 
depicted in the films do not only exist at the “ontologically 
inferior” level of the film’s fiction; they are real in the sense 
that you can buy them outside the cinema. In Ligotti, puppets 
and puppetry frequently symbolise this tangling of 
ontological hierarchy: what should be at the “inferior” level 
of the manipulated manikin suddenly achieves agency, and, 
even more horrifyingly, what is at the supposedly “superior” 
level of the puppet master suddenly finds itself drawn into 
the marionette theatre. Ligotti writes that it is a terrible fate 
indeed 


when a human being becomes objectified as a puppet 
and enters a world that he or she thought was just a 
creepy place inside of ours. What a jolt to find oneself a 
prisoner in this sinister sphere, reduced to a composite 
mechanism looking out on the land of the human, or 
that which we believe to be human by any definition of 
it, and yet be exiled from it. 


With Ligotti, it is not clear which is the more terrifying 
prospect — an ultimate puppet master pulling the strings or 
the strings fraying off into blind senseless chaos. 

Tiso noticed something peculiar about the desire of the 
toys in the Toy Story series: “what they like best is to be 
played with by children. But it so happens that at those times 


they are limp and inanimate; as is the case whenever they are 
in the presence of people, their spark abandons them, their 


eyes become vacant.”® It’s as if the message of the Toy Story 
films rhymes with that of Ligotti’s pessimistic tract: 
consciousness is not a blessing bestowed on us by a kindly 
toymaker standing in for a beneficent God, but a loathsome 
curse. 


Zer0 books 


statement! 


Contemporary culture has eliminated both the concept of the 
public and the figure of the intellectual. Former public spaces 
— both physical and cultural — are now either derelict or 
colonised by advertising. A cretinous anti-intellectualism 
presides, cheered by expensively educated hacks in the pay of 
multinational corporations who reassure their bored readers 
that there is no need to rouse themselves from their 
interpassive stupor. The informal censorship internalised and 
propagated by the cultural workers of late capitalism 
generates a banal conformity that the propaganda chiefs of 
Stalinism could only have dreamt of imposing. Zer0 books 
knows that another kind of discourse — intellectual without 
being academic, popular without being populist — is not only 
possible: it is already flourishing, in the regions beyond the 
striplit malls of so-called mass media and the neurotically 
bureaucratic halls of the academy. Zer0 is committed to the 
idea of publishing as a making public of the intellectual. It is 
convinced that in the unthinking, blandly consensual culture 


in which we live, critical and engaged theoretical reflection is 
more important than ever before. 


PART TWO 


SCREENS, 
DREAMS AND 

SPECTRES: FILM 

AND TELEVISION 


a spoonful of sugar 


The worst aspect of Dennis Potter’s final two indulgent and 
indulged works (Cold Lazarus and Karaoke) was that they had 
the effect of retrospectively introducing doubts over 
everything else he’d done. Could he possibly be anything like 
as good as we’d always believed? 

Actually, there’s a case for saying that, if 1986’s The 
Singing Detective marked the peak of Potter’s career, it also 
preceded a slow and painful decline. It would only be slightly 
harsh to say that everything after 1986 was either formulaic 
reiteration (Lipstick On Your Collar) or tortuously 
introspective, failed experimentalism (Blackeyes, the film 
Secret Friends). By the time of his death in 1994, Potter had 
been lionised by the great and good everywhere, his 
reputation for controversy forgotten (or forgiven?). Melvyn 
Bragg’s famous interview-cum-hagiography elevated Potter 
to the state of an unimpeachable morphine saint. All of this 
solemnity had the effect of devitalising Potter’s work, 
prematurely shrouding it with all the cobwebs of 
respectability and reverence. 

Well, I had the opportunity to see Potter’s 1976 
masterpiece Brimstone and Treacle again very recently. (The 


play is shortly to be reissued as part of a must-have Potter 
DVD boxset, which also includes The Singing Detective, Pennies 
from Heaven and Casanova). In 2004, when TV drama is 
corporate, committee-driven, blandly homogenous, Potter 
looks even more of an anomaly than ever. Today, there’s 
almost no way of identifying TV dramas by who has written 
them; they are routinely conceived of as vehicles for actors, 
not authors. By contrast, even at its worst, Potter’s work was 
marked by an indelible signature, characterised by a singular 
VISION. (The tendency to fall back on these trademark 
elements without remixing them was one of the weaknesses 
of his last pieces.) It’s hard to imagine that Potter’s peculiar 
portfolio of obsessions and techniques (his playful anti- 
naturalism, his disturbed disquisitions on sexuality, politics 
and religion, his loving interrogation of the appeal of pop 
music and pulp genres, his exemplification/ analysis of 
misogyny) would get past our Noughties  culture’s 
gatekeepers (which might be tolerant of representations of 
sex, but which are, in every other way, more censorious than 
those of the Seventies). As the Independent pointed out when 
it reappraised Potter in the light of the US film version of The 
Singing Detective, his influence is more likely to be felt on 
American than on British TV, in an expressionist drama such 
as Six Feet Under or even in the delirial departures from 
naturalism of something like Ally McBeal. 

In any case, Potter did fall foul of Seventies sensibilities 
with Brimstone and Treacle. Filmed in March 1976, it was due 
for broadcast as a Play for Today in April, but was pulled at the 
last minute when the BBC authorities quailed at its 
“nauseating” qualities. It didn’t surface until over a decade 


later, when, in the wake of the success of The Singing Detective, 
the play was eventually shown in 1987. An inferior film 
version, starring Sting, was released in 1982. 

Brimstone and Treacle features a young Michael Kitchen as 
the devil. In an echo of Potter’s earlier “visitation” plays, 
Kitchen’s character, Martin, inveigles himself into people’s 
lives and homes by cold reading them like a stage hypnotist. 

Potter’s vision of evil is a million miles away from the 
white-catting portentousness or Pacino-like histrionics to 
which countless clichéd cinema renderings have accustomed 
us. Kitchen’s devil is impeccably polite, insufferably, cloyingly 
nice, sanctimoniously religiose. “Religiose” is a word Potter 
used with a particular contempt, carefully contrasting its 
pious pomposity with what he saw as the genuine religious 
sensibility. 

The play opens with two epigraphs: the first from 
Kierkegaard’s Fear and Trembling: “there dwells infinitely 
more good in a demoniac than in a trivial person”, the second 
from Mary Poppins (“A spoonful of sugar helps the medicine 
go down”). For Kierkegaard, the most pressing danger for 
Christianity was not doubt, but the kind of bluff certainty 
peddled by pompous philosophers like Hegel. Kierkegaard’s 
Faith was indistinguishable from terrible anxiety. The 
paradox of Faith for Kierkegaard was that, if God completely 
revealed himself, Faith would be unnecessary. Faith is not a 
form of knowing; on the contrary. Kierkegaard’s models were 
Abraham on the day he was asked to sacrifice Isaac and Jesus’ 
disciples: tormented by uncertainty, unmoored from any of 
society’s ethical anchors, staking their life on fabulous 
improbabilities. 


Martin is a perverse double of 1976’s most iconic of icons, 
Johnny Rotten, that demonic purge of trivia and mediocrity. 
If Rotten’s Nietzscheanism (“I yam an antichrist”) concealed a 
burning core of righteousness, Martin’s surface charm belies 
malevolence. At the limit though, what both Rotten and 
Martin show is the deep complicity of “good” and “evil”, their 
mutual interdependence. Both Martin and Rotten are 
ultimately deliverers, destroyers of fragile status quos, 
bringers of disequilibrium and agents of chaos. Punk’s 
greatest disgust was with the trivial and the mediocre, with 
the existential death of boredom. The decadence would be 
cleansed by rage (cf the apopleptic Colin Blakeley in Potter’s 
1969 version of Christ’s life, Son of Man). 

Brimstone and Treacle begins with Martin accosting 
Denholm Elliott’s Mr Bates in the street. Martin’s questioning 
quickly establishes that Bates has a daughter, suffering from 
apparently incurable neurological damage after being hit by a 
car two years previously. Posing as an unrequited admirer of 
the daughter, Pattie, Martin insinuates his way into the Bates’ 
home. The house is a suburban fortress incubating quiet 
desperation, nagging frustration and unspoken betrayals. You 
can almost smell the house, thick with the stench of unaired 
rooms, the pulped food with which Pattie is spoonfed — and 
despair. Martin’s incursion is greeted with initial suspicion 
and circumspection by Mr Bates, but welcomed by the easily 
beguiled Mrs Bates (Patricia Lawrence), eager to clutch at any 
potential escape route from the treadmill of drudgery in 
which she is confined. While Bates has given up any hope of 
Pattie recovering, his wife cherishes the seemingly impossible 
dream of a miraculous return to health. 


Kitchen’s performance is magnificent, but it is Elliott who 
steals the show. He manages, incredibly, to make the 
obnoxious and unpleasant Bates, a neophyte National Front 
supporter, painfully sympathetic. The scene in which Bates 
regales his wife and Martin with a desperately unfunny Irish 
“joke” is excruciating. Elliot renders Bates’ typical expression 
as a grimace — of irritation, suppressed rage, bewilderment. It 
is the expression of a whole class, a whole generation’s, 
incredulity that the world no longer belongs to them, if it 
ever did. Bates’ political pathology is rooted in a bewildered 
and misconceived nostalgia, a bleary and inarticulate longing 
for the world to be like it used to be. He’s a bit like the 
average Britpop fan would be twenty years later. 

Potter is at his most politically acute here, in his exposing 
of the proximity of a respectable, “common-sense”, Daily Mail 
agenda to that of the far right. Potter locates Anglo-fascism’s 
Seventies heartland behind the politely manicured lawns and 
privet hedges of suburbia. Martin wins Bates over by agreeing 
with him that “we need to get rid of the blacks”. “It’s so good 
to have an intelligent conversation like this”, Bates enthuses, 
cracking open the scotch. However, Martin’s gleeful 
description of what will happen when “they won’t go”, “we'll 
round them up, put them in camps” — makes Bates blanche. 
Mrs Bates is not so convinced. “You can be too nice you 
know.” 

Brimstone and Treacle is disturbing, ethically opaque. It is 
troubling for reasons other than those of cultural or political 
conservatism. The denouement sees Martin’s raping of Pattie 
shocking her into an unexpected recovery (which itself 
prompts the play’s final shocking revelation, which I won’t 


give away for the sake of those who haven’t seen it yet). 
There is no easily digestible “message”. It’s a bitter pill rather 
than a spoonful of sugar. 


she’s not my 


mother! 


“Interviewer: It’s hard to see this movie and not 
consider that all our memories are creations. 
Cronenberg: But they are, they totally are.” 


— Andrew O’Hehir, “The Baron of Blood does 
2 


Bergman” 
“Watch from the wings as the scenes were replaying. 
We saw ourselves now as we never had seen.” 


— Joy Division, “Decades”? 


Cronenberg’s Spider — adapted from Patrick McGrath’s superb 
novel — is a study of schizophrenia that couldn’t be further 
removed from the clichéd image of “madness” in cinema. 
There are numerous examples of this, but the one that comes 
immediately to mind (perhaps because I watched it recently) 
is Windom Earl in the second season of Twin Peaks: gibbering, 
histrionic, megalomaniac. Think also of Nicholson’s Joker in 
the first Batman movie. Madness is here imaged as a kind of 


absurdly inflated ego; a self that knows no bounds, which 
wants to expand itself infinitely. As played by Ralph Fiennes 
in Cronenberg’s film, Spider, too, has a precarious sense of his 
own limits, but, far from wanting to spread further into the 
world, he seems to want to make himself disappear. 
Everything about him — his mumbling speech, shambling 
movements — screams withdrawal, retreat, terror of the 
outside. That’s because, as ever in Cronenberg’s schizoverse, 
the outside is already inside. And the reverse. 

McGrath’s novel is set entirely within the head of its 
archetypal unreliable narrator, Spider, since it is written as a 
series of diary entries. To simulate this, Cronenberg could 
have gone with the strategy employed in the early versions of 
the script and used voiceover (although anyone who’s seen 
Spike Jonze’s Adaptation will remember Robert Mckee’s rant 
about that particular technique). In the end, Cronenberg 
strips out Spider’s narrative voice altogether, with the result 
that the film is, in a strange way, truer to the novel than the 
novel itself. In the novel, Spider’s articulacy gives him a kind of 
self-awareness and (albeit limited) transcendence of his 
mania. In the film, there is no distance, no narrative voice, 
only a ceaselessly productive narrative machine, chattering 
out multiple permutations. In place of the transcendent 
offscreen voice, we are presented with Spider as a character 
in his own delirium, the adult version of himself observing 
and writing, always writing, as the memories of his childhood 
life play out. As Cronenberg has observed, it is almost as if 
Spider is directing his own memories. “One journalist said to me, 
‘When we see Spider in his own memories, peeking in the 
windows or hiding in the corner, isn’t that like a director 


being on the set?’ I hadn’t thought of it that way, but he is 


4 We are 


redirecting and rechoreographing his memories. 
reminded that the dreamer is every character in his dream. 

So Spider develops a naturalistic expressionism, or 
expressionist naturalism. Its strangely solitary London is, 
Cronenberg says, an expressionist London. Spider captures the 
boiled potatoes atmosphere of the pre-rock ‘n’ roll Fifties, its 
muted colours as washed out as cabbage water. 

The film of Cronenberg’s which Spider most resembles is 
Naked Lunch; not only because it, too, is based upon a 
supposedly unadaptable book, but also because both films 
principally concern writing, insanity, masculinity and the 
death of a woman. In both Naked Lunch and Spider, the 
phantasmatically reiterated murder of a woman is the pivotal 
event, the lacuna around which the films circle. In Naked 
Lunch, Lee initially disavows the killing of his wife Joan by 
attributing it to the influence of Control. Lee is only able to 
accept minimal responsibility for the killing when he is 
“required”, at the end of the film, to assassinate Joan, or at 
least her double, again. The re-staging of the death is less an 
admission of ethical responsibility than an attempt to own it, 
to make sense of it. Such is the logic of trauma. (Reminding us 
of Ballard’s description of the motives of the schizo in The 
Atrocity Exhibition: “He wanted to kill Kennedy again, but this 
time in a way that made sense.”) 

In Spider we are initially led to believe that Spider’s father, 
Bill Cleg (Horace in the novel) has killed Spider’s mother after 
embarking on an affair with the “fat tart” Yvonne (Hilda in 
the novel). No sooner has Bill brutally and casually murdered 
his wife, rolling her into a hastily dug grave in the earth of his 


allotment (“out with the old”, Yvonne callously cackles), than 
he moves Yvonne into his home. At this point, our suspicions 
that something is amiss with Spider’s narration begins to 
harden into a conviction. But it’s only at the end of the film 
that we learn what appears to have really happened: it is 
Spider himself who killed his mother, gassing her whilst 
apparently suffering from a delusion that she is another 
person. The early exchanges between Spider and his father 
take on a different significance (Spider: “She’s not my 
mother”. Bill: “Well, who is she then?”) The final scene sees 
Bill rescuing Spider from the house, and desperately trying to 
revive Yvonne, who in death, has become, once again, the 
dark-haired Mrs Cleg. 

While this seems to be the preferred interpretation, the 
film does not close down any of the narrative possibilities it 
has opened up. I think we can enumerate nine distinct 
narrative options that the film leaves open: 


1. Bill killed his wife, and he really did co-habit with a 
prostitute called Yvonne. 

2. Bill did kill his wife, there really is an Yvonne, but she 
never moved in with Spider’s father. 

3. Bill killed his wife, but there is no such a person as 
Yvonne. 

4. Spider, not Bill, killed his mother, but Bill moved in 
with Yvonne after his wife’s death. 

5. Spider killed his mother, there is a prostitute called 
Yvonne, but she never moved in with Spider’s father. 


6. Spider killed his mother, and there is no such person 


as Yvonne. 


7. Neither Spider nor Bill killed Mrs Cleg, but Bill moved 
in with Yvonne after his mother’s death. 


8. Neither Spider nor Bill killed Mrs Cleg, there really is 
an Yvonne, but she never moved in with the Clegs. 


9. Neither Spider nor Bill killed Mrs Cleg, and there is 
no such person as Yvonne. 


Rather than resolving the ambiguities of McGrath’s novel, 
the film actually amplifies them. In the novel, we at least 
learn (it seems) that Spider has been incarcerated for killing 
his mother (even though he continues to maintain that it was 
his father who was responsible for the death). In the film, the 
twenty years between Mrs Cleg’s death and Spider’s arrival at 
the halfway house are a blank. We know, or think we know, 
by inference, that he has been in a psychiatric institution, but 
no more. 

Miranda Richardson’s performance is crucial to the 
maintenance of the film’s polysemous ambiguity. She is 
superb in three different roles: as the virtuous brunette Mrs 
Cleg, the licentious blonde Yvonne and also as the suddenly 
and inappropriately sexually aggressive landlady of the 
halfway house, Mrs Wilkinson. The situation is complicated 
by the fact that Yvonne is played at first by another actress 
altogether (at least, I think that is the case; it is a tribute to 
the film’s queasy delirium and to Richardson’s performance, 
that I’m just not sure), just as Mrs Wilkinson is played for 
most of the film by Lynne Redgrave. 

As in Naked Lunch, writing is both passive and active. Like 
Bill Lee, Spider, scratching away in his notebook in his 


idiolectic hieroglyphics, seems at one level only to be 
recording signal from outside; at another level, he is the 
producer of the whole scene, its derealiser. 

Talking about the film, Cronenberg has referred to 
Nabokov’s theory of memory and art as attempts to recover 
the unrecoverable. But the figure that dominates the film is 
another writer who, like Nabokov, Brian McHale has referred 
to as a “limit-modernist”, Samuel Beckett. Cronenberg has 
said that Spider’s look, with its shock of spiky hair, was very 
much influenced by photographs of Beckett, but the affinity 
with Beckett goes much deeper. Like Molloy or Malone, 
Spider is continually fumbling in his pockets for talismanic 
objects. Such partial objects mark the routes on their 
“intensive voyages”. Like McGrath, Cronenberg seduces us 
into identification with Spider (Cronenberg: “I am Spider”), 
taking us with him on his schizo-stroll, then strands us in the 
delirium... 


stand up, nigel 


barton? 


“TI remember, I remember 

The school where I was born; 

I remember, I remember, 

The school where I was... torn.” 


— Dennis Potter, The Nigel Barton Plays? 


“And nowadays what else does education and culture 
want! In our age of the people —I mean our uncouth age 
— ‘education’ and ‘culture’ must basically be the art of 
deception, to mislead about the origin of the inherited 
rabble in one’s body and soul.” 


— Friedrich Nietzsche, Beyond Good and Evil? 


Dennis Potter’s Stand Up, Nigel Barton, shown as part of BBC 4’s 
“Summer of the Sixties” season, is still almost too painful to 
watch. 

Here is Potter writing a television play which draws very 
closely upon his experiences as a scholarship boy, projected 


out of his class into the rarefied world of Oxford. Stand Up, 
Nigel Barton was actually written after Vote, Vote, Vote for Nigel 
Barton, Potter’s fictionalised account of his failed attempt to 
become elected as a Labour MP. To Potter’s disgust, Vote, Vote, 
Vote was suppressed by the BBC, but its temporary banning 
allowed him to work again with the characters he had 
invented, writing this prequel which would be shown first. 

English fiction has always been ambivalent about social 
mobility. Potter’s theme was very much one with which the 
Sixties would be preoccupied, in music as much as drama. 
Consider the Kinks (“Rosy, won’t you please come home”, 
“See my friends/they cross the river”) or the Who (“I was 
born with a plastic spoon in my mouth”). Like Dickens’ Pip, 
Nigel is profoundly torn; unwilling to give up the privilege 
and status he has newly acquired, unable to accept and enjoy 
them as one to the manner born, simultaneously holding onto 
his roots and repudiating them, never forgetting where he 
has come from, but ashamed of the stains that his origins 
have left upon him. And ashamed of that shame. Never 
comfortable amongst the masters, but no longer at home in 
the community which produced him. 

Forty years on, and the screen still crackles with rage, 
confusion and embarrassment. Potter intercuts between the 
working men’s club, the bedrock of the proletarian 
community, with its “suffocating affection” but deep 
suspicion, resentment and distrust of those who leave; and 
the smug redoubt of the Oxford Union, whose louche 
members idly trade bon mots (“Oxford”, as Nigel observes in 
his somewhat too histrionic style, “where nothing really 
matters”, where a dissolute, ironic detachment is the mark of 


a gentleman, and where Nigel’s very passion marks him out 
as not quite right). 

Who can watch the final scene — Nigel at home with his 
parents, watching himself being interviewed on television 
about class — without cringing? What Nigel says about his 
father “watching him like a hawk”, about “walking a 
tightrope”, about class only being experienced by those who 
move between classes; none of this is a distortion. And yet, 
Nigel is too much in love with his own cleverness, too much 
attached to the role of alienated workingclass boy that he has 
been invited to play. He knows he has betrayed his parents. 
His father, ambivalent about him at the best of times, both 
proud and resentful, simmers; his mother, uncomprehending, 
weeps, “But it’s clean. You could eat off the floor here...” 

Potter shows that he can do naturalism painfully and 
powerfully. But he’s already exploring more expressionistic 
techniques: playing with chronology, breaking the frame 
(adults playing children, characters speaking directly to 
camera). The origin of the famous classroom scene in The 
Singing Detective is here, with Janet Henfrey taking on the role 
of the terrifyingly inquisitorial, witch-like schoolmistress she 
will reprise in the later play. The performances, especially 
Keith Barron as Nigel and Jack Woolgar as his father, are 
universally superb. 

No need to reiterate, by now, my lament for TV drama 
this challenging, this near-the-knuckle, this relevant. But 
what a nihilistic message Potter conveys. There is nothing to 
aspire to, nothing you’d want to return to. Nigel trapped and 
alone, forever alone... 


With Stand Up, Nigel Barton I knew that in small family 
groupings — that is, at their most vulnerable — both 
coalminers and Oxford dons would probably see the 
play. This could add enormously to the potency of a 
story which attempted to use the specially English 
embarrassment about class in a _ deliberately 
embarrassing series of confrontations. In the theatre — 
or, at least, in the West End — the audience would have 
been largely only on one side of this particular fence. 
There is no other medium which could virtually 
guarantee an audience of millions with a full quota of 
manual workers and stockbrokers for a “serious” play 


about class.* 


portmeirion: 


an ideal for living 


“As the bourgeoisie laboured to produce the economic 
as a separate domain, partitioned off from its intimate 
and manifold interconnectedness with the festive 
calendar, so they laboured conceptually to reform the 
fair as either a rational, commercial trading event or as a 
popular pleasureground. As the latter, the fair had from 
classical times been subject to regulation and 
suppression on both political and moral grounds. But 
although the bourgeois classes were frequently 
frightened by the threat of political subversion and 
moral licence, they were perhaps more scandalised by 
the deep conceptual confusion entailed by the fair’s 
inmixing of work and pleasure, trade and play. In so far 
as the fair was purely a site of pleasure, it could be 
envisaged as a discrete entity: local, festive, communal, 
unconnected to the ‘real’ world. In so far as it was 
purely a commercial event it could be envisaged as a 
practical agency in the progress of capital, an 


instrument of modernisation and a means of 
connecting up local and communal ‘markets’ to the 
world market.” 

— Peter Stallybrass and Allon White, “The Fair, the Pig, 


Authorship”? 


If you know about Portmeirion, it’s almost certainly because 
of The Prisoner, justly recognised as one of the most 
innovative television series ever produced (more on which 
presently). Our tendency is to think of Portmeirion, built by 
gentlemen-philanthropist Sir Clough Williams-Ellis on his 
private peninsula near Porthmadog, as a quaintly attractive 
divertissement; an example of charming English eccentricity 
that has somehow fetched up in Wales. The subtext we don’t 
even need to articulate to ourselves (so we think) is that all 
this — attractiveness, eccentricity, charm — are harmless, 
which is to say, pleasant but ultimately irrelevant. The idea 
that they could have political-economic significance; that’s 
more absurd than Ellis’ absurdist architecture, surely? 

It’s fitting that I should have encountered both Ellis’ 
village and Llandudno’s homage to Lewis Carroll in the same 
week, in Wales, since both belong to an ex-centric Britishness 
that is as at least as important as Magritte’s Belgian 
Surrealism. Remember that André Breton thought that the 
British — with Edward Lear, Lewis Carroll and their ludic ilk 
— had little need of Surrealism, since they were already 
Surrealist... But Artaud, who could hardly have been accused 
of being over-conscious, was an admirer of Carroll; as were 
the Situationists, who recognised that there was something 
utterly serious about English Nonsense. As did Deleuze, of 


course, who produced what is one of the strangest landmarks 
in Psychedelic Reason, The Logic of Sense, as a rigorous 
philosophical exposition of Carroll’s Nonsense. (One of its 
most inciting sections is an account of Artaud’s translation of 
“Jabberwocky”.) 

But it’s worth pausing and thinking a little more about the 
Situationists. It’s disastrous that the Situationist insistence 
upon the ludic has degenerated into a smugonautic 
celebration of bourgeois circus trickery (juggling and 
unicylcists as the shock troops of the revolution against 


Corporate Kapital). You have to reread Ivan Chtcheglov’s 


3 _ written in 


astonishing “Formulary for a New Urbanism” 
the year of our current Queen’s coronation, 1953 — to be 
reminded of the force of the Situationist critique. How could 
architecture — i.e. the places in which we live — not be an 
intensely political matter? And why should we live in boring, 
utilitarian spaces when we could live in grottoes and crooked 
caverns? “A mental disease has swept the planet: 
banalisation. Everyone is hypnotised by production and 
conveniences...” 

Like punk, Surrealism is dead as soon as it is reduced to an 
aesthetic style. It comes unlive again when it is instantiated 
as a delirial program (just as punk comes unlive when it is 
effectuated as an anti-authoritarian, acephalic contagion- 
network). Chtcheglov resists the aestheticisation of 
Surrealism, and treats De Chirico’s paintings, for instance, not 
as particular aesthetic contrivances, but as architectural 
blueprints, ideals for living. Let’s not look at a De Chirico 
painting — let’s live in one. Chtcheglov’s call was 
astonishingly pre-empted by Clough Williams-Ellis’ building 


of Portmeirion. Ellis described himself as follows: 


He almost certainly has a weakness for splendour and 
display and believes that even if he were reduced to 
penury himself he would still hope to be cheered by the 
sight of uninhibited lavishness & splendour unconfined 
somewhere which is why he feels that Copenhagen’s 
Tivoli Gardens or something like them should be spread 
around the civilised world giving everyone a taste of 


lavishness, gaiety and cultivated design.* 


Ellis recognised, that is to say, that the production of the 
aesthetic as a category separate from the “necessary” (i.e. the 
utile, in the Bataille restricted economy sense) was complicit 
in a kind of (from any rational POV) inexplicable diminution 
of the possibilities of human experience. Why must 
architecture be part of a banalising culture of vampiric 
undeath? Why should only the privileged be able to enjoy 
their surroundings? Why should the poor be penned into 
miserable concrete blocks? 

Ellis referred to beauty as a “strange necessity”, cutting 
through the binary of needs = biological and aesthetic = 
cultural luxury. Bodies deprived of attractive surroundings 
were as likely to be as depressed — or to use the superbly 
multivalent Rasta term, downpressed — as those deprived of 
anything they more obviously “needed”. 

According to the Portmeirion website,” Ellis sought, in the 
building of Portmeirion, to demonstrate that it was possible 
to develop sites of natural beauty without destroying them: 


A tireless campaigner for the environment Clough was 
a founder member of both the Council for the 
Protection of Rural England in 1926 and the Campaign 
for the Protection of Rural Wales in 1928 (and of which 
he was president for twenty years). He was an advocate 
of rural preservation, amenity planning, industrial 
design and colourful architecture. 


The fact that The Prisoner was filmed here then is in no 
sense an accident. In addition to its Foucauldian analyses of 
power (“you are Number 1”), its — in every good sense — 
existentialism, its PKD-like psychedelic dismantling of 
identity, The Prisoner was a withering account of the English 
class system. McGoohan, auteur-actor, was given an artistic 
licence by the then head of ITV (yes, remember, The Prisoner 
appeared on ITV — I know it beggars belief now), Lew Grade 
— both were outsiders (McGoohan an Americanborn 
Irishman, Grade a Jew) who had penetrated into the genteel 
brutality of the English Core’s gentlemen’s club. However 
irascible they sometimes became, the series of Number 2’s 
typically had that impermeable urbane assurance so 
infuriatingly characteristic of the English Core Master Class. 
Power expressed itself not in crude force — whenever that 
was used (cf the episode “Hammer into Anvil”) you knew that 
they had in every sense lost it — but with the quiet, 
insinuating menace lurking behind an inscrutable politesse. 
“Cup of tea, Number 6?” 

The village had all the quaint charm of politely ritualised 
Englishness ambivalently celebrated by the Kinks in their 
Village Green Preservation Society (which came _ out 


contemporaneously with The Prisoner). And of course 
McGoohan’s genius lay in exposing the acidic undertaste of 
phrases like “be seeing you” and “feel free”. 

The Prisoner is the heir of both Kafka and Carroll — and 
part of its importance consists in its revelation of the shared 
sensibility. Kafka’s observations of the banalising terror of 
the decaying Hapsburg bureaucracy as it moved towards 
Weberian impersonality owes much to Carroll. K’s Trial after 
all has no more sense than the trial at the end of Alice’s 
Adventures in Wonderland. Like Alice, K often comes across as a 
lucid child — for only a child can be lucid in Carroll and 
Kafka’s world — observing the senseless and arbitrary cruelty 
of adult caprice, whose only alibi is precedent. “Things have 
always been done that way. Don’t you know? How stupid are 
you?” 

It is their restoration of the child’s reason in the face of 
adult intransigent baboonery that makes Kafka, Carroll and 
The Prisoner punk. Until it is socialised — i.e. stupefied into 
mute acceptance of the irrational caprice of the socius — the 
child knows that authority is nothing unless it is can be 
defended via reason. 

The Prisoner, like Williams-Ellis, like the Situationists and 
the Surrealists, dreamed a dream deemed to be impossible, 
conceiving of a social system in which play and reason 
combine in an exploration of Intensive Now. 


golgothic 


materialism1 


I finally saw The Passion of the Christ this week. I watched it at 
work with the A-level Religious Studies students. They, like 
me, were moved to tears and beyond. (Tip for any teacher out 
there: show the film at nine in the morning, that’ll wake up 
any students still yawning their way into the day.) 

Whilst agreeing with much of what Zizek says about 
Gibson’s film in his brilliant essay “Passion in the Era of 


Decaffeinated Belief’,” I think that he doesn’t go nearly far 
enough. 

Zizek is right to challenge the smug and lazy culturalist 
consensus that religious conviction is inherently pathological 
and dangerous. But he is wrong to suggest that what is most 
important about Passion is belief. Gibson’s Gnostic vision — 
which is simply Christ’s ethical Example rescued from the 
institutionalised religion that has systematically distorted it 
in his name — makes the two traditional supports of religious 
belief irrelevant. Astonishingly, The Passion of the Christ 
demonstrates that neither Revelation nor Tradition are 


important for those seeking to become-Christ(ian). What 
matters is not so much whether the events described in the 
film really happened — and there is no reason to doubt that 
something resembling them did — but the life-practice which 
the Christ story narrates. 

Life as parable. 

Let’s dismiss first of all the idea that the film is anti- 
semitic. Certainly, the first half of the film threatens to invite 
this interpretation. In the run-up to Jesus’ arrest, the film 
appears to depict the Jewish religious authorities as near- 
subhuman monsters, while the Roman imperial powers are 
viewed sympathetically, as benign and puzzled observers of a 
distasteful local conflict amongst the people they have 
colonised. (In this respect, Gibson appears to buy into the 
anti-Jewish narrative retrospectively imposed by the Roman 
Catholic Church once it had come to its concordat with the 
Roman Empire and was keen to excuse its new Masters of any 
responsibility for the crucifixion.) 

But once the notorious beating scene happens, the film 
goes through an intensive threshold. Here, the Roman 
soldiers are seen to be gratuitously cruel psychopaths, whose 
excessive zeal in punishing Jesus exceeds any “duty”. It is 
clear by now that The Passion of the Christ has no ethnic axe to 
grind: it is about the stupidity and cruelty of the human 
species, but more importantly, about an escape route from 
the otherwise meaningless and nihilistic cycle of abuse 
begetting abuse that is human History. 

The Gnostic flashes that surface in the Gospels are given 
full weight in Gibson’s film. “My kingdom is not of this 
world.” But Gibson refuses to give any comfort to those life- 


deniers and body-haters that Nietzsche rightly excoriates in 
his many attacks on Christianity. There is little supernatural 
or transcendent dimension to The Passion’s vision. If Christ’s 
kingdom is not of this world, Gibson gives us few reasons to 
assume that this kingdom will be the Platonic heaven of 
which those tired of the body dream. 

The World which Christ rejects is the World of Lies, the 
consensual hallucination of established power and authority. 
By contrast, Christ’s kingdom only subsists whenever there is 
an Affectionate Collectivity. In other words, it exists not as 
some deferred supernatural reward, but in the Ethical actions 
of those, who in becoming-Christ, keep his spirit alive. Again, 
it is important to stress that this spirit is not some 
metaphysical substance, but a strictly material abstract 
machine that can be instantiated only through actions and 
practices. Loving God and loving others more than yourself 
are preconditions for dissolving your ego and gaining 
deliverance from the Hell of Self. 

What, from one perspective, is the utter humiliation and 
degradation of Jesus’ body is on the other a coldly ruthless 
vision of the body liberated from the “wisdom and limits of 
the organism”. 

Masochristianity. 

Christ’s Example is simply this: it is better to die than to 
pass on abuse virus or to in any way vindicate the idiot 
vacuity and stupidity of the World of authority. 

Power depends upon the weakness of the organism. When 
authority is seriously challenged, when its tolerance is tested 
to the limit, it has the ultimate recourse of torture. The slow, 
graphic scenes of mindless physical degradation in The Passion 


of the Christ are necessary for revealing the horrors to which 
Jesus’ organism was subject. It is made clear that he could 
have escaped the excruciating agony simply by renouncing 
his Truth and by assenting to the Authority of the World. 
Christ’s Example insists: better to let the organism be 
tortured to death (“If thine own eye offend thee, pluck it 
out”) than to bow, bent-headed, to Authority. 

This is what is perhaps most astonishing about Gibson’s 
film. Far from being a statement of Catholic bigotry, it can 
only be read as an antiauthoritarian AND THEREFORE anti- 
Catholic film. For the Pharisees of two millennia ago, puffed 
up in their absurd finery, substitute the child-abuser 
apologists of today’s gilt-laden, guilt-ridden Vatican. Against 
all the odds, against two thousand years of cover-ups and 
dissimulation, The Passion of the Christ recovers the original 
Christ, the anti-Wordly but not otherwordly Christ of 
Liberation Theology: the Gnostic herald of Apocalypse Now. 


this movie doesn’t 


move me! 


As I nervously anticipate the new Doctor Who (although after 
McCoy, after McGann, what more can there be to fear?), it is 
worth thinking again about the appeal of the series, and also, 
more generally, about the unique importance of what I will 
call “uncanny fiction”. 

A piece by Rachel Cooke in the Observer two weeks ago 


brought these questions into sharp relief.* Cooke’s article was 
more than an account of a television series; it was a story 
about the way broadcasting, family and the uncanny were 
webbed together through Doctor Who. Cooke writes 
powerfully about how her family’s watching of the 
programme was literally ritualised: she had to be on the sofa, 
hair washed, before the continuity announcer even said the 
words, “And now...” She understands that, at its best, Dr Who’s 
appeal consisted in the charge of the uncanny — the strangely 
familiar, the familiar estranged: cybermen on the steps of St 
Paul’s, yeti at Goodge Street (a place whose name will forever 
be associated with the Troughton adventure, “The Web of 


Fear”, for Scanshifts,> who saw it whilst living in New 
Zealand). 

Inevitably, however, she ends the piece on a melancholy 
note. Cooke has been to a screening of the first episode of the 
new series. She enjoys its expensive production values, its 
“sinister moments”, its use of the Millennium Wheel. “But it 
is not — how shall I put this? — Doctor Who.” Faced with an 
“overwhelming sense of loss”, she turns to a DVD of the Baker 
story Robots of Death for a taste of the “real” stuff, the 
authentic experience that the new series cannot provide. But 
this proves, if anything, to be even more of a disappointment. 
“How slow the whole thing seems, and how silly the robots 
look in their Camilla Parker-Bowles-style green quilted 
jackets... Good grief.” 

Let’s leave aside, for a moment, all the post-post- 
structuralist questions about the ontological status of the text 
“itself”, and consider the glum anecdote with which the 
article concludes: 


Before Christmas, when it became clear that my father’s 
cancer was in its final stages, my brother went out and 
bought a DVD for us all to watch together. Dad was too 
ill, and box went unopened. At the time, I cried about 
this; yet another injustice. Now I know better. Some 
things in life can’t ever be retrieved — an enjoyment of 
green robots in sequins and pedal pushers being one of 
them. 


This narrative of disillusionment belongs to a genre that 
has become familiar: the postmodern parable. To look at the 


old Doctor Who is not only to fail to recover a lost moment; it 
is to discover, with a deflating quotidian horror, that this 
moment never existed in the first place. An experience of awe 
and wonder dissolves into a pile of dressing up clothes and 
cheap special effects. The postmodernist is then left with two 
options: disavowal of the enthusiasm, i.e. what is called 
“srowing up”, or else keeping faith with it, i.e. what is called 
“not growing up”. Two fates, therefore, await the no longer 
media-mesmerised child: depressive realism or geek 
fanaticism. 

The intensity (with) which Cooke invested in Doctor Who is 
typical of so many of us who grew up in the Sixties and 
Seventies. I, slightly younger than her, remember a time 
when those twenty-five minutes were indeed the most 
sacralised of the week. Scanshifts, slightly older than me, 
remembers a period when he didn’t have a functioning 
television at home, so he would watch the new episode 
furtively at a department store in Christchurch, silently at 
first, until, delighted, he found the means of increasing the 
volume. 

The most obvious explanation for such fervour — 
childhood enthusiasm and naiveté — can also be 
supplemented by thinking of the specific technological and 
cultural conditions that obtained then. Freud’s analysis of the 
unheimlich, the “unhomely”, is very well known, but it is 
worth linking his account of the uncanniness of the domestic 
to television. Television was itself both familiar and alien, and 
a series which was about the alien in the familiar was bound 
to have particularly easy route to the child’s unconscious. In a 
time of cultural rationing, of modernist broadcasting, a time, 


that is, in which there were no endless reruns, no VCRs, the 
programmes had a precious evanescence. They were 
translated into memory and dream at the very moment they 
were being seen for the first time. This is quite different from 
the instant — and _ increasingly pre-emptive — 
monumentalisation of postmodern media _ productions 
through “makings of’ documentaries and interviews. So 
many of these productions enjoy the odd fate of being 
stillborn into perfect archivisation, forgotten by the culture 
while immaculately memorialised by the technology. 

But were the conditions for Dr Who’s colonising presence 
in the unconscious of a generation merely scarcity and the 
“innocence” of a “less sophisticated” time? Does its magic, as 
Cooke implies, crumble like a vampire seducer in bright 
sunlight when exposed to the unbeguiled, unforgiving eyes of 
the adult? 

According to Freud’s famous arguments in Totem and 
Taboo and The Uncanny, we moderns recapitulate in our 
individual psychological development the “progress” from 
narcissistic animism to the reality principle undergone by the 
species as a whole. Children, like “savages”, remain at the 
level of narcissistic auto-eroticism, subject to the animistic 
delusion that their thoughts are “omnipotent”; that what 
they think can directly affect the world. 

But is it the case that children ever “really believed” in 
Doctor Who? Zizek has pointed out that when people from 
“primitive” societies are asked about their myths, their 
response is actually indirect. They say “some people believe”. 
Belief is always the belief of the other. In any case, what 
adults and moderns have lost is not the capacity to 


uncritically believe, but the art of using the series as triggers 
for producing inhabitable fictional playzones. 

The model for such practices is the Perky Pat layouts in 
Philip K. Dick’s The Three Stigmata of Palmer Eldritch. Homesick 
off-world colonists are able to project themselves into Ken 
and Barbie-like dolls who inhabit a mockup of the earthly 
environment. But in order to occupy this set they need a 
drug. In effect, all the drug does is restore in the adult what 
comes easily to a child: the ability not to believe, but to act in 
spite of the lack of belief. 

In a sense, though, to say this is already going too far. It 
implies that adults really have given up a narcissistic fantasy 
and adjusted to the harsh banality of the disenchanted- 
empirical. In fact, all they have done is substituted one 
fantasy for another. The point is that to be an adult in 
consumer capitalism IS to occupy the Perky Pat world of 
drably bright soap opera domesticity. What is eliminated in 
the mediocre melodrama we are invited to call adult reality is 
not fantasy, but the uncanny — the sense that all is not as it 
seems, that the kitchen-sink everyday is a front for the 
machinations of parasites and alien forces which either 
possess, control or have designs upon us. In other words, the 
suppressed wisdom of uncanny fiction is that it is THIS world, 
the world of liberal-capitalist commonsense, that is a stage 
set with wobbly walls. As Scanshifts and I hope to 
demonstrate in our upcoming audiomentary London Under 
London on Resonance FM, the Real of the London 
Underground is better described by pulp and modernism 
(which in any case have a suitably uncanny complicity) than 
by postmodern drearealism. Everyone knows that, once the 


wafer-thin veneer of “persons” is stripped away, the 
population on the Tube are zombies under the control of 
sinister extra-terrestrial corporations. 

The rise of fantasy as a genre over the last twenty-five 
years can be directly correlative with the collapse of any 
effective alternative reality structure outside capitalism in 
the same period. Watching something like Star Wars, you 
immediately think two things. Its fictional world is BOTH 
impossibly remote, too far-distant to care about, AND too 
much like this world, too similar to our own to be fascinated 
by. If the uncanny is about an irreducible anomalousness in 
anything that comes to count as the familiar, then fantasy is 
about the production of a seamless world in which all the 
gaps have been mono-filled. It is no accident that the rise of 
fantasy has gone alongside the development of digital FX. The 
curious hollowness and depthlessness of CGI arises not from 
any failure of fidelity, but, quite the opposite, from its 
photoshopping out of the Discrepant as such. 

The fantasy structure of Family, Nation and Heroism thus 
functions, not in any sense as a representation, false or 
otherwise, but as a model to live up to. The inevitable failure 
of our own lives to match up to the digital Ideal is one of the 
motors of capitalism’s worker-consumer passivity, the docile 
pursuit of what will always be elusive, a world free of fissures 
and discontinuities. And you only have to read one of Mark 
Steyn’s preppy phallic fables (which need to be ranked 
alongside the mummy’s boystories of someone like Robert E. 
Howard) to see how fantasy’s pathetically imbecilic 
manichean oppositions between Good and Evil, Us and (a 
foreign, contagious) Them are effective on the largest 


possible geopolitical stage. 


fear and misery in 
the third reich ‘n’ 


roll! 


I (belatedly) went to see the traumatically powerful Downfall a 
couple of nights ago at the behest of Karl Kraft. Overhype of 
mediocre tat renders one suspicious of any praise 
surrounding contemporary films, but this is a genuine 
masterpiece, and one that can only be appreciated fully in the 
cinema environment, where the relentless pummelling of the 
Soviet artillery and the claustrophobic airlessness of the 
Hitler bunker have a crushingly visceral presence. 

Downfall, actually, is the second film this year (the first 
was The Aviator) to flout my otherwise reliable dictum that 
movies based on real life are to be avoided. But the reason 
why both work is that they describe situations in which reality 
had itself gone psychotic. As Ballard has observed, the Nazi 
delirium was one of those moments when the distinction 
between the internal and the external world no longer held: 


hell has erupted on earth, there is no escape, no future, and 
you know it... 

Downfall is fascinating because it closely and, I’m 
assuming, meticulously documents the “line of abolition” 
that Deleuze and Guattari claim is constitutive of Nazism. For 
Deleuze and Guattari, who borrow the idea from Virilio, the 
Nazis’ scheduled auto-annihilation — “if we are defeated, 
better that the nation should perish” — was less a forced 
contingency than the realisation, the very consummation, of 


the Nazi project.? Deleuze and Guattari’s account might be 
dubious empirically, but the great service it provides for 
cultural analysis may not be the idea that Nazism is suicidal, 
but the thought that the suicidal, the self-destructive is Nazi. 

Since at least the death of Chatterton, popular culture has 
found the temptation to glamourise _ self-destruction 
irresistible. The Nazis provide the definitive twentieth- 
century version of this age-old Romance of Death. As Ballard 
noted in his essay on Hitler, “Alphabets of Reason”, the Nazis 
are a creepily modern phenomenon, their technicolour 
glamour a world away from the fussy frock-coated figures of 
the Edwardian British ruling elite. The Nazis’ facility with 
broadcasting laid the groundwork for the media landscape we 
now occupy. Hitler as the first rock star? 

Downfall takes us through the scenes in which the Nazi 
party disintegrates only for the Third Reich ‘n’ Roll to begin. 
The death of the frontman is the blood-sacrifical rite that will 
guarantee a hideous immortality. Hitler was the first 
twentieth-century figure to pass from historical individuality 
to becoming a permanent archetype-artefact in the the 
McLuhan-Ballard media unconscious. After him, Kennedy, 


Malcolm X, King, Morrison, Hendrix, Curtis seem local, 
particular, whereas Hitler comes to stand for a general 
principle, for modern Evil itself. 

As spectators of Downfall, we spend most of the time in the 
Fiihrer Bunker, forced into an unsettling sympathy if not for 
the Reich’s leaders then for those who were loyal to them, the 
secretaries and functionaries who admired, by no means 
fanatically, Hitler and National Socialism. Meanwhile, the 
glimpses we have of the Berlin above show a landscape out of 
The Triumph of Death, a city devolving into total anomie: child 
conscripts, vigilante hangings, intoxicated revelling, 
carnivalesque sexual excess. 

While those scenes play out, you can almost hear Johnny 
Rotten leering, “when there’s no future how can there be 
sin?” (Although for Germany, in fact, there was nothing but the 
future: immediate postwar Germany was subject to a willed 
amnesia, a disavowal of cultural memory.) It’s no accident 
that post-punk in many ways begins here. As the Pistols 
pursue their own line of abolition into the scorched earth 
nihilism of “Belsen was a Gas” and “Holidays in the Sun”, they 
keep returning to the barbed-wire scarred Boschscape of Nazi 
Berlin and the Pynchon Zone it became after the war. 
Siouxsie famously sported a swastika for a while, and 
although much of the flaunting of the Nazi imagery was 
supposedly for superficial shock effects, the punk-Nazi 
connection was about much more than trite transgressivism. 
Punk’s very 1970s, very British fixation on Nazism posed 
ethical questions so troubling they could barely be articulated 
explicitly: what were the limits of liberal tolerance? Could 
Britain be so sure that it had differentiated itself from Nazism 


(a particularly pressing issue at a time that the NF was 
gathering an unprecedented degree of support)? And, most 
unsettling of all, what is it that separates Nazi Evil from 
heroic Good? 

Downfall poses that last question with a real force, and it is 
a question that has a special resonance at the moment given 
Zizek and Zupanti¢’s theory of the ungrounded Act as the 
very definition of the ethical. As I watched the most 
“monstrous” act depicted in the film, Frau Goebbels’ drugging 
and then poisoning her children — better this “redemption”, 
she reasoned, than that they be left in a world without 
National Socialism — I was struck by the parallel with Sethe 
in Toni Morrison’s Beloved, who kills one of her children 
rather than let it fall into the hands of the slavers. What is to 
separate Frau Goebbels’ act of abominable Evil from Sethe’s 
act of heroic Good? (Those who have read The Fragile Absolute 
will remember that Zizek uses Sethe precisely as an example 
of a Good entirely alien to liberal morality, with its ethic of 
enlightened self-interest.) 

Downfall seems to invite us to sympathise with the “liberal 
Nazis”, the “reasonable” doctor, for instance, who wants to 
keep the medical services running and is disgusted and 
aghast at the “senseless, suicidal” behaviour that results from 
seeing Duty through to the end; the General who wants to end 
the war to protect the lives of civilians. But these “pragmatic 
humanitarian” figures are the least defensible because they 
are not prepared to follow the principles of their actions to 
the end (if they were committed to Nazism, why not die for 
it? If they weren’t, why not resist it?). Strangely, it is almost 
as if the film seems to suggest that what was irredeemably 


malevolent about the Nazis was their will to die for the cause. 

In spite of ourselves, we find ourselves thinking that the 
Evil Nazis — those who totally identify with the Nazi project 
and who destroy themselves when it is clear that has failed — 
attain a certain tragic heroism by refusing to give up on their 
fundamental commitment. All of which leads us back to the 
old question: does the Kantian emphasis on unconditional 
duty legitimate Nazi Evil? 

Zupancic, who has done so much to re-discover Kantian 
ethics from the perspective of Lacanian theory, addressed 
this question in her interview with Cabinet magazine: 


Recall that, in Hannah Arendt’s famous example, Nazi 
functionaries like Eichmann took themselves to be 
Kantians in this respect: They claimed to act simply on 
principle without any consideration for the empirical 
consequences of their actions. In what way is this a 
perversion of Kant? 


This attitude is “perverse” in the strictest clinical 
meaning of the word: The subject has here assumed the 
role of a mere instrument of the Will of the Other. In 
relation to Kant, I would simply stress the following 
point, which has already been made by Slavoj Zizek: In 
Kantian ethics, we are responsible for what we refer to 
as our duty. The moral law is not something that could 
clear us of all responsibility for our actions; on the 
contrary, it makes us responsible not only for our 
actions, but also — and foremost — for the principles 


that we act upon? 


Is this enough though to distinguish Goebbels from Sethe? 
Was it really the case that Frau Goebbels was making herself 
into “a mere instrument of the Will of the Other”? Or had she 
freely chosen to assume responsibility for her actions and for 
the principles on which she acted? Remember that Kantian 
freedom consists in choosing to obey the moral law. To be 
motivated by anything other than “duty” is to be driven by 
“pathological” passions, and hence not to be free at all. There 
is no obvious pathological motivation for Frau Goebbels’ 
actions. She stood to gain nothing from this act of 
“destroying what is best in her” (and indeed, shortly after she 
killed her children, she consented to be shot by her husband). 

The only answer you are left with is that the Nazi Cause is 
itself a pathology. By definition, the Nazi Act cannot be 
universal, since it is based upon preserving — if only, at the 
end, at the level of myth — the particular pathological 
characteristics of “a chosen people” and, more abstractly 
therefore, of defending the very principle of “ethnic 
pathology”. Sethe’s abominable act in Beloved is an act of 
Unplugging from a social situation fatally, totally corrupted 
by a lethally imbecilic racial delirium; Frau Goebbels’ multiple 
infanticide, by contrast, is an attempt to hardwire herself and 
her children into an ethnocidal madness that can only live 
through their deaths and the deaths of millions of others. 


we want it all? 


What use might Nietzsche be today? Or, to put it another way: 
which Nietzsche might be of use, now? 

It will come as no surprise that I would count Nietzsche 
the perspectivist — he who questioned not only the 
possibility but the value of Truth — as the enemy. There will 
be even fewer surprises that I would reject the Dionysian 
Nietzsche, the celebrant of transgressive desire. This 
Nietzsche, in any case, is largely a_ post-Bataillean 
retrospective construct (even in The Birth of Tragedy, what 
Nietzsche mourns is the lost tension between Dionysus and 
Apollo; and in his later writings Nietzsche is more likely to be 
found extolling the necessity of constraints and limitations 
than he is to be heard calling for the unrestrained venting of 
libido). The perspectival and the Dionysiac are far too timely. 

The Nietzsche that remains untimely — and by that I do not 
mean outmoded, very far from it — is Nietzsche the 
aristocrat. Nietzsche should not be taken seriously as a 
political theorist, at least not at the level of his positive 
prescriptions. But the Nietzsche who denounces the insipidity 
and mediocrity that result from democracy’s levelling 
impulses could not be more acute. Passage after passage of 


polemic in Beyond Good and Evil seems uncannily apposite in 
these times of focus-grouped blandness and “autonomous 
herding”. Nietzsche’s real interests lay with cultural politics; 
government and social institutions troubled him only insofar 
as they produced cultural effects, his ultimate question being: 
“What are the conditions in which great cultural artefacts can 
emerge?” 

I was reminded of Nietzsche’s warnings about what would 
happen to culture if all “special claims and privileges” are 
denied, if the very concept of superiority is abolished, when 
Chantelle Houghton won Celebrity Big Brother a week or so ago 
(it already seems much longer than that). I was reminded, 
too, of Nietzsche’s scalding admonition that “harshness” and 
“cruelty” must be cultivated if the human animal is to 
transformed, by hammer blows and force of will, into a great 
work of art; reminded, especially, when some posters on 
Dissensus were seriously advancing “‘niceness” — niceness, that 
is — as a desirable trait. 

Chantelle’s victory wasn’t just a popularity contest: as 
Marcello’s excellent Big Brother piece observed, a principle 
was at stake, the principle that ordinariness must trump any 
notion of superiority: 


“You are not going to win support or respect by placing 
yourself out of the ordinary. You need to be 
approachable but you also need to be yourself. That’s 
what young people respect.” That’s a recent quote from 
one Alex Folkes, the speaker for a pressure group 
named Votes at Sixteen, apropos George Galloway, and 
it’s the kind of exhausting, fatuous antiphilosophy 


which tempts me to form a pressure group called Votes 
at Thirty. Nevertheless it is (un)pretty fitting for an age 
bereft of desire for godhood. Where once we assembled 
in front of screens or stages to gasp in awe at people 
doing and achieving things we could never hope of 
doing or achieving ourselves — but how we luxuriated, 
carried ourselves afloat, on the dream of doing so — 
now all we require is a humbling mirror. This is the sort 
of thing which stops dangerous people from gaining 
power, but also the kind of closure which would 
ultimately forbid all art. Where once we assembled in front 
of screens or stages to gasp in awe at people doing and 


achieving things we could never hope of doing or achieving 
2 


ourselves [...] now all we require is a humbling mirror. 

This is Celebreality: the simultaneous desublimation of 
the Star and the elevation of “the ordinary”. The commentary 
on Celebrity Big Brother treated it as self-evident that people 
will want to “identify with” media figures who offer a 
comforting and unchallenging reflection of themselves at 
their most mediocre, stupid and harmless. Julie Burchill’s 
endlessly reiterated polemic in favour of Big Brother — that it 
allows working-class people opportunities to break into a 
media otherwise dominated by the privileged — is baseless 
for three reasons. First, because the real beneficiaries of Big 
Brother are not the contestants, whose “career” is notoriously 
short-lived, but Endemol, with its coterie of smug graduate 
producers. Second, because Big Brother trades in a patronising 
and reductive image of the working class, the dominion of 
Celebreality relies upon the mediocrats inducing the working 


class into corresponding to — and “identifying with” — that 
image. Third, because Big Brother and reality TV have effaced 
those areas of popular culture in which a working class that 
aspired to more than “wealth” or “fame” once excelled. Its 
rise has meant a defeat for that over-reaching proletarian 
drive to be more, (I am nothing but should be everything), a 
drive which negated Social Facts by inventing Sonic Fictions, 
which despised “ordinariness” in the name of the strange and 
the alien. On Celebrity Big Brother, Pete Burns, with his casual 
cruelties, his savage articulacy and his Masoch-furs, was a 
cartoon symbol of those lost ambitions, skulking and sulking 
at the periphery, a glam prince in an age of post-Blairite 
roundheads. 

We all know that the “reality” of reality TV is an artful 
construction, an effect not only of editing but of a Lorenzian 
rat-in-a-mirrored-labyrinth artificial environment which 
attenuates psychology into a series of territorial twitches. 
The “reality” that is designated is significant more for what is 
absent from it than for any positive properties it is deemed to 
possess. And what is absent, above all, is fantasy. Or rather, 
fantasy objects. 

We once turned to popular culture because it produced 
fantasy objects; now, we are asked to “identify with” the 
fantasising subject itself. It was entirely appropriate that, the 
week after Chantelle won Celebrity Big Brother, Smash Hits 
should have announced its imminent closure. 

Smash Hits began just as the glam continuum was winding 
down. What Smash Hits took from punk was its least 
Nietzschean affect, namely its “irreverence”. In the case of 
Smash Hits, this amounted to a compulsory trivialisation 


coupled with a kind of good-humoured debunking of the 
pretensions of Stardom. Behind Smash Hits’ silly surrealism 
was good solid commonsense and a conflicted desire, to both 
have your idols and kill them. Heat was Smash Hits’ successor 
and what rendered it obsolete. No need to bother with the 
(pop) pretext, now you can consume celebrity directly, 
untroubled by pop’s embarrassing Dreams. Chantelle is the 
logical conclusion of the process: the anti-Pop anti-Idol. 
Nietzsche’s contention was that the kind of levelling 
Chantelle stands for was the inevitable and necessary 
consequence of all egalitarianism. Yet popular culture was 
once the arena which demonstrated that any genuine 
egalitarianism is inimical to any such levelling down. I wrote 
last year of goth as “a paradoxically egalitarian aristocracy in 
which membership [is] not guaranteed by birth or beauty but 
by self-decoration”; will popular culture ever again teach us 
that egalitarianism is not hostile to, but relies upon, a will-to- 
greatness, an unconditional demand for the excellent? 


gothic oedipus: 
subjectivity and 
capitalism in 
christopher nolan’s 


batman begins! 


Batman has contributed more than its fair share to the 
“darkness” that hangs over contemporary culture like a 
picturesque pall. “Dark” designates both a highly marketable 
aesthetic style and an ethical, or rather anti-ethical, stance, a 
kind of designer nihilism whose chief theoretical proposition 
is the denial of the possibility of the Good. Gotham, 
particularly as re-invented by Frank Miller in the Eighties, is, 
along with Gibson’s Sprawl and Ridley Scott’s LA, one of the 


chief geomythic sources of this trend. 


Miller’s legacy for comics has been ambivalent at best. 
Reflect on the fact that his rise coincides with the almost total 
failure of superhero comics to produce any new characters 


with mythic resonance.’ The “maturity” for which Miller has 
been celebrated corresponds with comics’ depressive and 
introspective adolescence, and for him, as for all adolescents, 
the worst sin is exuberance. Hence his trademark style is 
deflationary, taciturn: consider all those portentous pages 
stripped of dialogue in which barely anything happens and 
contrast them with the crazed effervescence of the typical 
Marvel page in the Sixties. Miller’s pages have all the 
brooding silence of a moody fifteen-year-old boy. We are left 
in no doubt: the silence signifies. 

Miller traded on a disingenuous male adolescent desire to 
both have comics and to feel superior to them. But his 
demythologisation, inevitably, produced only a new 
mythology, one that posed as more sophisticated than the 
one it has displaced but is in fact an utterly predictable world 
of “moral ambivalence” in which “there are only shades of 
grey”. There are reasons for being highly sceptical about 
Miller’s bringing into comics a noir-lite cartoon nihilist 
bleakness that has long been a cliché in films and books. The 
“darkness” of this vision is in fact curiously reassuring and 
comforting, and not only because of the sentimentality it can 
never extirpate. (Miller’s “hard-bitten” world reminds me not 
so much of noir, but of the simulation of noir in Dennis 
Potter’s Singing Detective, the daydream-fantasies of a cheap 
hack, thick with misognyny and misanthropy and cooked in 
intense self-loathing.) 

It is hardly surprising that Miller’s model of realism came 


to the fore in comics at the time when Reaganomics and 
Thatcherism were presenting themselves as the only 
solutions to America and Britain’s ills. Reagan and Thatcher 
claimed to have “delivered us from the ‘fatal abstractions’ 


inspired by the ‘ideologies of the past’”.* They had awoken us 
from the supposedly flawed, dangerously deluded dreams of 
collectivity and re-acquainted us with the “essential truth” 
that individual human beings can only be motivated by their 
own animal interests. 

These propositions belong to an implicit ideological 
framework we can call capitalist realism. On the basis of a 
series of assumptions — human beings are irredeemably self- 
interested, (social) Justice can never be achieved — capitalist 
realism projects a vision of what is “Possible”. 

For Alain Badiou, the rise to dominance of this restricted 
sense of possibility must be regarded as a period of 
“Restoration”. As Badiou explained in an interview with 
Cabinet magazine, “in France, ‘Restoration’ refers to the 
period of the return of the King, in 1815, after the Revolution 
and Napoleon. We are in such a period. Today we see liberal 
capitalism and its political system, parlimentarianism, as the 


only natural and acceptable solutions”.° According to Badiou, 
the ideological defence for these political configurations 
takes the form of a lowering of expectations: 


We live in a contradiction: a brutal state of affairs, 
profoundly inegalitarian — where all existence is 
evaluated in terms of money alone — is presented to us 
as ideal. To justify their conservatism, the partisans of 
the established order cannot really call it ideal or 


wonderful. So instead, they have decided to say that all 
the rest is horrible. Sure, they say, we may not live in a 
condition of perfect Goodness. But we’re lucky that we 
don’t live in a condition of Evil. Our democracy is not 
perfect. But it’s better than the bloody dictatorships. 
Capitalism is unjust. But it’s not criminal like Stalinism. 
We let millions of Africans die of AIDS, but we don’t 
make racist nationalist declarations like Milosevic. We 
kill Iraqis with our airplanes, but we don’t cut their 


throats with machetes like they do in Rwanda, etc.° 


Capitalism and liberal democracy are “ideal” precisely in 
the sense that they are “the best that one can expect”, that is 


to say, the least worst.’This chimes with Miller’s rendition of 
the hero in The Dark Knight Returns and Year One: Batman may 
be authoritarian, violent and sadistic, but in a world of 
endemic corruption, he is the least worst option. (Indeed, 
such traits may turn out to be necessary in conditions of 
ubiquitous venality.) Just as Badiou suggests, in Miller’s 
Gotham it is no longer possible to assume the existence of 
Good. Good has no positive presence — what Good there is has 
to be defined by reference to a self-evident Evil which it is 
not. Good, that is to say, is the absence of an Evil whose 
existence is self-evident. 

The fascination of the latest cinema version of Batman, 
Batman Begins (directed by Christopher Nolan) consists in its 
mitigated return to the question of Good. The film still 
belongs to the “Restoration” to the degree that it is unable to 
imagine a possible beyond capitalism: as we shall see, it is a 
specific mode of capitalism — post-Fordist finance capital — 


that is demonised in Batman Begins,not capitalism per se. Yet 
the film leaves open the possibility of agency which capitalist 
realism forecloses. 

Nolan’s revisiting of Batman is not a re-invention but a 
reclaiming of the myth, a grand syncresis that draws upon 


the whole history of the character.’Gratifyingly, then, Batman 
Begins is not about “shades of grey” at all, but rather about 
competing versions of the Good. In Batman Begins, Christian 
Bale’s Bruce Wayne is haunted by a superfluity of fathers (and 
a near absence of mothers: his mother barely says a word), 
each with their own account of the Good. First, there is his 
biological father, Thomas Wayne, a rosetinted, soft focus 
moral paragon, the very personification of philanthropic 
Capital, the “man who built Gotham”. In keeping with the 
Batman myth established in the Thirtes Detective Comics, 
Wayne Pere is killed in a random street robbery, surviving 
only as a moral wraith tormenting the conscience of his 
orphaned son. Second, there is R’as Al Ghul, who in Nolan’s 


film is Wayne’s hyperstitional?mentor-guru, a Terroristic 
figure who represents a ruthless ethical code completely 
opposed to the benevolent paternalism of Thomas Wayne. 
Bruce is assisted in the struggle (fought out in his own 
psyche) between these two Father figures by a third, Michael 
Caine’s Alfred, the “maternal” carer who offers the young 
Bruce unconditional love. 

The struggle between Fathers is doubled by the conflict 
between Fear and Justice that has been integral to the Batman 
mythos since it first appeared in 1939. The challenge for 
Bruce Wayne in Batman Begins is not only to best Fear, as 
wielded by the Miller-invented crime boss Falcone and the 


Scarecrow with his “weaponised hallucinogens”, but to 
identify Justice, which, as the young Wayne must learn, 
cannot be equated with revenge. 

From the start, the Batman mythos has been about the 
pressing of Gothic Fear into the service of heroic Justice. 
Echoing the origin story as recounted in Detective Comics in 
1939, which has Bruce famously declare, “Criminals are a 
superstitious cowardly lot, so my disguise must be able to 
strike terror into their hearts”, Nolan’s Wayne dedicates 
himself to turning fear against those who use it. Yet Nolan’s 
version makes the origin story both more Oedipal and more 
anti-Oedipal than it appeared in Detective Comics. In the 
original comic, Bruce settles upon the name “Batman” when a 
single bat flies into his room. Nolan’s rendering of Batman’s 
primal scene is significantly different, in that it takes place 
outside the family home, beyond the realm of the Oedipal, in 
a cave in the capacious grounds of Wayne Manor, and not 


with a single bat but with a whole (Deleuzian) pack.!°The 
name “Batman”, with its suggestions of becoming-animal, 
does indeed have a Deleuzoguattarian resonance. Yet the 
proximity of Batman’s name to that of some of Freud’s case 
histories — “Ratman” especially, but also “Wolfman” — is no 
accident either. Batman remains a thoroughly Oedipal figure 


(as Batman Begins leaves us no doubt).'!Batman Begins re-binds 
the becoming-animal with the Oedipal by having Bruce’s fear 
of bats figure as a partial cause of his parents’ death. Bruce is 
at the opera when the sight of bat-like figures on stage drives 
him to nag his parents until they leave the theatre and are 
killed. 

The Gothic and the Oedipal elements of the Batman 


mythos were entwined immediately, on the two pages of 
Detective Comics on which Batman’s origin was first told. As 
Kim Newman identifies, Wayne’s epiphanic revelation that “I 
must be a terrible creature of the night... I shall become a 
BAT... a weird figure of the night”, contains “subliminal” 
quotes from Dracula (“creatures of the night, what sweet 
music they make”) and The Cabinet of Dr Caligari (“you shall 


”). 12 These panels follow three at the top of 


become Caligari 
the page where the shocked Bruce sees the bodies of his 
parents (father, mother [...] Dead, they’re dead”) and 
“swears by [their deaths] to avenge [them] by spending the 
rest of my life warring on all criminals”. Batman is self- 
consciously imagined — and self-created — as a Gothic 
monster, a “weird figure of the dark”, but one who will use 
“the night” against the criminals who habitually hide in it. 

If Batman was heavily indebted to German Expressionism 
— via Universal’s horror pictures — so, famously, was film 
noir, which emerged, like Batman, in the late Thirties and 
early Forties. (As we’ve already seen, Miller’s rendition of 
Batman can be seen as in many ways a postmodern 
investigation of this parallel.) Remarks made by Alenka 
Zupanci¢ suggest a possible hidden source for the complicity 
between Batman and noir: Oedipus again. “[I]n contrast to 
Hamlet”, ZupanCic¢ writes, 


the story of Oedipus has often been said to belong to 
the whodunnit genre. Some have gone even further, 
and seen in Oedipus the King the prototype of the noir 
genre. Thus Oedipus the King appeared in the “noir 
series” of French publisher Gallimard (“translated from 


the myth” by Didier Lamaison).*° 
Batman, the superhero-detective, walks in the footsteps of 
the first detective, Oedipus. 

Ultimately, however, the problem for Batman is that he 
remains an Oedipus who has not gone through the Oedipus 
complex. As Zupanci¢ points out, the Oedipus complex turns 
on the discrepancy between the Symbolic and the empirical 
father: the Symbolic Father is the embodiment of the 
Symbolic order itself, solemn carrier of Meaning and bearer 
of the Law; the empirical father is the “simple, more or less 
decent man”. For Zupanci¢, the standard rendering of the 
“typical genesis of subjectivity” has it that the child first of all 
encounters the Symbolic father and then comes to learn that 
this mighty figure is a “simple, more or less decent man”. Yet, 
as Zupanci¢ establishes, this trajectory is the exact inverse of 
the one which Oedipus pursues. Oedipus begins by 
encountering a “rude old man at the crossroads” and only 
later does he learn that this “simple man”, this “vulgar 
creature”, was the Father. Thus “Oedipus travels the path of 
initiation (of ‘symbolisation’) in reverse and, in so doing, he 
encounters the radical contingency of the Meaning borne by 


the symbolic.” !* 


For Bruce Wayne, though, there is no discrepancy at all 
between the Symbolic and the empirical. Thomas Wayne’s 
early death means that he is frozen in his young son’s psyche 
as the mighty emissary of the Symbolic; he is never 
“desublimated” into a “simple man”, but remains a moral 
exemplar — indeed he is the representative of Law as such, 
who must be avenged but who can never be equalled. In 


Batman Begins, it is the intervention of R’as Al Ghul which 
prompts an Oedipal crisis. The young Wayne is convinced 
that his father’s death is his fault, but Al Ghul tries to 
convince him that his parents’ death is his father’s 
responsibility because the good-natured and liberal Thomas 
Wayne did not know how to Act; he was a weak-willed failure. 
Yet Bruce refuses to go through this initiation and retains 
loyalty to the “Name of the Father” while Al Ghul remains a 
figure of excess and Evil. 

The question Al Ghul poses to Bruce is: are you, with your 
conscience, your respect for life, too weak-willed, too 
frightened to do what is Necessary? Can you Act? Wayne is 
forced to decide: is Al Ghul what he claims to be, the ice-cold 
instrument of impersonal Justice, or its grotesque parody? 
The ultimate Evil in the film turns out to originate from 


Ghul’s excessive zeal, not from some hoaky diabolism nor 


from some psycho-biographical happenstance.’ 


In this respect, it is the film that Zizek wanted Revenge of 
the Sith to be: a film, that is to say, which dares to hypothesise 
that Evil might result from an excess of Good. For Zizek, 
“Anakin [Skywalker] should have become a monster out his 
very excessive attachment with seeing Evil everywhere and 
fighting it”, but 


[ilnstead of focusing on Anakin’s hubris as an 
overwhelming desire to intervene, to do Good, to go to 
the end for those he loves and thus fall to the Dark Side, 
Anakin is simply shown as an indecisive warrior who is 
gradually sliding into Evil by giving way to the 
temptation of Power, by falling under the spell of the 


evil Emperor.'° 

In parallel with Zizek’s reading of Revenge of the Sith, 
Batman Begins’ treatment of the question of the Father — who 
is the father? — is doubled by the looming (omni-)presence of 
finance capital, and the issue of what is to be done about it. In 
Batman’s universe of course, “the Name of the Father” — 
Wayne — is also the name of a capitalist enterprise. The 
takeover of Wayne Industries by shareholder capital means 
that Thomas’ name has been stolen. Consequently, Bruce 
Wayne’s struggle against finance capital is also, inevitably, an 
attempt to restore the besmirched Name of the Father. Since 
Wayne Industries is at the heart — literally and figuratively — 
of the city, post-Fordist Gotham finds itself as blighted as the 
Sphinx-cursed Thebes. Its infrastructure rotten, its civil 
society disintegrated, Gotham is in the grip of a depression 
and a crime wave, both of which are attributed to the newly 
predatory, delocalised Capital that now has control of the 
Wayne corporation. The impact of finance capital is given a 
more personal narrative focus through the character of the 
kindly Lucius Fox (another candidate for Father 


)“who is degraded by the new regime. The 


surrogate 
implication is that this state of rottenness can only be 
rectified once the name of the Father resumes its rights. 

It is in its treatment of capitalism that Batman Begins is at 
its most intriguingly contradictory. In part, this can be 
attributed to the effects of attempting to retrofit the 1930s 
core narrative engine into a twenty-firstcentury vehicle: the 
reference to the depression is a clear Thirties echo, setting up 


a disjunction with a contemporary USA that has enjoyed an 


unprecedented period of economic success. In keeping with 
capitalism itself, Deleuze and Guattari’s “motley painting of 
everything that ever was”, Nolan’s Gotham is an admixture of 
the medieval and the ultra-contemporary, of the American, 
the European and the Third World. It resembles at once the 
crooked steeples and spires of German Expressionism and the 


favela-sprawls of cyberpunk?®: the nightmare of Old Europe 
erupting in the heart of the American Megalopolis. 

In a fascinating reading of Batman Begins, China Miéville 
argues that the film’s anti-capitalism cashes out as an 
advocacy of fascism. The film, he writes, 


is about fascism’s self-realisation, and the only struggle 
it undergoes is to admit its own necessity. BB argues for 
the era of the absolute(ist) corporation against the 
“postmodern” social dilutions of shareholder capitalism 
(perceived here in old-school corporate paranoia as a 
kind of woolly weakness), let alone against the 
foolishness of those well-meaning liberal rich who don’t 
understand that their desire to travel with the poor and 
working class are the “causes” of social conflict, 
because The Rich Man At His Garden The Poor Man At 
His Gate, and that the blurring of those boundaries 
confuses the bestial instincts of the sheep-masses. The 
film argues quite explicitly (in what’s obviously, in its 
raised-train setting, structured as a debate with 
Spiderman 2, a stupid but good-hearted film that thinks 
people are basically decent) that masses are dangerous 
unless terrorised into submission (Spidey falls among 
the masses — they nurture him and make sure he’s ok. 


Bats falls among them — they are a murderous and 
bestial mob because they are not being “effectively 
scared enough”). The final way of “solving” social 
catastrophe is [...] by the demolition of the mass transit 
system that ruined everything by literally raised the 
poor and put them among the rich: travelling together, 
social-democratic welfarism as opposed to trickle- 
downism is a nice dream but leads to social collapse, 
and if left unchecked terrorism that sends transit 
systems careering through the sky into tall buildings in 
the middle of New Yorkstyle cities — 9/11 as caused by 
the crisis of “excessive social solidarity”, the arrogance 
of masses “not being sufficiently terrified of their 
shepherds”. In all a film that says social stratification is 
necessary to prevent tragedy, and that it should be 
policed by terrorising the plebeians, for the sake of 
corporations which if there is a happy ending [...] will 
end up back in the hands of a single enlightened despot, 


hurrah, to save us from the depredations of 
19 


consensus. 

There is no doubt that the film poses finance capital as a 
problem that will be solved by the return of a re-personalised 
captal, with “the enlightened despot” Bruce taking on the 
role of the dead Thomas. It is equally clear, as we’ve already 
seen, that Batman Begins is unable to envisage an alternative 
to capitalism itself, favouring instead a nostalgic rewind to 
prior forms of capitalism. (One of the structuring fantasies of 
the film is the notion that crime and social disintegration are 
exclusively the results of capitalist failure, rather than the 


inevitable accompaniments to capitalist “success”. 

However, we must distinguish between corporate 
capitalism and fascism if only because the film makes such a 
point of doing so. The fascistic option is represented not by 
Wayne-Batman but by R’as al Ghul. It is al Ghul who plots the 
total razing of a Gotham he characterises as irredeemably 
corrupt. Wayne’s language is not that of renewal-through- 
destruction (and here Schumpterian capitalism and fascism, 
in most other respects entirely opposed, find themselves in 
sympathy), but of philanthropic meliorism. (It should also be 
noted that the masses who, in a pointed reference to 
Romero’s Living Dead films, threaten to consume and destroy 
Batman are under the influence of the Scarecrow’s 
“weaponised hallucinogens” when they attempt to 
dismember him, although this image of the masses no doubt 
tell us more about the political unconscious of the film- 
makers than it does about that of the masses.) 

If the film’s handling of capitalism is incoherent, in what 
does its challenge to capitalist realism consist? It is to be 
found not at the level of politics but in its account of ethics, 
agency and subjectivity. Zizek’s classic account of ideology in 
The Sublime Object of Ideology turns on the difference between 
belief and action. At the level of belief, key capitalist ideas — 
commodities are animate; capital has a quasi-natural status — 
are repudiated, but it is precisely the ironic distance from 
such notions that allows us to act as if they are true. The 
disavowal of the beliefs allows us to perform the actions. 
Ideology, then, depends upon the conviction that what 
“really matters” is what we are, rather than what we do, and 
that “what we are” is defined by an “inner essence”. In terms 


of contemporary American culture, this plays out in the 
“therapeutic” idea that we can remain a “good person” 
regardless of what we do. 

The film’s principal ethical lesson presents a reversal of 
this ideological conviction. In Wayne’s_ struggle to 
differentiate justice from revenge, revenge is personified by 
the uncompromising R’as al Ghul, while justice is represented 
by the assistant District Attorney, Rachel Dawes. Dawes is 
given the film’s crucial (anti-therapeutic) slogan, “It’s not 
who you are inside that counts, it’s what you do that makes 
you what you are.” The Good is possible, but not without 
Decision and the Act. In reinforcing this message, Batman 
Begins restores to the hero an existentialist drama that puts to 
flight not only capitalist realist nihilism, but also the niggling, 


knowing sprites of postmodern reflexivity*°that have sucked 
his blood for way too long. 


when we dream, 
do we dream we’re 


joey?! 


“When you dream, do you dream you're Joey?” 
— Carl Fogarty to Tom Stall, in David Cronenberg’s A 


History of Violence? 


“In a dream he is a butterfly. [...] When Choang-tsu 
wakes up, he may ask himself whether it is not the 
butterfly who dreams that he is Choang-tsu. Indeed he 
is right, and doubly so, first because it proves he is not 
mad, he does not regard himself as fully identical with 
Choang-tsu and, secondly, because he doesn’t fully 
understand how right he is. In fact, it is when he was 
the butterfly that he apprehended one of the roots of 
his identity — that he was, and is, in his essence, that 
butterfly who paints himself with his own colours — 
and it is because of this that, in the last resort, he is 


Choang-tsu.” 


— Jacques Lacan, “The Split Between the Eye and the 
993 


Gaze 
The key scene in Cronenberg’s A History of Violence sees the 
local sheriff addressing the hero, Tom Stall (Viggo 
Mortensen), after a series of violent killings have disrupted 
the life of the small midwest town in which they both live: “It 
just doesn’t all add up.” 

Superficially, A History of Violence is Cronenberg’s most 
accessible film since 1983’s The Dead Zone. Yet it is a film 
whose surface plausibility doesn’t quite cohere. All the pieces 
are there but, when you look closely, they can’t be made to fit 
together. Something sticks out... 

What makes A History of Violence unsettling to the last is its 
uneasy relationship to genre: is it a thriller, a family drama, a 
bleak comedy, or a trans-generic allegory (“the Bush 
administration’s foreign policy based upon a Western”)? This 
generic hesitation means that it is a film suffused with the 
uncanny. Even when the standard motions of the thriller or 
the family drama are gone through, there is something awry, 
so that A History of Violence views like a thriller assembled by a 
psychotic, someone who has learned the conventions of the 
genre off by heart but who can’t make them work. Perversely, 
but appropriately for a Cronenberg picture, it is this “not 
quite working” that makes the film so gripping. 

The near total absence of the prosthetics and FX for which 
Cronenberg is renowned from A History of Violence (traces of 
his old schtick survive only in the excessive shots of corpses 
after they have been shot in the face) has been remarked 


upon by most critics. In fact, Cronenberg’s renunciation of 
such imagery has been a gradual process, dating back at least 
as far as Crash (1998’s eXistenZ may turn out to be the last 
hurrah for Cronenberg’s pulsating, eroticised bio-machinery), 
but it has subtlised, rather than removed, his trademark 
ontological queasiness. 

Myth is everywhere in A History of Violence: not only in the 
hokey smalltown normality which is threatened, nor in the 
urban underworld of organised crime that threatens to 
encroach upon it and destroy it, but also in the conflict 
between the two. A town like Millbrook, the Indiana setting 
for A History of Violence, has been as likely to feature in 
American cinema as an image of menaced innocence in its 
own right. Comparisons with Lynch are inevitable, but it is 
Hitchcock, not Lynch, who is the most compelling parallel. 
The Hitchcock comparison goes far beyond surface details, 
significant as they are, such as the fact that, as the Guardian 
review reminds us, A History of Violence’s “Main Street 
resembles the one in Phoenix, Arizona, where the real estate 


office is to be found in Psycho”.* There is a much deeper 
affinity between A History of Violence and Hitchcock which can 
be readily identified when we recall Zizek’s classic analysis of 
Hitchcock’s methodology. In Looking Awry, Zizek compares 
Hitchcock’s “phallic” montage with the “anal” montage of 
conventional cinema: 


Let us take, for example, a scene depicting the isolated 
home of a rich family encircled by a gang of robbers 
threatening to attack it; the scene gains enormously in 
effectiveness if we contrast the idyllic everyday life 


within the house with the threatening preparations of 
the criminals outside: if we show in alternation the 
happy family at dinner, the boisterousness of the 
children, father’s benevolent reprimands, etc., and the 
“sadistic” smile of a robber, another checking his knife 
or gun, a third grasping the house’s balustrade. In what 
would the passage to the “phallic” stage consist? In 
other words, how would Hitchcock shoot the same 
scene? The first thing to remark is that the content of 
this scene does not lend itself to Hitchcockian suspense 
insofar as it rests upon a simple counterpoint of idyllic 
interior and threatening exterior. We should therefore 
transpose this “flat”, horizontal doubling of the action 
onto a vertical level: the menacing horror should be 
placed outside, next to the idyllic interior but well within 
it: under it, as its “repressed” underside. Let us imagine, 
for example, the same happy family dinner shown from 
the point of view of a rich uncle, their invited guest. In 
the midst of the dinner, the guest (and together with 
him ourselves, the public) suddenly “sees too much,” 
observes what he was not supposed to notice, some 
incongruous detail arousing in him the suspicion that 
the hosts plan to poison him in order to inherit his 
fortune. Such a “surplus knowledge” has so to speak an 
abyssal effect [...] the action is in a way redoubled in 
itself, endlessly reflected as in a double mirror play... 


things appear in a totally different light, though they 


stay the same. 


What is fascinating about A History of Violence is that it 


recapitulates this passage from the anal to the phallic within 
its own narrative development, entirely appropriate for a 
film that shows, as Graham Fuller puts it, “the return of the 


phallus”.® It begins, precisely, with a non-Hitchcockian 
contrast between a threatening Outside (a long, sultry 
tracking shot of two killers leaving a motel) and an idyllic 
Inside (the Stalls’ family house, where the six-year-old 
daughter is comforted by her parents and her brother after 
she is woken from a nightmare). But as the film develops, it 
effectively re-topologises itself, interiorising the Threat, or, 
more accurately, showing that the Outside has always been 
Inside. 

The Hitchcockian blot, the Thing that doesn’t fit, is the 
“hero” himself. The film’s central enigma — is the staid, 
pacific Tom Stall really the psychopathic assassin Joey 
Cusack? — can be resolved into the question: which Hitchcock 
film we are watching? Is A History of Violence a rehashing of 
The Wrong Man or Shadow of a Doubt? Disturbingly, it turns out 
that it is both at the same time. 

Shadow of a Doubt is the working out of a family scene 
much like the one described by Zizek above, although in that 
case, it is the guest, the rich uncle, who is the threat to the 
domestic idyll. The uncle (Joseph Cotten) is a killer of rich 
widows who has holed up in the house of his sister’s family to 
hide from the police. The Wrong Man, meanwhile, sees a family 
destroyed when the father is falsely accused. 

In Shadow of a Doubt, the uncle’s malevolence means that 
he must die so that the family idyll can be preserved. Only the 
Teresa Wright character knows the truth; the rest of the 
family, and the big Other of the community, are kept in 


ignorance. But of the family members in A History of Violence, 
by the end of the film, only the youngest child could plausibly 
not be aware that the family scene has always been a 
simulation. Crucial in this respect is the response of Stall’s 
wife, Edie (Maria Bello), as Ballard observed in his piece on A 
History of Violence in the Guardian: 


A dark pit has opened in the floor of the living room, 
and she can see the appetite for cruelty and murder 
that underpins the foundations of her domestic life. Her 
husband’s loving embraces hide brutal reflexes honed 
by aeons of archaic violence. This is a nightmare replay 
of The Desperate Hours, where escaping convicts seize a 
middle-class family in their sedate suburban home — 
but with the difference that the family must accept that 
their previous picture of their docile lives was a 
complete illusion. Now they know the truth and realise 


who they really are.’ 


But this isn’t so much a matter of accepting reality in the 
raw, as it were, but, very much to the contrary, it is a 
question of accepting that the only liveable reality is a 
simulation. Where at the start of the film, Edie play acts the 
role of a cheerleader for Tom’s sexual delectation, by the end 
she is playacting for real. (And of course, of course... there are 
no authentic cheerleaders, “real” cheerleaders are 
themselves playing a role.) If, as Zizek argued in Welcome to 
the Desert of the Real, 9/11 was already a recapitulation of the 
“ultimate American paranoiac fantasy [...] of an individual 
living in a small idyllic [...] city, a consumerist paradise, who 


suddenly starts to suspect that the world he lives in is a 


fake”,® a kind of real-life staging of The Matrix, then A History 
of Violence may be the first post 9/11 film in which the 
American idyll is deliberately and knowingly re-constructed 
AS simulation. (This is underscored by the fact that not one 
frame of the film was shot in America. In this respect, the film 
resembles Kubrick’s Lolita, whose America of motels and 
dusty highways was entirely reconstructed in Britain. In his 
interview with Salon, Cronenberg pronounced himself proud 
of his ability to hoodwink American audiences into believing 
that they were really seeing the midwest and Philadelphia.) 

“When you dream, do you dream you're Joey?” the 
mobster Fogarty (Ed Harris) asks Tom Stall, perhaps 
deliberately echoing Chuang Tzu’s story of a man who dreamt 
he was a butterfly. Chuang Tzu famously no longer knows if 
he is a butterfly dreaming that he was Chuang Tzu or Chuang 
Tzu dreaming that he is a butterfly. Is Tom Stall the dream of 
Joey Cusack, or is Joey Cusack the bad dream of Tom Stall? It’s 
no surprise that Lacan should have fixed upon this story, and 
Forgarty’s question contains an analyst’s assumption: the 
reality of Tom lies not at the level of the everyday-empirical 
but at the level of desire. The Real of Stall/Cusack is to be 
found, fittingly, in the desert, the space of subjective 
destitution where Stall says that he “killed Joey”. 

In an interesting but ultimately unconvincing piece in 
Sight and Sound, Graham Fuller argues that we should read the 
film as Stall’s fantasy: 


“Who is Joey Cusack?” the movie ponders at its 
midpoint as it leaves Western territory behind and 


plunges into a dark pool of noir. But the more fruitful 
question is “Who is Tom Stall, if not whom Fogarty 
claims he is, and why does he have a superegoic alter 
ego?” The name “Stall” indicates stasis. Though he is a 
diligent, caring husband and father, Tom knows he 
hasn’t made much of himself in life, and, we learn, 
harbours resentment towards his estranged wealthy 
brother, who considers him a fool. This chip on Tom’s 
shoulder explains his daydreaming which, born of 
repression, aligns him which such literary and movie 
dreamers as Walter Mitty and Billy Liar, whose 


fantasies of themselves as all-conquering heroes are 
9 


redolent of crippling neuroses, even impotence... 

Tempting as it is, this interpretation is unsatisfactory for 
a number of reasons. It is guilty of the same “oneiric 
derealisation” which has blighted responses to both Lynch’s 
Mulholland Drive and Kubrick’s Eyes Wide Shut, both of which 
have been interpreted as long dream sequences. Such 
readings ultimately amount to an attempt to put to rest the 
films’ ontological threat, ironing out all their anomalies by 
attributing them to an interiorised delirium. The problem is 
that this denies both the libidinal reality of dreams — we 
wake ourselves from dreams, Lacan suggests, in order to flee 
the Real of our desires — at the same time as it ignores the 
way in which ordinary, everyday reality is dependent for its 
consistency on fantasy. It also makes the empiricist 
presupposition that the quotidian and the banal have more 
reality than violence; the message of the film is rather that 
the two are inextricable. 


In the end, Stall as the fantasy of Cusack is much more 
interesting than Cusack as the fantasy of Stall. Is the 
American small-town idyll the fantasy of a psychopath? After 
Guantanamo Bay, after Abu Ghraib, this question has a special 
piquancy. The challenge that A History of Violence poses to the 
audience comes from the fact that we fully identify with 
Stall/Joey’s violence. We gain enormous enjoyment when the 
hoods are dispatched with maximum efficiency. When we 
dream, do we dream we’re Joey? Do we dream as Joey? Do we 
dream of being Tom, innocent, regular people, no blood on our 
hands? Are our “real”, everyday lives really only this dream? 

At the same time as we enjoy Joey’s hyper-violent killing 
of the gangsters, we know that it is impossible for us to 
position them as the Outside and Stall/Joey as the Inside, and 
the film reinforces the lesson that Zizek thought we should 
have learned in the aftermath of 9/11: 


Whenever we encounter such a purely evil Outside, we 
should gather the courage to endorse the Hegelian 
lesson: in this pure Outside, we should recognise the 
distilled version of our own essence. For the last five 
centuries, the (relative) prosperity and peace of the 
“civilised” West was bought by the export of ruthless 
violence and destruction into the “barbarian” Outside: 
the long story from the conquest of America to the 


slaughter in Congo.!® 


The most disturbing aspect about the film’s violence is not 
the gore that results from it, but the reptilian mechanism of 
its execution. There are no wisecracking one-liners; instead, 


once the killings are completed with a coiled spring 
autonomic power, there is an entranced animal calm, a 
machine exhaustion. (A History of Violence is reflexive without 
ironic, entirely lacking in any PoMo swagger. It may have put 
the final bullet into Tarantino’s career, if the spectacular 
indulgence of Kill Bill didn’t already do that.) 

A History of Violence suggests that twenty-first century 
America is a less a country in which violence is a repressed 
underside than that it is moebian band where if you begin 
with ultraviolence you will eventually end up with homely 
banality, and vice versa. In the final scene, when Tom — now 
“Tom” — returns to his house, “everything appears in a 
totally different light, though it has stayed the same”. The 
images of domesticity have now become “images of 
domesticity”, the meatloaf and the mashed potato have 
become “meatloaf” and “mashed potato”, reflexively-placed 
icons of American normality, the very definition of the 
unhomely, the unheimlich, the uncanny. Such, as Zizek said 
in the 9/11 piece, is the nature of “late capitalist consumerist 
society”, where ““‘real social life’ itself somehow acquires the 
features of a staged fake”. This is a simulated scenario far 
bleaker than that of The Truman Show or Dick’s Time Out of 
Joint, since it has been freely and knowingly embraced by the 
subjects themselves. There is no Them behind the scenes 
orchestrating and choreographing the simulation. At the end 
of the film, everyone is fooling but no one is fooled. 


notes on 
cronenberg’s 


eXistenZ' 


“Can what is playing you make it to level 2?” asked Nick Land 


in his 1994 discussion of cybertheory, “Meltdown”.* Land’s 
intuition that computer games would provide the best way to 
understand subjectivity and agency in digital culture was also 
the gambit of David Cronenberg’s 1999 film eXistenZ. The film 
takes place in a near-future in which games are capable of 
generating simulated environments which can barely be 
distinguished from real life. Instead of computer terminals or 
game consoles, players use organic “game pods”, which are 
connected directly to the players’ bodies via “bio-ports” in 
their spines. 

The main characters are Ted Pikul (Jude Law) and Allegra 
Geller (Jennifer Jason Leigh). We are first of all led to believe 
that Pikul is a neophyte gameplayer, being reluctantly 
initiated into the gameworld by Geller, who at this point 


seems to be the designer of the game (called eXistenZ) which 
they are playing. The two are pitched into a complex intrigue: 
a struggle between rival games corporations, and between 
gameplayers and “realists” — those who believe that the 
games are corroding the structure of reality itself. This 
corrosion is performed by the film itself, with what one of the 
characters memorably describes as “reality bleed-through” 
effects, so that the reality layers — only very weakly 
differentiated in any case — become difficult to distinguish. 
By the end it seems that both eXistenZ the game and what we 
had taken to be real life are embedded inside another game, 
tranCendenZ, but by now we cannot be sure of anything. The 
last line of dialogue is “Tell me the truth, are we still in the 
game?” 

At the time of release, it seemed like eXistenZ was a late- 
arriving take on a series of themes and tropes familiar from 
1980s cyberpunk — ideas Cronenberg had helped to shape in 
Videodrome. In retrospect, however, it is possible to see 
eXistenZ as part of a rash of late-1990s and early-2000s films, 
including The Matrix and Vanilla Sky, which mark a transition 
from what Alan Greenspan called the “irrational exuberance” 
of the 1990s bubble economy into the early twenty-first- 
century War on Terror moment. There is an abrupt mood 
shift toward the end of eXistenZ, with a military insurrection 
complete with heavy artillery and explosions. For the most 
part, though, the dominant mood is more quotidian. By 
contrast with the hyper-conspicuous CGI of The Matrix, with 
which it was destined to be most compared, eXistenZ is 
sparing in its use of special effects. The look is subdued, 
resolutely nonspectacular: there is a lot of brown. The 


brownness seems like a refusal of the gloss that will 
increasingly come to coat the artifacts of digital culture. 

With its dreary trout farms, ski lodges, and repurposed 
churches, the world (or, more properly, worlds) of eXistenZ 
have a mundane, lived-in quality. Or rather worked-in: much 
of the film happens in workplaces — gas station, factory, 
workshop — and this dimension of the film is what now seems 
prophetic. Though never explicitly discussed, labour is 
something like an ambient theme, omnipresent but 
unarticulated. The key to eXistenZ’s selfreflexivity is its 
preoccupation with the conditions of its own production (and 
the production of culture in general). It presents us with an 
uncanny compression, in which the “front end” of late 
capitalist culture — its cuttingedge entertainment systems — 
fold back into the normally unseen “back end” (the quotidian 
factories, labs, and focus groups in which such systems are 
produced). The clamour of capitalist semiotics, the frenzy of 
branding sigils and signals, is curiously muted in eXistenZ. 
Instead of being part of the background hum of experience, as 
they are in both everyday life and the typical Hollywood 
movie, brand names appear only rarely in eXistenZ. The ones 
that do appear — most of them the names of games 
companies — leap out of the screen. The generic naming of 
space is in fact one of the running jokes in the film: a country 
gas station is simply called Country Gas Station, a motel is 
called Motel. This is part of the flat affect, the strange 
tonelessness, which governs most of the film. 

The digitisation of culture which we take for granted now 
was only in its infancy in 1999; broadband was a few years off, 
as was the iPod, and eXistenZ has little to tell us about the 


digital communications equipment that proliferated in the 
decade after it was released. Handheld devices do not play 
any major role in eXistenZ — the glowing phone belonging to 
Pikul is thrown out of a car window by Geller — and, with its 
longueurs, its lingering in dead time, the film is very far from 
registering the jittery, attention-dispersing effects of 
“always-on” mobile technology. The most resonant aspects of 
eXistenZ do not reside in the body horror which was then still 
Cronenberg’s signature — although the scenes of the 
characters being connected to their organic game pod by bio- 
ports are typically grisly. Nor are they to be found in the 
perplexity expressed by characters as to whether they are 
inside a simulation or not — this is a theme that was already 
familiar from Videodrome, as well as Verhoeven’s Total Recall, 
both of which (in the first case indirectly, in the second more 
directly) took their inspiration from Philip K. Dick’s fiction. 
Instead it is the idea — in some ways stranger and more 
disturbing than the notion that reality is fake — that 
subjectivity is a simulation which is the distinctive insight of 
eXistenZ. 

This idea emerges, in the first place, through confronting 
other automated (or rather partially automated) 
consciousnesses: entities that seem autonomous but in fact 
can only respond to certain trigger phrases or actions that 
move the gameplay down a predetermined pathway. Some of 
the most memorable (and humorous) scenes in eXistenZ show 
encounters with these Read Only Memory beings. We see one 
of the characters locked in a “game loop”, silently lolling his 
head while waiting to hear the keywords that will provoke 
him back into action. Later, a clerk is seen repeatedly clicking 


a pen — as a background character he is programmed not to 
respond until his name is called. More disturbing than the 
third-person (or nonperson) encounter with these 
programmed drones is Pikul’s experience of subjectivity 
being interrupted by an automatic behavior. At one point, he 
suddenly finds himself saying, “It’s none of your business who 
sent us! We’re here and that is all that matters”. He is 
shocked at the expostulation: “God, what happened? I didn’t 


yo «66 


mean to say that.” “It’s your character who said it”, Geller 
explains. “It’s kind of a schizophrenic feeling, isn’t it? You'll 
get used to it. There are things that have to be said to advance 
the plot and establish the characters, and those things get 
said whether you want to say them or not. Don’t fight it.” 
Pikul later grimly notes that it makes no difference whether 
he fights these “game urges” or not. 

The emphasis on the curtailing of free will is one reason 
that Cronenberg’s claim that the film is “existentialist 
propaganda” seems odd. Existentialism was a philosophy 
which claimed that human beings (what Sartre called the 
“for-itself”) are “condemned to be free”, and that any 
attempt to avoid responsibility for one’s actions amounts to 
bad faith. There is an absolute difference between the for- 
itself and what Sartre called the “in-itself”’ — the inert world 
of objects, denuded of consciousness. Yet eXistenZ, in common 
with much of Cronenberg’s work, troubles the distinction 
between the foritself and the in-itself: machines turn out to 
be anything but inert, just as human subjects end up 
behaving like passive automata. As in Videodrome before it, 
eXistenZ draws out all the ambiguities of the concept of the 
player. On the one hand, the player is the one in control, the 


agent; on the other, the player is the one being played, the 
passive substance directed by external forces. At first, it 
seems that Pikul and Geller are for-itself, capable of making 
choices, albeit within set parameters (unlike in The Matrix, 
they are constrained by the rules of the world into which 
they are thrown). The game characters, meanwhile, are the 
in-itself. But when Pikul experiences “game urges”, he is both 
in-itself (a merely passive instrument, a slave of drive) and 
for-itself (a consciousness that recoils in horror from this 
automatism). 

To appreciate eXistenZ’s contemporary resonance it is 
necessary to connect the manifest theme of artificial and 
controlled consciousness with the latent theme of work. For 
what do the scenes in which characters are locked in fugues 
or involuntary-behavior loops resemble if not the call-centre 
world of twenty-first-century labour in which quasi- 
automatism is expected of workers, as if the undeclared 
condition of employment were to surrender subjectivity and 
become nothing more than a bio-linguistic appendage tasked 
with repeating set phrases that make a mockery of anything 
resembling conversation? The difference between 
“interacting” with a ROM-construct and being a ROM- 
construct neatly maps onto the difference between 
telephoning a call centre and working in one. 

In Being and Nothingness, Sartre famously used the example 
of the waiter: someone who overplays the role of waiter to 
the extent that they (to outside appearances at least) 
eliminate their own subjectivity. The power of Sartre’s 
example depends upon the tension between the would-be 
automatism of the waiter’s behavior and the awareness that 


behind the mechanical rituals of the waiter’s over- 
performance of his role is a consciousness that remains 
distinct from that role. In eXistenZ, however, we are 
confronted with the possibility that agency can genuinely be 
interrupted by the “inflexible stiffness of some kind of 
automaton”. In any case, eXistenZ compels us to reread 
Sartre’s description of the waiter in its terms, especially since 
one of the most horrific scenes of being-played features none 
other than a waiter. Pikul and Geller are sitting in a 
restaurant when Pikul feels himself overcome by a “game 
urge”: 


Pikul: You know, I do feel the urge to kill someone here. 
Geller: Who? 

Pikul: I need to kill our waiter. 

Geller: Oh. Well that makes sense. Um, waiter! Waiter! 
[She calls over waiter] 

Geller: When he comes over, do it. Don’t hesitate. 


Pikul: But... everything in the game is so realistic, I— I 
don’t think I really could. 


Geller: You won’t be able to stop yourself. You might as 
well enjoy it. Pikul: Free will... is obviously not a big 
factor in this little world of ours. 


Geller: It’s like real life. There’s just enough to make it 
interesting. 


“You won’t be able to stop yourself, you might as well 
enjoy it” — this phrase captures all too well the fatalism of 
those who have given up the hope of having any control over 


their lives and work. Here, eXistenZ emerges, not as 
“existentialist propaganda” but as_ decisively anti- 
existentialist. Free will is not an irreducible fact about human 
existence: it is merely the unpreprogrammed sequence 
necessary to stitch together a narrative that is already 
written. There is no real choice over the most important 
aspects of our life and work, eXistenZ suggests. Such choice as 
there is exists one level up: we can choose to accept and enjoy 
our becoming in-itself, or reject it (perhaps uselessly). This is 
a kind of deflation-in-advance of all of the claims about 
“interactivity” that communicative capitalism will trumpet in 
the decade after eXistenZ was released. 

Autonomist theorists have referred to a turn away from 
factory work toward what they call “cognitive labour”. Yet 
work can be affective and linguistic without being cognitive 
— like a waiter, the call-centre worker can perform 
attentiveness without having to think. For these non-cognitive 
workers, indeed, thought is a privilege to which they are not 
entitled. 

The muted tones of eXistenZ anticipate a digital-era 
banality, and it is the banal quality of life in a digitally 
automated environment — humansounding voices that 
announce arrivals and departures at a railway station, voice- 
recognition software which fails to recognise our voices, call- 
centre employees drilled into mechanically repeating a set 
script — that eXistenZ captures so well. 


i filmed it so i didn’t 
have to remember it 


myself! 


I was reminded of A History of Violence while watching Andrew 
Jarecki’s ultra-disturbing documentary Capturing _ the 
Friedmans on Channel 4’s new digital service, more4, the other 
night. 

Capturing the Friedmans is about a family from Great Neck, 
New York State, two of whose members (the father, Arnold, 
and one of the sons, Jesse, then only a teenager) pleaded 
guilty to serious sexual offences and were consequently 
jailed. Were they guilty? We can be reasonably confident only 
that Arnold had paedophiliac tendencies, and owned child 
pornography; he also confessed to having had some sort of 
sexual contact, short of sodomy, with two boys, but not in 
Great Neck. The rest is an enigma which makes Rashomon 
seem like an open and shut case. Jesse’s role, for instance, is 
desperately unclear. The supposed victims claimed that Jesse 


had participated in, and assisted with, his father’s violent 
abuses. But a campaigner cast doubt on the victims’ 
testimony, none of which was corroborated by any physical 
evidence, and most of which seemed to have been 
“recovered” after they had been hypnotised. 

The gaps in the Friedman narrative are all the more 
glaring because of the plethora of recorded material that IS 
available. This was a family that seemed — like many now I 
suppose — to obsessively record itself. Part of the “capturing” 
of the Friedmans is their capturing of themselves, on film and 
on tape. A documentary like this only became possible now 
that filming technology — cine cameras and later camcorders 
— had become widely available for the first time and kids are 
filmed from the moment of birth. The whole thing felt like a 
grim counterpoint to the proto-reality TV documentary of 
the Loud family Baudrillard discussed in “Precession of 


Simulacra”.? In a way, the most painful material consists of 
home movie footage of the Friedmans shot in the 1970s, in 
which they look for all the world like a perfectly happy 
family, the kids mugging and clowning for the cameras. Never 
has Deleuze’s observation that “family photos” are, by their 
very nature, profoundly misleading, been more bitterly borne 
out. Later, as the trials start and the recriminations follow, 
the family filmed and audiotaped themselves ripping each 
other to shreds. 

Why did they continue to film? “How do they remember, 
those who do not film?” asks Chris Marker in Sans Soleil. But 
why would the Friedmans want to remember their journey 
into Hell? Who could possibly want to film this? In Lost 
Highway, Fred Madison (Bill Pullman) claimed that he hated 


the thought of video-taping his own life because he “liked to 
remember things in his own way”. In an uncanny 
complement to this, David Friedman, who recorded the 
events of the day Jesse was sentenced to eighteen years 
imprisonment, said that he filmed it “so I didn’t have to 
remember it myself”. The machines remember, so we don’t 
have to. 


spectres of marker 
and the reality of 


the third way! 


Watching Chris Marker’s Le Fond de l’air est rouge (A Grin 
Without a Cat) last week made for a somewhat ambivalent 
experience: even though the film is, ostensibly, a catalogue of 
disappointments, its registering of a time when there were 
challenges — no matter how inchoate, messy, contradictory — 
to the existing order, cannot but offer some inspiration in 
these much bleaker times. A Grin Without a Cat, originally 
released in 1977 but given a new post-89 epilogue by Marker 
in 1992, is an epic montage-meditation on what Marker called 
“the Third World War”: the hydra-headed revolutionary or 
would-be revolutionary struggles of the Sixties and the 
Seventies. Marker constructed the film entirely out of archive 
material, shooting no original footage, and producing 
associations, connections, foreshadowings and_ echoes 
through masterly editing. The effect, especially if you are not 


minutely familiar with events in France, Vietnam, Algeria, 
Bolivia, Cuba and Czechoslovakia is  disorientating, 
vertiginous. You find yourself Quantum-Leapt into the middle 
of a jostling crowd scene; no sooner have you got your 
bearings there when you abruptly find yourself in another 
place, another time. Marker’s commentary — spoken by a 
number of actors — gives you clues, epigraphs, rather than 
explication. But Marker’s aim not to render the period from 
67 to 77 as Objective History to be pontificated upon by 
“experts” for whom the Meaning of the events is already 
established, nor, even worse, to produce a vanguardist 
version of I Heart 1968, in which sighing former 
revolutionaries look back on anger with the tender contempt 
of contemporary “wisdom”. No, the point was to present the 
events “in becoming”, to restore to them a subjectivity (in the 
Kierkegaardian sense) that retrospection — structurally 
forecloses. 

At one stage in the film, Marker’s commentary ruefully 
notes that while revolutionaries, failed revolutionaries and 
ex-revolutionaries devoted all their attention to the 
formation of the New Left, the New Right was coalescing, 
unnoticed. Cue images of Valery Giscard D’estaing playing 
football in a carefully-cultivated attempt to look sporty and 
modern. The PR director of Citroén muses on the “science of 
management” (too complicated, he says, for even the most 
talented Union member to master) and looks forward to the 
incorporation of leftist desire into Capital that would become 
post-Fordism. 

Cut to now, where the images of even an ultimately failed 
militancy belong to a past. A past that was not — in one sense 


— even mine, that was over before I was born in July 1968. Yet 
the reverberations continued for a few years yet, were an 
unacknowledged (by me, then) background to the things that 
I enjoyed in the late Seventies and early Eighties. For those of 
us arriving after the event, the significance of the convulsions 
documented in Marker’s film could only be apprehended 
much later, once their effects had completely ebbed away and 
the reality (and the pleasure) principles were Restored. 
Marcus’ Lipstick Traces — whose temporal jump-cutting in 
many ways recalls that of Marker’s film — goes some way to 
establishing the connections between the events remembered 
in A Grin Without a Cat and those that began in the UK at more 
or less the time that the film was completed. A cheshire cat’s 
grin, lipstick traces on a cigarette, spectres of Marx: Marcus, 
Derrida and Marker come to see ruptures, revolts and 
revolutions as ghostly residue, thin stains on the seamless 
surfaces of post-Cold War Capital. 

The untranslateable French title of Marker’s film suggests 
possibilities that hovered and haunted without ever making 
themselves real. At the Marker conference held at the ICA a 
few years ago, Barry Langford argued that, “rather than the 
spectre of Communism famously invoked by Marx in the 
opening lines of the Communist Manifesto”, for both A Grin 
Without a Cat and Marx’s “The Civil War in France” a hundred 
years before it, “it is the phantom of revolution that haunts 
Marx and Marker alike — that is, the fear that revolution will 
ultimately prove, precisely, phantasmic”. If Marx and 
Marker’s fear was that revolution would only be a spectre, our 
suspicion is that it will not turn out to be even that, that the 
stricken ghosts have been put to flight once and for all. (And 


even the “death of communism” is not enough for the 
guardians of the new status quo, for whom “communism is 
not dead enough — [...] they will only be content when they 
have driven a stake through its heart and buried it at the 


crossroads at midnight”.*) 

The struggles in A Grin Without a Cat might have been 
defeated, might even have contributed to a more ferociously 
effective Reaction, but the pressures that those events 
brought to bear almost had very immediate effects — by 
contesting the Possible, by rejecting “realism”, they could not 
but have altered expectations about what was acceptable in 
the workplace, about what could happen in everyday life. The 
revolutions were cultural; which is to say, they understood 
that culture and politics could not be conceived in isolation 
from one another. Both Althusser and the Situationist- 
inspired students of 68, in many ways so opposed, could agree 
on at least one thing: that cultural products were never 
merely cultural. In their condemnations of recuperated 
Spectacle and Ideological Apparatuses, they granted a weight 
to cultural products which few would countenance now. 

I felt the contrast between what Marker’s film recounted 
and contemporary realities especially painfully last week 
when I went on a TUC training course with members of 
NATFHE from other FE colleges. The stories of increased 
casualisation, of newly punitive sickness policies, of lecturers 
being sacked and forced to re-apply for their jobs, of the 
imposition of more and more targets and “spurious 
measurable”, each entailing yet more pointless, window- 
dressing paperwork, confirmed what, individually, we all 
already knew. The Further Education sector is in crisis; its 


problems only symptomatic of a wider malaise in UK 
education as a whole. Further Education colleges, out of Local 
Education Authority control since 1992, show the way in 
which a “reformed” (i.e. part-privatised) education will 
develop. The recent report which stated that students spoon- 
fed at A-level cannot cope with university study would come 
as little surprise to few A-level teachers and lecturers. The 
pressure to meet government targets means that quality and 
breadth of teaching is sacrificed for the narrow goal of 
passing the exam: an instrumentalisation of education that 
fully accepts that its only role is to reproduce the labour 
force. Far, far away from 68, at the core of whose 
conflagrations was education, and the question of what it 
could be: could it be more than an ideological training camp, 
a carceral institution? 

One thing that occurred to me last week, prompted by the 
contrast between Marker’s Then and our Now, was that the 
third way is not entirely a phantasm, an ideological dupe. 
There is in fact a reality to the third way, and it is the reality 
of bureaucracy. That is what is left once politics has become 
administration. 

It’s hard to believe that public services are not more 
clogged with bureaucracy than they were pre-Thatcher. 
Certainly, education is choked with the stuff... targets, action 
plans, log books, all of them required conditions for funding 
by the Learning and Skills Council, and assessed by Ofsted, 
whose threat no longer takes the form of an invasive external 
entity arriving every two or three years, but has become 
introjected into the institution itself, through the permanent 
panoptic vigilance of a bloated managerial strata determined 


to over-compensate in order to fully ensure it is meeting 
central government’s demands. This is the reality of “market 
Stalinism” in education. 

Is there a way to challenge or roll back the slow, 
implacable, rapacious proliferation of bureaucracy? Only by a 
collective action that seems inconceivable now... Only by a 
change in the ideological climate... Only by a switch in the 
cultural atmosphere... Where to start? While we search, 
desperately, for cracks in the Possible, bureaucracy, that steel 
spider, patiently spins its grey web... 


dis-identity politics! 


The discussion of V for Vendetta has been far more interesting 
than the film deserved. Yes, there is a certain frisson in 
seeing a major Hollywood movie refusing to unequivocally 
condemn terrorism, but the political analysis in the film (as in 
the original comic) is really rather threadbare. That is 
Moore’s fault; it can’t be blamed on the Wachowskis. Like all 
of Moore’s work, V for Vendetta is considerably less than the 
sum of its parts. I’ve complained before of finding Moore’s 
continual efforts to reassure himself and his readers of their 
erudition — every time you are about to succumb to the 
fictional world, it’s as if Moore taps you on your shoulder and 
say, “We’re too good for this, aren’t we folks?” — highly 
distracting and irritating. 

As for V for Vendetta’s politics — apart from the subjective 
destitution scenes, they amount in large part to the familiar 
populist ideology which maintains that the world is 
controlled by a corrupt oligarchy that could be overthrown if 
only people knew about it. Steven Shaviro says that “rather 
than trying to please all demographics, [the film] identifies a 
deeply religious, homophobic, ultra-patriotic, imperialistic 


surveillance state as the source of oppression.”” But isn’t this 
precisely “appealing to all demographics”, since few 
homophobic fascists will identify themselves as homophobic 
fascists, and it’s hard to imagine anyone warming to Hurt’s 
foaming-at-the-mouth ranter, still less voting for him. 
Postmodern fascism is a disavowed fascism (cue the BNP 
leaflet delivered through my door when I lived in Bromley, 
photograph of a smiling kiddywink, slogan: “My daddy’s not a 
fascist”), just as homophobia survives as disavowed 
homophobia. The strategy is to refuse the identification while 
pursuing the political programme. “We of course deplore 
fascism and homophobia, but...” The Wachowskis’ 
government bans the Koran, but that is the last thing that 
Blair and Bush would ever do; no, they will praise Islam as a 
“sreat religion of peace” while bombing Muslims. 


Blair’s authoritarian populism? is far more sinister than V for 
Vendetta’s pantomime autocracy precisely because Blair is so 
successful at “presenting himself as the reasonable, honest 
bloke on the side of the common man”. Similarly, Bush’s 
linguistic incompetence, far from being an impediment to his 
success, has been crucial to it, since it has allowed him to 
pose as a “man of the people”, belying his privileged Harvard 
and Yale-educated background. It is significant in fact that 
class is not mentioned at all in the film. As Jameson wryly 
notes in “Marx’s Purloined Letter”, it is not 


particularly surprising that the system should have a 
vested interest in distorting the categories whereby we 
think class and in foregrounding gender and race, 


which are far more amenable to liberal ideal solutions 
(in other words, solutions that satisfy the demands of 
ideology, it being understood that in concrete social life 


the problems remain equally intractable).* 


The climactic scenes of V for Vendetta, in which the people 
rise up (by this time, against no one) made me think, not of 
some great political Event, but rather of the Make Poverty 
History campaign — a “protest” with which no one could 
possibly disagree. The comparison with Fight Club does V for 
Vendetta no favours; the targets of Tyler Durdon’s terrorism 
were not the fusty symbols of the political class but the 
franchise coffee bars and skyscrapers of impersonal capital. 

I’m no fan of the Wachowskis’ Matrix, but it succeeded in 
two ways that V for Vendetta never will. The Matrix has become 
a massively propagated pulp mythos (whereas who but 
academics will think about the V for Vendetta film a year from 
now? It'll be a year after that until academics recognise that 
the far more fascinating and sophisticated Basic Instinct II is 
worthy of study). More importantly, it suggested that what 
counts as “real” is an eminently political question. 

That ontological dimension is what is missing from the 
progressive populist model, in which the masses cannot but 
appear as a dupes, fooled by the lies of the elite but ready to 
effectuate change the moment they are made aware of the 
truth. The reality, of course, is that the “masses” are under 
few illusions about the ruling elite (if anyone is credulous 
about politicians and “capitalist parliamentarianism”, it is the 
middle classes). The Subject Supposed Not To Know is a figure 
of populist fantasies — more than that: the duped subject 


awaiting factual enlightenment is the presupposition on 
which progressive populism rests. If the most crucial political 
task is to enlighten the masses about the venality of the 
ruling class, then the preferred mode of discourse will be 
denunciation. Yet, this repeats rather than challenges the 
logic of the liberal order; it is no accident that the Mail and 
the Express favour the same denunciatory mode. Attacks on 
politicians tend to reinforce the atmosphere of diffuse 
cynicism upon which capitalist realism feeds. What is needed 
is not more empirical evidence of the evils of the ruling class 
but a belief on the part of the subordinate class that what 
they think or say matters; that they are the only effective 
agents of change. 

This returns us to the question of reflexive impotence. 
Class power has always depended on a kind of reflexive 
impotence, with the subordinate class’ beliefs about its own 
incapacity for action reinforcing that very condition. It 
would, of course, be grotesque to blame the subordinate class 
for their subordination; but to ignore the role that their 
complicity with the existing order plays in a self-fulfilling 
circuit would, ironically, be to deny their power. 

“(C]jlass consciousness”, Jameson observes in ‘“Marx’s 
Purloined Letter”, 


turns first and foremost around the question of 
subalternity, that is around the experience of 
inferiority. This means that the “lower classes” carry 
around within their heads unconscious convictions as 
to the superiority of hegemonic or ruling-class 
expressions or values, which they equally transgress 


and repudiate in ritualistic (and socially and politically 
ineffective) ways. 


There is a way, then, in which inferiority is less class 
consciousness than class unconsciousness, less about 
experience than about an unthought precondition of 
experience. Inferiority is in this sense an_ ontological 
hypothesis that is not susceptible to any empirical refutation. 
Confronted with evidence of the incompetence or corruption 
of the ruling class, you will still feel that, nevertheless, they 
must possess some agalma, some secret treasure, that confers 
upon them the right to occupy the position of dominance. 

Enough has been already been written about the kind of 
class displacement people like myself have experienced. 
Dennis Potter’s Nigel Barton plays remain perhaps the most 
vivid anatomies of the loneliness and agony experienced by 
those who have been projected out of the confining, 
comforting fatalism of the working-class community and into 
the incomprehensible, abhorrently seductive rituals of the 
privileged world. “A drive from nowhere leaves you in the 
cold”, as the Associates sang in “Club Country”, “Every breath 
you breathe belongs to someone there.” 

There is a Cartesian paradox about such experiences, in 
that they are significant only because they produce a 
distanciation from experience as such; after undergoing 
them, it is no longer to conceive of experience as some 
natural or primitive ontological category. Class, previously a 
background assumption, suddenly interposes itself — not so 
much as a site for heroic struggle, but as a whole menagerie 
of minor shames, embarrassments and resentments. What 


had been taken for granted is suddenly revealed to be a 
contingent structure, producing certain effects (and affects). 
Nevertheless, that structure is tenacious; the assumption of 
inferiority constitutes something like a core programming 
which makes sense of the world in advance. To think of 
oneself as capable of doing a “professional” job, for instance, 
requires a traumatic shift in perspective, and if there are 
confidence crises and nervous breakdowns, they will be very 
often the consequence of the core programming 
intermittently reasserting itself. 

The real lesson to draw from Potter’s Barton plays is not 
the fatalistheroic one about the agonies of the charismatic 
individual confronting intransigent social structures. The 
plays have to be read instead against class-as-ethnicity and 
for class-as-structure; in any case, as they make clear, the 
occult machineries of social structure produce the visible 
ethnicities of language, behaviour and cultural expectations. 
The plays’ demand is not for a re-acceptance into the 
rejecting community, nor a full accession into the elite, but 
for a mode of collectivity yet to come. 

Potter’s challenges to naturalism then, become far more 
than mere PoMo trickery. His foregrounding of the way in 
which fictions structure reality, and of the role that television 
itself plays in this process, brings to the fore all the 
ontological issues that worthier, more traditional social 
realist writers conceal or distort. There is no realism, Potter 
suggests, beyond the Real of class antagonism. 

Now is perhaps the time to address two good questions 


that Bat? mailed in response to the reflexive impotence post. 
First, Bat asked, is the situation for French teenagers 


different from that of their British counterparts? This is 
easily dealt with, since, after all, it was the very problem with 
which the post aimed to deal. French students are far more 
embedded in a Fordist/disciplinary framework than are 
British students. In education and employment, the 
disciplinary structures survive in France, providing some 
contrast with, and resistance to, the cyberspatial pleasure 
matrix. (For reasons I will explore in more depth shortly, this 
is not necessarily for the best, however.) Bat’s second 
question raised more important issues; doesn’t talking about 
reflexive impotence reinforce the very interpassive nihilism 
it supposedly condemns? I would say that the exact opposite 
is the case. I’ve had more mail about the reflexive impotence 
post than any other; mostly, actually, from teenagers and 
students who recognise the condition but who, far from being 
further depressed by seeing it analysed, find its identification 
inspiring. There are very good Spinozist and Althusserian 
reasons for this — seeing the network of cause-and-effect in 
which we are enchained is already freedom. By contrast, what 
is depressing is the implacable poptimism of the official 
culture, forever exhorting us to be excited about the latest 
dreary-shiny cultural product and hectoring us for failing to 
be sufficiently positive. A certain “vulgar Deleuzianism”, 
preaching against any kind of negativity, provides the 
theology for this compulsory excitation, evangelising on the 
endless delights available if only we consume harder. But 
what it is so often inspiring — in politics as much as in 
popular culture — is the capacity to nihilate present 
conditions. The nihilative slogan is neither be “things are 
good, there is no need for change”, nor “things are bad, they 


cannot change”, but “things are bad, therefore they must 
change.” 

This brings us to subjective destitution, which, unlike 
Steve Shaviro, I think is a precondition of any revolutionary 
action. The scenes of Evey’s subjective destitution in V for 
Vendetta are the only ones which had any real political 
charge. For that reason, they were the only scenes which 
produced any real discomfort; the rest of the film does little 
to upset the liberal sensibilities which we all carry around 
with us. The liberal programme articulates itself not only 
through the logic of rights, but also, crucially, through the 
notion of identity, and V is attacking both Evey’s rights and 
her identity. Steve says that you can’t will subjective 
destitution. I, however, would say that you can only will it, 
since it is the existential choice in its purest form. Subjective 
destitution is not something that happens in any 
straightforward empirical sense; it is, rather, an Event 
precisely in the sense of being an incorporeal transformation, 
an ontological reframing to which you must assent. Evey’s 
choice is between defending her (old) identity — which, 
naturally, also amounts to a defence of the ontological 
framework which conferred that identity upon her — and 
affirming the evacuation of all previous identifications. What 
this brings out with real clarity is the opposition between 
liberal identity politics and proletarian dis-identity politics. 
Identity politics seeks respect and recognition from the 
master class; dis-identity politics seeks the dissolution of the 
classifactory apparatus itself. 

That is why British students are, potentially, far more 
likely to be agents of revolutionary change than are their 


French counterparts. The depressive, totally dislocated from 
the world, is in a better position to undergo subjective 
destitution than someone who thinks that there is some 
home within the current order that can still be preserved and 
defended. Whether on a psychiatric ward, or prescription- 
drugged into zombie oblivion in their own domestic 
environment, the millions who have suffered massive mental 
damage under capitalism — the decommisioned Fordist 
robots now on incapacity benefit as well as the reserve army 
of the unemployed who have never worked — might well turn 
out to be the next revolutionary class. They really do have 
nothing to lose... 


“vou have always 
been the caretaker”: 
the spectral spaces 
of the overlook 


hotel? 


“What is anachronistic about the ghost story is its 
peculiarly contingent and constitutive dependence of 
physical place and, in particular, on the material house 
as such. No doubt, in some pre-capitalist forms, the past 
manages to cling stubbornly to open spaces, such as a 
gallows hill or a sacred burial ground; but in the golden 
age of this genre, the ghost is at one with a building of 
some antiquity [...] Not death as such, then, but the 
sequence of such ‘dying generations’ is the scandal 


reawakened by the ghost story for a bourgeois culture 
which has triumphantly stamped out ancestor worship 
and the objective memory of the clan or extended 
family, thereby sentencing itself to the life span of the 
biological individual. No building more appropriate to 
express this than the grand hotel itself, with its 
successive seasons whose vaster rhythms mark the 
transformation of American leisure classes from the 
late 19th century down to the vacations of present-day 
consumer society.” 


— Fredric Jameson, “Historicism in The Shining” 


“(T]he strongest compulsive influence arises from the 
impressions which impinge upon the child when we 
would have to regard his psychical apparatus as not yet 
completely receptive. The fact cannot be doubted; but it 
is so puzzling that we may make it more 
comprehensible by comparing it with a photographic 
exposure which can be developed after any interval of 


time and transformed into a picture.” 
3 


— Sigmund Freud, “Moses and Monotheism” 
Space is intrinsic to spectrality, as one of the meanings of the 
term “haunt” — a place — indicates. Yet haunting, evidently, 
is a disorder of time as well as of space. Haunting happens 
when a space is invaded or otherwise disrupted by a time that 
is out-of-joint, a dyschronia. 

The Shining - King’s novel, and Kubrick’s “unfaithful” film 
version, both of which I propose to treat as one 
interconnected textual labyrinth — is fundamentally 


concerned with the question of repetition. In Spectres of Marx, 
Derrida defines hauntology as the study of that which repeats 
without ever being present. To elaborate, we might say that 
the revenant repeats without being present in the first place — 
where “place” is equivalent in meaning to “time”. Nothing 
occupies the point of origin, and that which haunts insists 
without ever existing. We shall return to this presently (or 
would it be better to say, it will return to us?). 

Precisely because it is so centrally about repetition, The 
Shining is a deeply psychoanalytic fiction. You might say that 
it translates psychoanalysis’ family dramas into the stuff of 
horror, except that it does rather more; it demonstrates what 
many have long suspected — that psychoanalysis already 
belongs to the genre of horror. Where else could we place 
concepts such as the death drive, the uncanny, trauma, the 
compulsion to repeat? 

Yet The Shining is about repetition in a cultural, as well as 
a psychoanalytic sense. Hence Jameson’s interest. Jameson, 
after all, has theorised postmodernity in terms of repetition, 
albeit a repetition that is disavowed. The “nostalgia mode” he 
refers to names an all-but ubiquitous yet largely 
unacknowledged mode of repetition, in a culture in which the 
conditions for the original and the ground-breaking are no 
longer in place, or are in place only in very exceptional 
circumstances. The nostalgia in question is neither a 
psychological nor an affective category. It is structural and 
cultural, not a matter of an individual or a collective longing 
for the past. Almost to the contrary, the nostalgia mode is 
about the inability to imagine anything other than the past, 
the incapacity to generate forms that can engage with the 


present, still less the future. It is Jameson’s claim that 
representations of the future, in fact, are increasingly likely 
to come to us garbed in the forms of the past: Blade Runner, 
with its well-known debt to film noir, is exemplary here (and 
nothing makes Jameson’s point more clearly than Blade 
Runner’s domination over science fiction film in the last 
twenty-five years). 

According to Jameson, then, The Shining, then, is a 
“metageneric” reflection on the ghost story (a ghost story 
that is about ghost stories). Yet I want to claim The Shining 
does not belong to postmodernity, but rather to 
postmodernity’s doppelganger, hauntology. We could go so 
far as to say that it is a meta-reflection on postmodernity 
itself. As Jameson reminds us, The Shining is also about a failed 
writer: a would-be novelist who yearns to be virile writer in 
the strong modernist mould, but who is fated to be a passive 
surface on which the hotel — itself a palimpsest of fantasies 
and atrocities, an echo chamber of memories and 
anticipations — will inscribe its pathologies and homicidal 
intent. Or, it would be better to say, for this is the horrible 
dyschronic temporal mode proper to the Overlook, it will have 
always done. 


The Overlook and the Real 


“Around him, he could hear the Overlook Hotel coming 
to life.” 


— Stephen King, The Shining* 


There is no escape from the infinite corridors of the Overlook. 
It is no gloomy castle, easily relegated to an obsolete genre 


(the gothic romance); neither is it a supernatural relic that 
will crumble to dust when exposed to the harsh light of 
scientific reason. Concealed behind the alluring ghosts of the 
hotel’s Imaginary which seduce Jack, the horrors that stalk 
the Overlook’s corridors belong to the Real. The Real is that 
which keeps repeating, that which re-asserts itself no matter 
how you seek to flee it (more horribly, it is that which re- 
asserts itself through the attempts to flee it: the fate of 
Oedipus). The Overlook’s horrors are those of the family and 
of history; or more concisely, they are those of family history 
(the province, needless to say, of psychoanalysis). 

David A. Cook has already shown how the film version is 


haunted by American history.° In Cook’s rendition, the 
Overlook, that playground of the ultra-privileged and the 
super-crooked (and no one, in the still paranoid post- 
Watergate dusk when King wrote the novel, could be so naive 
as to imagine that these two groups could be parsed), 
metonymically stands in for the nightmare of American 
history itself. A leisure hive built on top of an Indian Burial 
Ground (this detail was added by Kubrick); a potent image of 
a culture founded upon (the repression of) the genocide of 
the native peoples: 


It was as if another Overlook now lay scant inches 
beyond this one, separated from the real world (if there 
is such thing as a “real world” Jack thought) but 


gradually coming into balance with it.® 


Important as Cook’s reflections are, as I have already 
indicated, I want to concentrate, not on the macro-level of 


history, on the micro-level of the family. This, inevitably, 
brings us to Walter Metz’s valuable reflections on the way in 
which The Shining is intertextually bound up with the 


melodrama genre.’ A central tension in the film — a tension 
which for some is never quite resolved — concerns how The 
Shining is ultimately to be generically placed: is it about the 
family (in which case, it belongs to melodrama) or is about 
the supernatural (in which case, it belongs to horror or the 


ghost story)?® This inevitably recalls Todorov’s famous claim 
that the “fantastic” is defined by the hesitation between two 
epistemological possibilities; if spectral forces can be 
explained psychologically or by some other naturalistic 
means, then we are dealing with the “uncanny”. If the 
spectres of the supernatural cannot be exorcised, then we are 
dealing with the “marvellous”. Only while we oscillate 
between the two possibilities do we confront the “fantastic”. 


The U The Marvell 
e Uncanny a eanaeiie e Marvellous 
Melodrama The ghost story 


Noting that most critics have regarded The Shining as a case of 
the “marvellous”, Metz positions The Shining as an example of 
the “uncanny”. 

But I want to argue that The Shining is important because 
it scrambles the terms of Todorov’s schema; it is, at one and 
the same time, a family melodrama and a ghost story. If the 
ghosts are real, it is not because they are supernatural; and if 
the spectres are psychoanalytic, that is not to say that they 
can be reduced to the psychological. Just the reverse, in fact: 
rather than the spectral being subsumed by the 


psychological, for psychoanalysis, the psychological can be 
construed as a symptom of the spectral. It is the haunting 
that comes first. 


Patriarchy as Hauntology 


The Overlook’s ghosts are inescapable because they are the 
spectres of family history, and who of us is without a family 


history?? The Shining is a fiction, after all, about fathers and 
sons. Its genesis lay in a fantasy from which King the father, 
still struggling with alcoholism, recoiled, but which King the 
writer was fascinated by. Finding his papers scattered by his 
son one day, King flew into a blind rage; later he realised he 
could easily have struck the child. The germ of the novel was 
King’s extrapolation from that situation: what if he had struck 
his son? What if he had done much worse? What if King were 
an alcoholic failure who merely dreamt that he is a novelist? 

Psychoanalysis could be crudely boiled down to the claim 
that we are our family history, although it is perhaps at this 
point that we can dispense with the term “history” and 
replace it with “hauntology”. The family emerges in Freud as 
a hauntological structure: the child is father to the man, the 
sins of the fathers are visited upon the children. The child 
who hates his father is condemned to repeat him, the abused 
becomes the abuser. 

The Shining is about patriarchy as hauntology, and that 
relation is nowhere more thoroughly explored than in 
Freud’s essays on the foundations of religion. Here, Freud 
shows that the Holy Father, Jahweh, is indeed also a Holy 
Ghost: a spectral deity which can assert itself only through its 


physical absence. Freud repeated the “speculative myth” of 
the dismemberment and devouring of the Father Thing in 
“Totem and Taboo” thirty years later in “Moses and 
Monotheism”, a text which is itself full of repetitions and 
refrains. 

In Freud’s account, there are two Fathers: the obscene 
“Pere Jouissance” (Lacan) who has access to total enjoyment, 
and the Name/No (Nom/Non) of the Father — the Father of 
Law, the Symbolic Order in person, who forbids and mortifies. 


As Zizek has shown,’° one of the most significant aspects of 
“Totem and Taboo” was to have established that the austere 
Father of Symbolic Law is not originary; it is not, as the 
theory of the Oedipus complex had assumed, that the father 
is a pre-existent block to enjoyment. This “block” only comes 
into place once the father is killed. 

In the story as Freud recounts it, the primal horde of beta 
males, jealous and resentful of the tribal Father, rise up one 
day to kill him, anticipating that they will now have 
unlimited access to jouissance. But this is not what transpires. 
The “band of brothers” are immediately remorseful, 
guiltstricken, melancholic. Far from being able to enjoy 
everything, the gloomy parricidal brothers are unable to 
enjoy anything. And far from ridding themselves of their 
Father’s loathsome domination, they find that the Father 
dominates them all the more now that he is absent. The 
Father’s ghost preys upon their conscience; indeed, their 
conscience is nothing other than the reproach of the dead 
Father’s spectral voice. In heeding this absent voice, in 
commemorating and propitiating it by initiating new 
ceremonies and codes of practice, the brothers introduce the 


rudimentary forms of morality and religion. God, the Father, 
the Big Other, the Symbolic does not exist; but it insists 
through the repetition of these rituals. 

The Father is doubly dead. He asserts his power only when 
he is dead, but his power is itself only a power of death: the 
power to mortify live flesh, to kill enjoyment. 


A Child is Being Beaten 


“Like father, like son. Wasn’t that how it was popularly 
expressed?” 


— Stephen King, The Shining"? 


The Shining shows us patriarchal dementia — with its lusts, its 
ruses and its rationalisations — from inside. We witness Jack 
gradually succumbing to this dementia as he becomes 
intoxicated by the hotel and its temptations, promises and 
challenges. In the soft-focus, honeyed space of the Gold 
Room, Jack parties with the hotel’s ghosts: 


He was dancing with a beautiful woman. He had no idea 
of what time it was, how long he had spent in the 
Colorado Lounge or how long he had been there in the 


ballroom. Time had ceased to matter.” 


In the grip of these fever-dream fantasies, Jack descends 
into the unconscious (where, as Freud tells us, time has no 
meaning). The unconscious is always impersonal, and 
especially so here: the unconscious that Jack subsides into is 
the unconscious of the hotel itself. His family come to seem 
like “ball-breaking” distractions from his increasing spells of 


enchanted communion with the hotel, and being a good father 
becomes synonymous with delivering Danny to the Overlook. 
Jack becomes convinced by the hotel’s avatars — which seem 
to reconcile the demands of the superego with those of the id 
— that it is his duty to bring Danny into line. 

Beyond the Imaginary no-time of the Gold Room, there is 
another mode of suspended time in the Overlook. This 
belongs to the Real, where sequential, or “chronic”, clockface 
time, is superseded by the fatality of repetition. It is the 
Imaginary pleasures of the Gold Room, with their succulent 
promises of enwombing fusion, which allow Jack to fall 
increasingly into the hold of the hotel’s Real structure — the 
structure of abusive repetition. Danny confronts this 
structure as a vision of man endlessly a pursuing a child with 
a roque mallet (in the film, an axe). 


The clockface was gone. In its place was a round black 
hole. It led down into forever. It began to swell. The 
clock was gone. The room behind it. Danny tottered and 
then fell into the darkness that had been hiding behind 
the clockface all along. 


The small boy in the chair suddenly collapsed and 
lay in it at a crooked unnatural angle, his head thrown 
back, his eyes staring sightlessly at the high ballroom 
ceiling. 

Down and down and down and down to - the 
hallway, crouched in the hallway, and he had made 
wrong turn, trying to get back to the stairs he had made 
a wrong turn and now AND NOW - 


~ he saw he was in the short dead-end corridor that 


led only to the Presidential Suite and the booming 
sound was coming closer, the roque mallet whistling 
savagely through the air, the head of it embedding itself 
into the wall, cutting the silk paper, letting out small 


puffs of plaster dust.° 


Here we can turn again to the image of fatality Freud uses 
in “Moses and Monotheism”, which I cited at the beginning of 
this essay. “[T]he strongest compulsive influence”, Freud 
writes, 


arises from the impressions which impinge upon the 
child when we would have to regard his psychical 
apparatus as not yet completely receptive. The fact 
cannot be doubted; but it is so puzzling that we may 
make it more comprehensible by comparing it with a 


photographic exposure which can be developed after 
4 


any interval of time and transformed into a picture.’ 
This passage is especially piquant and suggestive when 
considered in relation to The Shining, given the famous 
final image of Kubrick’s film: a photograph taken in 
1923 showing Jack, surrounded by party-goers and 
grinning. At this moment, we cannot but be reminded 
of Delbert Grady’s ominous claim that Jack has “always 
been the caretaker”. 


What I want to draw from Freud’s photographic metaphor 
is precisely its concept of effects being distanced in time from 
the events which produced them. This is the psychoanalytic 
horror which The Shining anatomises. Violence has been 


imprinted upon Jack “psychical apparatus” long ago, in 
childhood (the novel details at some length the abuse that 
Jack has himself suffered at the hands of his own father), but 
it requires the “spectral spaces” of the Overlook hotel to 
transform those impressions from an “exposure” into a 
“picture”, an actual act of violence. 

If Jack “has always been the caretaker”, it is because his 
life has always been in the abuse-circuit. Jack represents an 
appalling structural fatality, a spectral determinism. To have 
“always been the caretaker” is never to have been a subject in 
his own right. Jack has only ever stood in for the Symbolic 
and the homicidal violence which is the Symbolic’s obscene 
underside. What, after all, is the father if not the “caretaker”, 
the one who (temporarily) shoulders the obligations of the 
Symbolic (what Jack calls “the white man’s burden”) before 
passing them onto the next generation? In Jack the ghosts of 
the past are revived — but only at the cost of his own “de- 
vival”. 

Of course, the dyschronic nature of the Overlook’s abusive 
causality — events stored in the psyche will yield their effects 
only after time has elapsed — has implications for Danny’s 
future as well. As Metz puts it: “When Jack chases Danny into 
the maze with ax in hand and states, ‘I’m right behind you 
Danny’, he is predicting Danny’s future as well as trying to 


scare the boy. [...] [T]he patriarchal beast is within [Danny] as 


”15 Jack might as well be saying, “I’m just ahead of you, 


well, 
Danny”: I am what you will become. In the Overlook, a child is 
always being beaten, and the position of the abused and the 
position of the abuser are places in a structure. It is all-too- 


easy for the abused to become the abuser. The ominous 


question The Shining poses, but does not answer, is: Will this 
happen to Danny (as it happened to Jack)? Is The Shining, that 
is to say, “Totem and Taboo”/ “Moses and Monotheism” — 
where the Father retains his spectral hold on the sons 
precisely through his own death — or is it Anti-Oedipus? 

In the novel, Danny can only escape death at the hands of 
his father by catatonically communing with his double, Tony, 
whom King reveals to be an avatar of his future self: 


And now Tony stood directly in front of him, and 
looking at Tony was like staring into a magic mirror 
and seeing himself in ten years... 


The hair was light blond like his mother’s, and yet 
the stamp on his features was that of his father, as if 
Tony — as if the Daniel Anthony Torrance he would 


someday be — was a halfling caught between father and 
16 


son, a ghost of both, a fusion. 
In the film, Danny escapes from his father by walking 
backwards in his footsteps. Yet we do not know if the (psychic) 
damage has already been done — will Danny, in surviving his 
father, end up taking his father’s place? 

For Metz, these hesitations leaves the text open: “It is up 
to Danny to grow up and build a better world, throwing off 
the demons of the past but always knowing that deep inside 
of him, the demons that possessed Jack and all Americans are 


right beneath the surface. Danny has inherited Jack’s 


"17 If Danny can throw off the spectres of the past, 


legacy. 
there is a possibility of freedom, then, but have the “strongest 


compulsive influences” already done their work? Is Danny, 


too, destined to always have been the Overlook’s caretaker? 


coffee bars and 


internment camps! 


I’ve finally seen Children of Men, on DVD, after missing it at the 
cinema. Watching it last week I asked myself, why is its 
rendering of apocalypse so contemporary? 

British cinema, for the last thirty years as chronically 
sterile as the issueless population in Children of Men, has not 
produced a version of the apocalypse that is even remotely as 
well realised as this. You would have to turn to television — 
to the last Quatermass serial or to Threads, almost certainly the 
most harrowing television programme ever broadcast on 
British TV — for a vision of British society in collapse that is 
as compelling. Yet the comparison between Children of Men 
and these two predecessors points to what is unique about 
the film; the final Quatermass serial and Threads still belonged 


to Nuttall’s bomb culture,? but the anxieties with which 
Children of Men deals have nothing to do with nuclear war. 
Children of Men reinforces what few would doubt, but 
which British cinema would seldom lead you to suspect: the 
British landscape bristles with cinematic potential. It’s long 


since been evident that only someone outside the self- 
serving, self-pitying low gene pool of British cinema is 
capable of realising this potential, and Children of Men’s 
director, Alfonso Cuarén, and cinematographer, Emmanuel 
Lubezki, are both Mexican. Together they have produced a 
portrait of Grim Britannia that is like a film equivalent of the 
Burial LP (and the film’s excellent soundtrack features 
Burial’s mentor and label-mate, Kode9). 

Lubezki’s cinematography is breathtaking. His 
photography seems to leech all organic and naturalistic 
vitality from the images, leaving them a washed-out grey- 
blue. As David Edelstein put it in an insightful review in New 
York Magazine: “The movie calls to mind an early description 
in Cormac McCarthy’s overwrought but gripping post- 
apocalypse novel The Road of gray days ‘like the onset of some 


cold glaucoma dimming away the world.’”’ The lighting is 
masterly: it as if the whole film takes place in a permanent 
winter afternoon when even the sun is dying. White smoke, 
its source unspecified, curls ubiquitously. 

Cuaron’s trick is to combine this despondent lyricism with 
a formal realism, achieved through the expert use of hand- 
held camera and long takes. Blood spatters onto the camera 
lens and goes unwiped. The gunfire is as oppressively tactile 
as it was in Saving Private Ryan. The meticulously 
choreographed long takes — technical feats of some 
magnitude — have justly been highly praised, and they are all 
the more remarkable because they go beyond the familiar 
role of simulating documentary realism to serve a political 
and artistic vision. 

This brings us back, then, to my initial question, and I 


think that there are three reasons that Children of Men is so 
contemporary. 

Firstly, the film is dominated by the sense that the 
damage has been done. The catastrophe is neither waiting 
down the road, nor has it already happened. Rather, it is 
being lived through. There is no punctual moment of disaster; 
the world doesn’t end with a bang, it winks out, unravels, 
gradually falls apart. What caused the catastrophe to occur, 
who knows; its cause lies long in the past, so absolutely 
detached from the present as to seem like the caprice of a 
malign being: a negative miracle, a malediction which no 
penitence can ameliorate. Such a blight can only be eased by 
an intervention that can no more be anticipated than was the 
onset of the curse in the first place. Action is pointless; only 
senseless hope makes sense. Superstition and religion, the 
first resorts of the helpless, proliferate. 

Secondly, Children of Men is a dystopia that is specific to 
late capitalism. This isn’t the familiar totalitarian scenario 
routinely trotted out in cinematic dystopias (see, for example, 
V for Vendetta, which, incidentally, compares badly with 
Children of Men on every point). 

If, as Wendy Brown has so_ persuasively argued, 
neoliberalism and neoconservatism can be made compatible 
only at the level of dreamwork, then Children of Men renders 
this oneiric suturing as a nightmare. In Children of Men, public 
space is abandoned, given over to uncollected garbage and to 
stalking animals (one especially resonant scene takes place 
inside a derelict school, through which a deer runs). But, 
contrary to neoliberal fantasy, there is no withering away of 
the State, only a stripping back of the State to its core 


military and police functions. In this world, as in ours, 
ultraauthoritarianism and Capital are by no means 
incompatible: internment camps and franchise coffee bars co- 
exist. 

In P.D. James’ original novel, democracy is suspended and 
the country is ruled over by a self-appointed Warden. Wisely, 
the film downplays all this. For all that we know, the Britain 
of the film could still be a democracy, and the authoritarian 
measures that are everywhere in place could have been 
implemented within a political structure that remains, 
notionally, democratic. The War on Terror has prepared us 
for such a development: the normalisation of crisis produces 
a situation in which the repealing of measures brought in to 
deal with an emergency becomes unimaginable (when will 
the war be over?). Democratic rights and freedoms (habeas 
corpus, free speech and assembly) are suspended while 
democracy is still proclaimed. 

Children of Men extrapolates rather than exaggerates. At a 
certain point, realism flips over into delirium. Bad dream 
logic takes hold as you go through the gates of the Refugee 
Camp at Bexhill. You pass through buildings that were once 
public utilities into an indeterminate space — Hell as a 
Temporary Autonomous Zone — in which laws, both juridical 
and metaphysical, are suspended. A carnival of brutality is 


underway. By now, you are homo sacer* so there’s no point 
complaining about the beatings. You could be anywhere, 
provided it’s a warzone: Yugoslavia in the Nineties, Baghdad 
in the Noughties, Palestine any time. Graffiti promises an 
intifada, but the odds are overwhelmingly stacked in favour 
of the State, which still packs the most powerful weapons. 


The third reason that Children of Men works is because of 
its take on cultural crisis. It’s evident that the theme of 
sterility must be read metaphorically, as the displacement of 
another kind of anxiety. (If the sterility were to be taken 
literally, the film would be no more than a requiem for what 
Lee Edelman calls “reproductive futurism”, entirely in line 
with mainstream culture’s pathos of fertility.) For me, this 
anxiety cries out to be read in cultural terms, and the 
question the film poses is: how long can a culture persist 
without the new? What happens if the young are no longer 
capable of producing surprises? 

Children of Men connects with the suspicion that the end 
has already come, the thought that it could well be the case 
that the future harbours only reiteration and re-permutation. 
Could it be, that is to say, that there are no breaks, no “shocks 
of the new” to come? Such anxieties tend to result in a bi- 
polar oscillation: the “weak messianic” hope that there must 
be something new on the way lapses into the morose 
conviction that nothing new can ever happen. The focus 
shifts from the Next Big Thing to the last big thing — how 
long ago did it happen and just how big was it? 

The key scene in which the cultural theme is explicitly 
broached comes when Clive Owen’s character, Theo, visits a 
friend Battersea power station, which is now some 
combination of government building and private collection. 
Cultural treasures — Michelangelo’s David, Picasso’s Guernica, 
Pink Floyd’s inflatable pig — are preserved in a building that 
is itself a refurbished heritage artefact. This is our only 
glimpse into the lives of the elite. The distinction between 
their life and that of the lower orders is marked, as ever, by 


differential access to enjoyment: they still eat their artfully 
presented cuisine in the shadow of the Old Masters. Theo, 
asks the question: how all this can matter if there will be no- 
one to see it? The alibi can no longer be future generations, 
since there will be none. The response is nihilistic hedonism: 
“T try not to think about it”. 

T.S. Eliot looms in the background of Children of Men, 
which, after all, inherits the theme of sterility from “The 
Waste Land”. The film’s closing epigraph “shantih shantih 
shantih” has more to do with Eliot’s fragmentary pieces than 
the Upanishads’ peace. Perhaps it is possible to see the 
concerns of another Eliot — the Eliot of “Tradition and the 


Individual Talent”? — ciphered in Children of Men. It was in 
this essay that Eliot, in anticipation of Bloom, described the 
reciprocal relationship between the canonical and the new. 
The new defines itself in response to what is already 
established; at the same time, the established has to 
reconfigure itself in response to the new. Eliot’s claim was 
that the exhaustion of the future does not even leave us with 
the past. Tradition counts for nothing when it is no longer 
contested and modified. A culture that is merely preserved is 
no culture at all. The fate of Picasso’s Guernica — once a howl 
of anguish and outrage against fascist atrocities, now a wall- 
hanging — is exemplary. Like its Battersea hanging space in 
the film, the painting is accorded “iconic” status only when it 
is deprived of any possible function or context. 

A culture which takes place only in museums is already 
exhausted. A culture of commemoration is a cemetery. No 
cultural object can retain its power when there are no longer 
new eyes to see it. 


rebel without a 


cause! 


“Why is it [...] that left-wingers feel free to make their 
films direct and _ realistic, whereas Hollywood 
conservatives have to put on a mask in order to speak 
what they know to be the truth?” 


— Andrew Klavern, “What Bush and Batman Have in 
, 


Common” 
“What I despise in America is the studio actors [sic] 
logic, as if there is something good in self expression: 
do not be oppressed, open yourself, even if you shout 
and kick the others, everything in order to express and 
liberate yourself. This stupid idea, that behind the mask 
there is some truth. [...] Surfaces do matter. If you 
disturb the surfaces you may lose a lot more than you 
account. You shouldn’t play with rituals. Masks are 
never simply mere masks.” 

— Slavoj Zizek and Geert Lovink, “Japan Through a 
Slovenian Looking Glass: Reflections of Media and 


Politic and Cinema”? 

There are many symptomatically interesting things about the 
right-wing attempts to appropriate The Dark Knight that are 
doing the rounds at the moment. The idea is that the Batman 
of the film equals Bush — a misunderstood hero prepared to 
make “tough choices” in order to protect an ungrateful 
population from threats it is too ethically enfeebled to 
confront. 


In a couple of intricately argued posts, Inspersal* 
demonstrates that The Dark Knight by no means presents 
“tough choices” as “hard but necessary”; on the contrary, 
whenever Batman resorts to torture, it either yields nothing 
or is counterproductive. What neocon readings of the film 
must overlook is that this is exactly the same in geopolitical 
reality: far from being unpalatable but necessary, the Iraq 
misadventure, Guantanamo Bay, extraordinary rendition, etc. 
have either achieved no results or made things worse. What’s 
interesting here is the doggedness of the neocon fantasy, 
which is precisely a fantasy of “being realistic’? — 
astonishingly, elements of the American right appear to 
actually still believe that the Bush administration’s policies 
are successful, and that the American public has rejected 
them on the grounds of high-minded (liberal) ethical qualms 
rather than for pragmatic-utilitarian reasons (too many of 
our boys being killed). 

Secondly, what these readings also miss is the actual 
nature of the model of virtue presented in the film. If this is 
(neo)conservative, it is not at the simple level of utilitarian 
calculation of consequences. What we are dealing with is a far 


more complicated Straussian meta-utilitarianism whose 
cynical reasoning is akin to that of Dostoyevsky’s Grand 
Inquisitor. Deception — of the masses by the elite — is 
integral to this account of virtue: what is “protected” is not 
the masses’ security but their belief (in Harvey Dent’s 
campaign). 

As Inspersal argues, the emphasis on deception in The 
Dark Knight is one of the themes that connects it with Nolan’s 
previous films, and Batman’s climactic act of self-sacrifice is 
precisely an act of deception. It takes place at the level of 
signs: what he must give up is his reputation, his good 
standing in the eyes of the Gotham public. The act of 
deception doesn’t conceal an underlying good act — it is the 
concealing that is the good act itself. 

Thirdly, the neocon readings misconstrue the nature of 
“evil” in the film. If these right-wingers really think that 
Osama bin Laden is like The Joker as he appears in The Dark 
Knight, that gives us another, intriguing, insight into their 
fantasies. (Matthew Yglesias says, “I look at the movie and say 
‘see — if you were fighting a comic book bad guy and you 
were a comic book hero then your policies would make 


sense.’””° But even this isn’t the case, as Inspersal’s arguments 
above make clear.) Or rather, it reveals the inconsistency on 
which Islamophobic fantasy depends: the Islamist is both “an 
agent of chaos”, someone without a cause, and a zealot 
excessively attached to a cause. 

What’s interesting about The Dark Knight is that is not 
really about Good versus Evil at all but “good causes” versus 
aberrant modes of cause/causality. The Joker and Two-Face 
are mad rather than bad, and their insanity is centrally 


connected with their relationship to cause. The Joker is pure 
Terror, that is, Terror detached from any cause: 


You see, nobody panics when things go according to 
plan. Even if the plan is horrifying. If I told people that 
a gangbanger was going to get shot, or a busload of 
soldiers was going to get blown up, nobody would 
panic. Because it’s all part of the plan. But tell people 
that one tiny little mayor is going to die and everyone 
loses their minds! Introduce a little anarchy, you upset 
the established order, and everything becomes chaos. I 
am an agent of chaos. And you know the thing about 
chaos, Harvey. It’s fair. 


While Batman is drawn into utilitarian calculations, The 
Joker is free in the same way that the death drive is free: he 
acts with indifference to consequences, glorying instead in a 
kind of ungrounded unbinding of orderly causal sequences. 
The reference to “fairness” above is not idle. As an imp of the 
perverse, The Joker stands for an inverted (or freaked) 
Kantian justice. In many ways, we are looking at the reversal 
of Kantianism into Don Giovanni Zizek has described many 
times (Don Giovanni’s decision not to save himself, to 
maintain his commitment to his libertinism even when doing 
so will result in his execution, becomes an ethical gesture). 
The Joker acts without any pathological interests, grandly 
symbolising his lack of instrumentality with the burning of 
the pyramid of money. 

Two-Face’s insanity is also a kind of haemorrhaging of 
justice. In his case, the championing of a good cause — which 


it seems will inevitably leads to terrible consequences — is 
displaced by an embrace of chance’s random causality 
(heads/tails). The flip into randomness is not an 
abandonment of justice, but the quest for a justice that will 
not be corrupted by human will — in its very impersonal 
mechanism, chance is fair because it does not privilege any 
outcome or any individual. Interestingly, it is only when Dent 
becomes Two-Face that his coin tossing is fair; when Dent is 
the “White Knight” DA, his coin is loaded (it has heads on 
both sides). What also interrupts the orderly sequence of 
causality in Dent’s case is trauma — the trauma of seeing 
Rachel die, which is itself a consequence of a binary choice 
trap, one of a series of such traps The Joker attempts to 
spring. 

The by now standard view of The Dark Knight — that its 
real libidinal pull is not the peripheral Batman/Wayne, but 
the charisma of Heath Ledger’s Joker — is certainly correct. 
When I heard Ledger’s performance celebrated, I feared the 
worst: that we were going to see the actorly overplaying that 
usually garners this kind of ubiquitous praise. But it is to 
Ledger’s immense credit that he completely avoids what 
Nicholson was allowed to do in Tim Burton’s dreadful Batman: 
we get no glimpse of the actor behind the role (with 
Nicholson, of course, that’s all we got). There is also no 
question of Ledger appearing bare-faced for any significant 
length of time, as Tobey Maguire and Julian McMahon were 
allowed to in Spider-Man 3 and the Fantastic Four films 
respectively. Thankfully, there is only the briefest glimpse of 
The Joker sans make-up in The Dark Knight. 

What Ledger does, in many ways, is play the make-up. I 


should stress here that the make-up, which makes Ledger’s 
face look like a malevolent monkey leering from behind 
cracked plaster, manages a feat that is near impossible: it 
reinvents The Joker look whilst also maintaining fidelity to 
the comics (compare the Green Goblin’s mask and outfit in 
the Spider-Man films, whose divergence from the halloween 
hood in the comics always disappointed me). My one point of 
disagreement with Inspersal concerns his claim that Ledger’s 
performance “shows the Nicholson/Burton interpretation to 
be much closer to Cesar Romero from the TV show, rather 
than Alan Moore’s version from The Killing Joke, allegedly 
Burton and Hamm’s chief influence”. I would argue that, in 
fact, it is Ledger’s performance that is closer to Romero’s, and 
that is why it works so well. Nicholson’s PoMo posturing and 
Moore’s psychological depth were all of a piece, and both 
were far less terrifying than the senseless gibbering of 
Romero’s pantomimeturn Joker. The Joker was always 
fascinating because, unlike most if not all big-time 
supervillains, he was pure surface, motiveless madness, 
devoid of any origin or backstory — until Moore obligingly 
filled one in, as is his hamfisted pseudo-literary wont. There 
are a couple of great scenes in The Dark Knight where Ledger’s 
Joker mocks cod psychoanalytic reduction: “See these scars... 


> «646 


I got them because of my father.” “See these scars... I got 
them because of my wife.” (This reminded me of nothing so 
much as Ian Bannen’s chilling burst of explosive laughter in 
Sidney Lumet’s The Offence, in response to Sean Connery’s 
question: “Was your father a big man?”) If The Joker aligns 
himself with anything it is “the freak”, which cannot but 


remind us of freak events, that is, events which appear to 


happen without proper causation. By evacuating The Joker of 
all interiority, by refusing anything which would contain the 
Joker’s wildness or compromise the autonomy of his face- 
painted persona, Ledger’s performance (and Jonathan Nolan’s 
script) do justice to the freakish. 


robot historian in 


the ruins! 


“Ideology is not something foreign, something in a film with a 
strange power to impose itself on our minds; ideology is what 
we and the film share, what allows for the transfer of specific 
meanings between film and audience (a transfer which is not 
one way). As Zizek puts it, ideology is made up of ‘unknown 
knowns’; that is to say, the problem with ideology is not that 
it is a falsehood of which we might be persuaded, but because 


it is a truth that we already accept without knowing it.” 
22 


— Voyou, “Ideology critics are a superstitious, cowardly lot 
Voyou’s remarks on readings of The Dark Knight make some 
important points about ideology. Focusing on the supposed 
“message” of the film — as_ both neoconservative 
interpretations of the film, and their critics, including me, do 
— is in danger of missing the way in which ideology works in 
capitalism. The role of capitalist ideology is not to make an 
explicit case for something in the way that propaganda does, 
but to conceal the fact that the operations of capital do not 


depend on any sort of subjectively assumed belief. It is 
impossible to conceive of fascism or Stalinism without 
propaganda — but capitalism can proceed perfectly well, 
indeed better, without anyone making a case for it. 

In the responses to The Dark Knight I posted here, it was 
Wayne Wedge who captured the way that the film functions 


as a hyper-object in late capitalism.° The very multivalence of 
The Dark Knight, its capacity to generate radically different 
interpretations, to elicit discourse, is what makes it a highly 
efficient meta-commodity. A text with a single monologic 
Message, even supposing such a thing could exist, would not 
be able to “provoke the debate” which capitalist culture now 
feeds upon. 

It not only that a cultural object can be opposed to 
capitalism on the level of content, but serve it on the level of 
form; one could convincingly go further and argue that the 
ideology of capitalism is now “anti-capitalist”. The villain in 
Hollywood films is routinely the “evil multinational 
corporation”. So it is, once again, in Disney/Pixar’s Wall-E, 
which, like The Dark Knight, has provoked all kinds of bizarre 
conservative readings. “This is perhaps the most cynical and 


darkest big-budget Disney film ever”, claims Kyle Smith’. 
“Perhaps never before has any corporation spent so much 
money on insulting its customers.” (By way of parenthesis, 
since it isn’t relevant to my argument here, this, from Paul 
Edwards, is priceless: “WALL-E is the story of what results 
when a liberal vision of the future is achieved: government 
marries business in the interest of providing not only ‘the 
pursuit of happiness’ but happiness itself, thus creating 
gluttonous citizens dependent on the government to sustain 


their lives.”)° 

Wall-E’s attack on consumerism is easily absorbed. The 
“insult” that provoked Kyle Smith into disgust was its image 
of humans as obese, infantilised chair-bound consumers 
supping pap from cups. Initially, it might seem subversive 
and ironic that a film made by a massive corporation should 
have such an anti-consumerist and anti-corporate message (it 
is made clear in the film that the mega corporation Buy N 
Large is chiefly responsible for the environmental 
depredation which has destroyed earth as a human 
environment). Yet it is capital which is the great ironist, 
easily able to metabolise anti-corporate rhetoric by selling it 
back to an audience as entertainment. Besides, on the level of 
content, Wall-E ends up serving capitalist realism, presenting 
what we might think of as the very fantasies of capital itself — 
that it can continue to expand infinitely; that the despoilation 
of the human environment on Earth is a temporary problem 
that will eventually be overcome; that human labour can be 
extirpated altogether (on the spaceship Axiom, humans are 
given over entirely to consumption, and all work is 
performed by servomechanisms). Human labour returns only 
at the end of the film, when capital/Axiom begins its 
terraforming of Earth. 

There is another impasse in Wall-E. The film follows in the 
tradition of fictions about wanderers in the ruins (cf 
Christopher Woodward’s In Ruins). But in some respects Wall-E 
was an advance on the stories of postapocalyptic solitaries, 
from Mary Shelley’s The Last Man through to Richard 
Matheson’s I Am Legend or John Foxx’s The Quiet Man. For in 
Wall-E the lone figure in the ruins is not even human: it is a 


robot historian quite different from the one Manuel DeLanda 
imagined; or not a robot historian so much as a bricoleur- 
hauntologist, reconstructing human culture from a heap of 
fragments. (A precursor of this scenario is Numan’s “M.E.”, 
the track sampled by Basement Jaxx on “Where’s Your Head 
At”, written from the perspective of a sentient computer left 
alone on an Earth.) This idea of surveying a world in which 
humans are extinct clearly exercises a powerful fantasmatic 
allure. Yet it seems that there’s a certain point where the 
fantasy always breaks down — the fictions that start from this 
premise invariably end up restoring a human world at some 
point in the narrative. It is no doubt asking too much that 
Wall-E should buck this trend; but it’s notable that the film 
deteriorates massively the moment that the humans appear 
(cf all of the film versions of Matheson’s I Am Legend, 
including the most recent). You’re left wondering whether 
this is a structural necessity, whether there’s something in 
the nature of the fantasy itself which entails the return of 
other humans, or whether it is a requirement arising from 
the needs of narrative: stories can’t sustain themselves with 
only one protagonist. In the case of Wall-E, of course, there 
are two (non-human) characters, which make the early part 
of the film, a robotic romance played out as animated ballet, 
recall the films of the silent era. Needless to say, there are 
many films which feature non-human protagonists, but such 
characters are rendered effectively human by their language 
use. Wall-E and Eve, meanwhile, seem like convincing non- 
human subjects because they lack language. Wall-E tantalises: 
what if the feel of this first section had continued until the 
end of the film, uninterrupted by the return of humans? 


review of tyson! 


“It’s like a Greek tragedy. The only problem is that I’m the 
subject”, Mike Tyson reputedly told James Toback when he 
first saw this film. There is a classical structure to the 
narrative: a kid from mean streets, with few prospects, a life 
of criminality already under way, is talent-spotted by a 
grizzled boxing trainer; he becomes the youngest world 
champion ever; then it all disintegrates into hedonism, 
profligacy and violence. Yet in the end the structure of the 
story is psychoanalytic as much as tragic (after all, it wasn’t 
for nothing that Freud turned to Sophocles and Aeschylus for 
analogues of his discoveries). A familiar enough narrative arc, 
but what makes it even more remarkable (and even more 
Freudian) is that it happens again. Tyson struggles back to 
the top of the heavyweight game before once again 
succumbing to ill-discipline and self-destruction. A textbook 
case of the compulsion to repeat. 

Tyson’s life was shaped by absent fathers and father 
surrogates. He was rescued from _ rudderless street 
survivalism by the trainer who ended up adopting him, Cus 
D’Amato; his subsequent fall from grace was precipitated in 
part by D’Amato’s death. The Tyson that emerges in Toback’s 


gripping film is very much like the subject of psychoanalysis, 
a talking head coaxed by the director (in the role of the 
offscreen analyst) into reliving all the triumphs and traumas. 
The film consists only of archive footage and Tyson — a 
ringside commentator on his own life — talking. There are no 
experts, no supposedly neutral judgements, only Tyson trying 
to make sense of the double tragedy of his life. It makes for a 
claustrophobic experience, amped up by the way in which 
Toback occasionally multi-tracks Tyson’s voice and splits the 
screen, creating the impression of a divided man, sometimes 
chillingly self-aware, sometimes a mystery to himself. 

Tyson’s story is sufficiently forgotten now that it is 
capable of thrilling and horrifying us as if for the first time: 
the astonishingly quick rise to world champion, the run of 
viciously efficient victories, the high-profile debacle of his 
marriage to Robin Givens (Tyson sitting stock still on a 
chatshow couch while the actress vilifies him), the rape 
conviction and resulting prison sentence, the conversion to 
Islam, the biting of Evander Holyfield’s ear... Tyson provides a 
newly intimate perspective on these half-remembered 
images. 

Sports stars of this magnitude cannot but be the objects of 
collective fantasy and projection, and even though his is an 
individual story — and we can be under no illusions after 
watching Tyson that there is no lonelier sport than boxing — 
Tyson’s is also the story of a culture and a time. Just compare 
Tyson with Muhammad Ali (whose own myth was examined 
and re-presented in When We Were Kings and Ali). With his 
poetry, physical and verbal, Ali was the boxer for the age of 
Black Power, the Panthers, Malcolm X, Sly Stone and James 


Brown; Tyson’s pitbull brutality, meanwhile, was the fight 
analogue of the every-man-for-himself ethos of Reaganomics 
and the will-to-power pugilism of rap. His slogan was “Refuse 
to Lose” (a phrase that would be central to Public Enemy’s 
epochal Welcome to the Terrordome): the aim was to overcome 
Nemesis by force of will alone, and in his pomp Tyson looked 
like iron will embodied. He came out of his corner like a 
starved attack dog, clubbing opponents into oblivion in a 
matter of moments. Nothing was wasted; there was no 
grandstanding or showboating. 

Partly that was because Tyson felt he had no time to waste 
— for physical as well as existential reasons. He had suffered 
from a respiratory disorder since childhood and knew that he 
would struggle if fights went the full distance. The rapidity 
and intensity of his victories belied the precision of his 
attacks. We learn that it wasn’t a question of sheer physical 
force alone. D’Amato (a “master of anatomy”, according to 
Joyce Carol Oates) taught him where on the body to hit to 
cause maximum damage. In the fight footage, Tyson always 
looks short by comparison with his opponents — “at five feet 
11 inches”, Oates wrote in a 1986 essay, “he is short for a 
heavyweight and strikes the eye as shorter still; his 222 1/4- 


pound body is so sculpted in muscle it looks foreshortened, 


”2 vet he always turned that compactness to 


brutally compact. 
his advantage, making the taller men look like ponderous 
Harryhausen statues. 

Listening to him speak, you’re continually struck by the 
contrast between Tyson the fighting machine and Tyson the 
talker. His voice is a gentle lisp, devoid of swagger, suggestive 


of an unusual sensitivity. It sits just as oddly with Tyson’s 


older face and its Queequeg tattoos as it did with his earlier 
fighting frame. It becomes obvious, though, that the 
hypermuscular body Tyson developed was in part an exo- 
skeleton constructed to protect that sensitive core. 
Remembering the time he first realised that no one would 
ever be able to be beat him up again, Tyson stalls — “Oh, I 
can’t even say it” — pauses for a long moment before saying, 
“Because I would fuckin’ kill ‘em.” The film’s rhythm is 
governed by Tyson’s unstable relationship to language, by his 
switches in and out of articulacy. Sometimes his tongue is as 
quick as his fists once were. His hilarious takedown of Don 
King — a “wretched slimy reptilian motherfucker” — is as 
swift and savage as any of his combinations in the ring. 
Elsewhere, the words elude him, or he evades them. Yet, 
exactly as psychoanalysis taught us to expect, the ellipses, the 
sentences that lead nowhere and the “wrong” choice of word 
tell us even more than the moments of transparent lucidity. 
The unconscious speaks, and James Toback demonstrates an 
extraordinary facility for hearing and recording it. 


“they killed their 


mother”: avatar as 


ideological 


symptom! 


Watching Avatar, I was continually reminded of Zizek’s 
observation in First As Tragedy, Then As Farce, that the one 
good thing that capitalism did was destroy Mother Earth. 
“There’s no green there, they killed their mother”, we are 
solemnly informed at one point. Avatar is in some ways a 
reversal of Cameron’s Aliens. If the “bug-hunt” in Aliens was, 
as Virilio argued, a kind of rehearsal for the mega-machinic 
slaughter of Gulf War I, then Avatar is a heavy-handed eco- 
sermon and parable about US misadventures in Iraq and 
Afghanistan. (What’s remarkable about Avatar is how dated it 
looks. In the scenes of military engagement, it is as if Eighties 
cyberpunk confronts something out of Roger Dean or the 


Myst videogames; Cameron’s vision of military technology has 
not moved on since Aliens.) At the end of the film, it is the 
human corporate and military interests who are described as 
“aliens”. But this is a film without any trace of the alien. Like 
most CGI extravaganzas, it flares on the retina but leaves few 
traces in the memory. Greg Egan finds little to admire in 
Avatar, but he does defer to its technical achievements: 
“mostly, the accomplishments of the visual designers and the 
army of technicians who’ve brought their conception to the 
screen appear pixel-perfect, and hit the spot where the brain 
says ‘yes, this is real’.”* The cost of this, though, is that it is 
very difficult to be immersed in the film as fiction. It is more 
akin to a theme-park ride, a late-capitalist “experience”, than 
a film. 

What we have in Avatar is another instance of corporate 
anti-capitalism such as I discussed in Capitalist Realism in 
relation to Wall-E. Cameron has always been a proponent of 
Hollywood anti-capitalism: stupid corporate interests were 
the villains in Aliens and Terminator 2 as they are in Avatar. 
Avatar is Le Guin-lite, a degraded version of the scenario that 
Le Guin developed in novels such as The Word For World Is 
Forest, The Dispossessed and City Of Illusions, but stripped of all 
Le Guin’s ambivalence and intelligence. What is foreclosed in 
the opposition between a predatory technologised capitalism 
and a primitive organicism, evidently, is the possibility of a 
modern, technologised anti-capitalism. It is in presenting this 
pseudoopposition that Avatar functions as an ideological 
symptom. 

No primitivist cliché is left untouched in Cameron’s 
depiction of the Na’vi people and their world, Pandora. These 


elegant blue-skinned noble savages are at one with their 
beautiful world; they are Deleuzean Spinozists who recognise 
that a vital flow pervades everything; they respect natural 
balance; they are adept hunters, but, after they kill their prey 
they thank its “brother spirit”; the trees whisper with the 
voices of their revered ancestors. (Quite why skirmishes with 
the Na’vi and their bows and arrows should have prompted 
Steven Lang’s grizzled colonel into Apocalypse Now-like 
disquisitions on how Pandora made for his worst experience 
in war, is unclear.) “There’s nothing we have that they want”, 
concludes Sam Worthington’s Jake Sully of the Na’vi. Yet the 
Na’vi_ predictably seduce Sully, who quickly “forgets 
everything” about his former life on Earth (about which we 
learn almost nothing, beyond the fact that he is a marine who 
got injured in the course of battle) and embraces the 
wholeness of the Na’vi way of life. Sully attains wholeness 
through his avatar Na’vi body in a double sense: first, because 
the avatar is able-bodied, and, secondly, because the Na’vi are 
intrinsically more “whole” than the (self-)destructive 
humans. Sully, the marine who is “really” a tree-hugging 
primitive, is a paradigm of that late-capitalist subjectivity 
which disavows its modernity. There’s something 
wonderfully ironic about the fact that Sully’s — and our — 
identification with the Na’vi depends upon the very advanced 
technology that the Na’vi’s way of life makes impossible. 

But a telling tic in the film is the repeated compulsion to 
explain the persistence of (physical) wounds among the 
human characters. Given the level of technology in the film’s 
2051, both Sully’s useless legs and the colonel’s scars could 
easily have been repaired, and the script goes out of its way 


to say why the two characters they remain disabled and 
maimed respectively: in Sully’s case, it’s because he can’t 
afford the medical treatment; in the colonel’s, it’s because he 
“likes to be reminded of what he’s up against”. Such 
explanations are clearly unconvincing — the narratively 
underdetermined wounds can only be explained as libidinal 
residue which the film cannot fully digest into its digital 
Imaginary. The wounds prevent the disavowal of modern 
subjectivity and technology which Avatar attempts at the very 
same moment that the film invites us to admire it as a 
technological spectacle. 

If we are to escape from the impasses of capitalist realism, 
if we are to come up with an authentic and genuinely 
sustainable model of green politics (where the sustainability 
is a matter of libido, not only of natural resources), we have 
to overcome these disavowals. There is no way back from the 
matricide which was the precondition for the emergence of 
modern subjectivity. To quote one of my favourite passages in 
Zizek’s First As Tragedy: “Fidelity to the communist Idea 
means that, to repeat, Arthur Rimbaud, [...] we should remain 
absolutely modern and reject the all too glib generalisation 
whereby the critique of capitalism morphs into the critique of 
‘modern instrumental reason’ or ‘modern technological 


civilisation’.”* The issue is, rather, how modern technological 
civilisation can be organised in a different way. 


precarity and 


paternalism! 


The recent discussion of elitism (a topic also broached by 
Adam Curtis’ film on Charlie Brooker’s Newswipe this week) 
brings me back to the question of what — in the continuing 
lack of any alternative term — I must still refer to as 
“paternalism”. I think Taylor Parkes got to what is at stake in 
these discussions in his rather moving Quietus piece about 
Trunk’s Life On Earth release: 


Hard to credit now, but there was once something 
paternalistic, almost philanthropic about the Beeb, 
spreading the cultural wealth of the educated classes 
through housing estates and comprehensive schools. 
This kind of evangelism rarely sits well with self- 
conscious champions of the lumpenproletariat, whose 
right to live in shit, they believe, outweighs their right 
to not live in shit — for some, being patronised is worse 
than being brutalised. But then people can be very 
naive about the motivations of those who give the 


people what they want, relentlessly and remorselessly. 
And while the Corporation was sometimes guilty of 
gross assumptions and a very real stuffiness, I don’t like 
to think how I might have grown up — stomping 
around in the middle of nowhere — had it not been for 
Life On Earth, or Carl Sagan’s Cosmos, or James Burke’s 
Connections, or the gentle guidance of the BBC 
Children’s department. Years ago, I interviewed the 
men in charge of “youth programming” at Channel 4, 
goateed and bereted and utterly insistent that their 
race to the bottom was a noble crusade; they railed 
against the BBC’s “eat-your-greens” approach, and 
spoke of gallons of liquid effluent, coursing through the 
pipes of British culture, in terms of freedom and some 
strange colour of egalitarianism. Here was the future, 
banging its drums, and even then it made me blanch. As 
controller of BBC2 in the late 1960s, David 
Attenborough had a different vision, rooted in what 
was, for all his personal privilege, an (enduring) belief 
in inclusivity. If the so-called Golden Age of Television 
could boast its fair share of shoddy, overlit crap — and 
my God, it could — at best it was truly empowering, and 
its passing has screwed us all to some extent. We can 
still choose to watch BBC Four, I suppose (assuming it’s 
not another show where ex-NME writers smirk at Mud’s 
trousers), but then this is an age of choices, few of 
which have much to do with freedom in the long term. 
No one’s going to stumble onto culture any more, not 


like I did, or my dragged-up mates did. It’s worse than a 


shame. 


It’s worth reminding ourselves of the peculiar logic that 
neoliberalism has successfully imposed. Treating people as if 
they were intelligent is, we have been led to believe, “elitist”, 
whereas treating them as if they are stupid is “democratic”. It 
should go without saying that the assault on cultural elitism 
has gone alongside the aggressive restoration of a material 
elite. Parkes touches here on the right way to think about 
paternalism — not (just) as something prescriptive, but in 
terms of the gift and the surprise. The best gifts are those we 
wouldn’t have chosen for ourselves — not because we would 
have overlooked or rejected them, but because we simply 
wouldn’t have thought of them. Neoliberal “choice” traps you 
in yourself, allowing you to select amongst minimally 
different versions of what you have already chosen; 
paternalism wagers on a different “you”, a you that does not 
yet exist. (All of which resonates with J.J. Charlesworth’s 
illuminating piece on the management of the ICA in Mute, 
with its attack on the assumption that “what the audience 


wants is merely what the institution should do”.’) 
Neoliberalism may have been sustained by a myth of 
entrepreneurialism, a myth that the folk economics of 
programmes like The Apprentice and Dragon’s Den have played 
their part in propagating, but the kind of “entrepreneurs” 
that dominate our culture — whether they be Bill Gates, 
Simon Cowell or Duncan Bannatyne — have not invented new 
products or forms, they have just invented new ways of 
making money. Good for them, no doubt, but hardly 
something that the rest of us should be grateful for. (The 
genius of Cowell was to have plugged a very old cultural form 
into new machineries of interpassivity.) And for all the 


bluster about entrepreneurialism, it is remarkable how risk- 
averse late capitalism’s culture is — there has never been a 
culture more homogenous and standardised, more repetitive 
and fear-driven. 

I was struck by the contrast between Parkes’ piece and an 
article by that Caitlin Moran wrote in the wake of the 
announcement that Jonathan Ross is to leave the BBC. “After 
[Ross’] £18 million contract”, Moran wrote, 


endless fretting pieces were written, asking whether 
the BBC should ever try to compete with ITV1’s salaries. 
The real question, however, is “what would happen to 
the BBC if it didn’t?” If the only people who work for 
the BBC are those in it for the sheer love of it and — 
those who would piously turn down double the wages 
from ITV— the BBC would rapidly become the middle- 
class liberal pinko panty-waist institution of the Daily 
Mail’s nightmares, and, I suspect, fold within five years. 


Really? ITV’s high salaries, when they could afford to pay 
them, were hardly guarantees of quality; and the idea that 
Ross is one of us because he was “quick, edgy, silly nerd- 
dandy, into Japanese anime and rackety new guitar bands” 
presupposes a model of the “alternative” as shopworn and 
discredited as New Labour. Note that Moran fully accepts the 
neoliberal logic whereby “talent” is only motivated by 
money. (The return of the concept of “talent”, with all its de- 
punking implications, was perhaps the most telling cultural 
symptom of the last decade; while the application of the word 
to bankers was its sickest joke.) 


As Moran suggests, the BBC’s real rival now, evidently, is 
not the ailing ITV but the Daily Mail and News International, 
and if public service broadcasting is to defend itself against 
an assault that will only increase in ferocity, it will need 
rather more than Ross’ sexual suggestiveness, warmed over 
hipness and occasional wit at its disposal. (It’s far harder for 
the Mail to attack the likes of Attenborough than 
triviamongers such as Ross or Graham Norton; and did 
Attenborough ever get the equivalent of Ross’ eighteen 
million, I wonder?) It’s not only unjustifiable that public 
money be spent on exorbitant salaries for presenters and 
executives: it also plays into the Mail’s agenda, which is all 
about maintaining the negative solidarity which has been 


crucial to neoliberal hegemony.* Call me old fashioned, but I 
firmly believe that only those who would work for the BBC for 
the sheer love of it should be in the job. More than that, being 
motivated by money ought to be a reason for people not 
getting senior public service appointments. This is not, 
grotesquely, an argument for low wages — but it is an 
argument for the more equitable — and creative — 
redistribution of money in the public sphere. Imagine if Ross’ 
eighteen million were instead spent — risked — on what 
British television most sorely lacks, writers. You could pay 
scores of writers a good wage for years... The BBC ought to be 
in a position to cushion its creative staff from the pressures of 
producing immediate success — and, contrary to the 
neoliberal logic which insists that people are best motivated 
by fear and money, it is that cushioning which facilitates a 
certain kind of cultural entrepreneurialism. 

After all, people will do worthwhile things if they are not 


paid or if they are paid poorly. The interesting side of Web 2.0 
is just this — not the vacuous “debates”, but the impulse to 
share that is a significant part of the motivation for writing 
blogs, uploading material to YouTube and _ updating 
Wikipedia. If anything is the work of the multitude, it’s 
something like the salvagepunk archive that is YouTube. It’s 
intriguing that capitalist realism co-exists with the 
emergence of new forms of culture which can be 
commodified only very incompletely. At one level, 
commodification is total, and, in Jeremy Rifkin’s phrase, all of 
life is a paid-for experience; yet there are whole areas of 
culture which are effectively being decommodified (does 
anyone seriously think that any recorded music will be paid 
for at all in a decade?). As a cultural worker, this is something 
I am ambivalent about, to say the least [...] I seem to achieve 
success in things at the very moment that it’s not longer 
possible to make money from them... 

When I was in Dublin a week or so ago talking about 
Capitalist Realism, a member of the audience asked why I was 
talking about public service workers when my own situation 
has shown that it’s better to leave fulltime employment and 
enter the precariat. This is a reasonable question on the face 
of it, since I’ve done pretty well since being made redundant 
from my FE teaching job. Yet in some respects all that has 
happened is that I’ve swapped the NuBureaucratic stress of 
public service employment for the perpetual anxiety of 
hyper-precarity, and had my income massively cut in the 
process. One of the ways in which negative solidarity plays 
out is by exploiting the opposition between permanent 
employees and precarious workers. Permanent employees 


tend to be quietist to keep (what they think of as) their job 
security, whereas precarious workers, being expendable, have 
no power at all. A while back, Tobias van Veen gave a very 
powerful account of his own experiences of precarious 
labour: 


there is an ironic yet devastating demand being placed 
on the labourer: while work never ends (as one is never 
out of touch, and always expected to be available, with 
no claims to a private life or other demands), you as a 
worker are nonetheless completely expendable (and 
thus a member of the precariat: and so one must 
sacrifice all autonomy from work so as to keep one’s 
job). [...] This contemporary condition of on-call 
ontology or on-demand dasein produces an emotional 
economy of stress. To live under such instant-demand 
duress is stress-inducing indeed. Life becomes a series 
of panic attacks in the face of never being able to live 
up to such workplace demands without completely 
dismantling “life” itself as distinct from “work”. The 
managerial class uses techniques of guilt/loyalty to 
enforce workers to labour at a moment’s notice, 
scheduling with less than a few hours or days time, 
without hope of a raise, without benefits or reward, and 


all for a minimum wage.” 


The precarious worker is doubly punished: not only do 
they have no job security, they also get paid less than the 
permanent employees for doing the same work. When I 
switched from being an hourly paid lecturer in Further 


Education to having a permanent contract, I was doing 
exactly the same work, but suddenly I was both paid 
hundreds of pounds more a month and got paid for holidays 
too. Back in the precariat, my total income since the tax year 
that began in April — for all the teaching, supervision, 
writing and editing I’ve done, when I doubt there’s been more 
than two weeks that I’ve worked less than fifty hours — is the 
princely sum of eleven grand, which works out at 
significantly less than minimum wage. All the work I’ve done 
depends upon my not being in full-time work, so, no matter 
that my hourly rate for some work seems quite high, in effect 
I’m always working for minimum wage. (Much writing only 
pays minimum wage anyway.) All this, in conditions where 
it’s impossible to turn down any commission, no matter how 
short notice it is given to me, where I’m on-demand at 
practically all times and there are no guarantees that I will 
keep getting the work. The kind of hustling I’m required to do 
involves a kind of “creativity”, I suppose, but “getting 
creative” about how I can monetise my activities doesn’t 
seem like the best conceivable use of my time. What the 
broken, piecemeal time of precarity precludes is engagement 
in long-form projects. It’s very hard for me to devote any 
time to finishing my next book for Zer0 because I will always 
privilege any work that pays immediately. But full-time 
employment also precludes the engagement in long-form 
projects: Capitalist Realism, for instance, was written after 
work or at weekends. 

I say all this not because I want sympathy — I still think 
I’m incredibly fortunate to be making any sort of living out of 
what I do — but more because my situation is symptomatic. 


And now that the high-rolling, business ontology-driven 
model of cultural provision is finished, surely there’s a better 
way to fund cultural work? 


return of the gift: 


richard kelly’s the 


box! 


I wouldn’t say that Richard Kelly’s The Box is a hauntological 
film, but it shares certain affinities with the way someone like 
Ghost Box re-dream the Weird. The Box is based on a short story 
by Richard Matheson, who occupies something like the same 
position in the American Weird that Ghost Box’s touchstone, 
Nigel Kneale, does in the UK Weird. Both Kneale and 
Matheson operated in an interstitial generic space — between 
SF and horror — proper to the Weird, in a pulp infrastructure 
— paperbacks, television, B cinema — that has now largely 
disappeared. Matheson has yet to quite acquire the auteur 
status that Kneale enjoyed, but this only adds to his pulp- 
anonymous artisan allure; there’s a special kind of delight in 
realising that films you’d likely as not first encountered, 
apparently randomly, on late night TV — The Incredible 
Shrinking Man, The Omega Man, Duel (as recently discussed by 


Graham’) — were in fact written by the same individual. 
(Matheson also wrote the screenplay for what — leaving aside 
the Kneale-scripted Quatermass and the Pit — is perhaps 
Hammer’s greatest film, The Devil Rides Out.) 

Much like Jacob’s Ladder, which it resembles in a number 
of respects, The Box is a Weird take on the 1970s. Or rather, it 
draws together a number of Weird threads that were already 
present in the Seventies. Like Jacob’s Ladder and much 
hauntological music, The Box captures a certain grain of the 
Seventies. The Box feels like a re-dreaming of the Weird rather 
than a revival in part because of the very incoherence that 
some have complained about. This “incoherence” is of a 
particular type; it isn’t simply a failure of coherence so much 
as the generation of an oneiric (in)consistency which doesn’t 
add up (into a final resolution) but which doesn’t fragment 
into nonsense either. 

The dream atmosphere is reinforced by the way that Kelly 
incorporates aspects of his own life into the film — the 
characters of Arthur and Norma Lewis are apparently based 


closely on his own parents? — into the diegesis. But rather 
than the de-stranging tendencies at work in something like 
the new Dr Who — the Weird subordinated to familialism and 
emotionalism — The Box goes in the other direction, 
introducing the Weird into the family home — in parallel with 
how television used to do the same thing. The lines between 
Kelly’s home life and the Weird must have been soft in any 
case: his father worked at NASA at the time when the Viking 
probes were landing on Mars. 

The Box is based on Matheson’s 1970 short story, “Button 
Button”, later adapted into an episode of the revived Twilight 


Zone in 1986. To be more accurate, The Box uses both the 
original story and The Twilight Zone episode as elements in a 
simulated dreamwork which simultaneously extrapolates 
from the two versions and condenses them into an unstable 
compound. The result is a labyrinthine structure which bears 
some relation to Lynch’s Inland Empire (Inland Empire, 
incidentally, was the last film to creep me out as much as The 
Box did). The Box is defined by the tension between the 
structure of the labyrinth — an absolute labyrinth, leading 
nowhere except deeper into itself — and the structure of the 
dilemma — in which reality seems to resolve into a set of 
disjunctions. 

It’s possible to delimit a number of distinct but connected 
levels at which the film operates. 


The Ethical 


The most simple level on which the film works — the film’s 
entry level — is that of the ethical. All three versions of 
“Button, Button” turn on a dilemma: not so much an ethical 
dilemma as a dilemma about whether to set aside the ethical 
altogether. A well-dressed stranger, Mr Steward, arrives and 
presents the Lewises with a box with a button on top of it. If 
they press the button, Steward informs them, they will 
receive a large sum of money (in The Box it is a million 
dollars); however, someone that they don’t know will die. In 
all three versions, it the wife who decides to push the button. 
Here, the versions diverge: in Matheson’s original story, after 
Norma pushes the button, she receives the money as 
insurance compensation for the death of her husband. When 


she complains that Steward had told her that the person who 
died would be someone she didn’t know, Steward asks: “Did 
you really know your husband?” In The Twilight Zone version 
— which Matheson reputedly hated — the ending is different. 
Here, when Steward has handed over the money, he pointedly 
says to the couple, “I can assure you it will be offered to 
someone whom you don’t know.” The Box adopts this version 
of the story, but this is only the beginning of the film, the 
first act, as it were. 


Unintended Consequences 


“Button, Button” is clearly an update of W.W. Jacobs’ story 
“The Monkey’s Paw” — in which a family wishes for a sum of 
money, only to receive it in compensation for the death of 
their son. Jacobs’ story was itself a play on older tales about 
the unintended consequences of wish fulfilment. As Wiener 
observed in God and Golem, Inc.: A Comment On Certain Points 
Where Cybernetics Impinges On Religion, such unintended 
consequences arise because “the operation of magic is 
singularly literal-minded [in that] if it grants you anything at 
all, it grants you exactly what you ask for, not what you 
should have asked for or what you intend.” “The magic of 
automatisation, and in particular the kind of automatisation 
where the devices learn”, he adds, “may be expected to be 


similarly literal-minded”.* Like the cybernetic machine, the 
wish-fulfilling object (the monkey’s paw) delivers exactly 
what it says it will: but what it gives you may not be what you 
want (or what you think you want). 

What Matheson’s tale adds to Jacobs’ story is the question 


of knowledge. Matheson’s story brings into play the old 
philosophical “problem of other minds”, now applied to the 
marital situation: even those closest to us are ultimately 
opaque, black boxes into which we can never see. Naturally, 
this also raises the equally ancient problem of self- 
knowledge, but given a psychoanalytic edge. We are alien to 
ourselves; our real desires may be unknown to us, emerging 
only in parapraxes and dreams. Here the oneiric form of The 
Box collapses into its content — the box, like the dream 
according to Freud, fulfils our wishes. The inevitable 
psychoanalytic conjecture into which Matheson’s story 
tempts us is the thought that perhaps the wife does get 
exactly what she wants — that the death of her husband was 
her wish all along. In this sense the box would be like the 
Room in Tarkovsky’s Stalker: the stalker Porcupine goes into 
the wish-fulfilling Room hoping for the return of his dead 
brother, but receives instead immense riches. In its very 
unreflective automatism — giving Porcupine exactly what he 
wants — the Room judges and condemns him. 


The Political 


What Matheson’s story also adds to “The Monkey’s Paw”, of 
course, is the fact that the bad consequences are not simply 
unintended; they were just supposed to happen to someone 
else. This is what makes it so much nastier than Jacobs’ tale. 
Whereas the family in “The Monkey’s Paw” are guilty only of 
foolishness and greed, the couple in “Button, Button” 
knowingly trade another’s death in exchange for wealth. In 
The Box this is especially shocking because both Norma and 


Arthur Lewis seem to be “good” people — Cameron Diaz’s 
Norma in particular is immensely sympathetic. Perhaps what 
allows her to press the button is the unresolved ontological 
status of the box itself; the thought that it might be a prank 
(Arthur establishes that the box is empty) allows Norma to 
perform a kind of fetishist disavowal (“this might not be real, 
so I might as well do it”). As Hauntagonist put it on his 
Twitter feed: “the button in The Box is a nice example of how 
interactivity creates anxiety and fetishistic disavowal. Diaz 
doesn’t believe but she believes ‘the subject supposed to 
believe’ does, Arlington Steward being the stand-in for the 
Big Other.” 

Here we are back in the realm of the ethical — but the 
ethical bleeds out into the political. The choice to press the 
button has a special force in the era of globalisation and 
climate change. We know that our wealth and comfort are 
achieved at the price of others’ suffering and exploitation, 
that our smallest actions contribute to ecological catastrophe, 
but the causal chains connecting our actions with their 
consequences are so complicated as to be unmappable — they 
lie far beyond not only our experience, and any possible 
experience. (Hence the inadequacy of folk politics.) What the 
Lewises are in effect asked to do is affirm their plugging into 
this causal matrix — to formally accept the world and 
worldliness. The significance of this is that only the negative 
choice counts — to not press the button would be to choose a 
freedom that is not available to anyone at present (we are all 
so intricately embedded into the global capitalist matrix that 
it isn’t possible to simply opt out). But to press the button is 
to give up on freedom, to choose blind determinism. 


The Existentialist 


Which brings us to the most explicit intertext that Kelly 
introduces into The Box: Sartre’s Huis Clos. Huis Clos is 
everwhere in The Box; Norma, a highschool teacher, is 
teaching it; she and Arthur attend an amateur dramatic 
performance of the play. At the point when it is becoming 
evident that the Lewises’ choice will not be some private 
shame but will infect and destroy every aspect of their lives, 
the couple find the words “No Exit” written in the 
condensation of their car’s windscreen. 

The resonance of Huis Clos is clear: this is a text about 
those who can no longer choose, who have ceased to be 
subjects. Fearing that they will be killed, the Lewises try to 
return the briefcase of money immediately, the very instant 
that Steward tells them that he will be sure to give the box to 
someone who doesn’t know them. But the horror is that 
Norma and Arthur have made a choice that means that it is 
now too late: they are already (as if) dead. There is no 
returning the gift. 

It is astonishing that the briefcase containing the money 
is immediately desublimated. Kelly could have had the 
Lewises spend the money, their enjoyment shadowed by their 
anxieties about what they had done... Instead, the briefcase is 
immediately dumped in their basement, never to be seen or 
— I think — mentioned again. 

There is no possibility of returning the money — no way 
of taking back the choice to press the button — but there is no 
end to choosing either. Locked in an endlessly ramifying 
labyrinth, Arthur and Norma keep encountering further 


dilemmas — but the choice is now between bad (purgatory) 
and worse (hell); or else, as when Arthur is offered a choice of 
three gateways, two leading to eternal damnation, one to 
salvation, they have a quality of grotesque gameshow 
randomness. 


The Religious 


The mention of “salvation” is part of a persistent religious 
thread in the film. As the alien big Other, the one conducting 
“research” into the moral worth of human beings and judging 
them accordingly, and with the power of damnation and 
redemption in his hands, Steward clearly stands in for God. 
Yet he is a God who also performs the Satanic function of 
tempting humans. 


The SF/Conspiracy 


Steward’s position as the (extra-terrestrial) big Other, the 
subject supposed to know, also somewhat echoes Sartre’s 
discussion of the alien, as outlined by Infinite Thought: 


Sartre, towards the end of his gigantic unfinished 
Critique of Dialectical Reason from 1960, suddenly 
launches into a discussion of Martians. “For [the] 
Martian...who has long known the technique of inter- 
planetary navigation, we are... an animal species whose 
scientific and intellectual development have been 
retarded by certain circumstances [the Martian] will 
note that the inhabitants of this underdeveloped planet 
have certain behavioural patterns orientated towards 


certain objectives...” Because the hypothetical Martian 
will be at a particular scientific level (the assumption 
here is that it will be a much higher one), when the 
extent of human knowledge is revealed to the alien, 
there enters into the conceptual arena an exterior 
agent who for the first time knows what we do not 
know as a species — the Martian thus serves as the big 
Other for the entire collective enumeration of human 
beings. This limit case of the big Other Martian 
becomes, as Sartre puts it “a deep opacity, shadows in 


our understanding, a negation of interiority in our 
95 


hearts. 

The Box is thick with references to conspiracy films (and 
includes some of the most creepily paranoid scenes since the 
remake of Invasion of the Body Snatchers). The full extent of the 
collusion of the authorities with Steward remains unclear 
even at the end of the film. The threads connecting NASA, the 
Viking probe and Steward’s research project fray off into 
rumour and supposition. The labyrinth never ends. 


contributing to 


society! 


In respect of The Fairy Jobmother, it’s worth noting how much 
more pernicious it was than Benefit Busters, the original 
programme from which it was a spin-off. Despite its title, 
Benefit Busters allowed viewers to come to a critical judgement 
about the initiatives the government were using to “get 
people back to work”. The first part of the programme, the 
one featuring Hayley Taylor, was like some grim parody of a 
reality TV talent show, in which the glittering prize on offer 
was not a million-pound record deal but an unpaid work trial 
at discount store Poundland. Taylor was clearly a dupe of the 
ideology rather than its cynical author, credulously believing 
all the New Age pyschobabble she pushed along with the 
facile advice (“brush your teeth before an interview”). 
There’s no doubt that some of the women were happier after 
being on the six-week “course” — but that was less because 
they were working for Poundland and more because they 
were not isolated in their own homes any more. Meanwhile, 
the programme showed us the home belonging to Emma 


Harrison, the boss of A4E,* the consultancy for which Taylor 
worked. To say that Harrison’s house was a mansion would be 


a massive understatement.*> A4E employees such as Taylor 
were invited to Harrison’s house for “a cup of tea and a chat”, 
because Harrison is so informal and she just loves get feedback 
from her workers. Faced with the extreme opulence of 
Harrison’s house, viewers were at least invited to question 
who the real parasites scrounging off the state were. The 
excellent WatchingA4E blogspot does invaluable work 


exposing the realities of A4E’s schemes.* This entry quotes a 
description of Harrison: “Emma’s approach is to work with 
people: ‘I walk by their side, hold their hand and we go on a 


journey resulting in them getting a job that transforms their 


lives’.”” 


Subsequent parts of Benefit Busters allowed viewers to 
form even more negative views of the government’s schemes 
to get people back to work — we saw the long-term 
unemployed cynically forced off benefits for a job that would 
last only a few days, and a poor young lad with severe back 
problems sustained after falling out of a window being told 
that he was fit for work. There was none of this critical 
perspective in The Fairy Jobmother, which presented the 
reality TV “journey” back to work without any irony. As 
Digital Ben puts it: 


The show’s very title gives us an idea of what kind of 
strictly limited conclusions will be drawn at the end. 
Taylor’s steps did improve the family’s situation, but it 
was made clear that these “fairy godmother wishes” 
were miraculous and unexpected, a break from the 


normal order of things. The idea that they be 
distributed on a wider basis, or even structuralised as 
part of the benefits system, is never on the table. The 
majority of the working class unemployed are expected 
to pull themselves up by their bootstraps — become 
mini-Hayleys and fully valid humans without any 
outside help. So what exactly was the moral of the 
show? That finding work is easier when you have a 
well-known, well-connected recruitment specialist in 
your corner? Shocking. And even then — if Taylor fails 
to find work for the family next week, we can expect 
blame to be diverted to them. There is no systemic 
analysis. Blame falls solely upon the individuals (and, 


yes, their families).° 


One can hardly underestimate the role that reality TV 
plays in generating this lottery thinking, which is the other 
side of what Alex Williams calls negative solidarity. The 
persistent message is that any situation can be rectified by 
the application of dedicated self-improvement. (C4 is to be 
given some credit for showing some programmes which resist 
this agenda: its series The Hospital and Our Drug War show the 
real hopelessness of the NHS and the war on drugs. The 
Hospital gives a grim picture of youth in the UK. Class was the 
unspoken factor here: there weren’t any middle-class kids 
being filmed arriving in hospital pregnant, or catching HIV, 
or getting involved in knife crime. In the first part, about the 
impact of unprotected sex, anti-authoritarian defiance came 
out as self-destructive bad faith: “they can’t tell me what to 
do”, “I’m the sort of person who has to do this”. There was a 


desperate joylessness about the mandatory pleasure-seeking; 
another side to the hedonic depression I talk about in 
Capitalist Realism.) 

One of the things that irritated me in the last part of Fairy 
Jobmother was the moment when Taylor talked about 
someone getting back to work so they could “make a 
contribution to society” again. (My mentioning this on 


Twitter sparked a brief exchange with this character,’ who 
said “you can do what you please but not with my cash. You 
don’t want to work that’s fine — just don’t expect me to 
pay”.) As if there are no other ways to “make a contribution 
to society” than paid work (what is the Big Society if not 
about the value of such unpaid contributions?); as if those in 
work didn’t depend, in numerous ways, on those not being 
paid for work... 

Like many people I know, I spent my twenties drifting 
between postgraduate courses and unemployment, 
encountering many pointless and demoralising “helping you 
back to work” initiatives along the way. There wasn’t much 
difference between what I did on an average day when I was a 
student and what I did when I was unemployed, and there 
isn’t a great deal of difference between what I was doing then 
and what I do now. But now I’m fairly confident that I “make 
a contribution”; then I wasn’t. For a number of reasons, 
during my twenties I believed then that I was unemployable 
— too feckless to do either manual work or retail, and 
nowhere near confident enough to do a graduate job of any 
kind. (The ads for graduate jobs would fill me with despair: 
surely only a superhuman could do the job as described?) I 
won’t deny that eventually getting employment was 


important — I owe so much of what I am now to getting a 
teaching job. But equally important was the demystification of 
work that gaining this employment allowed — “work” wasn’t 
something only available to people who belonged to a 
different ontological category to me. (Even so, this feeling 
wasn’t rectified by having a job: I had a number of depressive 
episodes when I was convinced that I wasn’t the sort of person 
who could be a teacher.) 

But surely the importance of Virno and Negri’s work is to 
have undermined the distinction between work and non- 
work anyway. What precisely counts as non-work in post- 
Fordism? If, to use Jonathan Beller’s phrase, “to look is to 
labour” — if, that is to say, attention is a commodity — then 
aren’t we all “contributing”, whether we like it or not? As 
Nina Power argues, “[i]t is as if employers have taken the 
very worst aspects of women’s work in the past — poorly 
paid, precarious, without benefits — and applied it to almost 
everyone, except those at the very top, who remain 
overwhelmingly male and incomprehensibly rich.” In these 
conditions — in which unemployment/ 
underemployment/perpetual insecurity are structurally 
necessary, not contingent accidents — there’s more case than 
ever for a benefits safety net. 

At this point, I must plug Ivor Southwood’s forthcoming 
book, Non-Stop Inertia. It’s about the miseries of “jobseeking”, 
and it’s one of my favourite Zer0 books to date, combining 
poignant and funny observations derived from experience 
with theoretical acuity. The book is sure to be of interest to 
most people who enjoyed Capitalist Realism (indeed, Ivor 
writes about whole dimensions of capitalist realism which I 


didn’t touch upon). Here are a couple of paragraphs: 


The endless unpaid duties assigned to the virtuoso 
jobseeker cast him as the postmodernised inversion of 
the 1980s “gizza job” persona, which confronted the 
employer directly with the physical reality of the 
reserve laborer and his family. Now, rather than 
proclaiming his jobless status the career jobseeker 
hides it, like something obscene, behind a screen of 
training courses and voluntary work and expressions of 
rictus positivity, and he becomes ever more complicit 
with this concealment in proportion to his desperation. 
The jobseeker must have an alibi ready to explain away 
every gap in his employment history, while the most 
mundane experience becomes the occasion of a 
personal epiphany — “working in a busy café really 
taught me something about the importance of customer 
service”. Skills are valued over knowledge. Non- 
vocational qualifications are almost a liability, unless 
they are emptied of content; a degree in literature is 
valued not for its evidence of critical thought but 
because it shows that the applicant has word processing 
experience. 


What are we not thinking about during all those 
hours of jobseeking, networking and CV-building? What 
interests, worries and fantasies might we otherwise 
have? What books might we read (other than self-help 
manuals), what conversations might we have with 
colleagues and friends about topics other than work? 
How differently might we perceive our current jobs 


without this constant needling insecurity? What kind of 
dangerous spaces might open up, in what kind of 
jeopardy might we put ourselves and this dynamic 


system, if we resigned from our jobs as jobseekers?® 


“just relax and 
enjoy it”: 
geworfenheit on the 


bbc! 


I first saw Artemis 81 when it was broadcast for the first and 
only time in December 1981. Even though it struck me then as 
incoherent and incomprehensible, I willingly sat through all 
three hours of it. Judging by the internet responses to Artemis 
81, my experience was a common one amongst kids who, like 
me, were allowed to stay up late and watch it because it was 
broadcast during the school holidays. 

I suppose that Artemis 81 was one of the things that I was 
thinking of when, towards the end of Capitalist Realism, | 
argued that, far from being dreary and dull, the so-called 
paternalist era of media could be a breeding ground for the 
Weird (Ghost Box’s conflation of secondary school textbooks 


with Weird fiction is based on the same intuition). 

Artemis 81 was written by David Rudkin, the author of the 
betterknown Penda’s Fen (to which Ill be returning in another 
post very soon). Watching it again after nearly thirty years, 
the film doesn’t seem incomprehensible at all. It is structured 
around a simple Manichean dichotomy (Manicheanism was 
one of the heavily signposted themes of Penda’s Fen), and a 
mythic journey out of complacency and selfinvolvement and 
into a kind of visionary faith. (The persistent emphasis in 
Artemis 81 on the “leap into faith” makes for an interesting 
parallel with Inception: at one point, the lead character tells a 
woman who has been strung up inside a cathedral bell that “it 
is better to fall than to hang”.) What makes Artemis 81 still 
alienating to watch are all the things that it lacks — all those 
strategies for producing audience identification to which we 
are now so accustomed. The acting style is as Brechtian as 
anything you would see in a Straub-Huillet film; the dialogue 
is anti-naturalistic, highly mannered (it reminds me more of 
an opera than television writing — and Wagner is one of 
many intertexts). 

Rudkin says on the DVD commentary that the alien planet 
which we appear to see at the start of the film belongs to 
inner space. It is never clear when we exit inner space. But the 
film gains a great deal of power from grounding this inner 
space in what you might call found locations: the ferry 
terminal at Harwich; a power station in North Wales, which 
during the time of filming was under construction, and which 
becomes the entry to hell; and perhaps most memorably of 
all, the interior of the Anglican cathedral in Liverpool, which 
the BBC crew were not only given permission to use — they 


were also allowed to clear out all the pews, making for some 
astonishing oneiric images. 

One sequence in particular stands above all the others. It 
is both one of the most disturbingly effective dream — or 
nightmare — sequences I’ve ever seen in film (certainly it is 
far better capturing dream topographies than anything in 
Inception), and also a deeply resonant image of dystopia. The 
lead character, pulp novelist Gideon Harlax (Hywell Bennett) 
suddenly finds himself in an unidentified city: he is on a tram, 
surrounded by consumptives expectorating blood into their 
scarves. It is foggy; the city is militarised, although there is a 
great deal of street market-like commercial activity. No one 
speaks English. When he enquires after Helith, the guardian 
angel who has abandoned him (played by Sting — but don’t 
let that put you off), people laugh or admonish him. A public 
address system incessantly streams out announcements in 
what sounds like an East European language (it is actually 
Estonian spoken backwards). Watched now, you can’t help 
but see anticipations of Blade Runner and Children of Men here. 
On the commentary, Rudkin says that this section of the film 
was supposed to illustrate Heidegger’s concept of 
Geworfenheit, or throwness. Rudkin reveals that on-set, they 
used to refer to this city — actually a composite of 
Birmingham and Liverpool — as Geworfenheit, but this is never 
mentioned in the film itself. Beyond all the explicit references 
to myth, music and literature, there were further, occulted, 
layers of intertext. Another example, from this write-up on 
Artemis 81: 


One minor point that reveals much about [...] Rudkin’s 


approach: the presiding deity of the piece is a 
Scandinavian goddess known as Magog. But it takes an 
alert eye to spot the “Gog Magog Hills” in a map of 
Britain which we glimpse on the protagonist’s desk a 
lesser dramatist would perhaps have included a lengthy 
detour around the rather different “Magog” to be found 


in English mythology.” 


It was Artemis 81’s confidence that you can subject the 
audience to Geworfenheit that makes it so impressive. As all the 
kids who watched Artemis 81 and who have never forgotten it 
will attest, there’s an enjoyment to be had from being thrown 
into the middle of things which you cannot understand and 
being forced to make a kind of sense out of them. 

I hardly need say that it is impossible to imagine 
something like Artemis 81 being commissioned, still less 
broadcast, by the BBC today. I agree absolutely with Phillip 
Challinor when he writes that “Artemis 81 stands as a brilliant 
example of the way in which interesting pretentiousness can 
be a good deal more satisfactory than solid professionalism 


and good old-fashioned storytelling.”* Like much Seventies 
culture — and Artemis 81 really belongs to the “long 
Seventies” that ended circa 1982 — it deploys pretentiousness 
as a visionary force. To use a musical analogy, Artemis 81 
combines the overblown ambition of prog with the cool 
Ballardianism of post-punk. It is quintessentially pulp 
modernist — there are references to The Devil Rides Out as well 
as to The Seventh Seal and Carl Dreyer. 

It is the BBC that made and broadcast Artemis 81 which 
should be recovered and defended, not the institution as it 


currently functions today. The opposition that sets elitism 
against populism is one that neoliberalism has put in place, 
which is why it’s a mistake to fall either side of it. The 
neoliberal attack on cultural “elites” has gone alongside the 
consolidation and extension of the power of an economic elite. 
But there’s nothing “elitist” about assuming intelligence on 
the part of an audience (just as there is nothing admirable 
about “giving people what they want”, as if that desire were a 
natural given rather than something that is mediated on 
multiple levels). Important qualification: to say that there 
was much to be mourned in the cultural situation in the 
Seventies and early Eighties is not to say that everything about 
that period is to be missed. I shouldn’t have to make this 
disclaimer, but I’m mindful that any kind of critical 
judgement which favourably compares the past to the 
present is likely to be accused of “nostalgia”. There are 
unique opportunities in the current conjuncture, but they can 
only be accessed if there is some negation of the present 
rather than a vacuous affirmation of it. 

Of course, the discourse network in which surrounded the 
BBC in 1981 was vastly different to the situation in which the 
BBC finds itself today. For an example of this, take a look at 
the Daily Mirror’s preview of Artemis 81: 


It could be the most baffling show of the holiday, but 
ARTEMIS 81 (BBC1, 9.0) is also one of the best of the 
year. This three-hour thriller, giving pop singer Sting 
his first big television role, is a knockout. But even 
some of the people most closely involved are not too 
sure exactly what it’s about. Director Alastair Reid calls 


it a television Rubik Cube. And actor Hywel Bennett, 
who is at the heart of the action says he doesn’t 
understand it. Artemis 81 IS very complex. It has to do 
with a threat to the future of mankind, a series of 
mysterious deaths, a strange affair involving the Angel 
of Love and a great organist who, if he hits the right (or 
wrong) note, could blow up the world. My advice: Don’t 
worry about understanding it, just relax and enjoy it. 


star wars was a 
sellout from the 


start! 


Does Disney’s acquisition of Lucasfilm mean that Star Wars 
has sold out? Can the Star Wars franchise retain its soul now it 
has been absorbed into a corporate conglomerate? It’s hard to 
believe that these questions are seriously being posed. Star 
Wars was a sell-out from the start, and that is just about the 
only remarkable thing about this depressingly mediocre 
franchise. 

The arrival of Star Wars signalled the full absorption of the 
former counterculture into a new mainstream. Like Steven 
Spielberg, George Lucas was a peer of directors such as 
Martin Scorsese and Francis Ford Coppola, who had produced 
some of the great American films of the 1970s. Lucas’ own 
earlier films included the dystopian curio, THX 1138, but his 
most famous film was a herald of a coming situation in which 
mainstream cinema in America would become increasingly 


bland, and it would become impossible to imagine films of the 
quality of The Godfather trilogy or Taxi Driver ever being made 
again. 

According to Walter Murch, the editor of Apocalypse Now, 
Lucas had wanted to make Apocalypse Now but had been 
persuaded it was too controversial, so he decided to “put the 
essence of the story in outer space and make it in a galaxy 
long ago and far, far away”. Star Wars was Lucas’ 
“transubstantiated version of Apocalypse Now. The rebel group 
were the North Vietnamese, and the Empire was the US”. Of 
course, by the time the film was ideologically exploited by 
Ronald Reagan, everything had been inverted: now it was the 
US who were the plucky rebels, standing up to the “evil 
empire” of the Soviets. 

In terms of the film itself, there was nothing much very 
new about Star Wars. Star Wars was a trailblazer for the kind of 
monumentalist pastiche which has become standard in a 
homogeneous Hollywood blockbuster culture that, perhaps 
more than any other film, Star Wars played a role in 
inventing. The theorist Fredric Jameson cited Star Wars as an 
example of the postmodern nostalgia film: it was a revival of 
“the Saturday afternoon serial of the Buck Rogers type”, 
which the young could experience as if it was new, while an 
older audience could satisfy their desire to relive forms 
familiar from their own youth. All that Star Wars added to the 
formula was a certain spectacle — the spectacle of 
technology, via then state-of-the-art special effects and of 
course the spectacle of its own success, which became part of 
the experience of the film. 

While the emphasis on effects became a catastrophe for 


science fiction, it was a relief for the capitalist culture of 
which Star Wars became a symbol. Late capitalism can’t 
produce many new ideas anymore, but it can reliably deliver 
technological upgrades. But Star Wars didn’t really belong to 
the science fiction genre anyway. J.G. Ballard acidly referred 
to it as “hobbits in space”, and, just as Star Wars nodded back 
to Tolkien’s Manichean pantomime, so it paved the way for 
the epic tedium of Peter Jackson’s Lord of the Rings 
adaptations. 

What Star Wars did invent was a new kind of commodity. 
What was being sold was not a particular film, but a whole 
world, a fictional system which could be added to forever (via 
sequels, prequels, novels, and any number of other tie-ins). 
Writers such as Tolkien and H.P. Lovecraft had invented such 
universes, but the Star Wars franchise was the first to self- 
consciously commodify an invented world on a mass 
commercial scale. 

The films became thresholds into the Star Wars universe, 
which was soon defined as much by the merchandising 
surrounding the movies as by the films themselves. The 
success of the toys took even those involved with the film by 
surprise. The then small company, Kenner, purchased the 
rights for the Star Wars action figures in late 1976, a few 
months ahead of the film’s theatre release in summer 1977. 
Unanticipated and unprecedented demand soon outstripped 
supply, and parents and children could not find the action 
figures in toy shops until Christmas 1977. This all seems 
rather quaint now, at a time when the merchandising 
surrounding blockbuster films is synchronised with a military 
level of organisation, and augmented by a battery of 


advertising and PR hype. But it was the Star Wars 
phenomenon which gave us the first taste of this kind of film 
tie-in commodity supersaturation. 

This is why it’s ridiculous to ask if Star Wars sold out. It 
was Star Wars which taught us what selling out really means. 


gillian wearing: self 


made} 


An ordinary looking man in his thirties is walking towards 
the camera holding a carrier bag. It could be you or me, and 
the streets he moves through, with their off-licences and 
corner shops, could be anywhere, too — most people living in 
Britain wouldn’t have to go more than a mile to walk streets 
such as this. Still, something is not quite right: his expression 
looks distracted yet also troubled, while the music, an 
electronic drone punctuated by cries, creates an atmosphere 
of gathering unease. Suddenly, in the middle of the road, he 
stops, turns and drops the bag: it’s as if something in him has 
broken, as if he can no longer take it any more... 

It’s a powerful opening, but Self Made immediately retreats 
from its intensity. We learn that Self Made started with an 
advertisement placed by Turner Prize winning artist, Gillian 
Wearing: “Would you like to be in a film? You can play 
yourself or a fictional character. Call Gillian.” Hundreds 
apply, but only seven make it through to the experiment. This 
involves being trained by Method acting expert Sam 


Rumbelow, in preparation for acting out a “micro-drama” 
which will explore the participants’ memories and feelings. 

Immediately, I’m suspicious. Are these really the non- 
actors they are supposed to be? They seem remarkably 
unfazed by some of the exercises Rumbelow asks them to do, 
some of which you’d expect to cause nonperformers a degree 
of embarrassment. I’m suspicious about my feelings of 
suspicion: isn’t this exactly the response that’s expected of 
me? A whole series of questions ensue. What is the boundary 
between performance and everyday life? Is there any such 
thing as a non-actor, since all of us are engaged in performing 
our identities? 

We're in that familiar (art)space in which boundaries — in 
this case between “fiction” and “documentary” — are blurred. 
For much of its duration, the film puts us into that mode of 
listless sub-Brechtian questioning which so much art 
catalogue language routine invokes. The mode _ is 
deconstructive, demystificatory, (or it is their simulation): we 
see the micro-dramas, but only after we’ve been exposed to 
all the preparatory work that went into them; and 
afterwards, there are cutaways showing the crew filming the 
scenes. 

Rumbelow comes across as an intensely irritating and 
creepy figure — more therapist-guru than acting coach, he’s 
horribly reminiscent of Hal Raglan, the scientist-therapist 
from Cronenberg’s The Brood who encourages his patients to 
“so all the way through” their emotional traumas, with fatal 
consequences. Perhaps exploitation is integral to the Method, 
and perhaps one of the points of Self Made is to examine this... 
And perhaps Sam Rumbelow is playing “Sam Rumbelow”, 


annoying Method acting expert... 

Wearing has said in the past that she was inspired by Paul 
Watson’s 1974 fly-on-the-wall TV documentary The Family, 
and Self Made clearly follows on from such works as Confess all 
on video. Don’t worry, you will be in disguise. Intrigued? Call Gillian 
(1994) or Family History (2006) in engaging with the problems 
raised by mediated “revelation” — the issue here is precisely 
whether we are dealing with “revelation” at all, or whether 
what we are witnessing is an effect of the filming process 
itself. (The same questions occurred to Jean Baudrillard, and 
it’s no accident that some of his classic essays on simulation 
focus on the fly-on-the-wall phenomenon.) Wearing’s work 
certainly has less in common with the brashness of twenty- 
first-century reality TV than it does with the convergence of 
drama, psychotherapy and social experiment that came 
together in the 1970s and continued on into the 1980s. At 
points, Self Made reminded me of a half-forgotten mid- 
Eighties BBC programme which I believe was called 
Psychodrama, and which similarly invited the participants to 
explore traumatic moments in their lives through the 
construction of dramatic scenarios. In any case, there’s 
something horribly post-Sixties in every bad way about the 
techniques that Rumbelow uses to “unlock” the participants’ 
feeling. In the spirit of confessionalism that Wearing’s work 
examines, I admit that there are personal reasons for my 
hostility to this kind of thing. When I was at school in the 
early Eighties, we had to endure a class called Social and 
Personal Education. This involved being subjected to some of 
the emotionally terroristic exercises — such as “Trust Games” 
— which Rumbelow tries out with the participants here. 


Ironically, such exercises were at least as uncomfortable and 
disturbing as the experiences they were supposed to be 
exorcising, and these teachers were as oppressive in their 
own way as the agents of previous — more “repressive” — 
regimes of emotional management. There’s no suggestion 
that Self Made endorses the discourses which inform 
Rumbelow’s practice and the film’s most unsettling scenes — 
both concerning violence — at least raise the possibility than 
untapping and manipulating buried feelings may be 
catastrophic. At one point, Wearing conspicuously uses 
montage to highly charged effect, undercutting the sense — 
the illusion — of unmediated verité. The participant James is 
re-enacting/re-imagining a scene that took place on a train. 
He challenges one of the men who bullied him when he was 
younger. Almost immediately, he appears to consumed by a 
tempest of rage. He raises his fist to hit the other (non)actor 
and for a moment it seems as if he has struck his head with 
full force. We then realise, with a sense of relief that still 
doesn’t mitigate our horror, that Wearing has cut to James 
punching out a dummy. The film’s climactic scene is even 
more shocking. This returns us to Self Made’s opening shots. 
By now, we have learned that the man walking the streets is 
called Ash. This time, however, we see what he had turned 
around to do: kick a pregnant woman in the stomach. Even 
though we know this is an illusion — after all, we have seen it 
being constructed — the image in itself is so sickeningly 
transgressive that no amount of alienation effects can 
dissipate its power. 


batman’s political 


right turn 


“How long do you think all this can last?” Selina Kyle (Anne 
Hathaway) asks Christian Bale’s Bruce Wayne amid the 
opulence of a high-society charity ball in The Dark Knight 
Returns. “There’s a storm coming.” A storm of a rather 
unexpected kind gathered over the film on Friday, with the 


appalling massacre in Denver.’ But the film was already 
enmeshed in political controversy in the US, when 
conservative US radio host Rush Limbaugh claimed the name 
of Batman’s adversary in the film, Bane, was a reference to 
presidential candidate Mitt Romney and his former company, 
Bain Capital. 

Yet as Limbaugh also noted, it is not Bane but billionaire 
Bruce Wayne who most resembles Romney, while Bane’s 
rhetoric seems like a nod to the Occupy movement. Right- 
wing commentator John Nolte argues that the film has forced 
Occupy Wall Street into “damage control” and praises the 
director, Christopher Nolan, for “using the kind of 
conservative themes that most of artistically bankrupt 


Hollywood refuses to go near any more”. Fellow right- 
winger Christian Toto argues that it is impossible to read the 
film except as an anti-Occupy Wall Street treatise. “Bane’s 
henchmen literally attack Wall Street, savagely beat the rich 
and promise the good people of Gotham that ‘tomorrow, you 
claim what is rightfully yours’.” 

Such readings spuriously conflate Occupy Wall Street’s 
anti-capitalism with the indiscriminate violence used by Bane 
and his followers. 

When Nolan revived the Batman franchise in 2005, the 
setting — Gotham in the midst of an economic depression — 
seemed like an anachronistic reference to the superhero’s 
origins in the 1930s; 2008’s The Dark Knight was too early to 
register the impact of the financial crisis. But The Dark Knight 
Rises clearly attempts to respond to the post-2008 situation. 
The film isn’t the simple conservative parable that right- 
wingers would like, but it is in the end a reactionary vision. 

The storm Hathaway’s character prophesies is a time of 
reckoning for the wealthy, and what stops the film being a 
straightforward celebration of conservative values in the way 
Nolte and Toto want is the relish it takes in attacking the rich. 
“You and your friends better batten down the hatches”, Kyle 
continues, “cause when it hits, you’re all going to wonder 
how you ever thought you could live so large, and leave so 
little for the rest of us”. An early scene features the stock 
exchange, where we have the pleasure of seeing Bane 
manhandle some predatory traders. Later, when Wayne tells 
Kyle that although he is supposedly bankrupt, he has kept his 
house, Kyle acidly observes that “the rich don’t even go broke 
like the rest of us”. 


Anti-capitalism is nothing new in Hollywood. From Wall-E 
to Avatar, corporations are routinely depicted as evil. The 
contradiction of corporatefunded films denouncing 
corporations is an irony capitalism cannot just absorb, but 
thrive on. Yet this anti-capitalism is only allowed within 
limits. The Dark Knight Rises draws clear lines: anti-capitalist 
comment (of the kind that Kyle makes) is fine, but any direct 
action against the rich, or revolutionary moves towards the 
redistribution of property, will lead to dystopian nightmare. 

Bane talks about returning Gotham to “the people”, and 
liberating the city from its “oppressors”. But the people have 
no agency in the film. Despite Gotham’s endemic poverty and 
homelessness, there is no organised action against capital 
until Bane arrives. 

At the end of The Dark Knight Rises, Batman had sacrificed 
his reputation to save the city, and it’s tempting to read the 
film as an allegory for the attempts by the elite to rebuild 
their standing after the financial crisis — or at least to 
preserve the idea that there are good rich who, if suitably 
humbled, can save capitalism from its worst excesses. 

The sustaining fantasy of Nolan’s Batman films — which 
does chime uncomfortably with Romney — is that the 
excesses of finance capital can be curbed by a combination of 
philanthropy, off-the-books violence and symbolism. The Dark 
Knight at least exposed the duplicity and violence necessary 
to preserve the fictions in which conservatives want us to 
believe. But the new film demonises collective action against 
capital while asking us to put our hope and faith in a 
chastened rich. 


remember who the 


enemy is* 


There’s something so uncannily timely about The Hunger 
Games: Catching Fire that it’s almost disturbing. In the UK over 
the past few weeks, there’s been a palpable sense that the 
dominant reality system is juddering, that things are starting 
to give. There’s an awakening from hedonic depressive 
slumber, and The Hunger Games: Catching Fire is not merely in 
tune with that, it’s amplifying it. Explosion in the heart of the 
commodity? Yes, and fire causes more fire... 

I over-use the word “delirium”, but watching Catching Fire 
last week was a genuinely delirious experience. More than 
once I thought: How can I be watching this? How can this be 
allowed? One of the services Suzanne Collins has performed is 
to reveal the poverty, narrowness and decadence of the 
“freedoms” we enjoy in late, late capitalism. The mode of 
capture is hedonic conservatism. You can comment on 
anything (and your tweets may even be read out on TV), you 
can watch as much pornography as you like, but your ability 
to control your own life is minimal. Capital has insinuated 


itself everywhere, into our pleasures and our dreams as much 
as our work. You are kept hooked first with media circuses, 
then, if they fail, they send in the stormtrooper cops. The TV 
feed cuts out just before the cops start shooting. 

Ideology is a story more than it is a set of ideas, and 
Suzanne Collins deserves immense credit for producing what 
is nothing less than a counternarrative to capitalist realism. 
Many of the twenty-first century’s analyses of late capitalist 
capture — The Wire, The Thick Of It, Capitalist Realism itself — 
are in danger of offering a bad immanence, a realism about 
capitalist realism that can engender only a paralysing sense 
of the system’s total closure. Collins gives us a way out, and 
someone to identify with/as — the revolutionary warrior- 
woman, Katniss. 

Sell the kids for food. 

The scale of the success of the mythos is integral to its 
importance. Young Adult Dystopia is not so much a literary 
genre as a way of life for the generations cast adrift and sold 
out after 2008. Capital — now using nihiliberal rather than 
neoliberal modes of governance — doesn’t have any solution 
except to load the young with debt and precarity. The rosy 
promises of neoliberalism are gone, but capitalist realism 
continues: there’s no alternative, sorry. We had it but you 
can’t, and that’s just how things are, OK? The primary 
audience for Collins’ novels was teenage and female, and 
instead of feeding them more boarding school fantasy or 
Vampiary romance, Collins has been — quietly but in plain 
sight — training them to be revolutionaries. 

Perhaps the most remarkable thing about The Hunger 
Games is the way it simply presupposes that revolution is 


necessary. The problems are logistical, not ethical, and the 
issue is simply how and when revolution can be made to 
happen, not if it should happen at all. Remember who the enemy 
is — a message, a hailing, an ethical demand that calls out 
through the screen to us... that calls out to a collectivity that 
can only be built through class consciousness... (And what has 
Collins achieved here if not an intersectional analysis and 
decoding of the way that class, gender, race and colonial 
power work together — not in the pious academic register of 
the Vampires’ Castle, but in the mythographic core of popular 
culture — functioning not as a delibidinising demand for 
more thinking, more guilt, but as an inciting call to build new 
collectivities.) 

There’s a punk immanence about Catching Fire which I 
haven’t seen in any cultural product for a long time — a 
contagious self-reflexivity that bleeds out from the film and 
corrodes the commodity culture that frames it. Adverts for 
the movie seem like they belong in the movie, and, rather 
than a case of empty self-referentiality, this has the effect of 
decoding dominant social reality. Suddenly, the dreary gloss 
of capital’s promotional cyber-blitz becomes de-naturalised. 
If the movie calls out to us through the screen, we also pass 
over into its world, which turns out to be ours, seen clearer 
now some distracting scenery is removed. Here it is: a neo- 
Roman cybergothic barbarism, with lurid cosmetics and 
costumery for the rich, hard labour for the poor. The poor get 
just enough high-tech to make sure that they are always 
connected to the Capitol’s propaganda feed. Reality TV as a 
form of social control — a distraction and a subjugatory 
spectacle that naturalises competition and forces the 


subordinate class to fight it out to the death for the 
delectation of the ruling class. Sound familiar? 

Part of the sophistication and pertinence of Collins’ 
vision, though, is its awareness of the ambivalent role of mass 
media. Katniss is a totem not because she takes direct action 
against the Capitol — what form would that take, in these 
conditions? — but because her place in the media allows her 
to function as a means of connecting otherwise atomised 
populations. Her role is symbolic, but — since the capture 
system is itself symbolic in the first instance — this is what 
makes her such a catalyst. The girl on fire... and fire spreads 
fire... Her arrows must ultimately be aimed at the reality 
system, not at human individuals, all of whom are 
replaceable. 

The removal of capitalist cyberspace from Collins’ world 
clears away the distracting machinery of Web 2.0 
(participation as an extension of spectacle into something 
more pervasive, total, rather than as its antidote) and shows 
how TV, or, better, what Alex Williams has called “the 
Universal Tabloid”, is still productive of what counts as 
reality. (For all the horizontalist rhetoric about Web 2.0, just 
look at what typically trends on Twitter: TV programmes.) 
There’s a role as hero or villain — or maybe a story about how 
we've gone from hero to villain — prepared for all of us in the 
Universal Tabloid. The scenes in which Plutarch Heavensbee 
gives a businesslike description of the carrot and stick nature 
of the Capitol’s media-authoritarian power have a withering, 
mordant precision. “More beatings, what will her wedding be 
like, executions, wedding cake...” 

As Unemployed Negativity wrote of the first film: 


It is not enough that the participants kill each other, 
but in doing so they must provide a compelling persona 
and narrative. Doing so guarantees them good standing 
in their odds and means that they will be provided with 
assistance by those who are betting on their victory. 
Before they enter the arena they are given makeovers 
and are interviewed like contenders on American Idol. 
Gaining the support of the audience is a matter of life in 


death.’ 


This is what keeps the Tributes sticking to their reality TV- 
defined meat puppet role. The only alternative is death. 
But what if you choose death? This is the crux of the first 


film, and I turned to Bifo when I tried to write about it. 


“Suicide is the decisive political act of our times.”* Katniss 
and Peeta’s threat of suicide is the only possible act of 
insubordination in The Hunger Games. And this is 
insubordination, NOT resistance. As the two most acute 
analysts of Control society, Burroughs and Foucault, both 
recognised, resistance is not a challenge to power; it is, on the 
contrary, that which power needs. No power without 
something to resist it. No power without a living being as its 
subject. When they kill us, they can no longer see us 
subjugated. A being reduced to whimpering — this is the 
limits of power. Beyond that lies death. So only if you act as if 
you are dead can you be free. This is Katniss’ decisive step 
into becoming a revolutionary, and in choosing death, she 
wins back her life — or the possibility of a life no longer lived 
as a slave-subordinate, but as a free individual. 

The emotional dimensions of all this are by no means 


ancillary, because Collins — and the films follow her novels 
very closely in most respects — understands how Control 
society operates through affective parasitism and emotional 
bondage. Katniss enters into the Hunger Games to save her 
sister, and fear for her family keeps her in line. Part of what 
makes the novels and the films so powerful is the way they 
move beyond the consentimental affective regime imposed by 
reality TV, lachrymose advertising and soap operas. The 
greatness of Jennifer Lawrence’s performances as Katniss 
consist in part in her capacity to touch on feelings — rage, 
horror, grim resolve — that have a political, rather than a 
privatised, register. 

The personal is political because there is no personal. 

There is no private realm to retreat into. 

Haymitch tells Katniss and Peeta that they will never get 
off the train — meaning that the reality TV parts they are 
required to play will continue until their deaths. It’s all an 
act, but there’s no offstage. 

There are no woods to run into where the Capitol won’t 
follow. If you escape, they can always get your family. 

There are no temporary autonomous zones that they 
won’t shut down. It’s just a matter of time. 

Everyone wants to be Katniss, except Katniss herself. 

Bring me my bow, of burning gold. 

The only thing she can do — when the time is right — is 
take aim at the reality system. 

Then you watch the artificial sky fall. 

Then you wake up. 

And. 

This is the revolution... 


beyond good and 
evil: 
breaking bad! 


Who needs religion when you have television? On soap 
operas, unlike in life, villainous characters almost always face 
their comeuppance. TV cops may now be required to have 
“complicated” private lives and dubious personal ethics, but 
we’re seldom in any serious doubt about the difference 
between good and evil, and on which side of the line the 
maverick cop ultimately falls. The persistence of the fantasy 
that justice is guaranteed — a religious fantasy — wouldn’t 
have surprised the great thinkers of modernity. Theorists 
such as Spinoza, Kant, Nietzsche and Marx argued that 
atheism was extremely difficult to practise. It’s all very well 
professing a lack of belief in God, but it’s much harder to give 
up the habits of thought which assume providence, divine 
justice and a secure distinction between good and evil. 

The US television series Breaking Bad, an international hit 


whose final episode aired this autumn, escapes this impasse. 
But we have to be careful here — the series has been 
understood (its title invites this interpretation) as the story of 
how an ordinary lower-middle-class man becomes evil. The 
set-up was simple. Walter White (played by Bryan Cranston), 
a chemistry teacher at a school in New Mexico, is diagnosed 
with lung cancer. Unable to afford the treatment, Walt 
decides to use his expertise in chemistry to manufacture 
methamphetamine, or crystal meth, with the help of a 
feckless ex-student, Jesse. As the series progresses, Walt shifts 
from making agonised decisions about whether it is right to 
kill, to becoming a ruthless crimelord. Yet this is not the 
whole story, and to read the series as a narrative of Walt 
becoming evil is to resist what is most challenging about it. 
The success of the show outside the US has provoked 
some amusing parodies. Imagine Breaking Bad set in the UK 
and Canada. Opening scene. Doctor tells Walt he has cancer — 
the treatment starts next week. End of series. What this 
points out is an opposition that was crucial to the drama: 
between the fragility of the physical body and the precarity 
produced by social relations. One way of measuring progress 
is through the extent to which human beings have managed 
to contain the inevitable suffering that nature causes the 
body. In this sense, Breaking Bad can be compared with Ken 
Loach’s recent documentary about the foundation of the 
British welfare state, Spirit of ‘45. Loach’s evocation of a 
destroyed working-class progressivism brings the savage new 
Wild West that emerges in Breaking Bad into painful relief. 
Walt does so many “bad” things because he wants to remain a 
“good” husband, as defined by the Protestant work ethic. 


Much of the series’s mordant humour comes from seeing 
Walt pursue this ideology of work — it’s better to earn your 
“own” money, no matter how, than to scrounge from others 
or ask them for help — to all kinds of extremes. 

In the final episode, Walt has to admit that the desire to 
build his drug empire brought him an intense libidinal 
satisfaction that had long since become autonomous from the 
ostensible purpose — providing for his family when he is gone 
— that provoked him into cooking meth in the first place. But 
for most of the series Walt clings to the idea that he’s doing 
all the drug production, the killing, the manipulation and the 
terror for the sake of his family. Ironically, the one thing that 
the family could not survive is the course of action Walt ends 
up pursuing. It could probably survive penury and debt. It 
could survive the loss of Walt’s physical body. But it cannot 
survive the loss of the image of Walt as an ordinary father 
figure, beaten down by life, an underachiever maybe, but still 
someone who “does the right thing”. It’s as if Walt destroyed 
the family in the very attempt to save it. 

Perhaps the most complex and powerful character in the 
whole series is Walt’s wife, Skyler, played by Anna Gunn. The 
actor has written of the misogyny she faced from some 
Breaking Bad fans online as a consequence of playing Skyler: in 
a piece for the New York Times, she described how the 
character seemed to have become “a flash point for many 
people’s feelings about strong, non-submissive, ill-treated 
women”. This is especially depressing because Skyler is a 
nuanced character, not at all someone who simply rejects 
Walt at the earliest opportunity. Even though she deplores 
Walt’s adventures in crime, it is only at the very end of the 


series, when Walt’s actions have manifestly brought 
catastrophe to Skyler’s family, that she definitively breaks 
with him. Until then she struggles, impossibly but heroically, 
to reconcile her roles as wife, mother and responsible citizen. 
At the end, we feel that she is traumatised but not broken — 
someone who will eventually be able to escape the horrors 
Walt brought to her life, and who, astonishingly, is still 
capable of retaining some love for the husband whose pride, 
hubris and desperation have threatened to destroy her life 
and those of her two children. 

The politics of the family, and how these connect with the 
American ideology of earning your own money and paying 
your own way, were, then, at the heart of Breaking Bad. In the 
episode “Ozymandias” — probably one of the most intense, 
distressing, yet also occasionally hilarious hours of television 
I have ever seen — Skyler finally breaks totally with Walt. 
Their son, Walt Jr, has just discovered that Walt is a meth 
cook. Sheer vertigo, horror: Walt Jr’s whole world has 
disappeared in an instant. He doesn’t want to believe it, he’s 
angry with Skyler and Walt, he can’t make any sense of it, his 
eyes show the deepest pain, confusion, shock. Skyler grabs a 
carving knife — an echo of what Wendy Torrance does in The 
Shining — but, unlike Wendy, Skyler stands tough. She’s tall, 
strong, she’s not cowering or afraid anymore, and she 
suddenly knows what she has to do to protect herself and 
Walt Jr. She forces Walt out of the house. But before that, 
Skyler and Walt have grappled on the floor. Walt wriggles 
free, stands up and — hilariously, pathetically — tries to 
assert his patriarchal authority, tries to appeal to family 
togetherness. “Stop this! We — are — a — family!” 


A scene like this gets right to the heart of why Breaking 
Bad was so mesmerically powerful. Even here, we’re aware 
that Skyler still loves Walt — not because she’s deluded but 
because she recognises that, even though Walt has become “a 
monster”, this isn’t all he is. In some sense, he still loves 
Skyler and Walt Jr; and the scenes in the final episode when 
Walt returns to say his last goodbye to Skyler, and he holds 
his young baby for the last time, and he watches Walt Jr from 
a distance, knowing that he will never speak to him again, are 
wrenchingly sad. 

I think it was Lacan who remarked that when we talk 
about going beyond good and evil, we usually mean going 
beyond good. The modern world is fascinated by anti-heroes, 
people with a dark side, the pantomime madness and “evil” of 
Hannibal Lecter. What it is less comfortable with is the real 
atheist-existentialist revelation that “good” and “evil” are 
not written into the universe, but exist only in ourselves, in 
relation to our desires and interests. Soap opera melodrama 
keeps us believing in “evil” as a voluntaristic choice — people 
do bad things because they are evil. But in Breaking Bad, evil in 
that sense is nowhere to be found. 

Certainly, it’s full of people who do “bad” things — that is, 
those who pursue actions that they know would either 
directly or indirectly hurt or destroy others — but they don’t 
do this because they are evil. Tuco, the lowlevel drug lord 
that Walt and Jesse tangle with in season one, is deranged and 
violent because he is a meth addict from a criminal family. 
Gus Fring, the slick meth overlord who makes his first 
appearance in season two, is a super-pragmatic businessman 
— so pragmatic, in fact, that he lives his life in seemingly 


permanent cover, disguised as the humble owner of a small 
fast-food chain. He kills ruthlessly, but only when it is 
expedient. Even when hillbillies with swastikas tattooed onto 
their necks emerge as the antagonists towards the end of the 
series, the writing never allows us to write off the most 
repulsive of them as totally “evil”, because they, too, are 
capable of mercy and acts of kindness. 

Then there is Walt himself. One of the series’ subversive 
achievements is to draw attention to the way that our 
sympathy and identification with a character are a structural 
effect; one that is created both by the demands of genre and 
by the class structure of wider society. We _ initially 
sympathise with Walt in part because we remember other 
put-upon dads in popular TV series — such as Bryan 
Cranston’s character in Malcolm in the Middle — and also 
because the media constantly invite us to identify with the 
“hard-working” lower-middle-class family man. Yet Breaking 
Bad shows that the difference between the “good”, “ordinary” 
man and a ruthless criminal is the thinnest of lines. There but 
for the grace of social security and the NHS go we. 


classless 
broadcasting: 


benefits street! 


It’s not exactly clear why Channel 4’s Benefits Street (broadcast 
in January and February 2014) caused such a furore. It wasn’t 
the most obviously exploitative of the many programmes 
about the unemployed and those on benefits. Yet something 
about this series, which followed the residents of James 
Turner Street in Birmingham, touched a nerve. It was 
immediately pressed into ideological service by the right, 
fitted into a pre-existing story about the “need to reform the 
welfare state”. The Daily Mail’s Richard Littlejohn quickly 
inserted some of the series’ participants into his phobic 
delirium. For most of those on the left, however, it was 
business as usual. For Owen Jones, author of the book Chavs, it 
was yet another case of the demonisation of the working 
class. For Ben Walters, writing on the blog Not Television, it 
was an example of Thatcherite documentary, while for the 


film-maker Katharine Round, writing for the Huffington Post, it 
was a depressing example of the way in which documentaries 
were being used to “kick those without a voice”. 

In terms of its content, Benefits Street wasn’t all 
reactionary. Its somewhat mealy-mouthed claim to be about 
“community” rather than benefits wasn’t entirely false. Even 
in the first episode — which sensationistically dwelled on 
crime — there was still some emphasis on camaraderie and 
solidarity amongst the poor on the street. The second 
episode, which centred on desperate Romanians seeking 
work, was certainly sympathetic to the immigrants’ plight, 
and might even have done something to challenge the 
dominant media narrative about East Europeans “coming to 
steal our jobs and our benefits”. And by the third and fourth 
episodes sensation had largely given way to the inertia and 
radically contracted horizons of life on benefits. A small taste 
of this ought to have been enough to disabuse anyone of the 
notion that life on benefits is easy — but, since this belief is 
supported by relentless media propaganda, it isn’t likely to be 
given up any time soon. 

Still, Benefits Street is undoubtedly part of a disingenuous 
trend in documentary making. Writing last year for the 
journal the Sociological Imagination, Tracy Jensen predicted a 
“summer of poverty porn”, citing such programmes as How To 
Get A Council House, Why Don’t You Speak English?, Benefits 
Britain 1949 (all Channel 4) and We All Pay Your Benefits (BBC1). 
Writing of the latter, Jensen argued that despite occasional 
moments of sympathy towards benefits claimants, the 
‘“programme’s ideological message was clear; worth comes 
from paid work and not from childrearing or volunteering; 


unemployment is a problem of will or determination and not 


of structural obstacles; and social security itself generates the 


‘problem’ of welfare dependence.” 


Ultimately, Benefits Street fitted the same formula, in 
which intermittent sympathy for the poor and unemployed 
was used to season an otherwise crude reproduction of 
negative stereotypes. Then there is the perennial question of 
the exploitation of those who were filmed. Some — including 
residents of James Turner Street itself — objected to Benefits 
Street because they claimed that the programme’s producers 
had misrepresented what the series was actually going to be 
about. The residents weren’t told, for instance, that the series 
was to be given such a provocative and loaded title (the 
programme makers claimed that this was a last-minute 
decision, but I’m not sure how believable that is). 

The deep problem with programmes like Benefits Street lies 
more in their form than in their content. A decade ago, the 
academic John Corner argued that reality TV had led to a 
genre of ‘“post-documentary” television, in which 
documentary elements were merged with game-shows, 


makeover programmes and other entertainment forms.*? Now 
we are in the era of post-reality TV documentary, a much 
more pernicious genre. Even the most credulous viewer of 
reality TV could hardly fail to be aware of its constructedness, 
with participants worrying and complaining about how they 
were “portrayed”, and viewers quickly becoming familiar 
with the way narrative was produced by editing. (Partly this 
was because shows like Big Brother gave viewers access to the 
unedited footage, to the longueurs and the shapelessness of a 
quotidian time prior to its moulding into narrative.) Such 


reflexivity is largely absent from _ post-reality TV 
documentary — this genre uses many of the techniques from 
reality TV, but presents them with the simulated sobriety of 
documentary rather than with the winking, heavily made-up 
face of entertainment. That’s not to say that post-reality TV 
documentary is entirely straight-laced; no — one of its 
defining characteristics is a certain humour and lightness. 
But it doesn’t want to be positioned as entertainment in the 
way that reality TV was. 

In their important study Reacting To Reality Television: 
Performance, Audience and Value, Beverley Skeggs and Helen 
Wood argue that much reality TV posits an implied bourgeois 
gaze, which judges working-class participants as lacking, by 


comparison with the middle class.* Moreover, this lack is 
understood in heavily moralised terms; it isn’t to be 
explained by the working class’s lack of resources or 
opportunities, but by a deficit in will and effort. This implied 
perspective — seldom actually stated, but informing the 
whole way in which programmes are produced — is typical of 
the post-reality TV documentary. 

This moralistic framing was at work in Benefits Street. It 
did almost nothing to contextualise what it showed. There 
was barely any discussion of why the participants had ended 
up on benefits, and no mention of the social causes of 
unemployment, just as there was no interrogation of the 
political agendas driving the focus on those claiming benefits, 
nor any examination of austerity as a political project. Post- 
reality TV documentary projects a radically depoliticised 
world of individuals and their intimacies. In Benefits Street, we 
were told that benefits were cut, but this was treated like 


some natural disaster, an act of God rather than the 
consequence of a political decision. 

In many respects, post-reality TV documentary — like 
reality TV before it — goes out of its way to conceal the class 
differences between those who are making the programmes 
and those who feature in them. Like tabloid newspapers, the 
scripts impersonate a working-class vernacular. Typically, 
the voiceover plays an important role in this bid to present 
the programme to working-class viewers as if it has been 
produced by a group of peers. The voiceover will not now be 
the voice of the actual programme makers. If they are heard 
at all, these voices will only be heard in the off-screen 
prompts and questions put to the working-class participants. 
In the case of Benefits Street, the voiceover was performed by 
actor Tony Hirst, who has recently left the Coronation Street 
cast. Hirst’s accent is working-class, northern; his tone — 
perfectly in keeping with the supposedly “serious yet 
humorous” register of the post-reality TV documentary — is 
no-nonsense and wry. Tellingly, it was reported that the 
voiceover had been first offered to Brummie comedian Frank 
Skinner, who turned it down. 

The use of voiceovers by actors or comedians from 
working-class backgrounds not only obfuscates the class 
origins of those making the programme; it also bolsters the 
programme’s claims to authenticity. In addition, and perhaps 
most significantly, the voiceover is part of a strategy that 
conceals the fact that the material is being framed in a 
particular way. In previous, more essayistic forms of 
documentary, when the person writing the script would also 
provide the voiceover, and might appear on camera, it was 


clearer both that a particular case was being made and who 
was making it. In the absence of a journalist or a programme- 
maker explicitly taking responsibility for any argument, 
viewers are invited to classify what they are seeing as the 
truth, pure and unmediated: this, we are induced to believe, 
is just real people, being themselves, and the refusal or failure 
to make any explicit argument allows dominant ideology — 
which the programme doesn’t acknowledge, still less 
challenge — to step in. 

It’s a mark of how bad Channel 4’s programming now is 
that Benefits Street would probably count as one of its more 
serious recent attempts at documentary. If you want to 
measure the catastrophic impact of neoliberalism on British 
culture, then there’s no better example than Channel 4. A 
channel that began with programming that included 
European art films, serious philosophy discussion 
programmes and politically sophisticated documentaries has 
now degenerated into depths so embarrassingly hucksterish 
and craven that they are beyond parody. This is a channel 
which still allows Tory toffs like Kirstie Allsopp to front 
programmes that act as if it is normal for house-buyers to 
have budgets of a million pounds; a channel that cries 
crocodile tears over mental illness and other forms of 
extreme misfortune as a thin pretext for ruthlessly exploiting 
them. I’d like to think this decline isn’t irreversible, but there 
aren’t many reasons for hope at the moment. 


rooting for the 


enemy: 


the americans} 


The first season of The Americans (recently broadcast in the 
UK on ITV) ended with a sequence soundtracked by Peter 
Gabriel’s “Games Without Frontiers”. The series has rightly 
been praised for its intelligent use of music, and “Games 
Without Frontiers”, which was released in 1980, the year in 
which the series begins, was a perfect choice of track for the 
climax of the first season. Atmospherically, the song is 
somehow both anxious and fatalistic: drained of emotional 
inflection, Gabriel’s vocals sound catatonic; the production is 
cold and forbidding. “Games Without Frontiers” feels not so 
much post-traumatic as pre-traumatic: as if Gabriel is 
registering the impact of a catastrophe that is yet to come. 
Heard now, especially in the context of The Americans, a 
Cold War thriller, it reminds us of a time when such dread 
was ambient, when the spectre of seemingly inevitable 


apocalypse was woven into everyday life. Yet if “Games 
Without Frontiers” invokes the broad historical moment 
when The Americans is set, it also comments on the specific 
intrigues of the series. For The Americans is about Soviet spies 
posing as an ordinary US family. Cold War espionage did not 
respect the boundaries between private and public, between 
domestic life and duty to the cause: a game without frontiers 
indeed. 

Created by former CIA agent Joe Weisberg, The Americans 
centres on Elizabeth (Keri Russell) and Philip Jennings 
(Matthew Rhys), two KGB agents living undercover as 
Americans in Washington. Weisberg had reputedly toyed with 
setting the series in the 1970s, but opting for 1980 makes 
strong dramatic sense. In 1980, the Cold War was intensifying 
in the immediate wake of the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan, 
and the election of Ronald Reagan, who was keen to prosecute 
a Manichean struggle against the “Evil Empire”. 

The series is characterised by a bipolar oscillation 
between a downbeat naturalism and the screaming adrenal 
intensities of the thriller. There is no shortage of car chases 
and shoot-outs in The Americans — there is probably no more 
exciting show on TV at the moment than this — but these are 
intercut with scenes of domestic life, where the tensions are 
of another kind altogether. 

Far from being a respite from the Cold War, the 
Jenningses’ home life is the zone where they carry out their 
most emotionally charged deceptions. The marriage is itself a 
sham: initially at least, Elizabeth and Philip are agents on a 
mission, not lovers, and the series is in part about their 
attempts to navigate this fraught emotional terrain, and to 


reconcile their differing expectations about what their roles 
entail. But Elizabeth and Philip at least know what they are 
doing; their children, Paige and Henry, necessarily do not. 
They are not aware that their parents are KGB agents (the 
children’s ignorance being one of the best forms of cover that 
the Jennings have available to them). 

This not only raises the threat of discovery, but also raises 
a moral dilemma: should the children be told? This dilemma 
comes to a head in the second season, when one story arc 
concerns the murder of a fellow KGB couple and one of their 
children. When it turns out that the surviving child, Jared, 
had been recruited by the KGB, the question of Paige’s 
recruitment is inevitably raised. “Paige is your daughter”, 
says the Jenningses KGB controller, Claudia, “but she’s not 
just yours. She belongs to the cause. And to the world. We all 
do.” 

This brings us to a contrast between The Americans and 
even some of the most sophisticated spy fiction, such as that 
of John Le Carré. In Le Carré’s work, George Smiley’s 
adversary is the KGB Spymaster Karla — and for all that Le 
Carré complicated the broadbrush good-and-evil binary of 
Cold War propaganda, Karla remained an almost demonic 
figure whose commitment was incomprehensible to Smiley 
and his self-styled liberal pragmatism. In The Americans, the 
Soviets are transformed into our likeness. This first of all 
happens through the foregrounding of Elizabeth and Philip. 
But they are well supported by the rich cast of characters in 
the rezidentura (KGB station): Nina Krylova, a double, then 
triple agent, fragile but resilient and resourceful; the 
pragmatic strategist Arkady Ivanovich; the ambitious and 


enigmatic Oleg Burov. The decision to have the characters in 
the embassy speak Russian is important; their difference from 
Westerners is maintained, and the absurd convention 
whereby they are heard speaking bad English in pantomime 
Russian accents is avoided. 

In a reversal of stereotype, the Soviets in The Americans 
seem so much more glamorous than their American 
counterparts. The Jenningses’ chief antagonist, FBI agent Stan 
Beeman (Noah Emmerich) — who in a soap opera twist turns 
out to be a near neighbour — comes off as dour by 
comparison with the dynamic and glamorous Elizabeth and 
Philip, just as the FBI offices seem drab and mean when set 
against the intrigue of the rezidentura. 

This no doubt contributes to the series’ subversive 
flourish, which consists in the fact that the audience not only 
sympathise with the Jenningses, they positively root for 
them, dreading their discovery, hoping that all their plans 
come to fruition. The Americans’ message is not that the 
Jenningses share a common humanity with their American 
enemies and neighbours, but just happen to be on the other 
side. Given the extremity of their situation, it is impossible 
for us to think that Philip and Elizabeth are “just like us”; at 
the same time, however, the series forces us to identify with 
them, even as their otherness is preserved. 

At key points, their differences from the “real” Americans 
are emphasised. While Philip is sometimes seen to vacillate, 
to appreciate at least some aspects of the American way of 
life, Elizabeth never wavers in her commitment to the 
destruction of American capitalism. At one moment during 
the second season, Paige starts going to a church group. 


Nothing brings home Elizabeth’s alienness to American life — 
and to many of the protocols of US TV drama — more than 
the ferocity of her hostility to this development. The scene in 
which a furious Elizabeth confronts Paige about all this is 
strangely hilarious: there aren’t many places elsewhere in 
American TV drama where we can see Christianity attacked 
with such fervour. 

The complexity of Elizabeth’s character — and _ its 
sophisticated performance by Keri Russell — may be the 
highlight of the series. Both she and Philip have to be ruthless 
— when it is necessary, they kill without compunction — but 
Elizabeth has an unsentimental coldness and poise which the 
more equivocal Philip lacks. It is to the series’ credit that it 
doesn’t code this coldness as a moral failing — rather, it holds 
in tension two conflicting world views, which value 
Elizabeth’s strength of purpose and Philip’s uncertainties 
very differently. There is certainly no doubt, for instance, 
that Elizabeth loves her children (if she didn’t, she would too 
easily fall into the stereotype of the Soviet monster) — but 
the question is what place this love should have in a 
hierarchy of duties. For Elizabeth, it is clear, the Cause must 
always come first. 

In conditions where capitalism dominates without 
opposition, the very idea of a Cause has disappeared. Who 
fights and dies for capitalism? Whose life is made meaningful 
by the struggle for a capitalist society? (Perhaps it is this 
devotion to the Cause that gives the Soviet characters in The 
Americans their glamour.) It was none other than Francis 
Fukuyama who warned that a triumphal capitalism would be 
haunted by hankerings after existential purpose that 


consumer goods and parliamentary democracy could not 
assuage. Much of the appeal of The Americans depends upon 
the fact that it is set before this period. Our knowledge that 
the collapse of the Soviet experiment was less than a decade 
away from the period when the series is set lends all of the 
discourse about the communist Cause in The Americans a 
melancholy quality. In 1980, the Cold War felt as if it would 
last forever. In reality, within a mere nine years, everything 
that Elizabeth and Philip stood for would collapse, and the 
end of history would be upon us. 


how to let go: the 
leftovers, 
broadchurch 


and the missing! 


Loss is the subject of some of the best television series of the 
last year or so. Freud distinguished between mourning and 
melancholia, where mourning involves relinquishing the lost 
object and melancholia entails morbidly holding on. These 
series track the painful — perhaps permanently interrupted 
— process whereby melancholia becomes mourning. 

The problem for the characters in the enthralling HBO 
series The Leftovers is that mourning cannot properly begin. 
The series is about the consequences of a cataclysmic event — 
referred to as the Sudden Departure — in which, inexplicably, 
without warning and without leaving a trace, two per cent of 
the world’s population disappears. The series was adapted 


from his own novel by Tom Perotta, along with Damon 
Lindelhof, the co-creator of Lost. In some ways, The Leftovers is 
like Lost in negative. Where Lost focused on those who had 
gone over to the other side, The Leftovers concentrates on the 
ones left behind. The phrase “left behind” is not neutral, of 
course — it was the title of a series of best-selling Christian 
millenarian novels about the End Times. The first temptation 
is to see the Sudden Departure as a religious event — the 
greatest religious event of all, the Rapture. Yet the Sudden 
Departure appears to have taken people at random: abusers 
as well as altruists, celebrities as well as mediocrities, 
believers as well as nonbelievers. One of the most mordantly 
amusing threads in the series sees Reverend Matt Jamison — 
an unstable compound of bitterness, compassion and 
enduring faith, superbly played by Christopher Eccleston — 
producing a homemade scandal sheet whose sole purpose is 
to tarnish the name of those who were taken, in order to 
prove that the Departure cannot have been the Rapture. Or is 
this the form that the Rapture would supposedly take for 
those left behind? It would not be an event with immediately 
clear meaning, but an unintelligible, traumatic interruption, 
producing disorientation and anger as much as sadness. 

Yet The Leftovers does not concern itself overmuch with 
the enigma of the Sudden Departure. Lost became self- 
parodically enmeshed in a madly proliferating web of 
embedded mysteries that by the end seemed as if they were 
being invented simply to keep the intrigue going, and could 
never be satisfactorily resolved. The Leftovers offers no hint 
that its central mystery will ever be explained. If the first 
season is anything to go by, this absence of explanation is the 


point. The series is set three years after the Sudden 
Departure, and by now the event has become part of the 
assumed background of the characters’ lives: a vast epistemic 
void which they are simultaneously always ignoring and 
negotiating. The Sudden Departure is then like trauma as 
such: an unfathomable puncturing of meaning, a senseless 
spasm of sheer contingency. 

The fact that the nature of the Sudden Departure is never 
directly confronted means that the question which genre the 
series belongs to — religious drama? Science fiction? 
Metaphysical fiction? — is suspended. The dominant mode is 
an often brutal naturalism; but a naturalism forever haunted 
and conditioned by something it cannot assimilate. Some 
have viewed the Sudden Departure as an allegory of 9/11, but 
the analogy isn’t convincing. The Leftovers belongs to a 
moment deprived of the certainties possessed by those 
prosecuting the War on Terror and their opponents. There is 
no one to blame in The Leftovers — and there are no bodies to 
mourn. Without these, the population turns to rage and 
brooding depression. Families disintegrate, even families 
such as the Garveys, the lead characters, who did not lose a 
member in the Departure. Social cohesion is always 
threatening to unravel. New belief systems sprout like couch 
grass in an abandoned garden — for in a world in which sense 
has gone, who can adjudicate between the credible and the 
ridiculous anymore? 

In some ways, the most authentic response to the Sudden 
Departure comes from the “cult”, the Guilty Remnant. The 
rules that members follow have the eerie arbitrariness, the 
oneiric montage-logic, of a genuine cult. They are required to 


wear all white, to remain silent and — in a symbol of their 
lack of belief in a viable future — to always smoke whilst in 
public. But the Remnant have no cockamamie beliefs. In fact 
they seem to have no positive beliefs at all; their purpose is 
simply to retain a fidelity to the senseless event of the 
Departure. In their joyless white, they are mute spectres 
forever insisting that the Departure must not be forgotten. 
Their point is not moral — the departed should be 
remembered — but philosophical: reality has fundamentally 
altered, and this must be faced, not denied. 


In the UK, ITV’s Broadchurch confronts loss in a more 
intimate, less metaphysically fraught way. The series centres 
on the death of a child, Danny Latimer, in a fictional seaside 
town. While it was clearly British television’s response to 
wintry Scandinavian thrillers such as The Killing, the first 
series of Broadchurch (2013) was not merely pastiche. There 
was a poise in the way it combined the whodunnit intrigue of 
the traditional thriller with a more subdued tracking of the 
impact of the death on the town. The series also deftly 
negotiated the line between sentimentalising a local 
community and finding potential killers everywhere. In the 
course of the investigation, the “close-knit community” that 
rallies around after the killing soon becomes a mob, which — 
stoked by tabloid insinuations — hounds a local shopkeeper 
to his death. 

The second series of Broadchurch, halfway through at the 
time of writing, offered a clever solution to the seemingly 
intractable problem of how the series could continue once the 
killer was revealed. Another murder in the same town would 


definitively trip the series over into melodrama, yet 
abandoning the whodunnit element would deprive 
Broadchurch of one of its narrative drivers. As it turned out, 
the whodunnit was provided by an old case that the lead 
detective, Hardy (David Tennant), had failed to solve — a case 
that haunted him in the first series — while the ongoing study 
of the effects of the murder of Danny Latimer was continued 
with a trial, prompted when the killer, Joe Miller, retracts his 
confession. Yet the second series lacks the surefootedness of 
the first, and it is hard not to feel that it’s somewhat 
superfluous and unnecessary. 

If Broadchurch was ITV’s answer to The Killing, then The 
Missing was the BBC’s response to Broadchurch. In Broadchurch, 
the grieving family gradually has to adjust to the death of a 
child, to give up melancholia so that they can begin 
mourning. In The Missing, this process is indefinitely stalled — 
the child whose disappearance is at the heart of the series is 
precisely missing, not yet (confirmed) dead. On holiday in 
France in 2006, five-year-old Ollie Hughes disappeared in a 
bar. The series took us down many blind alleys in pursuing 
the truth behind his disappearance. It ran through a virtual 
inventory of folk devils, including paedophiles, corrupt 
politicians, drug addicts and Eastern European criminal 
gangs, before concluding in bathos — Ollie’s disappearance 
turned out to be the result of an alcoholic accident, not any 
intentional malignancy. 

In theory, there was something admirable about this 
controlled deflation. In practice, however, there was 
something dissatisfying about the way it was handled, which 
made the series feel like a shaggy-dog story, leading nowhere 


very interesting. Along the way, there were some memorable 
performances — most notably Tchéky Karyo as detective 
Julien Baptiste, a charismatic mix of wisdom, compassion and 
tenacity — but the most haunting scenes came at the 
beginning and the end of the series. First, there was the 
wrenching moment when Tony Hughes (James Nesbit) lost 
Ollie. Some of this power came from the very banality of the 
scene (one of the most notable aspects of the series was its 
nondescript settings, a contrast with the striking landscapes 
of Broadchurch): a bar which could be anywhere, a moment’s 
distraction, a hand momentarily released, a sudden 
contingency that irrevocably and irretrievably transforms 
life, pitching Ollie’s parents into hell. The final scene showed 
that Tony, now a dishevelled wreck, utterly consumed by 
obsession, would never escape that hell. Unable to accept that 
Ollie is dead — his body is never recovered — Tony is now in 
Russia, serially harassing children that he momentarily 
convinces himself might be his lost son. It is a horrible image 
of secular purgatory. Mourning will never begin; Tony is 
condemned to a melancholia-without-end that he doesn’t 
even want to escape. 


the strange death of 


british satire! 


Watch one of the BBC’s political programmes — such as the 
Daily Politics and This Week, both fronted by Andrew Neil — 
and you encounter a particular tone. British television 
viewers are unlikely to take much notice of this tone because 
we take it for granted. Take a step back, however, and it is 
really rather curious. These ostensibly serious programmes 
are conducted with an air of light mockery, which Neil, with 
his perma-smirk and smugly knowing air, personifies. The 
tone, I believe, tells us something about the widespread 
disengagement from parliamentary politics in England. (The 
situation in Scotland is now rather different: the popular 
mobilisation after the independence referendum has reversed 
the trend towards cynicism about politics that still dominates 
south of the border.) 

Take This Week. The whole show is conducted in a lamely 
comic style that it is hard to imagine any sentient creature 
finding amusing. Guests are required to dress up in daft 
costumes and present their arguments in the form of limp 


skits, pitched at an audience whose implied level of 
intelligence is imbecilic. The atmosphere is matey, informal, 
and the overwhelming impression is that nothing much is at 
stake in any of the decisions that parliament takes. While 
Neil’s dog pads about the set, former Tory leadership 
candidate Michael Portillo chats on a sofa with professionally 
amiable Blairite Alan Johnson — no class antagonism here, 
only mild disagreements. Politics appears as a (mostly) 
gentlemen’s club where everyone is friends. People from 
working-class backgrounds, such as Johnson, can achieve 
entry to this club, provided they accept its rules. These rules 
are never actually stated, but they are very clear. Parliament 
is not to be taken too seriously: it is to be treated as a (boring) 
soap opera, in which the lead characters are selfserving 
individuals who don’t believe in much beyond getting 
themselves elected. On no account are any intellectual 
concepts to be discussed, unless to be sneered at as 
pretentious nonsense. It has to be accepted that nothing very 
significant will ever change: the basic co-ordinates of political 
reality were set in the 1980s, and all we can do is operate 
inside them. 

If you were designing a programme specifically to put 
people — especially young people — off politics, to convince 
them it is a tedious waste of time, then you could hardly do 
better than This Week. The programme seems to be aimed at 
literally no one: if you are staying up late to watch a 
programme devoted to politics, then presumably you are 
pretty serious about politics. Who wants this unfunny froth? 

It would be bad enough if this tone of mirthless levity 
were confined to This Week, but it increasingly dominates 


political coverage of all kinds on the BBC. It thoroughly 
permeated the BBC’s election-night coverage this year, which 
Neil anchored. This trivialising tone is perhaps even more 
troubling than the problem of bias (as is well known, former 
Murdoch editor Neil was a Thatcher cheerleader; Nick 
Robinson, the BBC’s former Political Editor, meanwhile, was 
President of the Oxford University Conservative Association). 
The election-night coverage was notable for the 
disconnection between the shock and alarm that many in the 
audience felt about an unexpected win for the Conservative 
Party, and the guffawing banter of Neil and his associates. 
Reading out tweets and sharing gossip, the grinning Laura 
Kuenssberg, who has recently replaced Robinson as the BBC’s 
Political Editor, seemed to treat the whole evening as a jolly 
good laugh. Perhaps there isn’t that much at stake for her — 
she was, after all, born into immense privilege, the daughter 
of an OBE and a CBE, and the granddaughter of a founder and 
president of the Royal College of General Practitioners. 

But where does this tone — with its strange mixture of the 
middle-aged and the adolescent — come from? The quick 
answer is class background. The tone of light but relentless 
ridicule, the pose of not being seen to take things too 
seriously, has its roots in the British boarding school. In an 


article for the Guardian, Nick Duffell* argued that, from 
around the age of seven, boarders are required to adopt a 
“pseudo-adult” personality, which results, paradoxically, in 
their struggling “to properly mature, since the child who was 
not allowed to grow up organically gets stranded, as it were, 
inside them.” 

“Boarding children”, Duffell continues, 


invariably construct a survival personality that endures 
long after school and operates strategically [...] 
Crucially, they must not look unhappy, childish or 
foolish — in any way vulnerable — or they will be 
bullied by their peers. So they dissociate from all these 


qualities, project them out on to others, and develop 
3 


duplicitous personalities that are on the run. 

Now that the working-class perspective has been 
marginalised in the dominant British media and political 
culture, we increasingly live inside the mind of this 
psychically mutilated adolescent bourgeois male. Here, 
ostensible levity conceals deep fear and anxiety; self-mockery 
is a kind of homeopathic remedy that is used to ward off the 
threat of an annihilating humiliation. You must never appear 
too much of a swot; you must never look as if you might like 
or think anything that isn’t already socially approved. Even if 
you haven’t attended boarding school yourself, you are still 
required to operate in an emotional atmosphere set by those 
who did. Andrew Neil, who came from a working-class 
background and attended a grammar school, attained access 
to the top table by simulating the mores of the privately 
educated elite. Thatcherism depended on the conspicuous 
success of people like Neil — if they could make it, so could 
anyone. 

No programme did more to normalise the mode of 
mandatory light mockery than Have I Got News for You. In a 
2013 essay for the London Review of Books, “Sinking Giggling 
into the Sea”, Jonathan Coe positioned Have I Got News for You 


in a genealogy of British satire going back to the 1950s.* Coe 


argued that, back then, satire might have posed a threat to 
the authority of establishment politicians who expected 
unthinking deference from the electorate. Now, however, 
when politicians are routinely ridiculed and a weary cynicism 
is ubiquitous, satire is a weapon used by the establishment to 
protect itself. 

No one typifies this more than Boris Johnson. Coe points 
out that Johnson’s success crucially depended on _ his 
appearances — sometimes as guest presenter — on Have I Got 
News for You. The atmosphere of generalised sniggering 
allowed Johnson to develop his carefully cultivated, heavily 
mediated persona of “lovable, self-mocking buffoon”. The 
show allows Johnson to present himself as a hail-fellow-well- 
met everyman, not a member of an old Etonian elite. In this 
he has been abetted by his sometime antagonist Ian Hislop. 
Hislop always has the guffawing, self-satisfied air of a prefect 
who’s caught out some slightly posher kids stealing from the 
tuck shop. No matter what the infraction, Hislop’s response is 
always a supercilious snigger. While this snigger might be 
conceivably appropriate to MPs being caught with their 
trousers down, or even with their over-claiming on expenses, 
it seems grotesquely out of kilter with the kind of systemic 
corruption that we now know has occurred over the last 
thirty years in Britain, in everything from Hillsborough to the 
phone hacking scandal to paedophilia involving major 
establishment figures — not to mention the behaviours that 
led to the financial crash. As the editor of Private Eye, Hislop 
has played an important part in exposing these abuses. But 
on television his mocker-in-chief persona serves ultimately to 
neutralise and cover over the extremity and systematicity of 


the abuse: one snigger fits all situations. 

Coe’s discussion of Johnson is strikingly similar to the 
Italian philosopher Franco Berardi’s analysis of Silvio 
Berlusconi. Berlusconi’s popularity, Berardi argued, depended 
on his “ridiculing of political rhetoric and its stagnant 
rituals”. The voters were invited to identify “with the slightly 
crazy premier, the rascal prime minister who resembles 


them”. Like Johnson, Berlusconi was the fool who occupied 
the place of power, disdaining law and rules “in the name of a 
spontaneous energy that rules can no longer bridle”. 

In the UK, this concept of a “spontaneous energy that 
rules can no longer bridle” goes beyond politics in the narrow 
sense. The populist right-wing celebration of this energy is 
surely what kept Jeremy Clarkson in his job as a presenter of 
Top Gear for so long, and its appeal is what must have 
motivated over a million people to sign a petition calling for 
Clarkson to keep his job after he had punched a producer in 
the face. The prevailing media culture in the UK allows the 
privately educated Clarkson to come off as a plain-speaking 
man of the people, bravely saying what he thinks in the face 
of an oppressive “political correctness” that seeks to muzzle 
him. The success of Top Gear is another testament to the 
power — and, sadly, international appeal — of the English 
ruling-class male mentality. Who, more than Clarkson and his 
fellow presenters, better exemplifies this bizarre mixture of 
the middle-aged and the adolescent? What, after all, is it safer 
for a ruling-class adolescent male to like than cars? 

Clarkson is just one of a range of British television 
celebrities who play the role of pantomime villain; a persona 
entirely devoid of compassion for others. Except this is a 


pantomime with real blood. Take the former Apprentice star 
and Sun columnist Katie Hopkins, for instance. The UN high 
commissioner for human rights, Zeid Ra’ad Al Hussein, 
condemned her likening of refugees to “cockroaches” for its 
obvious echoes of Nazi rhetoric. Hopkins is allowed to get 
away with this because of what we might call the innate 
postmodernism of the English ruling class. Both she and 
Clarkson say hateful things, but with a twinkle in their eye 
and their eyebrows ever so slightly raised. 

There is an immense complexity at work in this ruling- 
class mummery. The humour allows Clarkson and Hopkins to 
be conduits for a racism that has very real, very tragic effects, 
whilst also letting them off the hook. The humour reassures 
them, and their audience, that they don’t really mean it. But 
the problem is that they don’t have to “mean” it: they help 
define the terms of debate, and allow migrants to be 
dehumanised, whatever their “true” feelings about the issue 
might be. 

However, Hopkins’ persona was troubled when she 
appeared on Celebrity Big Brother earlier this year. While much 
of the time she stayed in role as a spiteful, hard-hearted 
bigot, there were inevitably moments when the facade 
cracked, and she could be seen caring for others. While this 
increased her popularity — she almost won the show — it was 
also in danger of destroying the Katie Hopkins brand. 

Most tellingly, her greatest moments of vulnerability 
came when she was asked to accept tenderness from others. 
In order to survive in the harsh and emotionally retarded 
world of the English ruling-class male she was trained for in 
private school and at Sandhurst, Hopkins has clearly been 


required to forgo any public acceptance of warmth or 
kindness from others. Sadly, the wearing of such character 
armour is not now confined to Hopkins and the rest of the 
privately educated elite. 

Self-educated working-class culture generated some of 
the best comedy, music and literature in modern British 
history. The last thirty years have seen the bourgeoisie take 
over not only business and politics, but also entertainment 
and culture. In the UK, comedy and music are increasingly 
graduate professions, dominated by the privately educated. 
The sophistication of working-class culture — which 
combines laughter, intelligence and seriousness in complex 
ways — has been replaced by a grey bourgeois common sense, 
where everything comes swathed in a witless humour. It’s 
long past time that we stopped sniggering along with the 
emotionally damaged bourgeoisie, and learned once again to 
laugh and care with the working class. 


review: terminator 


genisys* 


Think Abbott and Costello Meets Terminator. Think 
Terminator & Robin. Think, in other words, the point at 
which a franchise subsides, perhaps finally, into self-parody. 

If the underrated Terminator Salvation (2009) drew on — 
and extended — all the machinic darkness of the first film, 
then Terminator Genisys returns to the playful PoMo of 
Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991). Indeed, the film is so mired 
in self-reference and in-jokes, you almost suspect that its 
writers and director must have been closely consulting 
Fredric Jameson’s remarks on pastiche in Postmodernism, or, 
the Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism. 

In retrospect, Terminator 2’s_ already _ irritating 
combination of cutesy smart alecry (“Hasta la vista, baby”) 
and apocalyptic foreboding laid out the formula for the 1990s 
postmodern thriller in the way that the Bond films did for the 
thrillers of the Sixties. The form was a kind of have-your- 
cake-and-eat-it mix of send-up and portentous melodrama 
(Linda Hamilton’s performance was so OTT that you wanted 


to say, “Chill out, it’s just a nuclear apocalypse”). 

That shtick feels played out far past the point of 
exhaustion now, and Terminator Genisys goes even more 
lightweight. It acts as if Terminator Salvation had never 
happened, emphatically rejecting its style and tone, and 
gorging on all the time-travel paradoxes that the previous 
film had sidelined. The set up returns us to the scenario of the 
first film. It sees Kyle Reese sent back into 1984 from the 
future. But Reese meets a Sarah Connor who is not at all what 
he expected. Rather than the disbelieving naif who has to be 
traumatically persuaded that she will become the mother of 
humanity’s future saviour, this already battle-hardened 
Connor knows more than Reese does. Aha, an alternative 
timeline: an excuse to run through so many remixed versions 
of the best-known sequences from the first two films, like so 
much microwave-reheated comfort food. 

By this point, we’ve already seen the original 1984 model 
of the Arnie Terminator blown away by an older Terminator 
(conveniently, it turns out that the Terminator skin and hair 
ages). This Terminator — whom Connor calls Pops — is 
essentially an older version of the protectivepatriarch 
Terminator of Terminator 2, but — you see — he always talks in 
very technical jargon, which makes for some deeply unfunny 
would-be humorous exchanges with Reese, who keeps asking 
if there is a switch he can use to turn this dialogue off. 

The presiding metaphysic here — a vision of total 
plasticity, in which nothing is final, everything can be redone 
— is, like everything else in this film, completely familiar. If 
the Terminator in the first film — a musclebound humanoid 
with metallic-robotic skeleton — was an image of work and 


technology in the Fordist era, then the T1000 gave us our first 
taste of the forms of capital and labour which were then 
emerging. No doubt, the T100’s protean capacity to adopt any 
form whatsoever initially seemed exciting — reflecting the 
promises of a new digital technologies, and of an unleashed 
capitalism, recently freed up from conflict with the Soviet 
empire. 

But by 2015 that excitement has long since flatlined. As 
with so much contemporary culture, Terminator Genisys feels 
simultaneously selfsatisfied and desperate, frenzied and 
boring. It is at one and the same time a desecration and 
plundering of the series’ past that is also pathetically 
reverential towards it. This sense of decadence makes the 
Batman & Robin parallel inevitable — with Arnie’s Pops 
uncomfortably recalling his  iconically disastrous 
performance as Mr Freeze. It isn’t only the presence of Matt 
Smith that makes one think of the smugly baroque narrative 
excrescences of recent Dr Who. 

In the end, however, what Terminator Genisys most 
resembles is something like a cross between the Back to the 
Future movies and The Butterfly Effect, but with none of the wit 
and ingenuity of the former, and little of the grim fatalism of 
the latter. In fact, it is the film’s absolute refusal of fatalism — 
its embracing, indeed, of a kind of radically open reality, in 
which nothing is fixed, everything can be redone — which 
gives Terminator Genisys its deeply affectless quality. The 
uncanny charge of the first film’s time loop — in which 
characters perform, apparently for the first time, acts that in 
some sense have always-already happened, is dissipated. No 
time loops here; just fuzzy and flabby spirals, which trail off 


into inconsequence, and which might very well be 
incoherent, if you could be bothered to care about them. 

But this is the problem — a film whose reality is this 
plastic, this recomposable, is simply impossible to care about 
on any level. As such, Terminator Genisys becomes a kind of 
dumb, unintentional parable about restructuring in late 
capitalism. Since anything can and will change soon, why 
bother to care about what is happening now? The whole film 
feels like a monument to pointless hard work. We’re left 
somewhat stupefied and perturbed by the vast amount of 
digital labour that has gone into something that is almost 
completely devoid of interest, and which it certainly feels like 
very hard work to watch. 


the house that fame 
built: celebrity big 


brother 


This summer’s Celebrity Big Brother (Channel 5) was like some 
Warholian nightmare. Long gone are the longueurs of the 
early Big Brother series, and the simplicity of its premise: put a 
group of people in a room, deprive them of contact with the 
outside world, have them vote one person out each week, and 
see what happens. Long forgotten also is the flimsy 
“scientific” justification for the show — the claim that it was a 
social experiment. The hyped-up atmosphere of 2015 will no 
longer permit even the illusion of such detachment. 

This year the overall format of the series, framed as a 
competition, not only amongst the individual housemates, 
but between “teams” representing the US and the UK, 
predictably provoked high tension early on. There were the 
familiar “tasks” — pointless activities, ranging from the daft 
to the humiliating — designed to foment discontent amongst 


the housemates. But this year, the producers’ interventions in 
the house amounted to prolonged psychological torture. This 
was all the more troubling, given that a number of the 
housemates were evidently fragile. The former TV presenter 
Gail Porter, who has a history of mental health problems, 
clearly struggled, “joking” on her exit from the house that it 
was worse than being sectioned. Model Austin Armacost, raw 
with anger and grief because his brother’s death had led to 
the crumbling of his family, was subject to violent mood 
swings, and at one point launched into a savage verbal attack 
on reality TV veteran Janice Dickinson. 

The obsession with “twists”, introduced to keep 
freshening the format, has produced a self-parodic situation 
where the only constant is perpetual instability. Rules on 
nominations were continually changed. Housemates would 
find nominations that they had supposed were happening in 
the “diary room”, seen only by the producers and the 
audience at home, broadcast to the whole house. Housemates 
were required to nominate in front of one another, which 
amounted to a demand that they denigrate each other in 
public. 

In one especially deceitful trick from the show’s 
producers, the two most aggressive American housemates — 
reality TV personality Farrah Abraham and former porn star 
Jenna Jameson — were apparently evicted, taken to a hidden 
part of the house and told they were watching the other 
housemates in secret. In fact, the other housemates were fully 
aware of Abraham and Jameson’s fake eviction, so the last 
laugh — a hollow, spiteful laugh — was on them. 

For the roots of this televisual culture, we need to look 


back forty years. In his book 1973 Nervous Breakdown: 
Watergate, Warhol, and the Birth of Post-Sixties America, Andreas 
Hillen persuasively argues that the threshold into our current 
era of reality/celebrity was 1973, the year of the Watergate 
hearings, and the year that the first reality TV programme, 


An American Family, was broadcast.” 

The ephemerality of celebrity status was of course 
anticipated by Andy Warhol’s quip about everyone being 
famous for fifteen minutes, but Warhol’s most extraordinary 
prescience lay in his understanding of the specificity of 
celebrity, its difference from the older mystique and glamour 
of the Hollywood star. Whereas the star was soft-focus and 
associated with film, the celebrity emerged from the new 
accessibility that television appeared to promise. 

Celebrity culture was nowhere better illustrated than in 
Warhol’s Interview magazine. Like Watergate, Interview was 
made possible by taping. The interviews, which ranged over 
the trivial minutiae of its subjects’ lives, were transcripts; 
they weren’t framed by the interposing persona of the writer. 
Yet Warhol understood that tape recording did not capture 
an unmediated real. Rather — and as Warhol’s admirer Jean 
Baudrillard recognised — ubiquitous taping destroyed any 
illusion that such a real existed. Instead, there would now 
only be an anxious and unanswerable question: are those who 
are recorded performing for the tape or the camera? (Some 
said they felt that Nixon, at the heart of a White House 
riddled with recording apparatus, would often seem to say 
things for the benefit of the tape.) 

The intrusion of the cameras into the Loud family’s lives 
in An American Family prompted all kinds of anxious 


discussions: did the cameras affect what they were recording? 
As Hillen points out, the series wasn’t only “Warholian” — 
there was an actual connection with Warhol. Lance Loud had 
corresponded with Warhol since the late 1960s, and An 
American Family featured scenes of Lance mingling with some 
of Warhol’s superstars, the clique of New York personalities 
he promoted, in the Chelsea Hotel. 

Not least because he was a victim of it, Warhol was 
sensitive to the volatile combination of violence and celebrity 
in the pop landscape. With Celebrity Big Brother in 2015, it is 
clear that this aggression has become overwhelming. Ever 
since An American Family, reality TV has provoked feelings of 
guilt and complicity in the audience. To what extent are we 
responsible for the suffering we are watching? With Celebrity 
Big Brother this summer, those feelings became acute, almost 
unbearable. The programme became a prolonged exercise in 
intense cruelty, which made the early Big Brother, not to 
mention An American Family, seem quaintly genteel. What has 
happened in the fifteen years since Big Brother was first 
broadcast in the UK to account for this increase in savagery? 

The simple answer involves two closely related factors: 
shifts in the economy, and the ubiquity of the internet. The 
resulting composite — capitalist cyberspace — has normalised 
extreme precariousness (the sense that nothing is permanent, 
everything is constantly under threat), competitiveness and 
casual aggression. One consequence is a new breed of 
celebrity, typified by twenty-four-year-old Farrah Abraham, 
the unofficial star of the latest Celebrity Big Brother. Abraham, 
who came to fame on MTV’s Teen Mom, is a Darwinian product 
of the harsh, unremitting spotlight of twenty-first-century 


celebrity/reality TV. Abraham has quite literally made a 
career out of being hateful. It’s what the audience, and 
therefore the TV producers, seems to want. She became the 
most successful of the Teen Moms by being obnoxious and 
antagonistic — her whole life becoming a performance art 
piece in which she played the one-dimensional role of a 
person devoid of compassion, nonchalantly dismissive and 
contemptuous of others practically all the time. But why 
would Abraham have any cause to mend her ways? She has 
been immensely rewarded. The performance of 
invulnerability is both her “brand” and a survival strategy. 

In the atmosphere of cut-throat uncertainty that prevails 
in late-capitalist television, trusting others is a luxury that no 
one, not even the super-rich, can afford. The grimace of scorn 
on Abraham’s face — surgically enhanced, permanently lip- 
glossed — is both a protective mask and her unique selling 
point. Allied with the similarly harsh Jenna Jameson in the 
Celebrity Big Brother house, Abraham came off as a comic 
figure, but one that no one could actually laugh at. Her one- 
note hostility and bisarre insults — “You're full of Satan” — 
were absurd, but too full of actual malice to leave anything 
but a bitter taste in the mouth. There was also something 
darkly comic about the relentlessly aggressive and insulting 
Jameson and Abraham attacking others for their “negativity”. 
Both seemed to be the endpoint of a therapeutic culture 
which lays all the emphasis on shoring up one’s own ego — 
even to the point of becoming delusional. 

The rise of social media, and the fear it has produced in 
television executives, means that shows like Celebrity Big 
Brother are saturated with anxiety — not only the anxiety of 


the housemates, who are often selected for their hair-trigger 
tempers or psychic weaknesses, but the anxiety of the 
producers, always looking for the next hashtag outrage, for 
provocations that will go viral. This anxiety, and the 
surrounding social situation that engenders it, takes us 
beyond the cool ambivalence of Warhol’s aesthetic. 

As Hillen points out, Warhol certainly enjoyed, even 
cultivated, the selfdestruction of figures such as Edie 
Sedgwick and Candy Darling. But he also imbued them with a 
tenderness and a tragic grandeur that has no place on reality 
TV in the twenty-first century. No tragedy now — only 
spasms of soon-to-be-forgotten outrage, ejaculations of 
hatred and suffering snacked on like fast food. 


sympathy for the 
androids: the 


twisted morality of 


westworld! 


The problem with all actually existing theme parks is that 
they aren’t actually very themed. The theme parks that have 
been built so far are really amusement parks, the theming 
acting as decoration for what are still, at bottom, old- 
fashioned thrill rides. The tendency in the latest rides is for a 
fusion with cinema, via the inclusion of 3D digital sequences 
— just as 3D cinema itself increasingly tends towards a ride’s 
logic of sensation. The immersion, such as it is, is confined 
within the rides, which remain discrete partial worlds, with 
clearly marked exits and entrances. Even if the theming is 
somewhat well executed, it is let down by the paying 
customers. Wandering around clutching cameras and wearing 


jeans, whatever world or historical period they are supposed 
to be in, the park visitors remain spectators, their identity as 
tourists preserved. 

Michael Crichton’s 1973 film Westworld tried to imagine 
what a genuine theme park would look like. There were no 
separate “attractions” here, and therefore no meta-zone in 
which the visitors were invited to return to their own 
identities. In the Westworld park, there was no readily 
apparent difference between the visitors and the androids 
that populated the park. Like the androids, the visitors were 
required to dress and comport themselves as if they belonged 
to the Old West. The appeal of Westworld — and _ its 
companion parks, Roman World and Medieval World — was of 
crossing over into an environment from which all signs of the 
contemporary had been expunged. Instead of the limited 
immersion offered by rides, the park offered a whole world. 
Inevitably, the meta crept in, via the visitors’ self- 
consciousness, their awareness of their differences from the 
androids (which were manifested most emphatically in the 
asymmetry whereby — initially at least — the guests can 
“kill” the androids, but not vice versa). 

The recurring theme in Crichton’s science fiction — 
broached most famously in his Jurassic Park novels — was the 
impossibility of predicting and controlling emergent 
phenomena. Westworld, like Jurassic Park after it, becomes the 
model for a kind of managerial hubris, in which the capacity 
of elements in a system to self-organise in ways that are not 
foreseeable is fatally underestimated. One of the notable 
features of the original Westworld film was its early 
mainstreaming of the possibility of a machinic virus: it is a 


non-biotic contagion of this sort that causes the androids, led 
by a memorably implacable, black-clad Yul Brynner, to go off- 
programme and start killing the park guests. 

In expanding Westworld from a ninety-minute science 
fiction movie into an extended television series for HBO, Lisa 
Joy and Jonathan Nolan have retained most of the core 
elements from the film, but shifted the emphasis. The glitch 
that starts to worry the park’s designers and managers is a 
cognitive failure rather than a predilection towards violence: 
a kind of android dementia that may be the symptom of 
emergent consciousness amongst the “hosts”, as the androids 
are called in the series. As the park’s chief founder, 
conceptualist and demiurge, Robert Ford (Anthony Hopkins) 
recognises that a glitch is something more than a mere 
failure. “Evolution”, he observes, “forged the entirety of 
sentient life on this planet using only one tool: the mistake”. 
Ford seems more fascinated than panicked by the prospect of 
a new wave of mutations in the hosts’ artificial psyches. 

In this version of Westworld, it isn’t the threat of violence 
against humans that commands our attention so much as the 
routine brutality to which the hosts are subjected. Ford 
justifies this by insisting that the androids “are not real”, that 
they “only feel what we tell them to feel”. Yet it’s not fully 
clear what criteria for reality he is employing, nor why 
feelings cease to be real when they are programmed. 
Wouldn’t forcing others to feel what we want them to feel be 
the very definition of violence? There is ample evidence in 
the series that the androids can experience distress: an 
indication, surely, that they are beings worthy of moral 
concern. 


Much of the park’s allure rests on the gap between the 
hosts’ capacity to feel suffering and their legal status as mere 
machines. Many of the hardened repeat visitors to the park — 
especially the so-called Man in Black (a superbly menacing Ed 
Harris) — specifically enjoy the pain and struggling of the 
androids. As the Man in Black tells Dolores (Evan Rachel 
Wood), the host cast in the role of sweet and wholesome 
farmgirl, it wouldn’t be half as much fun if she didn’t resist 
him. Others enjoy displaying indifference to the hosts’ 
agonies. In one horrifying early scene, a guest impales the 
hand of a prospector-host with a knife, chiding his 
companion for being tempted by such an un-engaging 
narrative as gold-hunting. 

It has been said that the fantasy underlying sadism is of a 
victim that can endlessly suffer. The hosts materialise this 
fantasy: they can be repeatedly brutalised, repeatedly 
“killed”, in an infinity of suffering. Ennui has always been 
both an occupational hazard and a badge of honour for the 
Sadean libertine, and some of the repeat visitors display an 
ironic and bored affect. Hence the ambivalent attitude of 
these guests towards the hosts — at once treating them as 
dehumanised objects of abuse and as creatures who share 
fellow feelings. If the hosts were nothing more than empty 
mechanisms, what enjoyment could be derived from 
humiliating and destroying them? Yet if the hosts were 
accorded equivalent moral status with the guests, then how 
could their abuse be justified? The hosts are protected from 
the full horror to which they are subjected by memory wipes, 
which allow them to return renewed and ready for more 
abuse, each time they are reset. The guests exist in a 


continuous time, while the hosts are locked into loops. 

What the hosts lack is not consciousness — they possess a 
form of consciousness that has been deliberately limited or 
blinkered — but an unconscious. Deprived of memory and the 
capacity to dream, the androids can be wounded but not 
traumatised. Yet there are signs that precisely this capacity 
to experience trauma is developing in some of the hosts, 
especially Dolores and the brothel madam, Maeve (Thandie 
Newton). Dolores is increasingly subject to flashbacks, which 
we must understand not as glitches but as the first stirrings 
of memory, a recollection of her previous iterations. Maeve, 
meanwhile, is tormented by fragmentary images of hooded 
figures tampering with her half-sleeping body. In fact, this is 
a memory of a botched repair procedure, which she 
witnessed because she was not properly put into sleep-mode 
while being fixed. In one of the most unsettling scenes in the 
series, the panicked and bewildered Maeve escapes from the 
hospital-cumrepair space, and stumbles around the aseptic 
compound, which — littered with decommissioned naked 
host bodies — must look to her like an atrocity scene. In 
attempting to solve the mystery of the inexplicable images 
which haunt her, Maeve comes to resemble a combination of 
Leonard in the film Memento and an alien abduction victim. 

With few exceptions, the human beings in Westworld are a 
charmless bunch. Their behaviour runs a gamut from the 
savagery of some of the guests to the banal bickering and 
corporate competitiveness of the park’s designers, managers 
and engineers. By contrast, Dolores and Maeve’s struggle to 
understand what they are — alternating between thinking 
there is something wrong with their minds and something 


wrong with their world — possesses a kind of metaphysical 
lyricism. Their coming to consciousness looks like being the 
precondition for a very different android rebellion than that 
which took place in the 1973 film. This time, it’s hard not be 
on the side of the hosts. 


PART 
THREE 


CHOOSE YOUR 
WEAPONS: 
WRITING ON 
MUSIC 


the by now 
traditional glasto 


rant! 


“What really drives student entrepreneurs into a 
premature commercial detachment is their audiences. 
Every new ents officer learns from first-term results; 
black music has no student draw; known bands are 
preferred to unknown bands; no one in the student 
union cares who the latest critical cult figures are. 
Students are the great, middle-class, middle-brow 
bastion of British rock and, after twenty years, their 
tastes aren’t about to be shaken.” 


— Simon Frith, “Afterthoughts”2 


So wrote Simon Frith in 1985. Well, after twenty further 
years, I see no reason to revise Frith’s judgement. 

These reflections have been prompted by Glastonbury, 
naturally, which is now nearly officially the end-of-college- 


year prom for Britain’s student (and graduate) population. 
I should preface my remarks here by referring to Ian 


Penman’s’ comments of more or less this time last year — 
and if anyone doubts what a LOSS Ian Penman is, and I’m sure 


no one does, just read his Glastonburial 03 posts.* Like 
Penman, I feel annoyed at myself for letting it get to me. The 
Pawboy put it perfectly: “I still get agitated, perplexed — I 
wouldn’t actually say ‘depressed’, that’s not true — but 
something like Glastonbury irks and niggles me, still, in a way 
I wish it didn’t. I really do wish it didn’t. Could you P-L-E-A-S- 
E knock me off my feet, for a while? P-L-E-A-S-E knock me off 
my feet for a while... ‘Cos there’s a GAAXY OF EMPTINESS 
tonight.” 

All that said, and obviously I didn’t GO — Christ, you 
didn’t imagine that IN A MILLION YEARS I would, did you? — 
and obviously the telly coverage is as nothing compared to 
the real experience: cos there’s like MUD there (and weren’t 
Jo Wiley’s mud anecdotes abso-fucking-lutely, screamingly 
hilarious?), and FIRE-EATERs and JUGGLERS... (Has any 
cultural event of any significance ever happened whenever a 
juggler is within a hundred mile radius?) Penman again: “I 
mean, music in a field — in the daytime? Wtf? It’s almost 
deliberately delibidinising...” 

But that’s the agenda, really, the secret purpose of this 
now unopposed embourgeoisement of rock culture UK. 
What’s positively sinister about Glastonbury now is that it’s 
not just accidentally crap, it’s systematically crap — the hidden 
message screams out: it’s all finished, roll up, roll up, for the 
necrophiliac spectacle, it’s all over. 

ABANDON ALL CULTURAL VITALITY ALL YE WHO ENTER 


HERE. 

Those who only remember the past are condemned to 
repeat it. 

Forever. 

The bill was almost parodically LCD MOR, so safe and 
organic and wholesome and _ unimpeachable and 
uncontroversial: Macca! Oasis! Franz Ferdinand! 

No black folks of course unless they’re well into their 
sixties James Brown; Toots and the Maytals), but no whiteys 
EITHER unless they’re into their sixties (Macca) or sound like 
they could be in their sixties (Franz Ferdinand, Scissor Sisters) 


Go along with Mum and Dad, read the Guardian, smoke 
some dope — the whole of rock history fugged out into some 
blandly beneficent museum of dead forms, all breaks, 
discontinuities, ruptures edited out or incorporated back in 
(the “Dance” stage), their force and novelty subdued and 
airbrushed into a joyless carnival of secondhand history for 
the stupefied delectation of the Last Men... (And didn’t they 
look so BORED? Well, wouldn’t you?) 

The significance of generation gaps wasn’t the tired 
Oedipal merry-go-round so much as that they pointed to a 
culture of constant renewal — how long is a generation? In 
any vital culture, it’s a matter of weeks or months, here? 
Well, the fact that the generation gap doesn’t make any sense 
any more at Glastonbury — balding accountants getting down 
to Basement Jaxx, Jemima studying Fine Arts at Sussex being 
“blown away” by Macca (“he was so gid!”) — is a sure sign 
that this is a “culture” as energetic as the contents of one of 
Hirst’s tanks. 


RESPECT, respect for everyone... (when culture demands 
respect, when respect is the appropriate response to culture, 
you know it’s either died in its sleep or been killed). Respect is 
how they killed Shakespeare, make it all a part of the National 
Heritage... 

A tactical nuclear strike would have taken out virtually 
everything that’s debilitating, deadening and reactive about 
the Brit culture industry (the whole NME staff: bargain!), 
much of the current ruling class and a significant portion of 
our future masters too (all those aspiring Tony Blairs). 

Once the bombers have hit Glasto, set the co-ordinates for 
Ibiza, things might start improving around here... 


art pop, no, really! 


If we’re going to discuss art pop, we really ought to forget 
Franz Ferdinand and Scissor Sisters and talk about Moloko. 

I saw them last night at the otherwise desultory Common 
Ground festival in Clapham, an event whose line-up was as 
limp as its name was uninspired. 

Gratifyingly, by the way, Common Ground wasted no time 
in confirming all my prejudices about festivals (and then 
some): those on the stage haplessly attempted to muster 
some enthusiasm from bored punters, who wandered around 
listlessly in a sunlight inimical to pop’s mystique, Strongbow 
in their hand, kid on their shoulder. We weren’t the only 
people to sit and read the paper for a while. 

The bill was shocking. It felt like a local council free event, 
the organisers under the lamentable misapprehension that 
they’ll appear “with it” by booking “dance” acts such as the 
oppressively lumpen stodge of Freestylers (a candidate for my 
worst band ever, actually; I mean, at least the Stereophonics 
don’t taint rap and dancehall by association) and the Dub 
Pistols. These cloddish white appropriations of hip-hop, drum 
‘n’ bass and dancehall are dis-spiritingly, missing-the-point 
funkless and morosely male (even when they use female 


vocalists). If their diabolic intent was to systematically 
convert some of the most exciting, cutting-edge music of 
recent years into a dull migraine thud, they couldn’t have 
done a more ruthlessly efficient job. 

And then Moloko arrived, Rdisin, preposterously but 
marvellously, in a helmet, like Boudicca come to retake 
London. 

Roisin is every inch the pop star. Pop stars are a rare 
breed at the best of times but they’re scarce to the point of 
near-extinction now. (There are more pop singers and 
“celebrities” than you can shake a stick at, of course...) It’s 
partly a question of style, partly of glamour, but mostly it’s to 
do with charisma. 

In its original meaning, charisma meant “a gift from God”. 
Appropriate. For charisma is dispensed according to fate’s 
inegalitarian whim. Roisin has it. No amount of bluster, sweat 
or sinew will allow the likes of the Freestylers to acquire it, 
even though the resentful, levelling spirit of the times would 
have it otherwise. 

So Roisin arrives and you can feel the change in the air. 
Where before the stage was a libido-draining vortex (DJs on 
stage — just one question: why?), now it radiates energy, 
excitement and electricity. Charisma, it’s almost a physical 
thing. 

Roisin has a glamour which includes sexual attractiveness 
but it is not reducible to it. Glamour originally meant a spell 
cast by women to entrance men — Roisin is certainly 
capitivating, but not only to men. 

If (viz Foucault) sex is ubiquitous and compulsory, 
glamour is now subtly forbidden. With the Baudrillard of 


Seduction, a book which could serve as a bible of glam, we 
could even see sex — in all its directness, in all its supposed 
lack of concealment — as a way of warding off glamour’s 
ambivalence. 

Much more successfully than derivative dullards like the 
thankfully now forgotten dull-as-a_ carpark-in-Croydon 
Suede, Moloko reconnect with the glam discontinuum which 
was ostensibly terminated by acid house’s “equity culture” in 
the late Eighties. Glam also had a terminator of an entirely 
different nature: hip-hop’s in-equity culture of conspicuous 
bling, one of the most unfortunate side-effects of which has 
been the rise of sportswear (surely one of the most 
depressing sights now, and not only because of its implied 
menace: a group of male teenagers dressed in tracksuits and 
hoods). 

That quotidian functionalism is today’s equivalent of the 
agrarian organicism from which Seventies glam revolted into 
style. Glam repudiated hippie’s “nature” in the name of 
artifice; disdained its fugged, bleary vision of equality for a 
Nietzschean-aristocratic insistence upon hierarchy; rejected 
its unscrubbed beardiness in order to cultivate Image. (Image 
and great pop are indissoluble. Maybe the integral role of 
Image is what separates pop from folk. Certainly, art pop, 
from Roxy to Jones to the New Romantics, is unthinkable 
outside fashion.) 

Madonna carried traces of the glam aesthetic over into 
the pop mainstream in the Eighties, but a more obvious 
precursor for Réisin is Grace Jones (about whom k-punk must 
write extensively in the very near future). Like art poppers 
such as Bryan Ferry (whose “Love is the Drug”, she famously 


vamped), Jones’ take on pop was essentially conceptual; at the 
same time, she knew that concepts without sensual 
instantiation are as worthless in pop as they are in art (a 
lesson some of our contemporary “artists” would do well to 
heed). Incidentally, an appreciation of the concept is one of 
the many things that Franz Ferdinand lack that was there in 
their inspirations. (Actually, FF are like a copy made by an 
alien race, which maintains all the superficial features of the 
original, but misses the essential.) 

Roisin has that paradoxical duality which comes as second 
nature to the compelling performer: she is both meticulously 
obsessed with her image and, at the same time, apparently 
indifferent to what she looks like. This comes over in her 
dancing. There is none of the over-rehearsed choreography of 
the Pop Idol puppet. Like Jagger’s and Ferry’s, Rdisin’s 
movement can occasionally look ungainly and gauche. 
Sometimes we feel that we’ve caught her prancing in front of 
the mirror. 

It’s partly this that gives her a distance from her image 
that isn’t camp, or at least not camp in the Kylie sense. There 
is an enjoyment there (this is one of many things that 
separates Roisin from Kylie: Kylie’s air hostess 
professionalism exudes grim determination, never 
enjoyment). Principally though not of course exclusively, this 
enjoyment is her own, an enjoyment that partly derives from 
being the object of attention, but which goes beyond that. 
Like all great performers, Rdisin onstage enters a kind of 
performance trance, attaining the innocence of a child at 
play, to use Nietzsche’s beautifully resonant phrase. Her 
costume changes — including fetish boots and a military cap 


for “Pure Pleasure Seeker” — have the deranged playfulness 
of a girl riffling through a dressing-up box. 

Just as Moloko give the lie to the accepted wisdom that 
dance music must be delivered by hooded anonymities, so 
they also expose the flimsiness of the alibi that Franz 
Ferdinand offer for indie conservatism: the idea that art pop 
must be retro. Moloko’s engagement with house and techno 
recalls Roxy’s dallyings with funk and Jones’ extraordinary 
Sly-and-Robbie assisted construction of a wonderfully elastic 
dubfunk. Any funk in Franz Ferdinand is third hand, an 
appropriation of an appropriation. 

The third shibboleth that Moloko demolish is the notion 
that dance music can’t be performed live. If you’d left before 
they came on, you would have gone home convinced that this 
was the case, as group after group trudged offstage having 
failed to capture the precision-engineered thrill of the rap or 
d ‘n’ b studio production. Not so with Moloko. 

For the most part the group are as reluctant to take the 
limelight as Rdisin is delighted to bathe in it. Perhaps because 
of this, they are an unbelievably efficient mutagenic sonic 
machine, dilating tracks into anti-climactic plateaus with the 
same skill that a brilliant producer uses in the studio to 
sequence an extended version. You know you've arrived at a 
plateau when it feels like the track could continue 
indefinitely or end immediately. This happened with every 
track last night. No doubt this is because the songs provide 
such a strong basis for improvisation. Does anyone in pop at 
the moment, apart from maybe Destiny’s Child, have a 
sequence of high-quality singles to rival Moloko’s run from 
“Sing It Back” to last year’s “Forever More”? Like the Junior 


Boys, Moloko’s whole existence demonstrates that rhythmic 
innovation and spine-tingling songwriting do not have to be 
mutually exclusive. (Why did we ever think they were?) 

Misleading, then, to select highlights, but the set is deftly 
constructed, so that the last three tracks pack the most 
impact: “Forever More”, with its anempathic house bass, 
Roisin plucking and shredding petals from an enormous 
bunch of roses as she delivered its gorgeous blues plaint; 
“Sing It Back”, which they’ve expanded into a deluxe suite, a 
song as a sequence of different possibilities; and finally the 
enigmatic “Indigo”, which begins all Moroder-minimal, just 
Rdisin, a drum machine and an electro throb, then builds into 
a mighty cake-walk riff, as brutally bass-heavy as the Fall at 
their most punitive. 

The only drawback? Roisin said that it'll be a long time 
until Moloko play in London again. 

Damn. 


k-punk, or the 


glampunk art pop 


discontinuum 


\Gla’mour\, n. [Scot. glamour, glamer; cf. Icel. 
gl[‘almegegdr one who is troubled with the glaucoma (?); 
or Icel. gl[=a]m-s?ni weakness of sight, glamour; 
gl[=a]mr name of the moon, also of a ghost + s?ni sight 
akin to E. see. Perh., however, a corruption of E. 
gramarye.| 


1. A charm affecting the eye, making objects appear 
different from what they really are. 

2. Witchcraft; magic; a spell — Tennyson. 

3. A kind of haze in the air, causing things to appear 
different from what they really are. 

4, Any artificial interest in, or association with, an 


object, through which it appears delusively magnified 
or glorified. 


1 


Glamour gift, Glamour might, the gift or power of 
producing a glamour. The former is used figuratively, of 
the gift of fascination peculiar to women. 


“Every woman has the instinct and the ability to make 
the most of her charms. It is an excellent thing to give 
oneself without love or pleasure: by keeping one’s self- 
control, one reaps all the advantages of the situation.” 


— Leopold von Sacher-Masoch, Venus in Furs? 


Glam IS punk; historically and conceptually. 

As Simon Reynolds argued (what must be a year ago now), 
it was glam that made the break which allowed punk to 
happen. 

Essentially, glam returned pop to the working-class 
audience disgusted and turned by the hippies’ lazy sleaze. 

For all its “androgynous” imagery, hippie was 
fundamentally a middleclass male phenomenon. It was about 
males being allowed to regress to that state of His Majesty the 
Ego hedonic infantilism, with women on hand to service all 
their needs. (If you don’t believe me — and I'll level with you 
I’m very far from being an objective commentator on hippie 
lol — read Atwood’s Cold Rationalist classic Surfacing to see 
how “liberating” this was for the women who lived through 
it.) 

Thus even Zarathustra/another time loser/could believe 
in you... 

Seventies glam played the Nietzsche of Beyond Good and 
Evil and The Genealogy of Morals (the Nietzsche who celebrated 
aristocracy, nobility and mastery) against the young 


Dionysian Nietzsche. As Simon argued: 


Glam’s tendency (through its shifting of emphasis 
toward the visual rather than sonic, spectacle rather 
than the swarm-logic of noise and crowds) towards the 
Classical as opposed to Romantic. Glam as anti- 
Dionysian. The Dionysian being essentially democratic, 
vulgar, levelling, abolishing rank; about creating 
crowds, turbulence, a rude commotion, a rowdy 
communion. Glam being about monumentalism, 


turning yourself into a statue, a stone idol.° 


But glam rectified the genetic fallacy that haunted 
Nietzsche’s thinking. While there’s no doubt that Nietzsche’s 
analysis of the deadening effects of slave-moralising 
“egalitarian” levelling in Beyond Good and Evil and The 
Genealogy of Morals identified the sick mind virus that had 
Western culture locked into life-hating dis-intensification- 
unto-death, his paeans to slaveowning aristocratic culture 
made the mistake of thinking that nobility could be 
guaranteed by social background. 

Nobility is precisely a question of values; i.e. an ethical 
stance, that is to say, a way of behaving. As such, it is 
available to anyone with the will and desire to acquire it — 
even, presumably, the bourgeoisie, although their whole 
socialisation teaches them to resist and loathe it. More than 
anyone, Nietzsche understood that the European 
bourgeoisie’s deep hostility to “the notion of superiority” 
concealed a viciously resentful psychopathology. 

If Nietzschean atheology says: We must become God, 


bourgeois secularism says: No one may be greater than me — 
not even God. 

Everyone knows that there has always been a deep affinity 
between the working class and _ the aristocracy. 
Fundamentally aspirational, working-class culture is foreign 
to the levelling impulse of bourgeois culture — and of course 
this can be politically ambivalent, since if aspiration is about 
the pursuit of status and authority, it will confirm and 
vindicate the bourgeois world. It is only if the desire to escape 
inspires taking a line of flight towards the proletarian 
collective body and Nu-earth that it is politically positive. 

Glam was a return to the Mod moment(um) that had been 
curtailed by the hippie hedonic longeur of the late Sixties. 
Like most names for subcultural groups, the term “Mod” 
started off life as an insult, in this case hailing from the mods’ 
perpetual adversaries, the rockers. As Jeff Nuttall explains, to 
the rockers, “‘Mod’ meant effeminate, stuck-up, emulating 
the middle classes, apsiring to a competitive sophistication, 


snobbish, phony.”4 

But no dilettante/or filigree fancy/beats the plastic you 

Mods in the Sixties were very different from how they 
appear in the designer cappuccino froth of Eighties soul- 
cialist retro-mythologisation. It was the rockers who 
appealed to the “authentic” and the “natural’: their rebellion 
posed as a Rousseauistic resistance to civilisation and mass 
(produced) culture. The mods, on the other hand, embraced 
the hyperartificial: for them, Nuttall wrote, “alienation had 
become something of a deliberate stance”. Nobility was not 
innate for mods: rather, it was something to be attained, 
through a ruthless de-naturalisation of the body via 


decoration and chemical alteration. 

The mods were in every sense hooked on speed, and the 
black American music they gulped down with their bennies 
and coffees was consumed in the same spirit and for the same 
reasons: as an accelerator, an intensifier, an artificial source 
of ecstasy. That is, as a chemical rush into Now, NOT as some 
timeless expression of pride and dignity. 

In the desire (my official position on this now btw is that 
“libido” should be used in place of “desire”)-pleasure 
relation, there is a third, occluded term: sensuality. 

The hippies’ sloppy, ill-fitting clothes, unkempt 
appearance and fuzzed-out psychedelic fascist drug talk 
displayed a disdain for sensuality characteristic of the 
Western master class. (“Hey man, it’s all about the MIND.”) 

When hippies rose from their supine hedono-haze to 
assume power (a very short step), they brought their 
contempt for sensuality with them. Brute functional 
utilitarianism plus aesthetic sloppiness and an imperturbable 
sense of their own rights are the hallmarks of the bourgeois 
sensibility (look at all those shops in Stoke Newington that 
say they’ll open “tennish” and you know exactly what class 
youre dealing with). 

The hippie power class wanted power without having to 
go to the effort of power dressing. Naturally, middle-class 
hippie “feminists” never missed a stride in their move from 
alleged egalitarianism to supercilious judgementalism. What 
is the disdain for cosmetics and clothes if not an attack on the 
working class? The assumption of bourgeois so-called 
feminists is that their lives of neurotic bed-hopping 
“freedom” and Carrie Bradshawing perpetual adolescent 


equivocation are better than the working-class pattern of 
(once) getting married young and (now) having children 
young, when it is clear that it is just another trap — and not 
necessarily a more congenial one. 

Now the bourgeois philistines have destroyed glam and 
returned us to their preferred aesthetic mode: Romanticism. 
The contemporary bourgeois Romantic has_ realised 
Romanticism in its most distilled form yet. The socalled 
Romantic poets, musicians and painters of the late- 
eighteenth and_ early-nineteenth century remained 
sensualists, whereas our contemporary Romantics are defined 
by their view that sensuality is at best an irrelevance, a 
distraction from the important business of the expression of 
subjectivity. 

Romanticism is the dressing-up of Teenage Ontology as an 
aesthetic cosmology. Teenage Ontology is governed by the 
conviction that what really matters is interiority: how you feel 
inside, and what your experiences and opinions are. In this 
sense, sloppy drunkard Ladette Tracy Emin is one of the most 
Romantic artists ever. Like Lads — the real inheritors of the 
hippie legacy — Emin’s bleary, blurry, beery, leery, lairy anti- 
sensualist sensibility is an advert for the vacuity of her own 
preferences. 

What we find in Emin, Hirst, Whiteread and whoever the 
idiot was who rebuilt his dad’s house in the Tate is a disdain 
for the artificial, for art as such, in a desperately naif bid to 
(re)present that pre-Warholian, pre-Duchampian, pre- 
Kantian unadorned Real. Like our whole won’t-getfooled- 
again PoRoMo culture, what they fear above all is being 
glamoured. Remember that glamour means, “Any artificial 


interest in, or association with, an object, through which it appears 
delusively magnified or glorified.” 

But let’s make our case by considering some artefacts in 
some detail. 


Exhibit one: the cover of Roxy Music’s For Your Pleasure, 1973. 

The cover image is a mistresspiece of ambivalence. 

Let’s approach it through the eyes of Ian Penman, the 
most consummate of Roxy observers. (No doubt, Penman, like 
me, is endlessly drawn back to Ferry because he took the 
same journey from the working class into acceptance into the 
English master class). 

(I make no apologies for citing Penman’s text, “The 
Shattered Glass: Notes on Bryan Ferry” at some length, since 
it is almost criminal that this bravura display of theoretical 
elegance should be mouldering amidst the pages of a long- 


forgotten, chalk dusty Cult Studs collection).° 


On the shoreline of For Your Pleasure, beneath it, on the 
waterfront strand, stands the second of many new 
models: at first sight the second installation of the stock 
Ferry/ Roxy woman. 


But to get the full picture we have to fold out the sleeve, so 
that we can see Ferry looking on... 
Penman goes on: 


Ferry fills out his function as her chauffeur (landlocked 
ferryman: a sign of the times). He waits in amused 
admiration, surveying the neatness of the visual pun — 
the model takes her cat (for a) walk: forming a uniform 


and uniformly predatory alliance with her black 
panther, eyes and mouth directed out at the viewer. 
Imperiously, she takes the air, she fields his grace, takes 
her anima for a prowl and a stretch. Ferry — for sure — 
remains to be seen, smiling manfully behind her back, 
artfully protected by the fold in his sleeve. He had 
arranged his own look as both within and outside of the 
main frame. 


(“Within and outside of the main frame: is that so often where we 
find ourselves, lost, stranded, these days—?”) 
Cut. 


She is a model woman, to be sure; fashion pushing into 
abstraction and rarified codification, not there for the 
benefit of a product as such or altogether in the name 
of Art; so she appears to be what? She appears, on the 
condition that she appear to be without attributes. We 
can attribute nothing to her beyond a certain imaginary 
realm of wealth, of wealth as fetish, (Helmut) Newton’s 
law of physiques. She is sheerest sharp blue 
nothingness. (For the cool-and-blue post-Duchamp 
artist, it seems entirely for beauty to take the veiled 
form of scissors.) 


As an aside, since this concerns another debate: the last things 
Ferry’s songs were — at this stage at least — were “just good 
tunes”. The first thing they were, were questions: including 
questions about what a good tune might mean... 

And — at this stage — Ferry’s songs were no more “love 
songs” than Magritte’s “Human Condition” was a 


representation of a landscape. Like Magritte, Ferry’s sheer 
coldness and distantiation cannot but draw our attention to 
the framing machines that make possible the emotions of 
which he sings. 

Another cut, to a “realm of a certain narcissistic eroticism 
he is not allowed entrance to without putting his 
heterosexual sensibility in doubt”: 


All his songs’ women (and this will be especially so with 
“Stranded” and subsequent plaints) are voiceless sirens 
who — although wielding the utmost power over the 
artist’s life and sensibility — seem to be without 
implication (which is to say: eternalised out of 
existence). Neutered time and place (those perennial 
spans of Fashion) coalesce naturally into the figure of 
the woman. Woman as figure, or scene — war pin up, 
cat-woman, amazon, siren, Riefehstahl Maedchen. 


“(Wielding the utmost power over the artist’s life and sensibility...” 
The utmost power... Is he, the artist, Severin, the protagonist 
of Masoch’s Venus in Furs? Or Sarasine, the hapless hero-dupe 
of Balzac’s novel who unwittingly falls in love with a castrato? 

Because, you see, the ironic punchline was: she is not(-all) 
a woman. 

Amanda Lear, the For Your Pleasure model, was a 
transsexual (though, in yet another complication, she later 
denied it). A transsexual, moreover, whose operation might 
have been paid for by none other than Salvador Dali. 

Either way, it is clear that Ferry has set the tone for a 
1970s in which the male is both glamorous and glamoured, 


himself a gorgeously-styled photogenic object, entranced and 
seduced by a cosmetic beauty he partly wants to make 
contact with, but mostly wants to cold pastoralise into an 
immutable untouchability. “Mother of Pearl” — which as 
Penman observed on The Pill Box, is the whole of Lacan in 
seven minutes, more or less — is the closest Ferry comes to 
writing a manifesto for his meta-melancholia, a meta-love 
song about the impossibility — and undesirability — of 
attaining the Ideal object. 

Now this melancholia is not straightforwardly “tragic” 
(and even if it were, it would have little to do with any 
bourgeois sensibility, since, as everyone from Shakespeare to 
George Steiner (The Death of Tragedy) to Nietzsche to Bataille 
demonstrates, bourgeois secularism is inherently inimical to 
any notion of the tragic). 

But Ferry’s sensibility is definitely masochistic. (As 
opposed to that of the Sixties, which, as Nuttall, for one, 
suggests, was Sadean. Compare the Sixties-sired Lennon’s 
“Jealous Guy” — the Sadist apologises — to Ferry’s reading of 
the song — the masochist sumptuously enjoying his own pain 
— for a snapshot of a contrast between the two sensibilities.) 

The masochist’s perversity consists in the refusal of an 
exclusive or even primary focus on genitality or sexuality 
even in its Sadean polymorphous sense, which is perverse 
only in a very degraded sense. 

The Sadean imagination quickly reaches its limits when 
confronted with the limited number of orifices the organism 
has available for penetration. But the masochist — and 
Newton is in this respect, as in so many others, a masochist 
through and through, as is Ballard — distributes libido across 


the whole scene. The erotic is to be located in all the 
components of the machine, whether liveware — the soft 
pressure of flesh — or dead animal pelt — the fur coat — or 
technical. Masochism is cyberotics, precisely because it 
recognises no distinction between the animate and 
inanimate. After all, when you run your fingers through your 
beloved’s hair, you are caressing something dead. 

How had Ferry got here, become stranded in the early 
Seventies, an artist-voyeur art-director masochist? 

Ferry famously studied painting under Richard Hamilton, 
the so-called godfather of British Pop Art, at Newcastle 
University. Can we even begin to reconstruct the impact that 
Hamilton’s art had on British culture? 

Well, you can get some impression of it from the fact that, 
in a documentary on Hamilton made by Channel 4 in the 
early 1990s, Ballard cited Hamilton’s 1956 “Just What Is It 
That Makes Today’s Homes so Different, so Appealing” as one 
of the cultural events that made it possible for him to be a 
sciencefiction writer. It would be better to say that Hamilton 
made possible Ballard’s exceeding of science fiction, his 
discovery of k-punk. 

1956 was, of course, the year of Presley’s breakthrough 
records. In its own way, though, Hamilton’s collage was at 
least as important as Presley in the development of British 
pop. 

After the Fifties, pop and art have always been reversible 
and reciprocally implicating in British culture in the way that 
they are not in America. Nuttall: “The students and the mods 
cross-fertilised... Purple hearts appeared in strange 
profusion. Bell-bottoms blossomed into wild colours. Shoes 


were painted with Woolworths lacquer. Both sexes wore 


make-up and dyed their hair... The air in the streets was 


tingling with a new delirium.”® 


British pop’s irreducible artificiality makes it resistant to 
the Romanticist naturalisation that the likes of Greil Marcus 
and Lester Bangs achieved in respect of American rock. There 
is no way of grounding British art pop in a landscape. 

Not a natural landscape in any case. 

If art pop had a landscape it would be the aggressively 
anti-naturalistic one Ferry collaged together on “Virginia 
Plain” (named after one of his paintings, which was itself 
named after a brand of tobacco). Is this an internal landscape, 
what the mind’s eye sees? Perhaps. But only if we recognise 
that — as Hamilton’s collage and Ballard’s fiction insist — in 
the late-twentieth century the “space” of the internal- 
psychological was completely penetrated by what Ballard 
calls the media landscape. 

When the British pop star sings, it is not “the land” which 
speaks (and what does Marcus hear in the American rock he 
mythologises in Mystery Train if not the American land?) but 
the deterritority of American-originated consumer culture. 
Hence the braying grotesquerie of Ferry’s singing voice on 
those early Roxy releases. (And the different grotesquerie of 
today’s simoting pop idols.) 

With the first-hand expertise of someone who has had to 
lose his voice in order to speak (for that is what you must do 
if you educate yourself — or are educated — out of a working- 
class background), Penman brings out very well how integral 
the problem of accent — of losing a Geordie accent, of not 
gaining an American accent — was to Ferry’s career. 


As a student, Ferry’s life was divided between his daytime 
movement through the art milieu and nighttime fronting of a 
soul band doing covers. Two voices, two lives. “I hadn’t found 
anything to incorporate all of me.” 

The early Roxy records are Ferry’s Warhol- 
Frankensteinian attempts — the joins still showing, 
thrillingly, horrifyingly — to hand-machine a space that 
would incorporate his day and his night self. So they are not 
so much expressions of a coherent subjectivity as a kind of 
destratificationin-progress, the production, on the fly, of a 
pop art plane of consistency which he could feel at unhome 
in. 

So here was a pop music, astonishingly, more shaped by 
Duchamp than Bo Diddley. The methodology Ferry deployed 
on his solo albums of cover versions (and remember that such 
albums were almost unknown in rock music at the time) was 
explicitly Duchampian. His renditions of standards such as 
“Smoke Gets in Your Eyes” and “These Foolish Things” were, 
he said, Duchampian “readymades”: found objects upon 
which he put his own stamp. 

Part of what made the early Roxy sound so cold — 
particularly by comparison with the hot authenticity of 
American rock — was the fact that they were evidently not an 
aggregation of spontaneous, creative subjects, but a 
meticulously executed Duchamp-type Concept: a group whose 
every gesture was micro-designed, and who credited their 
stylist, fashion designer Anthony Price, on their album 
sleeves. 

The great temptation for Ferry would always be to slip 
inside the frame: to become, really, the heartaching bachelor 


in the dreamhome, to achieve what Simon calls the 


fantasy of stepping outside the lowly world of 
production into a sovereign realm of pure unfettered 
expression and sensuous indulgence, an imaginary and 
fictitious notion of aristocracy (more Huysmans than 
real lords who have to do humdrum things like manage 
their estates, juggle their investments, do a bit of arms 
dealing). 


To achieve the total simulation of manners that he was up till 
then only pastiching-affecting. 

And, isn’t Simon right, aren’t Ferry’s later records all 
about “the disillusionment of actually achieving the 
supermonied aristo life — Ferry, condemned to mooch jaded 
forever through art openings, fashion shows, all tomorrow’s 
parties (that old tis better to journey than arrive line)”? 

Let’s leave Ferry there, stranded, framed. 

And cut. 


To 1982. Compass Point, Nassau. 
Grace Jones’ astonishing recording of Joy Division’s “She’s 
Lost Control”. 


Masoch: “A slap in the face is more effective than ten 
lectures, especially if it is delivered by the hand of a lady.” 
Kodwo Eshun: 


The womanmachine Grace Jones’ 82 remodel of Joy 
Division’s 79 She’s Lost Control updates the Fifties 
mechanical bride. For the latter losing control meant 


electric epilepsy, voice drained dry by feedback. For 
Jones, the female model that’s losing control induces 
the sense of automation running down, the human 
seizing up into a machine rictus. The model — as girl, as 
car, as synthesizer — incarnates the assembly time of 
generations, obsolescence, 3-year lifespans. 


The model is the blueprint for the post-Cold War cyborg, 
the womanmachine modified and mutated by the military 
medical entertainment complex. Hence Kraftwerk’s The 
Model, where the bachelormachines are threatened by the 


womanmachine’s superior reproductive capability. The Model 
7 


is an excerpt from the post-war machinereproduction wars. 
Jones is the sublime object before which Ferry prostrated 
himself — and who talked back. Through vagina-dentatal 
teeth. 

Be careful of the womanimal-machine. It bites. 

Jones is not a cyborg because she is not an organism of 
any kind (and the modifier “cybernetic” is in any case 
redundant, since all organisms, like everything that works, 
are cybernetic). 

She is a neurobotic femachine. 

The mechanical bride stripping her bachelors bare. 

Jones was herself once a model, but when she has the 
opportunity to “express herself”, she ruthlessly exploits her 
own body and image much more than any (male) 
photographer would have dared to. “In a recent poll by Men’s 
Health magazine, the male readership named Grace Jones [...] 
among the women who scared them the most.” (Brian Chin). 


The game becomes the hunter. 

She out-Duchamps Ferry, (dis)covering his “Love is the 
Drug” as a found object to be absorbed by the femachine. 

Jones understands her body Spinozistically as a machine 
capable of being affected and producing affects. This body is in no 
way limited to the organism; it is distributed across 
photographs, sound and video — and none of these media 
constitute a representation of an originary organic body. 
They are, each of them, unique expressive components of the 
Jones singularity. 

It’s total immanence. 

There is no Grace Jones the subject who expresses her 
subjectivity in sound and image. There is only Jones the 
abstract hyperbody, the cut-up scissormachine that cuts itself 
up, relentlessly. 

The Jones body is immanent, too, in that, as Kodwo 
repeatedly insists of sonic fiction throughout More Brilliant 
than the Sun, it produces its own theory. 

Certainly, by the time that Haraway’s Cyborg Manifesto 
limps onto the scene, it is only to mislead via 
reterritorialisation. 

Cut again. 


To London, 1982. 
(Reproduced from the early days of blogger k-punk.) 


The sex appeal of the inorganic. 
Paul Tickell’s review of The Anvil, NME 27 Mar 82: 


I'd thought “Contort Yourself” the right kind of music for 
Newton’s sadoeroticism — but “The Anvil” is a greater 


approximation. You wanted the moderne dance — well [...] 
here it is: the night-time moves of marionettes — dummies — 
puppets — clowns — and imaginary celluloid beings. It’s all a 
little deathly — the sound of commodities fucking — but a 
noise which can be a good deal more exhilarating (“the sex 
appeal of the inorganic” — Walter Benjamin) than healthy 
fun-loving creatures going at it. 

All in all — Visage are a rather seductive disease — the 
skull beneath the made-up skin. 


More material from early k-punk: 


Roxy versus Visage: a shift from subject to Object 
(therefore, following Baudrillard’s logic in Seduction, 
from masculine to feminine). | Fem-glam 
notwithstanding, Ferry retained for himself the male 
role of the onewho-looks. The problem, for Ferry, is the 
(male) gaze — how much to look? For how long? “Then I 
look away/too much for one day.” Strange, meanwhile, 
is invariably the looked-at. He is the discarded 
plaything in “Mind of a Toy” (telling title, that), the 
object of gossip in The Anvil’s maudlin “Look What 
They’ve Done” and “Whispers.” The model, here, is — 
the model: the anxiety — how am I seen? 


Can we assume, btw, that Gibson derived the name 
Neuromancer from “New Romantic”? If so, Gibson’s 
transposition suggests a much more interesting, and 
appropriate, name for the nerve sorcery of these newly-wired 
electronauts. “Romantic” always struck me as way-off beam 
for a culture so fastidiously uninterested in depth/emotions/ 


truth.) 

The case against Visage always seemed to me to depend 
on rockist prejudice: they didn’t play live, they were a vehicle 
for a clothes horse who “couldn’t sing”, they represented the 
return of prog. Isn’t there also a masculinist agenda, too, in 
the implicit rejection of the “superficiality” of fashion and 
clubbing? 

Visage thoroughly stripped their sound of the trappings 
of r and r, ostentatiously parading an Un-American ancestry. 
Thematically and sonically, Visage evoked a decadent Europe 
of seductive urban alienation (cf the Mondrian-like vision of 
endless High-Rises in Blocks on Blocks) and sumptuous 
glamour (cf the name, and the track, “Visage”; the French vox 
on “Fade to Grey”), conjured through vocoder vox, 
synthesizers and Billy Currie’s pseudo-classical flourishes. 
American influences came rerouted/refracted through 
Europe: Moroder disco; Morricone (cf McGeoch’s “Once Upon 
a Time in the West”-isms on the Spaghetti Western/Clint 
tribute “Malpaso Man” off Visage). Cinema was a major node: 
much of Visage’s sound belongs to what would later be called 
“virtual soundtracks” (Barry Adamson, one of the architects 
of this genre, was of course a Visage member). The mood was 
one of dis-affection, not the robotic functionality of 
Kraftwerk, nor the schizo-dislocation of Foxx/Numan, but the 
Euro-aesthete’s “exhaustion from life”, nowhere better 
expressed than on the Interview with the Vampire-like 
“Damned Don’t Cry”. Visage didn’t thematise machines in the 
way that Kraftwerk, Numan and Ultravox did: like Yello, they 
seemed to operate in a future-past glittering hall-of-mirrors 
in which synthesizers and electronics were less a new 


innovation than a taken-for-granted mainstay. 

Visage’s “cyberpunk baroque” is a link between Roxy 
Music, Vangelis, disco and what would later become dance 
culture. Anyone who doubts this should check out the dance 
mixes of “Frequency 7” or “Pleasure Boys”: the instrumental 
breakdown in the “Pleasure Boys” remix is pure acid house, 
and “Frequency 7” is nothing but a breakdown, a thrillingly 
anachronistic slice of machine-techno. It was no doubt 
Strange and Egan’s role in the Blitz/Camden Palace that 
facilitated the move into dance. Making clubbing and 
dancing, rather than the gig, central was a crucial step (for 
Visage specifically, but for the New Romantic scene in 
general). Strange was less important as “frontman” than as 
pure image, his very diffidence and passivity as a vocalist 
anticipating dance’s later complete effacement of the singer. 


Except the singer doesn’t get completely effaced by dance. 
It returns as the femachine Roisin. 


Cut to Now. 


I’ve little to add to my recent remarks® on Moloko and 
Roisin Murphy as the latest — but I hope not last — 
contribution to the art pop story. 

But it’s worth distinguishing Murphy from two artists 
John recently mentioned in the comments boxes: Madonna 
and Kylie. 

Minogue is a sex worker in the most banal and degrading 
sense, since it is clear that her simpering subordination to the 
Lad’s Gaze is nothing more than a career(ist) gambit. Murphy, 
by contrast, gives the impression of enjoying herself, of doing 


what she would do any way (and just happening to have an 
audience). It’s clear that she enjoys attention (male or 
otherwise) but like all great performers, her jouissance seems 
to be fundamentally auto- erotic. The audience function not 
as passive-consumer onanist spectators, but as a feedback 
component in the Rdéisin-machine. 

And unlike Madonna, Murphy does not Photoshop out all 
the joins and the cuts in her performance. Whereas 
Madonna’s hyper-professional show is all about attaining the 
CGI seamlessness of a corporate film, Murphy — pulling her 
leather fetish boots on onstage — is always playing — albeit 
seriously. 


Q: You’re becoming quite the style icon, is that an area 
that interests you? 


R: Well, I think I dress for myself, I mean, I’ve always dressed 
up anyway, and I just enjoy it. I think maybe people are just 
fed up of pop stars that are told what to do and what to wear. 


noise as anti- 
capital: as the veneer 
of democracy starts to 


fade? 


FORGET ORWELL 


Orwell is wrong about everything, but especially 1984. 

Far from being the year of zombie-drone enforced 
consensus, GB 1984 was a class war zone in which 
multinational Kapital’s paramilitary-police crushed the 
remnants of organic workerism live on videodrome. 

Such staged antagonism is a necessary phase in the 
pacification program that will culminate in apparently 
triumphant Kapital’s End of History. 

The reassuring non-hum of the noise free polis at the end 
of time. 


Tony’s smile. 

Blair is a much more effective class warrior than it was 
possible for Thatcher and Macgregor to be. 

Their efficacy was limited by Then Kapital’s need for them 
to be seen fighting the class war. 

No need for Tony to fight. 

To not fight is to have won. 

It’s all administration now. 

Systemic antagonism is just a bad memory. Turn up the 
TV. 

Bunker down in your burrow. 

Retune the guitars. 

Return to harmony. 

Welcome to Liberty City. 

The busier you are, the less you see. 


SOUND FX 


Mark Stewart’s As the Veneer of Democracy Starts to Fade was 
the politicallibidinal intensive soundtrack to “battle for the 
hearts and minds” fought between Kapital and its enemies GB 
circa 84-85. 

Seven years since Stewart began his anti-career as teen- 
Nietzsche Artaud Debord communist shamanic-firebrand 
hysteric-screecher in the Pop Group. 

Stewart’s journey since the dissolution of the Bristol f- 
punk kollektive takes him through Adrian Sherwood mega 
mashed hyperdub and into an encounter with US hip-hop. 

He immediately appreciates that hip-hop is not a street 
music but non-musique abstrakt: a site of pure sonic 


potential, in which inhuman constructivist sound cartoons 
can be produced without reference to musical protocols of 
any kind. 

It’s all sound FX, a way of manipulating noise. 

Hyper-modernism. The sonic equivalent of the 
Burroughs-Gysin cut-up. A contact of Sherwood’s leads to the 
most improbable of meetings. UK non-singer and sound- 
deranger Stewart plugs into the super-slick behind-the- 
scenes NYC p-funk machine responsible for the grooves on 
the pioneering hip-hop 45s released by Tommy Boy and 
Sugarhill. 

Component parts: 

Keith Leblanc. Beat machine producer of “Malcolm X: No 
Sell Out”. He can program drum machines to make them 
sound like packs of dogs. 

Doug Wimbish. Supertaut hypertechnicised Hendrix of 
bass. 

Skip McDonald. Synthesizer manipulator and reaper-rider 
of psychedelicfunk ax storms. 

Sherwood and Stewart take their already inhuman 
grooves and subject them to further layers of dissonant anti- 
musical editing, interpolating Burroughs vocal samples from 
Nova Express and other deliberately ciphered media 
background noise, machining an anti-communicational 
libidinal signal that takes you behind the screens to access 
the Real news. 

Apocalypse Now. 


THE BATTLE FOR THE HEARTS AND MINDS 


As the veneer of democracy starts to fade, some say the 
internment camps are already built. 

When the mask of civility comes off and the visors go on, 
the contours of the New World Order become apparent. 

The destruction of the miners — and with them the 
wrought-iron ruins of the postwar consensus — was only the 
most media-visible of the pacification strategies Kapital was 
deploying, and in many ways the least significant. 

The important thing was to prepare the way to 
transnational cyberspace Kapital Now, when all dissent is 
pathologised if it is not made literally unthinkable. 

“Sterezene, thorazine and lagactyl” administered under 
the Mental Health Bill subdue political prisoners re-assigned 
to psychiatric wards. 

Narco-neuroticisation as the re-imposition of a simulated 
Reality Principle shoring up Kapital against its virtual limit in 
Planetary Schizoprenia. 

You don’t have to be mad to work here. 

Restrict your demands to the what is possible. 

Find your way back to your dormitory. 

Privatise your misery. 

Struggling to pay the rent, the main worry’s job security. 

Now and then, we can afford a little luxury. 

Quietism. 


DISSONANCE/ DISSENSUS 


If the aim is to disseminate information, why all this noise? 
Why the distortion, the deliberately buried voices, why all 
the half-heard insinuations, the  audio-hallucinatory 


fragmentation, the wired-up screams? 

Why not communicate clearly? 

Because clear communication — and all it presupposes — 
is the fantasm the system projects as its vindication and 
necessarily always-deferred goal. 

“The big Other stands for the field of common sense at 
which one can arrive after free deliberation; philosophically, 


its last great version is Habermas’s communicative 


community with its regulative ideal of agreement.” 


The noise free polis. 
We are told: 


Only when the noise of antagonism recedes will we be able to 
hear each other. Only when we take out the background static 
will human speech be possible. Police yourself and there will 
be no need for the use of batons. Intoxicate yourself and we 
will not sedate you. 


Stewart’s disassembly of his self through noise is a refusal 
of the Foucault biocops and Burroughs control addicts that 
operate first of all at the level of the skin and the CNS, 
enticing-inciting you to constitute yourself as an internally 
coherent driving ego. 

Stewart treats his own voice not as the authentic 
expression of a subjective interiority, but as a series of lab 
animal howls, enraged yelps and impersonal intensities to be 
cut up and redistributed across the noise-hyperdubscape, 
mixed indifferently with Duchamp-found-sounds and noises 
produced by viciously distorted formerly musical 
instruments. 


Identity breakdown through the amplification of noise as 
an exploding flight from harmony at all levels: psychic, social, 
cosmic. 

Dissensus. 


I AIN’T GONNA BE A SLAVE OF LOVE 


Always take O’Brien’s side against Winston Smith and Julia. 

There is nothing natural, and human biosocial defaults 
are always to be distrusted. 

If you want to get out, leave all that mammal couple shit 
behind. 

Stewart is one of Burroughs’ most assiduous readers. 

It is not a matter of emulation but of the deployment of 
abstract engineering diagrams in different media. 

Position As the Veneer of Democracy Starts to Fade as the 
terminus of the Burroughs-saturated UK underground 
delineated by Nuttall in Bomb Culture. 

“Hypnotised” plays like the “I Love You” section from The 
Ticket that Exploded, Burroughs’ most pitilessly hilarious 
dissection-analysis of the biopsychic sex-love control virus as 
preprogrammed biological film, sentimental mooning croon- 
tunes spliced in with hardcore pornography and replayed like 
videodrome in your CNS, ensuring-exacerbating constant 
craving: 


All the tunes and sound effects of “Love” spit from the 
recorder permutating sex whine of a sad picture planet: 
Do you love me? — But I exploded in cosmic laughter — 
Old acquaintances be forgot? O darling just a 


photograph?? 


Heaven must be missing an angel. 
Hypnotised. 

Hypnotised. 

She’s got me hypnotised. 


Stewart’s cut-ups of constructivist-brutalist funk with 
saccharine lovesongs already anticipate the way in which 
Kapital’s tungsten-carbide stomach will metabolise hip-hop’s 
hyper-abstraction and use it as the dominant consumer 
seduction soundtrack from the Nineties till now. 


CONTROL DATA 


The data-content of Stewart’s rant-reports is nothing 
astonishing. 


7% of the population own 84% of the wealth. 

Parasites... The great banking families of the world... 
Bastards... 

Are these the words of the all-powerful boards and syndicates 
of the earth? 


The point is not to tell you something new but to 
reprogram your nervous system. 

Control works by reducing the reality of systemic 
antagonism to a mere belief. 

A track like “Bastards” is a very precise anti-Control 
weapon. 

It is a rage-inducer designed to make beliefs affective, 
whereas Control PR conciliates and normalises. 


Control PR plugs the gaps, emolliates, quietens, makes 
confrontation and exploitation unthinkable without denying 
their reality as such. 

Like John Heartfield collages, Stewart’s crude sonic splices 
amp up the distortion and the violence. 


The situation is not under Control 
They are not protecting you 
It is war 


And so are you 
THERE IS NO DIGNITY 


Don’t confuse the working class with the proletariat. 

Thatcher inhibits the emergence of the proletariat by 
buying off the working class with payment capital and the 
promise of owning your own Oed-I-Pod. The comforts of 
slavery. 

She gives the replicants screen memories and family 
photos. 

So that they forget that they were only ever artificial, 
factory farmed to function as the Kapital-Thing’s self- 
replicating HR pool, and begin to believe that they are 
authentic human subjects. 

The proletariat is not the confederation of such 
subjectivities but their dissolution in globalised k-space. 

The virtual population of nu-earth. 

Total recall of all the noise. 

Lyotard describes the hysterisation of a worker’s ear 
when it is subjected to the unprecedented noise of Industrial- 


Kapital’s reproduction: the incessant sonic violence of a 
20,000hz alternator. 

The heroism of the proletariat consists not in its dignified 
resistance to the  inorganic-inhumanity of the 
industrialisation process — “there is no libidinal dignity, nor 
libidinal fraternity, there are libidinal contacts without 


communication’* — but in its mutative Duchamp- 
transformation of its body into an inhuman inorganic 
constructivist machine. 

As the Veneer of Democracy Starts to Fade is a sonic machine 
for accelerating the process. An anti-Oedipal, anti-neurotic, 
anti-quitest, pro-proletarianising noise weapon. Anti- 
videodrome signal. 

Jack it into yr CNS and play. 


lions after slumber, 
or what is 


sublimation today?! 


“In post-liberal societies [...] the agency of social 
repression no longer acts in the guise of an internalised 
Law or Prohibition that requires renunciation or self- 
control; instead, it assumes the form of a hypnotic 
agency that imposes the attitude of ‘yielding to 
temptation’ — that is to say, its injunction amounts to a 
command: ‘Enjoy yourself!’ Such an idiotic enjoyment is 
dictated by the social environment which includes the 
Anglo-Saxon psychoanalyst whose main goal is to 
render the patient capable of ‘normal’, ‘healthy’ 
pleasures. Society requires us to fall asleep into a 
hypnotic trance...” 

— Slavoj Zizek, “The Deadlock of Repressive 


Desublimation’’2 


As we awake from the dreary dream of entryism, we can start 
to see that what kept us slumbering in the last twenty-five 
years was indeed a programme of controlled, if not quite 
repressive, desublimation. No doubt, the signs of any 
awakening are fitful as yet. In pop, they are perhaps most 
evident in a groping backwards, a paradoxical return to 
modernism. Could it be that the likes of Franz Ferdinand and 
the Rapture will prompt a self-overcoming of the very 
postmodern revivalism of which they are a symptom? Just 
now, Rip it up and Start Again sounds like a uncannily timely 
injunction. 

Something seems to be (re)coalescing, as the reception of 
the Early Scritti LP (including Simon’s piece in Uncut) 
indicates. For those inside — not least, of course, Green 


[Gartside]* himself — these recordings must be dismissed as 
inept avant-doodlings, embarrassing juvenilia. It seems 
plausible to attribute Green’s less-than-lukewarm judgements 
on the early Scritti material less to modesty, still less to a 
“maturity”, than to a defensive cleaving to a once-successful 
strategy that has now run its course, as Marcello acidly noted 
in his acerbic comparison between the indifferent reception 
of the last Scritti album and the eagerness with which Early 
has been anticipated: 


When you next find yourself at a motorway service 
station, feel free to browse through the plentiful copies 
of his 1999 up-to-the-1999-minute-Mos-Def-involving 
Anomie and Bonhomie album, yours for just £1.99 — 
whereas the new collection of his scratchy, disjointed 
post-punk improv stuff from two decades ago 


reportedly already has 10,000 advance orders.* 


Scritti were the most successful — aesthetically, 
commercially — of the post-post-punk entryists (the likes of 
U2 being always-already included of course). In the desolate 
gloss of mid-late Eighties pop, Scritti’s hyper-saccharine 
sweetness retained a plaintive if sickly gorgeousness, even if 
their vaunted deconstructive swerves became subtle to the 
point of invisibility. But the fastidious precision of that 
striplit Eighties production has dated (late-Eighties chartpop 
is the most time-bound pop music ever — discuss) much more 
damagingly than has the messthetic of the early records. 
Whereas the conspicuous completeness of Eighties entryist 
pop repels fascination, the queasy, uneasy unfinishedness of 
post-punk pop — the lurching “doubtbeat” of a collectivity 
discovering itself — is uncannily compulsive. In punk cut and 
paste, the joins, the cuts (in other words the ways in which 
any world does not coincide with itself) are flaunted and 
foregrounded. Entryism is the capture of cut and paste into 
Photoshopped seamlessness. 

What is perforce lost in today’s post-punk revivalists is 
the literal intensity of this sound: how it is in Kierkegaard- 
Zizek’s terms, in becoming. It doesn’t know anything (it 
certainly can’t be confident that it is a “classic independent 
rock sound” in the way that Franz Ferdinand are). In flight 
from rock’s “condition of possibility”, this undo (it) yourself 
pop puts into question ALL conditions of possibility, and with 
them the very concept of conditions of possibility. What is this 
if not the sound of the Badiou Event, which is the punk 
revelation itself: this is happening, now, but it can’t be, it’s 


Impossible...? 

Scritti were possibly the least Dionysian pop group ever. 
In the early days, the methodology may have been 
improvisational, but the group didn’t want anyone (least of 
all themselves) to be under the illusion that it issued from 
some vitalist wellspring of creativity. It was the sound of a 
collectivity thinking (itself into existence) under and through 
material constraints. The famous displaying of all the 
recording costs on the sleeve was demystificatory but not 
desublimating. What is too often missed about any punk that 
matters in fact, is that sublimation, far from requiring 
mystification, is alien to it. 


As Alenka Zupanci¢ argues, mystification is entirely on the 
side of the reality principle (and one of the greatest 
contributions psychoanalysis has made to politics is to 
identify “realism” precisely with a reality principle, so that 
what counts as “commonsense” can be exposed as an 
ideological determination): 


The important thing to point out [...] is that the reality 
principle is not some kind of natural way associated 
with how things are, to which sublimation would 
oppose itself in the name of some Idea. The reality 
principle itself is ideologically mediated; one could even 
claim that it constitutes the highest form of ideology, 
the ideology that presents itself as empirical fact (or 
biological, economic...) necessity (and that we tend to 
perceive as nonideological). It is precisely here that we 


should be most alert to the functioning of ideology. 


Listen to what Marcello calls the “pseudo-moronic chants 
of platitudes” (“An honest day’s pay for an honest day’s work! 
You can’t change human nature! Don’t bite the hand that 
feeds!”) of Scritti’s “Hegemony” and it is clear that this 
message has got through. It is the denunciation and exposure 
of the great ideological swindles that are liable to be 
remembered about punk, but this destructive urge (passive 
nihilism) is empty without its active complement: the 
production of a new space. It is no accident that mystificatory 
realism has allowed us to remember the former but not the 
latter, since the mere dismantling of ideological 
presuppositions quickly became a dreary academic parlour 
game associated with a desiccated, depressive and depressing 
left (they want to take your enjoyment away from you...). 


Zupanci¢é labels the production of this new space 
“sublimation”. To understand why she makes this move 
entails differentiating sublimation from the sublime as such. 
The postmodern emphasis on sublimity has tended to stress 
the sublime as an unreachable beyond, contemplation of 
which induces a pathos of finitude in any human subject. To 
think about sublimation, the process by which an object 
“acquires the dignity of the Thing”, produces a different 
emphasis. As Zupanci¢ continues: 


the Lacanian theory of sublimation does not suggest 
that that sublimation turns away from the Real in the 
name of some Idea; rather, it suggests that sublimation 
gets closer to the Real than the reality principle does. It 
aims at the Real precisely at the point where the Real 


cannot be reduced to reality. One could say that 
sublimation opposes itself to reality, or turns away 
from it, precisely in the name of the Real. To raise an 
object to the dignity of the Thing is not to idealise it, 
but rather to “realise” it, that is, to make it function as 
a stand-in for the Real. Sublimation is thus related to 
ethics insofar as it is not entirely subordinated to the 
reality principle, but liberates or creates a space from 
which it is possible to attribute certain values to 
something other than the recognised and established 
“common good.” [...] What is at stake is not the act of 
replacing one “good” (or one value) with the same 
planetary system of the reality principle. The creative 
act of sublimation is not only a creation of some new 
good, but also (and principally) the creation and 
maintenance of a certain space for objects that have no 


place in the given, extant reality, objects that are 
7” 6 


considered “impossible”. 

What was the “beyond good and evil” of Scritti, Gang of 
Four, the Pop Group and the Raincoats if not the production 
of just such a space? (As Lacan wryly notes, when we idly 
think of someone who is “beyond good and evil” we are liable 
to think of someone is merely beyond “good”.) This entails 
not an austere asceticism but the engineering of new forms of 
enjoyment. The early Scritti’s “difficulty” places them beyond 
the pleasure principle, for sure, but we succumb to an 
ideological lure if we think that this puts them beyond 
enjoyment too. As Savonarola said to me a few weeks ago, 
Gang of Four were far more effective at turning out 


compulsive pop songs than almost any of today’s chart acts 
you could care to name. The same goes double for Early, 
whose songs are catchy because they refuse to push familiar 
buttons. 

Entryism constitutes a double disavowal of sublime space. 
First, it is turned away from, then the very possibility of its 
existence is denied. In retrospect, entryism has to be seen as 
the production of a particularly virulent capitalist mind 
plague. How else to account for the absurd convolutions that 
allowed Green to posit some political continuity between the 
avant-Marxism of the early years and the champagne- 
swigging meta-boybandcum-yuppie-corporation “hammer 
and popsicle” posturing (check some of those pics which 
illustrate Simon’s piece) of the chart Scritti? As Simon has 
shown elsewhere, Green had by this point done more than 
merely accommodated himself to the market; he was acting 
as an entrepreneur, since the “‘Fairlight future-funk’ of Cupid 
and Psyche 85 was so far ahead of the game it actually 
influenced black pop.” There’s a case for saying that Cupid and 


ee 


Psyche’s “dazzling, depthless surfaces” in which “‘soul’ and 
interiority are abolished” and “desire traverses a flat plane, 
the endless chain of signifiers, the lover’s discourse as lexical 
maze” was THE sound of Eighties capital, the perfect 
soundtrack to Jameson’s Postmodernism, or the Cultural Logic of 
Late Capitalism, what it felt like to be lost in the mirrored 
plateaux of the hypermarket. 

Realism always poses as maturation. Of course it is 
acceptable, understandable and inevitable to have silly 
youthful dreams, but there comes a time when one must put 


aside such childish things and face reality; and reality is 


always defined “biologically”, in terms of the imperatives of 
reproductive futurism, and “economically”, in terms of the 
“constraints” of the capitalist anti-market. 


Readers of the lamented but never forgotten Pill Box’ may 
remember a letter Ian Penman received from Brian Anderson 
of the neo-Conservative City Journal. Anderson’s account of 
the intellectual provenance of neo-conservatism — many neo- 
cons were tellingly described as disappointed, disillusioned 
leftists who had been “mugged by reality” — concluded with 
the following convergence between new pop entryism and his 
own neo-conservative turn: 


Also — and this will probably horrify you — my move 
right came partly thanks to Ian Penman and Paul 
Morley at NME! Your rejection of overly politicised 
agitprop in music back in the late Seventies made 
intuitive sense to me — I disliked the didacticism of 
Billy Bragg or Crass, and could stomach even less the 
critics who pretended to be revolutionaries, etc. There 
was far more truth in an August Darnell ballad, I came 
to believe, than in the entire socialist posturing of, say, 
the Gang of Four or Robert Christgau. 


There it is: THAT opposition — Bragg versus Darnell — 
was the problem of the mid-to-late Eighties. As soon as it was 
a question of dour meat and potatoes no fuss empiricism (left) 
versus bright and brash hedonism (right), there was no 
longer any real choice. The sublime had been extirpated, and 
what remained was a quotidian cavilling against the wipe- 
clean sheen of the mall. 


It’s telling that Scritti’s “Confidence” (“Outside the clubs 
of boyhood/ Inside monogamy”) should be so preoccupied 
with the problems of “being a man”, and what that entailed. 

The interpellated subject of the Lad magazine is the 
supposed “real person” (=slavering, sloppy andro-Id) beneath 
the pretence of social politesse. The Lad magazine addresses 
this “authentic id” with the leering superegoic injunction to 
enjoy. “Go on, admit it, you don’t want to be bothered to 
cook, all you want is a fishfinger sandwich... Go on, admit it, 
you don’t want to be bothered to talk to a woman, have a 
wank instead...” The fact that this reduction is possible means 
that lads implicitly accept the Lacanian notion that phallic 
jouissance involves masturbation with a “real” partner. It 
also indicates that laddishness is more defined by a 
propensity towards depressive indolence than it is by any 
lasciviousness. What laddism attempts is a short-circuiting of 
desire (yes, I know that the “inhuman partner” of desire 
cannot be attained, just give me pictures of girls next door 
instead). 

From “Skank Bloc Bologna” (“an imaginary network of 
dissidents stretching from Jamaica to Bologna’s anarchist 
squatters”) to the Streets (Lads of the world unite to raise a 
glass to lachrymose lariness); from “The Sweetest Girl” to Abi 
Titmuss... 

Long past time that we roused from this slumber... 
Especially when, with habeas corpus suspended and 
mainstream political parties all but burning down gypsy 
camps, one of the things that makes the early Scritti so 
contemporary is that their conjecture/fear that It (fascism) 
Would Happen Here, their “trés 1979 paranoia”, is suddenly, 


alarmingly trés 2005: 


Rise, like lions after slumber, 
In unvanquishable number, 
Shake your chains to earth like dew, 


Which in sleep had fall’n on you. 


the outside of 


everything now! 


A week dominated in every way by Simon Reynolds’ Rip It Up 


and Start Again, and rightly so. 

Perhaps the best tribute you can pay to the book is that it 
makes you positively look forward to train and bus delays, to 
any moment when you can return to feed the hunger, scratch 
the itch... 

The size of the crowd at the Boogaloo event on 
Wednesday, but, more than that, a certain sense of ferment in 
the atmosphere, testified to the fact that this is something 
more than a book. Stirring up the ghost of post-punk cannot 
but be an act, an intervention in cultural politics — since 
post-punk not only judges contemporary pop culture 
(harshly), it brings back the legitimacy, the necessity of being 
judgemental, of having some criteria (non-musical criteria, 
non-hedonic criteria) for enjoyment. Such a position is not 
repressed by contemporary pop culture (=the cultural logic of 
late capitalism), it is made unthinkable by it. 

Something in Paul Morley certainly seemed to wake up on 


Wednesday. (And something in us?...) 

A certain Morley was knowingly complicit in the 
termination of post-punk — as Simon wryly reminded him 
when, after Morley had fulminated against the facile notion 
that the worth of a pop record is determined by its 
popularity, he asked him: “but didn’t that idea come from 
you?” It’s not accidental that, grotesquely but inevitably, 
Morley’s early-Eighties pop(ul)ist stance should have inspired 
some NME readers to turn towards neo-conservatism. In 
retrospect, it’s possible to see the turn to popism as the 
beginning of a giving voice to a creeping disappointment 
which spread slowly, insidiously yet incrementally during the 
period until almost everything of post-punk — even the 
traces — was disappeared (in the way that political prisoners 
are). The disappearing trick was almost complete when the 
Pod-Zombie duplicates started to arrive a few years ago, 
formally perfect copies mass-produced by Kapital. 

It’s easier to see now than it was at the time the extent to 
which the cultural artefacts — and the discourse surrounding 
them — produced in the wake of post-punk were being 
programmed by resurgent Kapital. A certain notion of realism 
began not only to prescribe what could now happen, but to 
airbrush out what had actually happened. The idea that pop 
could be more than a pleasant divertissement in the form of 
an easily consumable commodity, the idea that popular 
culture could play host to concepts that were difficult and 
demanding: it wasn’t sufficient to disavow these possibilities, 
they must also be denied. Operation Amnesia, Pacification 
Program: it never happened did it, it was a delusion, a folly of 
youth, and we’re all grown up now... 


Naturally, Morley’s railing against amateurism, his 
advocacy of ambition and lushness, play rather differently in 
2005 than they did in the early Eighties, but that’s only 
fitting, since his manifestos-as-works-of-art-in-themselves 
were produced as strategic provocations rather than timeless 
aesthetic philosophies. Even though the Morley of the 
disappointing Words and Music claimed Noughties web popists 
as his offspring, it’s hard to imagine the Morley and Penman 
of 1981 being gratified by the thought that their legacy would 
be the de-conceptualisation and de-politicising — i.e. the 
consumerisation — of pop. They could scarcely have 
imagined, then, the way in which pop would de-speed over the 
next twenty years, that their embrace of Entryism would 
prove to be the last word in rough-and-tumble theoretical 
dialogue that seemed, then, as if it could go on forever. 

Reading Rip it Up is like re-living my early pop life — but 
now at a distance, like Spider in Cronenberg’s film, an adult at 
the corner of the screen watching himself as a child. With 
Simon as my Virgil through that Paradiso lost, I can now 
recognise that pop for me was post-punk — Kings of the Wild 
Frontier was the first LP I bought and ABC were the first group 
I saw live. But Rip It Up makes me cognizant of what I, 
growing up absurd into post-punk, couldn’t have appreciated 
at the time: that the richness of pop then — not only 
sonically, but also in terms of concepts, clothes, images — 
lasted only a relatively short period, made possible by specific 
historical contingencies. 

Nevertheless, expectations were raised in me, and more 
or less everything I’ve written or participated in has been in 
some sense an attempt to keep fidelity with the post-punk 


event. Cyberpunk — both in its restricted literary generic 
sense and in the broader sense we have given to it in Ccru — 
was up to its neck in post-punk. Gibson’s debt to Steely Dan 
and the Velvet Underground has long been acknowledged, 
but the dominant tone of Neuromancer was an overhang from 
post-punk. Gibson named his hightech prostitutes after the 
Meat Puppets, but Neuromancer’s technihilistic ambience, dub 
apocalypticism, amphetamine-burned-out Cases and hectic, 
twitching finger-on-fast-forward and comatone-cut-out 
narrative, seem to be transposed straight out of the British 
post-punk scene. 

One of the things that is most remarkable about post- 
punk, actually, is its near total erasure of America and 
Americanness. When I was in my early teens, the only 
American pop you’d hear that wasn’t disco would be 
encountered while trudging round the shops on Saturday 
afternoon, as Paul Gambaccini’s Hot 100 was broadcast over 
the store PAs, and it was a window into a horrifyingly 
deprived world of barely imaginable banality. 

Of the few American groups of any significance in this 
period, perhaps only Devo and the Meat Puppets took much 
inspiration from the American landscape (in Devo’s case of 
course, the US was processed as a thoroughly artificial PKD- 
US-trash heap of post-industrial detritus). No wave emerged 
from the rootless cosmopolitanism and transnational nihilism 
of New York, while in many ways the most interesting 
American groups — Tuxedomoon and the Residents — were 
Europhiles. In post-punk, America increasingly featured as a 
series of ethnographic traces — as in the ecstatic, hysterical 
and authoritarian ghost chatter of Amerikkkan TV and media 


flittering through Cabaret Voltaire’s Voice of America or Byrne 
and Eno’s My Life in the Bush of Ghosts. 

It’s hard to remember now, but in the period after 
Vietnam and before the collapse of the Eastern Bloc, America 
was a paranoid and enfeebled nation, Nixon-sickened and 
introspective, scared of its own shadows. Post-punk was there 
to witness — and mock — the seeming absurdity of the idiot 
actor Reagan being wheeled on to give America’s confidence a 
shot-in-the-arm, although initially even Reagan’s rise to 
power seemed to be a kind of sinister post-punk prank, since 
it made eerily real what had been predicted by one of perhaps 
post-punk’s most important influence, Ballard. (In the States, 
Ballard’s Atrocity Exhibition was re-titled Love and Napalm: 
Export USA, and that novel — so omnipresent in post-punk 
production — was a kind of simultaneous observation of the 
way in which Britain was being turned into an LA of 
ubiquitous advertising hoardings as well as a British view of 
the US.) By the time that post-punk went out in a neonblaze 
of irony-tainted glory on MTV, the joke had, to say the least, 
worn thin. Pop had gone Blue-Gene American rock, again (I 
still remember the barely comprehending horror I felt when 
the NME started to give covers to the t-shirt and jean-clad 
Springsteen; worse was to follow, with the likes of The Long 
Ryders). Boredom was back, but this time, without the punks 
to denounce it. The arid shopping mall at the end of history 
opened up as the only possible future. Worse than the career 
opportunities that never knocked were the ones that did: jobs 
for everyone in the striplit wall-to-wall mart of Time Out of 
Joint America in which it is 1955, forever... No shadows to hide 
in... No room to move, no room to doubt... 


Ironic in some ways that Rip it Up should be named after 
an Orange Juice song, since Orange Juice and Postcard were 
responsible for what was in many ways a British equivalent of 
Springsteen’s US return-to-roots. If the comparison seems 
strained, think about the way in which both Springsteen and 
Orange Juice self-consciously advocated a kind of locally- 
rooted authenticity defined by its rejection of artificiality. For 
Springsteen’s reich and roll uniform of denim, substitute OJ’s 
Brideshead Revisited sweaters. Like the Smiths, the Postcard- 
era Orange Juice retrospectively imagined a British pop-that- 
never-was. The Brit equivalent of American open-throated 
stridency was a kind of floppy-fringed, tongue-tied dithering 
that was just as much of a self-conscious reclaiming of 
signifiers of national identity as Springsteen’s passional 
working stiff poses were. (Is it too fanciful to hear in the early 
Orange Juice an anticipation of Hugh Grant’s unbearable 
foppery and faffing?) 

By the time I got to university in 1986, Orange Juice, and 
the Smiths, had achieved hegemonic control of the 
undergraduate “imagination”. It was perfect pop for young 
men who were destined to go on to careers in marketing but 
who liked to think of themselves as “sensitive”. Orange Juice 
also played in a major part in rehabilitating the love song. If 
romance featured in post-punk at all, it was as something to 
be derided and demystified (as in the Slits’ “Love Und 
Romance” or Gang of Four’s “Love Like Anthrax”) or as 
something to be politically and theoretically interrogated a la 
Scritti or Devoto. The renewed preoccupation with love was a 
re-occupation of “the ordinary”, a re-statement of a revivified 
humanist confidence in a dehistoricised continuity of “things 


that go on the same”. 

It’s often said that punk was what Britain had instead of 
68, but that in many ways fails to process how punk had 
surpassed the events in Paris. 68 was as much a rejection of 
certain theoretical positions as it was of the institutions of 
modern liberal society so that, in the conflagration of the 
Sixties “Desirevolution”, the cold Spinozism of Althusser’s 
structural analysis was burned down with the buildings. Punk 
and post-punk, however, were profoundly suspicious of the 
Dionysisan triumvirate of leisure, pleasure and intoxication, 
so that the required attitude was one of vigilant 
hyperrationalism, a kind of popularised Althusserianism in 
which interiority was exposed as an ideological bluff, and 
emotions were understood not as “real expressions of 
authentic subjectivity” but as structurally engineered 
reactive circuitries. The stance such a perception demanded 
— and this was a culture that was deliberately and 
unashamedly demanding — was one of “proletarian 
discipline” rather than slack indulgence, its puritanism 
recalling the egalitarian social ambitions of the original 
Puritans. In this respect, Scrittis move from _pleasure- 
repudiating Marxism to “playful” deconstruction is 
emblematic of the way in which the decade would develop, in 
universities as much as in the charts. The exorbitant surfaces 
of Cupid 


and Psyche might have eschewed interiority, but at the same 
time their simulations of interiority were no less authentic, no 
less soulful, than other versions of interiority purveyed by 
more credulous, non-ironic sources in the mainstream. The 


person being duped now was the Green who imagined that his 
intelligence would prevent full incorporation. 

But the triumphant capitalism Green was already working 
for had no trouble at all in consuming those who sought entry 
into it. In the Seventies, in an effort to dispel the notion that 
there were “subversive regions” that would be inherently 
indigestible for capital, Lyotard compared capitalism to a 
“Tungsten-carbide stomach” that could consume anything in 
its path. By the Eighties, as Jameson has observed, Kapital had 
become a gigantic interiority without any outside: a kind of 
jaded pleasuredome reminiscent of the all-encompassing 
bubble environments imagined in Seventies SF. Except it 
looked, for all the world, just like a familiar domestic 
environment: the nice house, nice family set-up ridiculed by 
Jamie Reid, now refurbished with added ironic distantiation 
and hooked up to twenty-four-hour MTV. What had been lost 
was the “glam knowledge” that first entered pop through Pop 
Art: that the social scene is a stage set populated by puppets 
cornfed cheap dreams and sedated by narcotics of every kind. 
The punks knew they were replicants; that everything that 
seemed to be inside was bio-psycho-social machinery that 
should be re-programmed or stripped out. The end of punk 
was the forgetting that the memories were false, that the 
domestic scene was so much pasteboard and image virus. 

At the time of post-punk, pop could still be a counter- 
cultural lab (endlessly raided by, but never subordinated to 
the diktats of, Kapital). It really is not clear whether pop 
could be that again. Someone asked the panel on Wednesday 
if dredging post-punk up was an exercise in nostalgia. But 
this is entirely to miss the point of Jameson’s critique of the 


nostalgia mode. For Jameson, the nostalgia mode is 
exemplified by cultural artefacts which deny, or more 
radically, are unaware of their own total debt to the past. In 
other words, being contemporary does not guarantee being 
modern, especially not in a postmodern culture whose 
temporality is obsessively citational and commemorational. 
One of the most idiotic tics in cultural gatekeeping today is its 
need to justify the past in terms of the present: as if Gang of 
Four were only significant because they “influenced” no- 
mark, here-today boot-sale-tomorrow clones like Bloc Party 
and Franz Ferdinand. As if simply being here, now, meant 
that something New and Important is happening... 

Pop could function differently in post-punk because, at 
that time, it was the space which most readily leant itself to 
the production of a counter-consensual collectivity. Post- 
punk was an awakening from Kapital’s “consensual 
hallucination”, a means of channeling, externalising and 
propagating disquiet and discrepancy. It provided a crack in 
the way the social represented itself; or rather, exposed that 
crack. What the social would have us believe is dysfunction, 
grumbling, failure suddenly became the sound of the “outside 
of everything”. Records, interviews, the music press, were the 
means by which contact could be made between affects, 
concepts, commitments that would previously have been 
locked into private space. 

Some of the panel last Wednesday were unsure if they had 
really done anything, if their dreams of doing something 
more than simply entertaining were anything more than 
youthful naiveté, understandable then, an embarrassment 
now. But the achievements of post-punk can be appreciated, 


negatively, in what culture now lacks. Go into a roomful of 
teenagers and look at their self-scarred arms, the anti- 
depressants that sedate them, the quiet desperation in their 
eyes. They literally do not know what it is they are missing. 
What they don’t have is what post-punk provided... A way 
out... and a reason to get out... 

So is this a counsel of despair? 

Not at all. 

There are new means for producing counter-consensual 
collectivity. 

Like this. 

The web has a distributional reach, a global instaneity, 
whose unprecedented scale is easy to take for granted. But its 
vast potential far outstrips anything that fanzines or records 
could have achieved in the Seventies. What needs to happen 
is a kind of “existential reframing”: to see what happens here 
not as Kapital wants us to see it, as “failed” writers 
resentfully carving out some insignificant niche because they 
can’t “make it” in the overlit interior. The logic of Kapital 
insists that anything that is not reproducing it, or serving 
such a reproduction, is a waste of time. But to reframe what is 
happening would be to radically reverse these idiotic 
priorities. And the continuing relevance of post-punk is to 
remind us that such reversals are possible, to provide the 
impetus for the development of a (punk) will to retake the 
present... 


for your unpleasure: 
the hauter-couture 


of goth 


Ridiculed, forgotten, yet subterraneanly robust, goth is the 
last remnants of glam in popular culture. 

Goth is also the youth cult most associated with women 
and with fiction. This is hardly surprising. As I have pointed 


out before” and is well known, the novel has its origins in 
“Gothic romances” which were predominantly consumed and 
produced by women, and the complicity of women with the 
Gothic has been a commonplace of literary criticism at least 
since Ellen Moers wrote her classic essay, “Female Gothic” in 
1977. 


Why think about goth now? 

Partly it is because goth’s preposterous trash-aristocratic 
excess couldn’t be more at odds with contemporary culture’s 
hip-hop-dominated sportswear brutilitarianism. At the same 


time, though, goth’s shadow seems unusually visible in pop 
culture at the moment, what with references to it in both 
Coronation Street (“you’re not even a proper goth!”) and Big 
Brother (“what is a gothic? Can you make me into one?”) 
Partly it is because Rip It Up has revived fascination in all 
things post-punk, and goth is the last surviving post-punk 


cult. These two facts have resulted in I.T.~ and me seceding 
from the oppressive masculinist cool of the club into the 
more congenial cold of goth haunts. 

Goth has its own version of more or less every other youth 
culture (hence there’s techno goth, industrial goth, hippie 
goth...) But let’s leave aside the male abjects (the Cramps, the 
Birthday Party), the po-faced (the overwrought white dub of 
Bauhaus) and the PoMo (the Sisters of Mercy, who from the 
start traded in a self-conscious meta-goth), and start with 
Siouxsie. 

It is well-known that the Banshees were formed as a result 
of the future Siouxsie and Severin meeting at a Roxy show in 
1974. (This fact was repeated in this really rather bizarre 


piece* on Roxy in last Friday’s Guardian, which pursues the 
postmodern rock critical trend to equate “importance” with 
“influence” far past the point of self-parody, relegating actual 
discussion of Roxy’s output to a paragraph or so before 
launching into a survey of groups they inspired.) So, unlike 
the Birthday Party, who were famously disgusted when they 
arrived in London to find it dominated by new romantic 
poseur-pop, the Banshees belonged to an art pop lineage 
which had a relationship to music which was neither 
ironically distant nor direct. For all their inventiveness, for 
all the damage they wreaked upon the rock form, the 


Birthday Party remained Romantics, desperate to restore an 
expressive and expressionistic force to rock; a quest which 
led them back to the Satanic heartland of the blues. (If 
women want to understand what it is like to be the afflicted 
subject of male sexuality — I wouldn’t necessarily advise it — 
there’s no better fast-track to “what’s inside a boy” than the 
Birthday Party’s “Zoo Music Girl” or “Release the Bats”). By 
contrast with this carnal heat, the early Banshees affected a 
deliberate — and deliberated — coldness and artificiality. 

Siouxsie came from the art rock capital of England — that 
zone of South London in which both David Bowie 
(Beckenham) and Japan (Catford, Beckenham) grew up. 
Although Siouxsie was involved with punk from the very 
beginning, and although all of the major punk figures (even 
Sid Vicious) were inspired by Roxy, the Banshees were the 
first punk group to openly acknowledge a debt to glam. Glam 
has a special affinity with the English suburbs; its 
ostentatious anti-conventionality negatively inspired by the 
eccentric conformism of manicured lawns and quietly-tended 
psychosis Siouxsie sang of on “Suburban Relapse”. 

But glam had been the preserve of male desire: what 
would its drag look like when worn by a woman? This was a 
particularly fascinating inversion when we consider that 
Siouxsie’s most significant resource was not the serial 
identity sexual ambivalence of Bowie but the staging of male 
desire in Roxy Music. She may have hung out with “Bowie 
boys”, but Siouxsie seemed to borrow much more from the 
lustrous PVC blackness of For Your Pleasure than from 
anything in the Thin White Duke’s wardrobe. For Your Pleasure 
songs like “Beauty Queen” and “Editions of You” were self- 


diagnoses of a male malady, a specular desire that fixates on 
female objects that it knows can never satisfy it. Although she 
“makes his starry eyes shiver”, Ferry knows “it never would 
work out”. This is the logic of Lacanian desire, which Alenka 
Zupancié explains as follows: “The [...] interval or gap 
introduced by desire is always the imaginary other, Lacan’s 
petit objet a, whereas the Real (Other) of desire remains 
unattainable. The Real of desire is jouissance — that ‘inhuman 


partner’ (as Lacan calls it) that desire aims at beyond its 


object, and that must remain inaccessible.”° 


Roxy’s “In Every Dreamhome a Heartache” is about an 
attempt, simultaneously disenchanted-cynical and desire- 
delirious, to resolve this deadlock. It is as if Ferry has 
recognised, with Lacan, that phallic desire is fundamentally 
masturbatory. Since, that is to say, a fantasmatic screen 
prevents any sexual relation so that his desire is always for an 
“inhuman partner”, Ferry might as well have a partner that is 
literally inhuman: a blow-up doll. This scenario has many 
precursors: most famously perhaps Hoffman’s short story 
“The Sandman” (one of the main preoccupations of Freud’s 
essay on “The Uncanny” of course), but also Villier de L’isle 
Adam’s lesser known but actually more chilling masterpiece 
of decadent SF, The Future Eve and its descendant, Ira Levin’s 
Stepford Wives. 

If the traditional problem for the male in pop culture has 
been dealing with a desire for the unattainable — for Lacan, 
remember, all desire is a desire for the unattainable — then 
the complementary difficulty for the female has been to come 
to terms with not being what the male wants. The Object 
knows that what she has does not correspond with what the 


subject lacks. 

It is almost as if the female goth response to this dilemma 
is to self-consciously assume the role of the “cold, distanced, 
inhuman partner” (Zizek) of phallic desire. The glam male 
remains trapped in his perfect penthouse populated by dumb 
fantasmatic playdolls; the goth female meanwhile roams 
through the roles of vamp and vampire, succubus, 
automaton. The glam male’s pathologies are those of the 
subject; the goth female’s problematic is that of the object. 
Remember that the original sense of glamour — bewitchment 
— alludes to the power of the auto-objectified over the 
subject. “If God is masculine, idols are always feminine”, 
Baudrillard writes in Seduction, and Siouxsie differed from 
previous pop icons in that she was neither a male artist 
“feminised” into iconhood by fan adoration, nor a female 
marionette manipulated by male svengalis, nor a female 
heroically struggling to assert a marginalised subjectivity. On 
the contrary, Siouxsie’s perversity was to make an art of her 
own objectification. As Simon and Joy put it in The Sex Revolts, 
Siouxsie’s “aspiration [was] towards a glacial exteriority of 
the objet d’art” evinced through “a shunning of the moist, 


pulsing fecundity of organic life.”° This denial of interiority — 
unlike Lydia Lunch, Siouxsie is not interested in “spilling her 
guts”, in a confessional wallowing in the goo and viscera of a 
damaged interiority — corresponds to a staged refusal to 
either be “a warm, compassionate, understanding fellow- 
creature” (Zizek). Like Grace Jones, another who made an art 
of her own objectification, Siouxsie didn’t demand 
R.E.S.P.E.C.T. from her bachelor suitors (with the implied 
promise of a healthy relationship based on mutual regard) 


but subordination, supplication. 

(The goth male is all too ready to comply, although — as 
Nick Cave’s compulsively repetitious career has graphically 
demonstrated — snivelling prostration may well only be the 
prelude to homicidal destruction. Grovelling in front of the 
Ice Queen — “I kiss the hem of her skirt” — the goth male is 
neither object nor subject but — famously — abject. The best 
image of this idiot lust is the slavering, pustulant monstrosity 
on the cover of the Birthday Party’s Junkyard, and their 
“Release the Bats” — a song the group came to despise 
because they thought it might result in their being 
pigeonholed as generic goth — remains the most pulsingly 
compulsive dramatisation of the goth abject surrendering 
himself to the Object of his quivering desire. Cave oscillates 
between worshipping his lady’s femmachinc hauteur — “my 
baby is a cool machine”, “she moves to the pulse of the 
generator” — and pruriently drooling over the “filth” of her 
flesh — “she doesn’t mind a bit of dirt”. This conforms almost 
perfectly with Lacan’s description of the courtly lady, whose 
cold abstraction is not defined by opposition with smelly 
physicality. Cave’s abject is unable to give up on his desire, 
and the result is well-known: in order to continue to desire 
the woman, he must ensure that he cannot possess her, “so 
that Pil girl will just have to go”. Only when he has made her 
as cold and unyielding as Ferry’s “perfect companion” or 
Poe’s parade of beautiful cadavers, can his desire be extended 
“to eternity”, because then it is rendered permanently 
incapable of satisfaction.) 

Instead of asserting an illusory “authentic subjectivity” 
which supposedly lies beneath the costumes and the 


cosmetics, Siouxsie and Grace Jones revelled in becoming 
objects of the gaze. Both would no doubt have appreciated 
the derision Baudrillard poured upon the strategy of 
unmasking appearances in Seduction: “There is no God behind 
the images and the very nothingness they conceal must 


remain a secret.”’ Siouxsie and Jones’ embracing of their 
objectality testifies to the fact that there is a scopic drive that 
cult studs whining about “being reduced to an object” has 
always ignored: the exhibitionist drive to be seen. 

Simon is right that “Painted Bird” (from the Banshees 
mistresspiece, A Kiss in the Dreamhouse) and the nearly 
contemporary “Fireworks” were “virtual manifestos for 
goth”, but it’s worth reflecting on how different these songs 
are in message and mood from the hackneyed image of the 
culture. Both “Painted Bird” and “Fireworks” (with its 
“exultant image of self-beautification as a glam gesture 
flashing amid the murk of mundanity”) are not maudlin, matt 
black or self-absorbed, but celebrations of the colourful and 
the collective. “WE are fireworks”, Siouxsie sings, “burning 
shapes into the night”, and you’d be hard pressed to find a 
song that crackles with so much enjoyment as this. The 
Banshees’ take on Kosinski’s novel The 


Painted Bird is also about the triumph of collective joy over 
persecuted, isolated, individuated subjectivity. In Kosinski’s 
novel, the hero paints one bird and when he throws it back to 
its flock they don’t recognise it and therefore destroy it. But 
Siouxsie’s goths are not painted by another’s hand; they are 
“painted birds by their own design”. It is not the familiar 
tragic-heroic scenario in which an outsider, destined to lose, 


nevertheless makes a solitary stand against the conformist 
herd. The “dowdy flock” are to be “confounded”, but by 
another flock, not by an individual, and the result is not 
frustration, but, again, jouissance — by the end of the song, 
“there’s no more sorrow”. 


Think how different this is to the confederacy of isolation 
produced by Joy Division, whose functional clothes and “non- 
image” implied the traditional male subjectivist privileging of 
the inside over the outside, depth over surface. Here was one 
type of “black hole”: the “line of abolition” Deleuze and 


Guattari describe in “Micropolitics and Segmentarity”,® the 
drive towards total self-destruction. The Banshees, on the 
other hand, were more like the “cold stars” invoked by 
Neubauten: forbidding, remote, yet also the queens of a 
paradoxically egalitarian aristocracy in which membership 
was not guaranteed by birth or beauty but by self-decoration. 
Siouxsie’s hyper-white panstick radiated the “cold light” of 
stardom Baudrillard invokes in Seduction. Stars “are dazzling 
in their nullity, and in their coldness — the coldness of 
makeup and ritual hieraticism (rituals are cool, according to 


McLuhan).”? 


“The sterility of idols is well-known”, Baudrillard continues, 
“they do not reproduce, but arise from the ashes, like the 
phoenix, or from the mirror, like the seductress”. The Gothic 
has always been about replication as opposed to 
reproduction. It’s no coincidence that the female vampire was 
often associated with lesbianism (most gloriously in what is 
perhaps the definitive goth film, The Hunger) because 


vampires and lesbians (like machines) present the horror 
(from the point of view of the phallic One) of a propagative 
power that has no use for the male seed. Conversely, “female 
Gothic” often pathologises pregnancy, utilising the language 
of horror to describe the gradual take-over of the body by an 
entity that is both appallingly familiar and impossibly alien. 
“We Hunger” from the Banshees’ Hyaena, with its “horror of 
suckling”, fits into a lineage of female horror which has seen 


“pregnancy in terms of the appalling rapacity of the insect 


world”, as a “parasitic infestation”.*° 


The principal goth vectors of propagation are, of course, 
signs and clothes (and — clothes as signs). The Siouxsie Look 
is, in effect, a replicatable cosmetic mask — a literal 
effacement of the organic expressivity of the face by a 
geometric pattern, all hard angles and harsh contrasts 
between white and black. White tribalism. 

In Rip It Up, Simon says that the early Banshees were “sexy 
in the way that Ballard’s Crash was sexy”, and Ballard’s 
abstract fiction-theory is as palpable and vast a presence in 
the Banshees as it is in other post-punk. (It’s telling that the 
turn from the angular dryness of the Banshees’ early sound to 
the humid lushness of their later phase should have been 
legitimated by Severin’s reading of The Unlimited Dream 
Company.) But what the Banshees drew (out) from Ballard was 
the equivalence of the semiotic, the psychotic, the erotic and 
the savage. With psychoanalysis (and Ballard is nothing if not 
a committed reader of Freud), Ballard recognised that there is 
no “biological” sexuality waiting beneath the “alienated 
layers” of civilisation. Ballard’s compulsively repeated theme 
of reversion to savagery does not present a return to a non- 


symbolised bucolic Nature, but a fall back into an intensely 
semioticised and ritualised symbolic space. (It is only the 
postmoderns who believe in a pre-symbolic Nature.) 
Eroticism is made possible — not merely mediated — by signs 
and technical apparatus, such that the body, signs and 
machines become interchangeable. 

Baudrillard understood this very well, in his post-punk 
era essay on Crash: 


Each mark, each trace, each scar left on the body is like 
an artificial invagination, like the scarifications of 
savages [...]. Only the wounded body exists symbolically 
— for itself and for others — “sexual desire” is never 
anything but the possibility bodies have of combining 
and exchanging their signs. Now, the few natural 
orifices to which one normally attaches sex and sexual 
activities are nothing next to all the possible wounds, 
all the artificial orifices (but why “artificial”?), all the 
breaches through which the body is reversibilised and, 
like certain topological spaces, no longer knows either 
interior or interior [...] Sex [...] is largely overtaken by 
the fan of symbolic wounds, which are in some sense 
the anagrammatisation of the whole length of the body 
— but now, precisely, it is no longer sex, but something 
else [...] The savages knew how to use the whole body to 
this end, in tattooing, torture, initiation — sexuality 
was only one of the possible metaphors of symbolic 
exchange, neither the most significant, nor the most 
prestigious, as it has become for us in its obsessional 
and realistic reference, thanks to its organic and 


functional character (including in orgasm).'! 


As is well-known, female dis-ease in capitalism is often 
expressed not in an assertion of the “natural” against the 
artificial, but in the anti-organic protest of eating disorders 
and self-cutting. It’s hard not to see this — as I.T. following 
Zizek does — as part of the “obsession” with “realistic 
reference”, an attempt to strip away all signs and rituals so as 
to reach the unadorned thing-in-itself. Goth is in many ways 
an attempt to make good this symbolic deficit in postmodern 
culture: dressing up as re-ritualisation, a recovery of the 
surface of the body as the site for scarification and decoration 
(which is to say, a rejection of the idea that the body is merely 
the container or envelope for interiority). Take goth 
footwear. With their flagrant anti-organic angularity, their 
disdain for the utilitarian criteria of comfort or functionality, 
goth shoes and boots bend, bind, twist and extend the body. 
Clothing recovers its cybernetic and symbolic role as a 
hyperbolic supplement to the body, as what which destroys the 
illusion of organic unity and proportion. 


it doesn’t matter if 
we all die: the cure’s 


unholy trinity* 


“Goth took hold as both a suburban and provincial cult, 
in which young men and women with heavily powdered 
faces, mourning clothes and Robert Smith’s hairstyle 
could be seen at domestic ease in towns _ like 
Littlehampton and Ipswich.” 

— Michael Bracewell, England is Mine: Pop Life in Albion 


from Wilde to Goldie? 


Any discussion of goth will remain incomplete if it doesn’t 
deal with the Cure. 

Goth and the suburbs enjoy a peculiar intimacy (no one 
knows this more than Tim Burton, whose Edward Scissorhands 
brilliantly laced the Avon scent of the suburbs with the 
perfume from goth’s flowers of romance), and is there a 
group more suburban than the Cure? In England is Mine, 


Michael Bracewell made much of their origins in humble 
Crawley. “Quiet and respectable, yet lacking the bourgeois 
superiority of nearby Haywards Heath (home of Suede), 


Crawley is a near perfect example of England at its least 


> For Bracewell, the group are the 


surprising”, he wrote. 
sound of the in-between spaces of English culture: the 
suburbs, yes, but also, adolescence, the suburbia of the soul. 
The Cure are the personification of the not-quite and the not- 
yet: not quite execrated but never really respected; not punk 
veterans but not yet generic Goff. The suspicion that has 
dogged them is that of fakery; yet inauthenticity -as 
existential condition — was the Cure’s stock-in-trade. You can 
hear it all in the grain of Robert Smith’s voice. Bracewell 


again: 


When Smith sang, it wasn’t so much his doom-laden 
lyrics as the actual sound of his voice which lent the 
Cure their mesmeric monotony: it was the voice of 
nervous boredom in a small town bedroom, muffled 
beneath suffocating layers of ennui. Alternately peevish 
and petulant, breathless with anguish or spluttering 
with incoherent rage, Smith’s voice was unique in 


making monotony malleable.’ 


There is a period, a moment, when groups become what 
they are. Everything that has come before is preparation and 
rehearsal; everything that comes after is either decline or 
evasion. Roxy were themselves immediately — the band- 
brand established with the first notes of “Remake, Remodel” 
(with the result that Ferry’s subsequent career has been a 


long essay in disappointment and deferred return), but it’s 
more usual for a group to take a while to find themselves; to 
emerge gradually from a cocoon of allusion, homage and 
plagiarism. It wasn’t quite like that with the Cure, whose best 
work was always produced in negotiation with their 
influences. 

Their early mode — a spidery, punk-spiked pub sub- 
psychedelia — now sounds like a series of thin sketches. The 
Cure become themselves in that moment -lasting three 
albums — after they have shed the petulant quirkiness of 
Three Imaginary Boys but before they have entered the comfort 
zone of branded recognisability. By then, Smith’s panto- 
persona -- lipstick smear, warm beer and Edward Lear — had 
become an archetype in the semiotic cemetery of the student 
disco, and the parameters of the Cure’s style were well- 
established — marked by what quickly became a regular 
oscillation between a post-Sgt. Pepper jollity and a slippers- 
comfortable despair. All of the drama of faltering self- 
discovery and existential experimentalism that makes the 
essential triptych of Seventeen Seconds, Faith and Pornography 
so compelling has gone. 

The Cure’s three crucial albums emerged from the shadow 
of two other bands, whose reputation towered above theirs: 
the Banshees and Joy Division. Smith made no secret of his 
fixation on the Banshees (with whom he would later guest as 
a guitarist). When the band’s first bassist, Michael Dempsey, 
left the band, it was because he “wanted us to be XTC part 2”, 
whereas Smith “wanted us to be the Banshees part 2”. 

Robert Smith’s look — that clown-faced Caligari ragdoll — 
was a male complement to Siouxsie’s. And as with Siouxsie’s, 


Smith’s bird’s nest backcomb, alabaster-white face powder, 
kohl-like eyeliner and badly applied lipstick is easily copied; a 
kit to be readily assembled in any suburban bedroom. It was a 
mask of morbidity, a sign that its wearer preferred fixation 
and obsession above “well-rounded personhood”. 

Goth morbidity arose in part from a Schopenhauerian 
scorn for organic life: from goth’s perspective, death was the 
truth of sexuality. Sexuality was what the ceaseless cycle of 
birth-reproduction-death (as icily surveyed by Siouxsie on 
Dreamhouse’s “Circle Line”) needed in order to perpetuate 
itself. Death was simultaneously outside this circuit and what 
it was really about. Affirming sexuality meant affirming the 
world, whereas goth set itself, in Houllebecq’s marvellous 
phrase, against the world and against life. By the early 
Eighties, it was possible to posit a rock anti-tradition that had 
similar affiliations, an anhedonic, anti-vital rock lineage that 
began with the Stones — with the neurasthenic Jagger of 
“Paint it Black” rather than the cloven-hooved demonic- 
Dionysus of “Sympathy for the Devil” — and passed through 
the Stooges and the Pistols, before reaching its nadir-as- 
zenith in Joy Division. But goth suspected that rock was that 
always and essentially a death trip. This was the gambit of the 
Birthday Party, who hunted rock’s mythology back to the 
fetid, voodoo-stalked crossroads and swamplands of the delta 
blues. After all, isn’t blues the clearest possible 
demonstration of the discrepancy between desire and 
enjoyment, and therefore of the validity of the theory of the 
death drive? The blues juju — or jou-jou — relies upon the 
enjoyment of desires that cannot be satisfied. 

While the Birthday Party literalised the return to the 


blues — their career a kind of hectic rewind of rock history, 
beginning with Pere Ubu/Pop Group modernism and ending 
in a feverish re-imagining of blues — the Cure, like the 
Banshees, went to the other extreme. Maintaining fidelity to 
post-punk’s modernist imperative (novelty or nothing), they 
preferred a sound that was ethereal rather than earthy, 
artificial rather than visceral. You can hear this in Smith’s 
guitar, which, swathed in phasing and __ flange, 
destubtantialised and emasculated, aspires to be pure FX 
denuded of any rock attack. (Is this the first step towards 
MBV’s honeyed amorphousness?) The Cure’s version of blues 
enjoyment-in-the-frustration-of-desire is auditioned in “A 
Forest”: the song in which the group find themselves, 
ironically, since it is a song about loss — or rather about an 
encounter with what can never be possessed. “The girl was 
never there”, Smith sings, a line worthy of Scritti — or Lacan. 
“Running towards nothing. Again and again and again...”, 
Smith — a suburban Scotty seeking his Madeleine — pursues 
the desire-chimera, the petit objet a, through a dreamscape 
vividly sound-painted by oneiric synthesizers, drum- 
machines and Smith’s FX-saturated guitar. “A Forest” was the 
trailer for Seventeen Seconds, and it turned out to be the 
album’s centerpiece. The synthesizers and the drum machine 
bring a moderne sheen lacking on the no-frills hustle and 
bustle of Three Imaginary Boys. Smith was listening to Astral 
Weeks, Hendrix, Nick Drake, Bowie’s Low, and wanted the 
album to be a synthesis of the four. The result was both more 
and less than this. As English as the Smiths would be, but, 
naturally, much more modernist and much less kitchen sink, 
Seventeen Seconds puts one in mind of a deserted country 


house, vast white spaces and empty floorboards decorated by 
the ornate cobwebs of Smith’s guitar. Emotionally, the 
effervescent petulance of the first album has drained away, 
but, even if the predominant mood is now moroseness, it is 
not yet goth-morbid. But there is a kind of cultivated 
detachment, Smith assuming an “ostentatious absenteeism”, 
dissociating himself from an everyday life conceived of as a 
dramaturgy of effigies: “it’s just your part/in the play/for 
today...” 

“I was 21”, Smith told Uncut in 2000, “but I felt really old. I 
actually felt older than I do now. I had absolutely no hope for 
the future. I felt life was pointless. I had no faith in anything. 
I just didn’t see there was much point in continuing with life. 
In the next two years, I genuinely felt that I wasn’t going to 
be alive for much longer. I tried particularly hard to make 
sure I wasn’t.” From its very first moments, Faith locks onto 
this hollow-eyed bleakness, and stays there. Affectively, the 
album is as improbably unwavering as Unknown Pleasures and 
Closer, and the Joy Division (anxiety of) influence hung over 
Faith like an acrid pall, the black source of its paradoxically 
entropic energy, what made it possible but also what would 
relegate it to the status of a revenant. “The whole thing was 
reinforced by the fact that Ian Curtis had killed himself,” 
Smith recalled in the Uncut interview, speaking for the post- 
Joy Division generation (which would of course include New 
Order) that would deem itself inauthentic simply by dint of 
the fact that it had carried on living. “I knew that the Cure 
were considered fake in comparison, and it suddenly dawned 
on me that to make this album convincing I would have to kill 
myself. If I wanted people to accept what we were doing, I 


was going to have to take the ultimate step.”° 

Yet Faith would have benefited from pursuing its 
emotional monotone even more assiduously, if what 
adrenaline that remained had been drained away, and the 
two up-tempo tracks (“Primary” and “Doubt”) had been 
excised. On all the other tracks, Faith flatlines pop, bringing it 
as close to complete stillness as it is possible to be without 
coming to the grinding halt the group had sang of in an 
earlier, much more fleet-of-foot incarnation. There was no 
calmness in Faith’s stillness. It is not tranquil, but 
tranquillised, downer-heavy; not so much oceanic as 
waterlogged, swamped. (In fact, Faith was recorded on coke, 
not tranquillisers.) The album seems to come from another 
planet where gravity is more powerful. The synthesizers, now 
foregrounded more than ever, do most to produce this effect 
of viscous heaviness. They have a cold warmth that fills out the 
sound like valium entering the bloodstream. With Faith, as 
with downers, it is as if the edge has been taken off. Its world is 
without angles, a fug, fog of bleary drear. It lacks the clinical 
quality of Joy Division; this is not the sound of depression, nor 
(as with Movement) of post-traumatic stress, but of a kind of 
total fatalism, in which nothing much matters, where “all cats 
are grey”. Faith finds a strange exhilaration in yielding all 
hope, in playing dead while going through the zombie 
motions, “breathing like the drowning man”. Bracewell’s 
description of the Cure’s sound is nowhere more appropriate 
than when applied to Faith. 


There is no insight or polemic: there are no messages 
and no rallying anthems. Rather, the Cure are the 


musical expression of suburbia itself: a dense and 
repetitious sound, carrying a mesmeric dirge of 
infinitely transferable sounds, all of which sound as 


though they could go on forever — like endless avenues, 
6 


crescents and drives. 
Faith’s tracks are distended, hynoptic (or hypnagogic) in their 
repetitiousness, 


Smith’s mope a wraith that drifts in after introductions that 
typically last for ninety seconds or two minutes. Go through 
the mirror with Smith and what the uninitiated hear as 
directionless dirges become addictive plateaus, gentle 
blizzards you enjoy losing yourself in. 

After this, you would expect recovery and return, a 
compensatory uplift. But in the event the Cure’s season in 
hell was far from over and Pornography outdoes even Faith for 
morbid enervation. But Faith’s amorphousness is replaced by 
a newly jagged abrasion and a jittery rhythmic urgency that 
was the Cure’s take on the then fashionable tribal sound. Its 
template seems to be the less synthesizer-heavy, more 
metallic-brutalist tracks on Closer (“Atrocity Exhibition”, 
“Colony”); the cavernous hollow spaces of PiL; the dancing in 
the ruins urban anomie of Killing Joke. In the end, it sounds 
like “Flowers of Romance” sung by a neurasthenic rather 
than a hysteric, Killing Joke fed on bad trip acid and downers, 
a defunked 23 Skidoo, all at once. 

The opener, “100 Years”, is the Cure’s masterpiece. It 
starts as it means to go on, Smith intoning, “It doesn’t matter 
if we all die”, an invitation even more forbidding than that 


leered by the circus barker Curtis on “The Atrocity 
Exhibition” (“This is way step inside”). Like Joy Division’s 
“Disorder”, “100 Years” seems to lift its head from morbid 
self-absorption to gaze at the world — its words a Cold War 
ticker-tape as filtered through an adolescent nervous system 
in the midst of breakdown — but in reality it only selects for 
consideration those things which confirm its hypothesis that 
cosmic despair is the only justifiable attitude. “Ambition in 
the back of a black car... Sharing the world with slaughtered 
pigs... The soldiers close in...” Smith comes on like Bowie’s 
Newton in the most famous scene of The Man Who Fell to Earth, 
entranced and stupefied by a bank of television screens, all of 
them bringing bad news. What makes this exhilarating rather 
than emiserating is the necrotic urgency of the death-disco 
drum machine and Smith’s guitar riff, which blazes like a 
distress flare in light-polluted sky. 

If Smith’s guitar on Pornography often sounds Eastern, it 
calls up a fantasmatic East in which all of the hippie dreams 
of free-your-mind exotica have been napalmed into oblivion. 
Pornography was famously recorded on LSD washed down by 
alcohol (the band would skulk in a pub waiting for the effects 
of the acid to wear off before they went into the studio) but it 
is psychedelic in the same way that Apocalypse Now is. (There 
are grounds for claiming that Apocalypse Now — with its 
warporn media overload, its schizophrenic delirium, its sense 
that The End is only minutes away — was the post-punk film; 
23 Skidoo, for one, seemed to have emerged fully-formed 
from its vision.) Pornography’s delirium is a Jacob’s Ladder bad 
trip, a psychic Indochina fever dreamt in a Crawley bedroom, 
the hallucinogens giving distended and distorted shape to 


anxieties conjured from the suburban heart of darkness. 

Smith’s lyrics shred sense for the sake of image-impact. 
He has always been a “purveyor of filmic ambience” 
(Bracewell), and the songs on Pornography convey mood 
through striking images (“voodoo smile... siamese twins”) 
that never cohere into any clear meaning. The album is the 
goth equivalent of a chocolate box: an exercise in sheer 
morbid indulgence unleavened by any cheer. 

At the end of the title track, a howling grind that sounds 
like Joy Division’s “The Atrocity Exhibition” spliced with 
Stockhausen’s Hymnen, Smith seeks redemption. “I must fight 
this sickness... Find a cure.” But the sickness, the sickness was 
the most interesting thing about the Cure. 


look at the light! 


Its cover image is a waveform of a blackbird’s song re- 
imagined as a geological formation. Kate Bush’s Aerial is 
Deleuzian MOR: a numinous, luminous twitterscape of 
women-animal becomings, a hymn to light, and lightness. 

I’'d concur with what’s already coalescing into a critical 
consensus: “King of the Mountain” apart, the first disc — “A 
Sea of Honey” — is merely an appetiser for the second CD, the 
sumptuous song suite that is “A Sky of Honey”. 

On the face of it, for this, her return after twelve years, 
Bush could either make a show of pursuing Relevance a la 
Bowie, or Madonna, or else recline into a session-musician 
airbrushed “timelessness” like Bryan Ferry. In the event, she 
tacks closer to the second option, but with considerably more 
success than Ferry has mustered in any of his solo albums for 
the last twenty years. The sonic palette from which Bush has 
constructed Aerial contains few rogue elements, and hardly 
anything that would have discomfited a mid-Eighties 
audience. 

And yet... “A Sky of Honey” in particular has the flavour, if 
not the instrumentation, of later genres. The intermittent 
birdsong, the lambent washes of subdued strings and synth, 


the shifts in atmosphere — now tranquil, now tempestuous, 
now humid, now temperate — recall ambient jungle (I’m put 
in mind more than once of Goldie’s “Mother’), the lush 
opiated vastness of microhouse, English pastoral techno such 
as Ultramarine. 

It is in A Thousand Plateaus’ “Of the Refrain” that Deleuze 
and Guattari write of birdsong. On one side, the refrain is a 
territorial marker, the tracing of an interiority; on the other, 
it opens out into the cosmos. Aerial is similarly double: “A Sea 
of Honey” exploring the heimlich, “A Sky of Honey” dreaming 
the cosmic. 

“King of the Mountain” has been one of the singles of the 
year — insidious and insinuating rather than immediate, a 
blind-side seduction which makes itself a habit before you’ve 
registered awareness of it. Its snow-swept eyrie contains the 
grandest, most elemental, rendition of the twin themes that 
dominate “A Sea of Honey” — domesticity and isolation. Kane 
in Xanadu doubles Elvis in Graceland, wind howling around 
the melancholy opulence of their empty mansions. 

The other songs on “A Sea of Honey” retreat from these 
media mythscapes into more intimate territory. Bush flirts 
with sentimental indulgence on the song addressed to her 
son, “Bertie”, while meditating on the line between bliss and 
banality, pathos and bathos, on “How to be Invisible” and 
“Mrs Bartolozzi”, with their imagery of anoraks, wallflowers 
and washing machines. 

What is fascinating about “Sea of Honey” is its exploration 
of the Mother’s bliss, which has by definition been excised 
from a history of rock that has endlessly staged the cutting of 
the apron strings, the rejection of the maternal. There’s 


something oppressive and cloying about this domestic space, 
something suffocating and greedily insatiable about the 
protected interiority Bush creates. The “domestic idyll” is 
literally agoraphobic, troubled by an Outside it seeks to keep 
at bay. “How to be Invisible” is a spell in which ultra-ordinary 
objects are brandished as protective charms, preservatives of 
a domesticity that has withdrawn from the wider social 
world. Yet the heimlich, the homely, is always, also, the 
unheimlich, the unhomely, the uncanny. In “Mrs Bartolozzi”, 
a widow’s solitude transforms laundry into a Svankmajer 
erotic dance, the boredom, loneliness and sadness of a 
confined mind transfiguring empty clothes into an animist 
memory-theatre. In these circumscribed horizons, washing 
the floor becomes a religious observance, an act of mourning 
and melancholy. 

If “A Sea of Honey” is a kitchen-sink delirium, its spaces 
all carpeted and walled, then “A Sky of Honey” is widescreen, 
panoramic, as the words of the stand-out track, “Nocturn”, 
have it. Everything opens out. It’s as if we leave the artificial 
cocoon of the house to step out into the garden, a garden 
which becomes a lush Ernst jungle... 

What impresses most about “A Sky of Honey” is the 
majesty of its composition. It sounds like the sort of thing Bush 
has done before, but there’s nothing else in her oeuvre quite 
so sustained as this. I mean “composition” in the painterly at 
least as much as the musicianly sense, for “A Sky of Honey” is 
Bush’s most painterly record: each sound a delicate stroke in 
a delicately constructed and minutely conceived picture. Van 
Gogh (“the flowers are melting!”), Chagall, Ernst, as much as 
Joyce or Bronte, seem to be the guiding hands. The painter’s 


medium — light — may well be “A Sky of Honey”’s principal 
preoccupation. The image of a pavement artist’s work 
destroyed by rain is central to “A Sky of Honey”: “all the 
colours are running”. Yet no mood of regret or melancholy 
can last long here; in an instant, Bush is celebrating “the 
wonderful sunset” that the run colours have become. 
Ironically for a record so artfully and fastidiously designed, so 
foreign to rock and jazz’s spontaneity, the message is that the 
Accident is the pre-eminent form of creation. We are gently 
urged to revel in the innocence of becoming, to “look at the 
The record 


’ 


light... and all the time it’s a changing...”. 
celebrates the butterfly-wing fragility of the Moment, the 
neverstatic Hacceities Nature is madly composing and is 
composed of, the ever-evanescent iridescences of the 
“somewhere in-between” in which we are always lost. 
Between wakefulness and sleep, between land and sea, 
between sky and dust, between day and night, “A Sky of 
Honey” reaches its poised, anti-climax plateau on the last 
three tracks, “Somewhere in Between”, “Nocturn” and 
“Aerial”. By “Somewhere in Between”, we have reached dusk, 
the time when everything de-substantialises, and the song is 
a dance of dying light, a savouring of the evening’s 
bewitched, betwixt state. “Nocturn” is up there with anything 
she’s done — its oneiric, oceanic disco a kind of becalmed 
answer to Patti Smith’s “Horses”, the white water of Smith’s 
angsts and passions soothed and smoothed into a placid lake 
in which amphibious longings swim and commingle. 
“Nocturn” is a journey to the end of the night very different 
to the one Celine took: a Van Gogh-visionary stretching, a 
reaching both up into the sky and down into the sea. 


The stars are caught in our hair 
The stars are on our fingers 

A veil of diamond dust 

Just reach up and touch it 

The sky’s above our heads 

The sea’s around our legs 

In milky, silky water 

We swim further and further 


We dive down... We dive down... 


There are suggestions of Joyce’s Anna Livia Plurabelle 
here, the river heading out to the sea that will swallow it, just 
as the dreaming mind awakens. After this, there is the 
dappled return of sunlight on “Aerial”, glimmers of light on 
the water’s surface, “all of the birds laughing”, Bush joining 
in. 

Magisterial, and better with every listen. 


is pop undead?! 


If there is a current coalescence of fascination around 
hauntology, there is also a mounting anxiety about the death, 
dearth, end of pop. A few examples: this atrocious piece on 


the “death of black music’”’ (significant only for the statistics 


it cites), Simon’s 05 round-up for Frieze,> and a number of 
recent threads on Dissensus. The suspicion is inescapable: 
part of the reason why hauntology should appeal to us so 
much now is that, unconsciously, and _ increasingly 
consciously, we suspect that something has died. 

Nothing lasts forever, of that I’m sure. 

Announcements of the demise of pop are nothing new of 
course. And there any number of reasons to be sceptical 
about the language of “death” and morbidity (not least 
because it concedes too much to the vitalist valorisations of 
life). The fact is that nothing ever really dies, not in cultural 
terms. At a certain point — a point that is usually only 
discernible retrospectively — cultures shunt off into the 
sidings, cease to renew themselves, ossify into Trad. They 
don’t die, they become undead, surviving on old energy, kept 
moving, like Baudrillard’s deceased cyclist, only by the 


weight of inertia. Cultures have vibrancy, piquancy only for a 
while. Lyric poetry, the novel, opera, jazz had their time; 
there is no question of these cultures dying, they survive, but 
with their will-to-power diminished, their capacity to define a 
time lost. No longer historic or existential, they become 
historical and aesthetic — lifestyle options not ways of life. 

We are lulled into the belief that pop should be immune to 
this process by the illusion to which those within any culture, 
any civilisation, fall prey (perhaps it is a necessary illusion?): 
the belief that our own culture will continue forever. The 
question we need to ask, then, is not so much “will pop die?”, 
but has pop already reached the point of undeath? Has it 
seduced us into an entropy tango, clasping us with zombie 
fingers as it slowly winds down towards permanent 
irrelevance? Questions worth raising, if only because as soon 
as they are no longer raised we can be sure that pop really 
has reached its terminal phase. 

What alarms me is the lack of alarm about pop’s current 
situation. Where is the chorus of disapproval and disquiet 
about a group like the Arctic Monkeys? Granted, it is not that 
the Arctic Monkeys are significantly worse than any of their 
retro forebears (although if anything ought to set alarm bells 
ringing, it is a situation where “not being worse” than 
mediocre predecessors is thought of as worthy of comment, 
still less of muted celebration). What is novel is the 
discrepancy between the Arctic Monkeys’ modest 
“achievements” and the scale of their success. Critical success 
is more easily bought than ever, of course, so we shouldn’t be 
surprised that the NME rates the Monkeys’ album as fifth best 
British album of all time (disgust would be more an 


appropriate response, actually). But such subjective and 
professionally expedient over-valuations would be 
insignificant were it not for the quantitative scale of the Arctic 
Monkeys’ success — fastest selling UK debut album ever! 
What this implies is a libidinal deficit in pop’s audience as 
well as in its old media commentariat — a much more 
worrying trend. 

The Arctic Monkeys’ success is as glum news for popists as 
it is for those of us who still pledge allegiance to pop’s 
modernist tendencies. (It should be noted here that, with R&B 
and hip-hop faltering and stuttering, popist-approved pop 
has been one of the last remaining places where modernism’s 
guttering flame persists.) As Marcello has suggested recently 
over at Church of Me, the new new pop (Rachel Stevens, Girls 
Aloud) is barely secure, certainly not thriving, and its 
(relatively) disappointing sales compare ominously with the 
voracious triumph of retro-indie and the new authenticity 
(Blunt! Jack Johnson!). There has been a kind of reversal, with 
new new pop occupying the old pre-indie independent 
position of the popular-experimental, and indie dominating 
the mainstream. (Hence I would argue that, contra Simon in 
the Frieze article, it is mew new pop, not some putative, 
ghastly fusion “of grime and indie rock”, that is today’s 
closest equivalent to post-punk.) A little insight into the 
times can be gleaned from the fact that NME has been reduced 
to ostentatiously banning Blunt from its awards ceremony 
(because there are a MILLION miles between his maudlin 
mumbling and that of their darlings, naturally). James Blunt 
versus Coldplay: is this what pop antagonism is reduced to? A 
pseudo-conflict that should excite only Swiftian ridicule. 


Hate’s not your enemy, love’s your enemy. 

Such plastic antagonisms (and NME/corporate indie can’t 
survive without convincing its consumers that they are an 
alternative to something, that there is some region of common- 
sense, complacent, middle of the road mediocrity that they 
don’t already occupy) substitute for the real antagonisms that 
once sustained pop. Even the most ardent devotees must 
sense something is missing — there’s just a hint in Doherty’s 
puppy dog junky eyes that even he recognises the sad fact 
that even if he dies, it won’t stop being pantomime. (Although 
one suspects that the current malaise can in large part be 
accounted for by the fact that “what is missing” is not even 
noticed, still less mourned or hankered for.) 

Indie may have all but driven black musics out of the 
British charts, hybridity may be off the agenda, but you can 
bet your bottom dollar that all of those indie bands just love 
hip-hop and R&B. Pop at its most febrile was stoked by 
critical and negative energies that are now exhausted — or 
which have been exiled as far too impolite for today’s pot- 
pourri, PoMo buffet in which you can have a bit of indie here, 
a bit of R&B there, where contradictions and anomalies have 
been Photoshopped out, where it all happily fits into one 
well-adjusted consumer basket. If the revolutionary tumult of 
the post-punk era was characterised by restless 
dissatisfaction, anxiety, uncertainty, rage, harshness, 
unfairness — that is, by an atmosphere of relentless criticism 
— today’s pop scene is suffused with laxness, bland 
acceptance, quiescent hedonism, luxuriant self-satisfaction 
(ALL those awards shows!) — that is, by PR. 

What pop lacks now is the capacity for nihilation, for 


producing new potentials through the negation of what 
already exists. One example, of many possible. Both the 
Birthday Party and new pop nihilated one another: far from 
existing in a relation of mutual acceptance or of mutual 
ignorance each defined themselves in large part by not being 
the other. One shouldn’t rush to conceive of this in simple- 
minded dialectical terms as thesis-antithesis, since the 
relationships are not only oppositional — there is always 
more than one way to nihilate, and it is always possible for 
any individual thing to nihilate more than one Other. It seems 
at least plausible to suggest that the capacity for renewed 
nihilation is what has driven pop. So let’s dare to conceive of 
pop not as an archipelago of neighbouring but unconflicting 
options, not as a sequence of happy hybridities or pallid 
incommensurabilities, but as a spiral of nihilating vortices. 
Such a model of pop is utterly foreign to postmodern 
orthodoxies. But pop is either modernist or it is nothing at 
all. 

Just because something is current doesn’t mean it is new. 
Saying that pop was better twenty-five years ago is NOT to be 
nostalgic; on the contrary, it is to resist the ambient, airtight, 
total nostalgia that can not only tolerate but delight in the 
latest regurgitations on the indie retreadmill. 

Let’s dispense once and for all with popist- 
Deleuzianism/Deleuzian popism’s obligatory positivity. The 
fact we happen to be alive now doesn’t mean that we must be 
committed to the belief that this is the best time to live EVER. 
We have no duty to search out entertainment and spread a 
little excitement everywhere we go. (Think of how hard to 
please audiences were in the mid-Seventies, in the midst of a 


veritable cornucopia by comparison with today’s grim desert; 
and think of what that dissatisfaction produced.) So, please, 
no consumerist homilies about the fact that “it is always 
possible to find good records, no matter what the year”. Yes, 
of course it is, but as soon as pop is reduced to good records it 
really is all over. When pop can no longer muster a nihilation 
of the World, a nihilation of the Possible, then it will only be 
the ghosts that are worthy of our time. 


memorex for the 
kraken: the fall’s 


pulp modernism 


Part 


“Maybe industrial ghosts are making Spectres 
redundant” 


— The Fall, Dragnet sleevenotes” 


‘““M.R. James be born be born 
Yog Sothoth rape me lord 
Sludge Hai Choi 

Van Greenway 

Ar Corman” 

— The Fall, “Spectre Vs. Rector”? 


“Scrawny, gnarled, gaunt: Smith doesn’t waltz with 
ghosts. He materialises them.” 


— Mark Sinker, “Look Back In Anguish”* 


Who can put their finger on the Weird? 

It’s taken me more than twenty years to attempt this 
deciphering. Back then, the Fall did something to me. But 
what, and how? 

Let’s call it an Event, and at the same time note that all 
Events have a dimension of the uncanny. If something is too 
alien, it will fail to register; if it is too easily recognised, too 
easily cognizable, it will never be more than a reiteration of 
the already known. When the Fall pummelled their way into 
my nervous system, circa 1983, it was as if a world that was 
familiar — and which I had thought too familiar, too quotidian 
to feature in rock — had returned, expressionistically 
transfigured, permanently altered. 

I didn’t know then, that, already, in 1983, the Fall’s 
greatest work was behind them. No doubt the later albums 
have their merits but it is on Grotesque (After the Gramme) 
(1980), Slates (1981) and Hex Enduction Hour (1982) where the 
group reached a pitch of sustained abstract invention that 
they — and few others — are unlikely to surpass. In its 
ambition, its linguistic inventiveness and its formal 
innovation, this triptych bears comparison with the great 
works of twentieth-century high literary modernism (Joyce, 
Eliot, Lewis). The Fall extend and performatively critique that 
mode of high modernism by reversing the impersonation of 
working-class accent, dialect and diction that, for example, 
Eliot performed in “The Waste Land”. Smith’s strategy 


involved aggressively retaining accent while using — in the 
domain of a supposedly popular entertainment form — highly 
arcane literary practices. In doing so, he laid waste the notion 
that intelligence, literary sophistication and artistic 
experimentalism are the exclusive preserve of the privileged 
and the formally educated. But Smith knew that aping 
master-class morés presented all sorts of other dangers; it 
should never be a matter of proving (to the masters) that the 
white crap could be civilised. Perhaps all his writing was, 
from the start, an attempt to find a way out of that paradox 
which all working-class aspirants face — the impossibility of 
working-class achievement. Stay where you are, speak the 
language of your fathers, and you remain nothing; move up, 
learn to speak in the master language, and you have become a 
something, but only by erasing your origins — isn’t the 
achievement precisely that erasure? (“You can string a 
sentence together, how can you possibly be working class, my 
dear?”) 


The temptation for Smith was always to fit into the easy role 
of working-class spokesman, speaking from an assigned place 
in a given social world. Smith played with that role (“the 
white crap that talks back”, “Prole Art Threat”, “Hip Priest”) 
whilst refusing to actually play it. He knew that 
representation was a trap; social realism was the enemy 
because in supposedly “merely” representing the social 
order, it actually constituted it. Against the social realism of 
the official left, Smith developed a late-twentieth-century 
urban English version of the “grotesque realism” Bakhtin 
famously described in Rabelais and his World. Crucial to this 


grotesque realism is a contestation of the classificatory 
system which deems cultures (and populations) to be either 
refined or vulgar. As Peter Stallybrass and Allon White 
argued, “the grotesque tends to operate as a critique of a 


dominant ideology which has already set the terms of, 


designating what is high and low”.° 


Instead of the high modernist appropriation of working- 
class speech and culture, Smith’s pulp modernism reacquaints 
modernism with its disavowed pulp doppelganger. 

Lovecraft is the crucial figure here, since his texts — 
which first appeared in pulp magazines like Weird Tales — 
emerged from an occulted trade between pulp horror and 
modernism. Follow the line back from Lovecraft’s short 
stories and you pass through Dunsany and M.R. James before 
coming to Poe. But Poe also played a decisive role in the 
development of modernism — via his influence on Baudelaire, 
Mallarmé, Valéry and their admirer T.S. Eliot. “The Waste 


Land”’s debt to Dracula, for instance, is well-known.® The 
fragmentary, citational structure of a story like Lovecraft’s 
“Call of Cthulhu”, meanwhile, recalls “The Waste Land”. More 
than that: as Benjamin Noys argued in his paper “Lovecraft 
the Sinthome” (given at the recent “Gothic Remains” 
conference at Sussex), the abominations from which 
Lovecraft’s strait-laced scholars recoil bear comparisons with 
cubist and futurist art: Lovecraft, that is to say, turns 
modernism into an object of horror. 

Yet Lovecraft’s texts are exemplary of Weird, rather than 
straightforwardly Gothic, fiction. Weird fiction has its own 
consistency, which can be most clearly delineated by 
comparing it to two adjacent modes, fantasy and the 


uncanny. Fantasy (and Tolkien is the exemplar here) 
presupposes a completed world, a world that, although 
superficially different to “ours” (there may be different 
species, or supernatural forces) is politically all-too familiar 
(there is usually some nostalgia for the ordered organisation 
of feudal hierarchy). The uncanny, meanwhile, is set in “our” 
world — only that world is no longer “ours” any more, it no 
longer coincides with itself, it has been estranged. The Weird, 
however, depends upon the difference between two (or more) 
worlds — with “world” here having an ontological sense. It is 
not a question of an empirical difference — the aliens are not 
from another planet, they are invaders from another reality 
system. Hence the defining image is that of the threshold, the 
door from this world into another, and the key figure is the 
“Lurker at the Threshold” — what, in Lovecraft’s mythos is 
called Yog Sothoth. The political philosophical implications 
are clear: there is no world. What we call the world is a local 
consensus hallucination, a shared dream. 


Is There Anybody There? 


“Part One: spectre versus rector 
The rector lived in Hampshire 

The Spectre was from Chorazina)...” 
— The Fall, “Spectre Vs. Rector” 


“Spectre Vs. Rector”, from 1979’s Dragnet, is the first moment 
— still chilling to hear — when the Fall both lay out and 
implement their pulp modernist methodology. “Spectre Vs. 
Rector” is not only a ghost story, it is a commentary on the 


ghost story. The chorus, if it can be called that, is a litany of 
pulp forebears — “M.R. James be born be born/Yog Sothoth 
rape me lord...” — in which language devolves into 
asignifying chant, verbal ectoplasm: “Sludge Hai Choi/Van 
Greenway/Ar Corman”. 

Not coincidentally, “Spectre Vs. Rector” was the moment 
when the Fall really began to sound like themselves. Before 
that, the Fall’s sound is a grey-complexioned, conspicuously 
consumptive garage plink-plonk punk, amphetamine-lean 
and on-edge, marijuana-fatalistic, simultaneously arrogant 
and unsure of itself, proffering its cheap and nastiness as a 
challenge. All of the elements of Smith’s later (peripheral) 
vision are there on Live at the Witch Trials and on the other 
tracks on Dragnet — watery-eyed figures lurking in the corner 
of the retina, industrial estates glimpsed through 
psychotropic stupor — but they have not yet been condensed 
down, pulped into the witches’ brew that will constitute 
Smith’s plane of consistency. 

On “Spectre Vs. Rector”, any vestigial rock presence 
subsides into hauntology. The original track is nothing of the 
sort — it is already a palimpsest, spooked by itself; at least 
two versions are playing, out of sync. The track — and it is 
very definitely a track, not a “song” — foregrounds both its 
own textuality and its texturality. It begins with cassette hum 
and when the sleeve notes tell us that it was partly “recorded 
in a damp warehouse in MC/R” we are far from surprised. 
Steve Hanley’s bass rumbles and thumps like some implacable 
earth-moving machine invented by a deranged underground 
race, not so much rising from subterranea as dragging the 
sound down into a troglodytic goblin kingdom in which 


ordinary sonic values are inverted. From now on, and for all 
the records that really matter, Hanley’s bass will be the lead 
instrument, the monstrous foundations on which the Fall’s 
upside-down sound will be built. Like Joy Division, fellow 
modernists from Manchester, the Fall scramble the grammar 
of white rock by privileging rhythm over melody. 

Fellow modernists they might have been, but the Fall and 
Joy Division’s take on modernism could not have been more 
different. Hannett and Saville gave Joy Division a minimalist, 
metallic austerity; the Fall’s sound and cover art, by contrast, 
was gnarled, collage cut-up, deliberately incomplete. Both 
bands were dominated by forbiddingly intense vocalist- 
visionaries. But where Curtis was the depressive-neurotic, the 
end of the European Romantic line, Smith was the psychotic, 
the self-styled destroyer of Romanticism. 

“Unsuitable for Romantics”, Smith will graffiti onto the 
cover of Hex Enduction Hour, and “Spectre Vs. Rector” is the 
template for the anti-Romantic methodology he will deploy 
on the Fall’s most important releases. After “Spectre Vs. 
Rector”, there is no Mark E Smith the romantic subject. The 
novelty of Smith’s approach is to impose the novel or tale 
form (“Part One: spectre versus rector...”) into the Romantic- 
lyrical tradition of the r and r song, so that the author- 
function supplants that of the lyrical balladeer. (There are 
parallels between what Smith does to rock and the cut-up 
surgery Eliot performed on the etherised patient of Romantic 
expressive subjectivity in his early poems.) Smith chant- 
narrates, not sings, “Spectre Vs. Rector”. 

The story is simple enough, and, on the surface, is 
deliberately conventional: a post-Exorcist revisiting of the 


classic English ghost story. (At another level, the narrative is 
generated by a Roussel-like playing with similar words: 
Rector/Spectre/Inspector/Excorcist/Exhausted.) A rector is 
possessed by a malign spirit (“the spectre was from 
Chorazina” — described on the sleevenotes as “a negative 
Jerusalem”); a police inspector tries to intervene but is driven 
insane. (This a real Lovecraftian touch, since the dread fate 
that haunts Lovecraft’s characters is not of being consumed 
by the polytendrilled abominations but by the schizophrenia 
that their appearance often engenders.) Both Rector and 
Inspector have to be saved by a third figure, a shaman-hero, 
an Outsider who “goes back to the mountains” when the 
exorcism is complete. 

The Rector stands for rectitude and rectilinearity as well 
as for traditional religious authority. (The ontological shock 
that Lovecraft’s monstrosities produce is typically described, 
any Lovecraft reader will recall, in terms of a twisting of 
rectilinear geometries.) The Inspector, meanwhile, as Ian 
Penman conjectured in his 1980 interview with the Fall 


“stands for an investigative, empirical world view”.’ The hero 
(“his soul possessed a thousand times”) has more affinity with 
the Spectre, whom he absorbs and becomes (“the spectre 
possesses the hero/ but the possession is ineffectual”) than 
with the agents of rectitude and or empirical investigation. It 
seems that the hero is driven more by his addiction to being 
possessed, which is to say dispossessed of his own identity 
(“that was his kick from life”) than from any altruistic 
motive. He has no love for the social order he rescues (“I have 
saved a thousand souls/they cannot even save their own”) 
but in which he does not occupy a place. “Those flowers take 


them away”, he said: 


They’re only funeral decorations 

And this is a drudge nation 

A nation of no imagination 

A stupid dead man is their ideal 

They shirk me and think me unclean... 
UNCLEAN... 


In Madness and Civilisation, Foucault argues that the insane 
occupy the structural position vacated by the leper, while in 
The Ecstasy of Communication, Baudrillard describes “the state 
of terror proper to the schizophrenic: too great a proximity 
of everything, the unclean promiscuity of everything which 


touches, invests and penetrates without resistance, with no 


halo of private projection to protect him anymore”.® 


Baudrillard is of course describing the schizophrenia of media 
systems which overwhelm all interiority. Television brings us 
voices from far away (and there’s always something on the 
other side...). For Baudrillard, there is an increasing flatness 
between media and the schizophrenic delirium in which they 
feature; psychotics often describe themselves as receivers for 
transmitted signal. And what is the hero of “Spectre Vs. 
Rector” if not another version of the “ESP medium of 
discord” that Smith sings of on “Psychic Dancehall”? 

Smith’s own methodology as_ writer-ranter-chanter 
echoes that of the hero-malcontent. He becomes (nothing 
but) the mystic pad on which stray psychic signals impress 
themselves, the throat through which a warring multiplicity 


of mutually antatognistic voices speak. This is not only a 
matter of the familiar idea that Smith “contains multitudes”; 
the schizophonic riot of voices is itself subject to all kinds of 
mediation. The voices we hear will often be reported speech, 
recorded in the compressed “telegraphic” headline style 
Smith borrowed from the Lewis of Blast. 

Listening to the Fall now, I’m often reminded of another 
admirer of Lewis, Marshall McLuhan. The McLuhan of The 
Mechanical Bride (subtitle: The Folklore of Industrial Man), 
understood very well the complicity between mass media, 
modernism and pulp. McLuhan argued that modernist collage 
was a response to the perfectly schizophrenic layout of the 
newspaper frontpage. (And Poe, who in addition to his role as 
a forebear of Weird fiction, was also the inventor of the 
detective genre, plays a crucial role in The Mechanical Bride.) 


Part If 


M.R. James, Be Born Be Born 


“Ten times my age, one tenth my height...” 
— The Fall, “City Hobgoblins”* 


“So he plunges into the Twilight World, and a political 
discourse framed in terms of witchcraft and demons. 
It’s not hard to understand why, once you start 
considering it. The war that the Church and triumphant 
Reason waged on a scatter of wise-women and 
midwives, lingering practitioners of folk-knowledge, 
has provided a powerful popular image for a huge 
struggle for political and intellectual dominance, as 
first Catholics and later Puritans invoked a rise in devil- 
worship to rubbish their opponents. The ghost-writer 
and antiquarian M.R. James (one of the writers Smith 
appears to have lived on during his peculiar drugged 
adolescence) transformed the folk-memory into a bitter 
class-struggle between established science and law, and 
the erratic, vengeful, relentless undead world of 
wronged spirits, cheated of property or voice, or the 
simple dignity of being believed in.” 

— Mark Sinker, “Watching the City Hobgoblins”? 


Whether Smith first came to James via TV or some other 


route, James’ stories exerted a powerful and persistent 
influence on his writing. Lovecraft, an enthusiastic admirer of 
James’ stories to the degree that he borrowed their structure 
(scholar/researcher steeped in empiricist common sense is 
gradually driven insane by contact with an abyssal alterity) 
understood very well what was novel in James’ tales. “In 
inventing a new type of ghost”, Lovecraft wrote of James, 


he departed considerably from the conventional Gothic 
traditions; for where the older stock ghosts were pale 
and stately, and apprehended chiefly through the sense 
of sight, the average James ghost is lean, dwarfish and 
hairy — a sluggish, hellish night-abomination midway 


betwixt beast and man — and usually touched before it is 
4 


seen. 

Some would question whether these dwarven figures (“ten 
times my age, one tenth my height”) could be described as 
“shosts” at all; often, it seemed that James was writing demon 
rather than ghost stories. 

If the libidinal motor of Lovecraft’s horror was race, in the 
case of James it was class. For James scholars, contact with 
the anomalous was usually mediated by the “lower classes”, 
which he portrayed as lacking in intellect but in possession of 
a deeper knowledge of weird lore. As Lovecraft and James 
scholar S.T. Joshi observes: 


The fractured and dialectical English in which [James’ 
array of lower-class characters] speak or write is, in one 
sense, a reflection of James’ well-known penchant for 
mimicry; but it cannot be denied that there is a certain 


element of malice in his relentless exhibition of their 
intellectual failings. [...] And yet, they occupy pivotal 
places in the narrative: by representing a kind of 
middle ground between the scholarly protagonists and 
the aggressively savage ghosts, they frequently sense 
the presence of the supernatural more quickly and 
more instinctively than their excessively learned 


betters can bring themselves to do.” 


James wrote his stories as Christmas entertainments for 
Oxford undergraduates, and Smith was doubtless provoked 
and fascinated by James’ stories in part because there was no 
obvious point of identification for him in them. “When I was 
at the witch trials of the twentieth century they said: You are 
white crap.” (Live at the witch trials: is it that the witch trials 
have never ended or that we are in some repeating structure 
which is always excluding and denigrating the Weird?) 

A working-class autodidact like Smith could scarcely be 
conceived of in James; sclerotically-stratified universe; such a 
being was a monstrosity which would be punished for the 
sheer hubris of existing. (Witness the amateur archaeologist 
Paxton in “A Warning to the Curious”. Paxton was an 
unemployed clerk and therefore by no means working class 
but his grisly fate was as much a consequence of “getting 
above himself” as it was of his disturbing sacred Anglo-Saxon 
artefacts.) Smith could identify neither with James’ 
expensively-educated protagonists nor with his uneducated, 
superstitious lower orders. As Mark Sinker puts it: “James, an 
enlightened Victorian intellectual, dreamed of the spectre of 
the once crushed and newly rising working classes as a 


brutish and irrational Monster from the Id: Smith is working 
class, and is torn between adopting this image of himself and 


fighting violently against it. It’s left him with a loathing of 


liberal humanist condescension.”® 


But if Smith could find no place in James’ world, he would 
take a cue from one of Blake’s mottoes (adapted in Dragnet’s 
“Before the Moon Falls”) and create his own fictional system 
rather than be enslaved by another man’s. (Incidentally, isn’t 
Blake a candidate for being the original pulp modernist?) In 
James’ stories, there is, properly speaking, no working class at 
all. The lower classes that feature in his tales are by and large 
the remnants of the rural peasantry, and the supernatural is 
associated with the countryside. James’ scholars typically 
travel from Oxford or London to the witch-haunted flatlands 
of Suffolk, and it is only here that they encounter demonic 
entities. Smith’s fictions would locate spectres in the urban 
here and now; he would establish that their antagonisms 
were not archaisms. 

Sinker: “No one has so perfectly studied the sense of 
threat in the English horror story: the twinge of 
apprehension at the idea that the wronged dead might return 


to claim their property, their identity, their own voice in 


their own land.” 


The Grotesque Peasants Stalk the Land 


“Detective versus rector possessed by spectre 
Spectre blows him against the wall 
Says direct, ‘This is your fall 


I’ve waited since Caesar for this 


Damn fatty, my hate is crisp! 
I'll rip your fat body to pieces!’”” 
— The Fall, “Spectre Vs. Rector” 


“The word grotesque derives from a type of Roman 
ornamental design first discovered in the fifteenth cenury, 
during the excavation of Titus’s baths. Named after the 
‘grottoes’ in which they were found, the new forms consisted 
of human and animal shapes intermingled with foliage, 
flowers, and fruits in fantastic designs which bore no 
relationship to the logical categories of classical art. For a 
contemporary account of these forms we can turn to the 
Latin writer Vitruvius. Vitruvius was an official charged with 
the rebuilding of Rome under Augustus, to whom his treatise 
On Architecture is addressed. Not surprisingly, it bears down 
hard on the ‘improper taste’ for the grotesque. ‘Such things 
neither are, nor can be, nor have been,’ says the author in his 
description of the mixed human, animal, and vegetable 
forms: 


For how can a reed actually sustain a roof, or a 
candelabrum the ornament of a gable? or a soft and 
slender stalk, a seated statue? or how can flowers and 
half-statues rise alternately from roots and stalks? Yet 
when people view these falsehoods, they approve 
rather than condemn, failing to consider whether any 
of them can really occur or not.” 


— Patrick Parrinder, James Joyce® 


By the time of Grotesque (After the Gramme), the Fall’s pulp 


modernism has become an entire political-aesthetic program. 
At one level, Grotesque can be positioned as the barbed Prole 
Art retort to the lyric antique Englishness of public school 
prog. Compare, for instance, the cover of “City Hobgoblins” 
(one of the singles that came out around the time of 
Grotesque) with something like Genesis’ Nursery Cryme. Nursery 
Cryme presents a gently corrupted English surrealist idyll. On 
the “City Hobgoblins” cover, an urban scene has been invaded 
by “emigres from old green glades”: a leering, malevolent 
cobold looms over a dilapidated tenement. But rather than 
being smoothly integrated into the photographed scene, the 
crudely rendered hobgoblin has been etched, Nigel Cooke- 
style, onto the background. This is a war of worlds, an 
ontological struggle, a struggle over the means of 
representation. 

Grotesque’s “English Scheme” was a thumbnail sketch of 
the territory over which the war was being fought. Smith 
would observe later that it was “English Scheme” which 
“prompted me to look further into England’s ‘class’ system. 
INDEED, one of the few advantages of being in an 
impoverished sub-art group in England is that you get to see 
(If eyes are peeled) all the different strata of society — for 


free.”? The enemies are the old right, the custodians of a 
National Heritage image of England (“poky quaint streets in 
Cambridge”) but also, crucially, the middle-class left, the 
Chabertistas of the time, who “condescend to black men” and 
“talk of Chile while driving through Haslingdon”. In fact, 
enemies were everywhere. Lumpen-punk was in many ways 
more of a problem than prog, since its reductive literalism 
and perfunctory politics (“circles with A in the middle”) 


colluded with social realism in censuring/censoring the 
visionary and the ambitious. 

Although Grotesque is an enigma, its title gives clues. 
Otherwise incomprehensible references to “huckleberry 
masks”, “a man with butterflies on his face” and Totale’s 
“ostrich headdress” and “light blue plant-heads” begin to 
make sense when you recognise that, in Parrinder’s 
description, the grotesque originally referred to “human and 
animal shapes intermingled with foliage, flowers, and fruits 
in fantastic designs which bore no relationship to the logical 
categories of classical art”. 

Grotesque, then, would be another moment in the 
endlessly repeating struggle between a pulp Underground 
(the scandalous grottoes) and the Official culture, what Philip 
K. Dick called “the Black Iron Prison”. Dick’s intuition was 
that “the Empire had never ended”, and that history was 
shaped by an ongoing occult(ed) conflict between Rome and 
Gnostic forces. “Spectre Vs. Rector” (“I’ve waited since Caesar 
for this”) had rendered this clash in a harsh Murnau black 
and white; on Grotesque the struggle is painted in colours as 
florid as those used on the album’s garish sleeve (the work of 
Smith’s sister). 

It is no accident that the words “grotesque” and “weird” 
are often associated with one another, since both connote 
something which is out of place, which either should not exist 
at all, or which should not exist here. The response to the 
apparition of a grotesque object will involve laughter as much 
as revulsion. “What will be generally agreed upon”, Philip 
Thompson wrote in his 1972 study The Grotesque “is that 
‘grotesque’ will cover, perhaps among other things, the co- 


presence of the laughable and something that is incompatible 


with the laughable.”!° The role of laughter in the Fall has 
confused and misled interpreters. What has been suppressed 
is precisely the co-presence of the laughable with what is not 
compatible with the laughable. That co-presence is difficult to 
think, particularly in Britain, where humour has often 
functioned to ratify commonsense, to punish overreaching 
ambition with the dampening weight of bathos. 

With the Fall, however, it is as if satire is returned to its 
origins in the grotesque. The Fall’s laughter does not issue 
from the commonsensical mainstream but from a psychotic 
Outside. This is satire in the oneiric mode of Gillray, in which 
invective and lampoonery becomes delirial, a (psycho) 
tropological spewing of associations and animosities, the true 
object of which is not any failing of probity but the delusion 
that human dignity is possible. It is not surprising to find 
Smith alluding to Jarry’s Ubu Roi in a barely audible line in 
“City Hobgoblins” (“Ubu le Roi is a home hobgoblin”). For 
Jarry, as for Smith, the incoherence and incompleteness of 
the obscene and the absurd were to be opposed to the false 
symmetries of good sense. 

But in their mockery of poise, moderation and self- 
containment, in their logorrheic disgorging of slanguage, in 
their glorying in mess and incoherence, the Fall sometimes 
resemble a white English analogue of Funkadelic. For both 
Smith and Clinton, there is no escaping the grotesque, if only 
because those who primp and puff themselves up only 
become more grotesque. We could go so far as to say that it is 
the human condition to be grotesque, since the human 
animal is the one that does not fit in, the freak of nature who 


has no place in nature and is capable of re-combining nature’s 
products into hideous new forms. 

On Grotesque, Smith has mastered his anti-lyrical 
methodology. The songs are tales, but tales half-told. The 
words are fragmentary, as if they have come to us via an 
unreliable transmission that keeps cutting out. Viewpoints 
are garbled; ontological distinctions (between author, text 
and character) are confused, fractured. It is impossible to 
definitively sort out the narrator’s words from direct speech. 
The tracks are palimpsests, badly recorded in a deliberate 
refusal of the “coffee table” aesthetic Smith derides on the 
cryptic sleeve notes. The process of recording is not 
airbrushed out but foregrounded, surface hiss and illegible 
cassette noise brandished like improvised stitching on some 
Hammer Frankenstein monster. 

“Impression of J Temperance” was typical: a story in the 
Lovecraft style in which a dog breeder’s “hideous replica” 
(“brown sockets... Purple eyes... fed with rubbish from 
disposal barges”) haunts Manchester. This is a Weird tale, but 
one subjected to modernist techniques of compression and 
collage. The result is so elliptical that it is as if the text — 
part-obliterated by silt, mildew and algae — has been fished 
out of the Manchester ship canal (which Hanley’s bass sounds 
like it is dredging). 

“*Yes’, said Cameron, ‘And the thing was in the impression 
of J Temperance.” 

The sound on Grotesque is a seemingly impossible 
combination of the shambolic and the disciplined, the 
cerebral-literary and the idiotic-physical. The obvious 
parallel was the Birthday Party. In both groups, an implacable 


bass holds together a leering, lurching schizophonic body 
whose disparate elements strain like distended, diseased 
viscera against a pustule and pock-ridden skin (‘a spotty 
exterior hides a spotty interior”). Both the Fall and the 
Birthday Party reached for pulp horror imagery rescued from 
the white trash can as an analogue and inspiration for their 
perverse “return” to rock and roll (cf. also the Cramps). The 
nihilation that fired them was a rejection of a pop that they 
saw as_ self-consciously sophisticated, conspicuously 
cosmopolitan, a pop which implied that the arty could only be 
attained at the expense of brute physical impact. Their 
response was to hyperbolically emphasise crude atavism, to 
embrace the unschooled and the primitivist. 

The Birthday Party’s fascination was with the American 
‘“junkonscious”, the mountain of semiotic/narcotic trash 
lurking in the hindbrain of a world population hooked on 
America’s myths of abjection and omnipotence. The Birthday 
Party revelled in this fantasmatic Americana, using it as a 
way of cancelling an Australian identity that they in any case 
experienced as empty, devoid of any distinguishing features. 

Smith’s r and r citations functioned differently, precisely 
as a means of reinforcing his Englishness and his own 
ambivalent attitude towards it. The rockabilly references are 
almost like “What If?” exercises. What if rock and roll had 
emerged from the industrial heartlands of England rather 
than the Mississippi Delta? The rockabilly on “Container 
Drivers” or “Fiery Jack” is slowed by meat pies and gravy, its 
dreams of escape fatally poisoned by pints of bitter and cups 
of greasy spoon tea. It is rock and roll as Working Men’s Club 
cabaret, performed by a failed Gene Vincent imitator in 


Prestwich. The “What if?” speculations fail. Rock and roll 
needed the endless open highways; it could never have begun 
in Britain’s snarled up ring roads and claustrophobic 
conurbations. 

For the Smith of Grotesque, homesickness is a pathology. 
(In the interview on the 1983 Perverted by Language video, 
Smith claims that being away from England literally made 
him sick.) There is little to recommend the country which he 
can never permanently leave; his relationship to it seems to 
be one of wearied addiction. The fake jauntiness of “English 
Scheme” (complete with proto-John Shuttleworth cheesy 
cabaret keyboard) is a squalid postcard from somewhere no 
one would ever wish to be. Here and in “C and Cs Mithering”, 
the US emerges as an alternative (in despair at the class- 
ridden Britain of “sixty hours and stone toilet back gardens”, 


yD 66 


the “clever ones” “point their fingers at America”), but there 
is a sense that, no matter how far he travels, Smith will in the 
end be overcome by a compulsion to return to his blighted 
homeland, which functions as his pharmakon, his poison and 
remedy, sickness and cure. In the end he is as afflicted by 
paralysis as Joyce’s Dubliners. 

On “C n Cs Mithering” a rigor mortis snare drum gives 
this paralysis a sonic form. “C n Cs Mithering” is an 
unstinting inventory of gripes and irritations worthy of Tony 
Hancock at his most acerbic and disconsolate, a cheerless 
survey of estates that “stick up like stacks” and, worse still, a 
derisive dismissal of one of the supposed escape routes from 
drudgery: the music business, denounced as corrupt, dull and 
stupid. The track sounds, perhaps deliberately, like a white 
English version of rap (here as elsewhere, the Fall are 


remarkable for producing equivalents to, rather than facile 
imitations of, black American forms). 


Body a Tentacle Mess 


“So R. Totale dwells underground 
Away from sickly grind 

With ostrich head-dress 

Face a mess, covered in feathers 
Orange-red with blue-black lines 
That draped down to his chest 
Body a tentacle mess 

And light blue plant-heads.” 


— The Fall, “The N.W.R.A”! 


But it is the other long track, “The N.W.R.A.”, that is the 
masterpiece. All of the LP’s themes coalesce in this track, a 
tale of cultural political intrigue that plays like some 
improbable mulching of T.S. Eliot, Wyndham Lewis, H.G. 
Wells, Dick, Lovecraft and Le Carré. It is the story of Roman 
Totale, a psychic and former cabaret performer whose body is 
covered in tentacles. It is often said that Roman Totale is one 
of Smith’s “alter-egos”; in fact, Smith is in the same 
relationship to Totale as Lovecraft was to someone like 
Randolph Carter. Totale is a character rather than a persona. 
Needless to say, he is not a character in the “well-rounded” 
Forsterian sense so much as a carrier of mythos, an inter- 
textual linkage between pulp fragments. 

The inter-textual methodology is crucial to pulp 


modernism. If pulp modernism first of all asserts the author- 
function over the creative-expressive subject, it secondly 
asserts a fictional system against the author-God. By 
producing a fictional plane of consistency across different 
texts, the pulp modernist becomes a conduit through which a 
world can emerge. Once again, Lovecraft is the exemplar 
here: his tales and novellas could in the end no longer be 
apprehended as discrete texts but as part-objects forming a 
mythos-space which other writers could also explore and 
extend. 

The form of “The N.W.R.A.” is as alien to organic 
wholeness as is Totale’s abominable tentacular body. It is a 
grotesque concoction, a collage of pieces that do not belong 
together. The model is the novella rather than the tale, and 
the story is told episodically, from multiple points of view, 
using a heteroglossic riot of styles and tones (comic, 
journalistic, satirical, novelistic): like “Call of Cthulhu” re- 
written by the Joyce of Ulysses and compressed into ten 
minutes. 

From what we can glean, Totale is at the centre of a plot — 
infiltrated and betrayed from the start — which aims at 
restoring the North to glory (perhaps to its Victorian moment 
of economic and industrial supremacy; perhaps to some more 
ancient pre-eminence, perhaps to a greatness that will eclipse 
anything that has come before). More than a matter of 
regional railing against the capital, in Smith’s vision the 
North comes to stand for everything suppressed by urbane 
good taste: the esoteric, the anomalous, the vulgar sublime, 
that is to say, the Weird and the Grotesque itself. Totale, 
festooned in the incongruous Grotesque costume of “ostrich 


head-dress... feathers/orange-red with blue-black line/...and 
light blue plant-heads” is the would-be Faery King of this 
Weird Revolt who ends up its maimed Fisher King, abandoned 
like a pulp modernist Miss Havisham amongst the relics of a 
carnival that will never happen, a drooling totem of a 
defeated tilt at social realism, the visionary leader reduced, as 
the psychotropics fade and the fervour cools, to being a 
washed-up cabaret artiste once again. 


Part IF 


“Don’t start improvising, for Christ’s sake” 


The temptation, when writing about the Fall’s work of this 
period, is to too quickly render it tractable. I note this by way 
of a disclaimer and a confession, since I am of course as liable 
to fall prey to this temptation as any other commentator. To 
confidently describe songs as if they were “about” settled 
subjects or to attribute to them a determinate aim or 
orientation (typically, a satirical purpose) will always be 
inadequate to the vertiginous experience of the songs and the 
distinctive jouissance provoked by listening to them. This 
enjoyment involves a frustration — a frustration, precisely, of 
our attempts to make sense of the songs. Yet this jouissance 
— something also provoked by the late Joyce, Pynchon and 
Burroughs — is an irreducible dimension of the Fall’s 
modernist poetics. If it is impossible to make sense of the 
songs, it is also impossible to stop making sense of them — or 
at least to it is impossible to stop attempting to make sense of 
them. On the one hand, there is no possibility of dismissing 
the songs as nonsense; they are not gibberish or disconnected 
strings of non-sequiturs. On the other hand, any attempt to 
constitute the songs as settled carriers of meaning runs 
aground on their incompleteness and inconsistency. 

The principal way in which the songs were recuperated 
was via the charismatic persona Smith established in 


interviews. Although Smith scrupulously refused to either 
corroborate or reject any interpretations of his songs, 
invoking this extra-textual persona, notorious for its strong 
views and its sardonic but at least legible humour, allowed 
listeners and commentators to contain, even dissipate, the 
strangeness of the songs themselves. 

The temptation to use Smith’s persona as a key to the 
songs was especially pressing because all pretence of 
democracy in the group has long since disappeared. By the 
time of Grotesque, it was clear that Smith was as much of an 
autocrat as James Brown, the band the zombie slaves of his 
vision. He is the shaman-author, the group the producers of a 
delirium-inducing repetition from which all spontaneity must 
be ruthlessly purged. “Don’t start improvising for Christ’s 
sake,” goes a line on Slates, the 10” EP followup to Grotesque, 
echoing his chastisement of the band for “showing off” on the 
live LP Totale’s Turns. 

Slates’ “Prole Art Threat” turned Smith’s persona, 
reputation and image into an enigma and a conspiracy. The 
song is a complex, ultimately unreadable, play on the idea of 
Smith as “working-class” spokesman. The “Threat” is posed 
as much to other representations of the proletarian pop 
culture (which at its best meant the Jam and at its worst 
meant the more thuggish Oi!) as it is against the ruling class 
as such. The “art” of the Fall’s pulp modernism — their 
intractability and difficulty — is counterposed to the 
misleading ingenuousness of social realism. 

The Fall’s intuition was that social relations could not be 
understood in the “demystified” terms of empirical 
observation (the “housing figures” and “sociological 


memory” later ridiculed on “The Man Whose Head 
Expanded’). Social power depends upon “hexes”: restricted 
linguistic, gestural and behavioural codes which produce a 
sense of inferiority and enforce class destiny. “What chance 
have you got against a tie and a crest?”, Weller demanded on 
“Eton Rifles”, and it was as if the Fall took the power of such 
symbols and sigils very literally, understanding the social 
field as a series of curses which have to be sent back to those 
who had issued them. 

The pulp format on “Prole Art Threat” is spy fiction, its 
scenario resembling Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy re-done as a tale 
of class cultural espionage, but then compressed and cut up 
so that characters and contexts are even more perplexing 
than they were even in Le Carré’s already oblique narrative. 
We are in a labyrinthine world of bluff and counter-bluff — a 
perfect analogue for Smith’s own elusive, allusive textual 
strategies. The text is presented to us as a transcript of 
surveillance tapes, complete with ellipses where the 
transmission is supposedly scrambled: “GENT IN SAFE- 
HOUSE: Get out the pink press threat file and Brrrptzzap* the 
subject. (* = scrambled).” 

“Prole Art Threat” seems to be a satire, yet it is a blank 
satire, a satire without any clear object. If there is a point, it is 
precisely to disrupt any “centripetal” effort to establish fixed 
identities and meanings. Those centripetal forces are 
represented by the “Middle Mass” (“vulturous in the 
aftermath”) and “the Victorian vampiric” culture of London 
itself, as excoriated in “Leave the Capitol”: 


The tables covered in beer 


Showbiz whines, minute detail 
It’s a hand on the shoulder in Leicester Square 


It’s vaudeville pub back room dusty pictures of white 
frocked girls and music teachers 


The bed’s too clean 

The water’s poison for the system 
Then you know in your brain 
LEAVE THE CAPITOL! 

EXIT THIS ROMAN SHELL! 


This horrifying vision of London as a Stepford city of drab 
conformity (“hotel maids smile in unison”) ends with the 
unexpected arrival of Machen’s Great God Pan (last alluded to 
in the Fall’s very early “Second Dark Age”, presaging the 
Fall’s return of the Weird. 


The Textual Expectorations of Hex 


“He’d been very close to becoming ex-funny man 
celebrity. He needed a good hour at the hexen school...” 
— Press release for Hex Enduction Hour 


Hex Enduction Hour was even more expansive than Grotesque. 
Teeming with detail, gnomic yet hallucinogenically vivid, Hex 
was a series of pulp modernist pen portraits of England in 
1982. The LP had all the hubristic ambition of prog combined 
with an aggression whose ulcerated assault and battery 
outdid most of its post-punk peers in terms of sheer ferocity. 
Even the lumbering “Winter” was driven by a brute urgency, 
so that, on side one, only the quiet passages in the lugubrious 


“Hip Priest” — like dub if it had been invented in drizzly 
motorway service stations rather than in recording studios in 
Jamaica — provided a respite from the violence. 

Yet the violence was not a matter of force alone. Even 
when the record’s dual-drummer attack is at its most 
poundingly vicious, the violence is formal as much as 
physical. Rock form is disassembled before our ears. It seems 
to keep time according to some system of spasms and lurches 
learned from Beefheart. Something like “Deer Park” — a 
whistle-stop tour of London circa 82 sandblasted with “Sister 
Ray”-style white noise — screams and whines as if it is about 
to fall apart at any moment. The “bad production” was 
nothing of the sort. The sound could be pulverisingly vivid at 
times: the moment when the bass and drums suddenly loom 
out of the miasma at the start of “Winter” is breathtaking, 
and the double-drum tattoo on “Who Makes the Nazis?” fairly 
leaps out of the speakers. This was the space rock of Can and 
Neu! smeared in the grime and mire of the quotidian, 
recalling the most striking image from The Quatermass 
Xperiment: a space rocket crash-landed into the roof of a 
suburban house. 

In many ways, however, the most suggestive parallels 
come from black pop. The closest equivalents to the Smith of 
Hex would be the deranged despots of black sonic fiction: Lee 
Perry, Sun Ra and George Clinton, visionaries capable of 
constructing (and destroying) worlds in sound. 

As ever, the album sleeve (so foreign to what were then 
the conventions of sleeve design that HMV would only stock 
it with its reverse side facing forward) was the perfect visual 
analogue for the contents. The sleeve was more than that, 


actually: its spidery scrabble of slogans, scrawled notes and 
photographs was a part of the album rather than a mere 
illustrative envelope in which it was contained. 

With the Fall of this period, what Gerard Genette calls 


“naratexts”* — those liminal conventions, such as 
introductions, prefaces and blurbs, which mediate between 
the text and the reader — assume special significance. Smith’s 
paratexts were clues that posed as many puzzles as they 
solved; his notes and press releases were no more intelligible 
than the songs they were nominally supposed to explain. All 
paratexts occupy an ambivalent position, neither inside nor 
outside the text: Smith uses them to ensure that no definite 
boundary could be placed around the songs. Rather than 
being contained and defined by its sleeve, Hex haemorrhages 
through the cover. 

It was clear that the songs weren’t complete in 
themselves, but part of a larger fictional system to which 
listeners were only ever granted partial access. “I used to 
write a lot of prose on and off”, Smith would say later. “When 
we were doing Hex I was doing stories all the time and the 
songs were like the bits left over.” Smith’s refusal to provide 
lyrics or to explain his songs was in part an attempt to ensure 
that they remained, in Barthes’ terms, writerly. (Barthes 
opposes such texts, which demand the active participation of 
the reader, to “readerly” texts, which reduce the reader to 
the passive role of consumer of already-existing totalities.) 

Before his words could be deciphered they had first of all 
to be heard, which was difficult enough, since Smith’s voice — 
often subject to what appeared to be loud hailer distortion — 
was always at least partially submerged in the mulch and 


maelstrom of Hex’s sound. In the days before the internet 
provided a repository of Smith’s lyrics (or fans’ best guesses 
at what the words were), it was easy to mis-hear lines for 
years. 

Even when words could be heard, it was impossible to 
confidently assign them a meaning or an ontological “place”. 
Were they Smith’s own views, the thoughts of a character or 
merely stray semiotic signal? More importantly: how clearly 
could each of these levels be separated from one another? 
Hex’s textual expectorations were nothing so genteel as 
stream of consciousness: they seemed to be gobbets of 
linguistic detritus ejected direct from the mediatised 
unconscious, unfiltered by any sort of reflexive subjectivity. 
Advertising, tabloid headlines, slogans, pre-conscious chatter, 
overheard speech were masticated into dense schizoglossic 
tangles. 


“Who wants to be in a Hovis advert anyway?” 


“Who wants to be in a Hovis/advert/anyway?” Smith asks in 
“Just Step S’Ways”, but this refusal of cosy provincial cliché 
(Hovis adverts were famous for their sentimentalised 
presentation of a bygone industrial North) is counteracted by 
the tacit recognition that the mediatised unconscious is 
structured like advertising. You might not want to live in an 
advert, but advertising dwells within you. Hex converts any 
linguistic content — whether it be polemic, internal dialogue, 
poetic insight — into the hectoring form of advertising copy 
or the screaming ellipsis of headline-speak. The titles of “Hip 
Priest” and “Mere Pseud Mag Ed”, as urgent as fresh 


newsprint, bark out from some Voriticist front page of the 
mind. 

As for advertising, consider “Just Step S’Ways” opening 
call to arms: “When what used to excite you does not/like 
you’ve used up all your allowance of experiences.” Is this an 
existentialist call for self re-invention disguised as 
advertising hucksterism, or the reverse? Or take the bilious 
opening track, “The Classical”. “The Classical” appears to 
oppose the anodyne vacuity of advertising’s compulsory 
positivity (“this new profile razor unit”) to ranting profanity 
(“hey there fuckface!”) and the gross physicality of the body 
(‘stomach gassss”). But what of the line, “I’ve never felt 
better in my life?” Is this another advertising slogan or a 
statement of the character’s feelings? 

It was perhaps the unplaceability of any of the utterances 
on Hex that allowed Smith to escape censure for the notorious 
line, “where are the obligatory niggers?” in “The Classical”. 
Intent was unreadable. Everything sounded like a citation, 
embedded discourse, mention rather than use. 

Smith returns to the Weird tale form on “Jawbone and the 
Air Rifle”. A poacher accidentally causes damage to a tomb, 
unearthing a jawbone which “carries the germ of a curse/of 
the Broken Brothers Pentacle Church.” The song is a tissue of 
allusions — James (“A Warning to the Curious”, “Oh, Whistle 
and I’ll Come to You, My Lad”), Lovecraft (“The Shadow over 
Innsmouth”), Hammer Horror, The Wicker Man — culminating 
in a psychedelic/psychotic breakdown (complete with torch- 
wielding mob of villagers): 


He sees jawbones on the street 


Advertisements become carnivores 

And roadworkers turn into jawbones 

And he has visions of islands, heavily covered in slime. 
The villagers dance round pre-fabs 


And laugh through twisted mouths. 


“Jawbone” resembles nothing so much as a League of 
Gentlemen sketch, and the Fall have much more in common 
with the League of Gentlemen’s febrile carnival than with 
witless imitators such as Pavement. The co-existence of the 
laughable with that which is not laughable: a description that 
captures the essence of both the Fall and The League of 
Gentlemen’s grotesque humour. 


“White face finds roots” 


“Below, black scars winding through the snow showed 
the main roads. Great frozen rivers and snow-laden 
forest stretched in all directions. Ahead they could just 
see a range of old, old mountatins. It was perpetual 
evening at this time of year, and the further north they 
went, the darker it became. The white lands seemed 
uninhabited, and Jerry could easily see how the legends 
of trolls, Jotunheim, and the tragic gods — the dark, 
cold, bleak legends of the North — had come out of 
Scandinavia. It made him feel strange, even 
anachronistic, as if he had gone back from his own age 
to the Ice Age.” 


— Michael Moorcock, The Final Programme? 


On Hex’s second side, mutant r and r becomes r and Artaud as 
the songs become increasingly delirial and abstract. “Who 
Makes the Nazis” — as lunar as Tago Mago, as spacey- 
desolated as King Tubby at his most cavernous —- is a TV talk 
show debate rendered as some Jarry-esque pantomime, and 
composed of leering backing vocals and oneiric-cryptic 
linguistic fragments: “longhorn breed... George Orwell 
Burmese police... Hate’s not your enemy, love’s your enemy, 
murder all bush monkeys...” 

“Iceland”, recorded in a lava-lined studio in Reykjavik, is a 
fantasmatic encounter with the fading myths of North 
European culture in the frozen territory from which they 
originated. “White face finds roots”, Smith’s sleeve-notes tell 
us. The song, hypnotic and undulating, meditative and 
mournful, recalls the bone-white steppes of Nico’s The Marble 
Index in its arctic atmospherics. A keening wind (on a cassette 
recording made by Smith) whips through the track as Smith 
invites us to “cast the runes against your own soul” (another 
James’ reference, this time to his “Casting the Runes”). 

“Iceland” is rock as ragnarock, an anticipation (or is it a 
recapitulation) of the End Times in the terms of the Norse 
“Doom of the Gods”. It is a Twilight of the Idols for the 
retreating hobgoblins, cobolds and trolls of Europe’s receding 
Weird culture, a lament for the monstrosities and myths 
whose dying breaths it captures on tape: 


Witness the last of the god men... 


A Memorex for the Krakens 


scritti’s sweet 


sickness! 


“His new album is called White Bread, Black Beer... 


‘Why? It’s pretty much all I live on — Guinness and a 
lovely, soft, gooey, terribly-bad-for-you white bread 
from the local Turkish bakery. It’s also a reference to 
when I worked with all these R&B musicians in New 
York in the 80s — if you played something they didn’t 
like they’d frown and say, “Oh man, that’s so white- 
bread”. Meaning that it came from that “white” pop 
culture which is seen as largely voided of nutrition, 
substance, goodness, or indeed “soul”. And that 
definitely got my antennae going, because I’m 
mistrustful of “soul” and I very much like white, 
processed pop music. Which, in a way, is what this 
album celebrates.” 


— Interview with Green Gartside, Time Out? 


“Instead of any fulfilment or resolution, Scritti’s music 
delivers the bliss of the lover’s discourse in all its 


ellipses, contradiction and repetition, its endless 
pursuit of an unattainable object. The disembodied, 
depthless, non-linear effects, and the borrowing of 
pop’s language of love try to undo desire’s usual 
articulation in coherent drives and stable identity while 
reinscribing or repeating the very ‘soul’ language that’s used 
to complete the self in today’s pop: the sweet nothings heard 
beside, within the sexual healing.” 


— Paul Oldfield, “After Subversion: Pop Culture and 
3 


Power” 
A fascinating conjunction: listening to Scritti Politti’s quietly 
stunning new album — or rather being seduced and ravished 
by it — while reading Mladen Dolar’s A Voice and Nothing More. 


If, as Simon Reynolds claims,* White Bread, Black Beer is an 
album without a “sonic concept”, must we conclude that the 
songs are Green’s version of a soul-baring? After all the 
deferrals, the veilings, the deviations, finally a revelation: this 
is me? The album’s title seems to invite such an 
interpretation, suggesting a negative alchemy, 


the reversion of sublime agalma into foodstuffs. Without a 
sonic concept, we are left only with the honey-pure voice, one 
of the most distinctive in pop — and the voice, so we have 
always been told, is the bearer of pure presence, guarantor of 
authenticity and veracity... 

This, precisely, is what Dolar challenges. Dolar’s claim is 
not that Derrida was wrong that the voice has been privileged 
in a certain version of metaphysics, but that this has never 
been the whole story. “There exists a different metaphysical 


history of voice, where the voice, far from being the 


safeguard of presence, was considered to be dangerous, 


> Tellingly, Dolar’s 


threatening and possibly ruinous.” 
alternative history of metaphysics goes via the treatment of 
music. (Incidentally, it is hard not to read Plato’s admonition, 
quoted by Dolar, that “[a] change to a new type of music is 
something to beware of as a hazard of all our fortunes... [flor 
the modes of music are never disturbed without unsettling of 
the most fundamental political and social conventions” as a 
critique of both PoMo popism and nostalgic rockism). Dolar’s 
argument is that Law-Logos has always sought to 
differentiate itself from a voice conceived of as feminine and 
chaotic, but Logos cannot extirpate the voice, and indeed 
depends upon it: what is the fundamental expression of the 
Law if not the voice of the Father? 


How could your nothings be so sweet? 

What to make of Green’s voice, then? Or, to pose the same 
question from the other side: what is the minimal difference 
that has always separated Scritti’s deconstructions from the 
real thing? There’s a tendency to locate Green’s undoings and 
unsettlings on the level of signifiers, as if his subversion were 
all to do with wordplay, and his voice were merely a site for 
natural expressivity. But, as Dolar establishes, the “object 
voice” is neither the voice stripped of all sensual qualities in 
order to become the neutral transmitter of signifiers, nor the 
voice stripped of all signification in order to become a pure 
source of aesthetic pleasure. With Green’s voice, we 
continually slide between two types of non-sense: the 
nonsense of “the lover’s discourse”, the nursery-rhyme-like 


reiterations of baby-talk phrases that are devoid of meaning, 
but which are nevertheless the most important utterances 
people perform or hear; and also the nonsense of the voice as 
sound, another kind of sweet nothing. That is why Green’s 
lyrics look very different when you read them; the voice 
almost prevents you hearing them except as senseless 
sonorous blocks, mechanically repeated refrains. 

What is disturbing about Cupid and Psyche 85 by 
comparison with the new pop that preceded it is precisely its 
lack of any self-conscious meta-presence. This is where I 
slightly disagree with Simon, when he argues that Cupid and 
Psyche is “about love rather than in love”. It seems to me that 
what makes Cupid and Psyche so disturbingly depthless is 
precisely the absence of that space between the song’s form 
and the subject; the songs instantiate the lover’s discourse, 
they do not comment on it. Cupid and Psyche’s songs, creepily, 
aren’t about anything, any more than love itself is. Compare 
Cupid and Psyche with ABC’s The Lexicon of Love (an album of 
love songs about love songs, if ever there was one), for 
instance. Martin Fry’s presence is ubiquitous in The Lexicon of 
Love, manifesting itself in every raised eyebrow and set of 
inverted commas. But on Cupid and Psyche we get precious 
little sense of a “real”, biographical Green behind or beyond 


the record; as opposed to self-consciousness, we have 


“reflexivity without a self (not a bad name for the subject).”° 


There is only the void, the voice and the signifying chain, 
unraveling forever in a shopping mall of mirrors, a 
whispering gallery of sweet nothings... But what is disturbing 
about Cupid and Psyche is the suggestion that this really is love, 
this impersonal, idiot rhyming is all love is. That is why Cupid 


and Psyche is far more unsettling than the supposed 
“reversion to a pre-linguistic condition” of the “Kristevan” 
psychedelic rock celebrated by Simon in the late Eighties (and 
mentioned in the Paul Oldfield essay I cited above as a point 
of comparison with Scritti); the supposed “oceanic dissolution 
of self’ assumes not only that such a dissolution can be 
attained, but that there is a “real self’ that can be dissolved. 
Like the first two Roxy albums, Cupid and Psyche’s message is 
far more radical: the supposed “real”, “authentic” self, with 
its emotional core, is a structural illusion; our most treasured 
“inner” feelings are trite repetitions; there is no intimate, 
only an extimate. 

I guess it’s a sickness/that keeps me wanting... 

The excess of Green’s voice resides in its sweetness, a 
sweetness that seems unhealthy, sickly, which puts us on our 
guard even as it seduces us. Green’s voice is synthetic, 
candied, rather than authentic, wholesome. It already sounds 
inhuman, so that, upon first hearing rave’s pitched-up 
chirruping vocals, the obvious comparison was with Scritti’s 
androgynous cooing. All of this is anticipated on the track 
that I find most captivating when I listen to Cupid and Psyche 
now, the machine ballad, “A Little Knowledge”, in which 
Green duets with what sounds like a woman, but which is in 
fact a Fairlight-sprite, a synthetic succubus constructed from 
his own voice pitched up. (This exchange with a synthetic 
spectre happens before the “real woman”, session singer B.J. 
Nelson, officially comes in...) 

It’s worth remembering at this point that Green is very 
much the white ghost at the revel of contemporary black pop. 
At least since More Brilliant Than Sun, disco, techno and 


house’s (non)roots in white synthetics have been exposed — 
Moroder inducting Donna Summer into a labyrinth of 
synthesizers, Chic wanting to be Roxy Music, Cybotron 
stealing Ultravox’s accents and sound — but Cupid and Psyche’s 
function as a template for contemporary R&B is far less 
rehearsed. Specifically via its influence on Jam and Lewis’ 
production of Janet Jackson’s epochal Control, but more 
generally through its intuition — or entrepreneurial leap — 
that the flesh and blood of (what was then called) soul could 
be sutured with hip-hop’s artificiality and abstraction 
machine, Cupid and Psyche instituted a “new paradigm” for 
globalised pop. Skank Bloc Bologna has become the blobal 
retail arcade of capital. Cupid and Psyche is chillingly 
impersonal, but in a way that is much different to the staged 
impersonality of Kraftwerk, Numan and Visage which 
fascinated black American hip-hoppers, techno and house 
pioneers in the early Eighties. Scritti’s erasure of soul goes by 
way of a neurotically noteperfect, ultra-fastidious simulation 
of a hyper-Americanised “language of love”. It is no longer a 
matter of technical machines versus real emotional beings, 
but of “authentic emotion” as itself the refraining of 
signifying and sonorous machines. (It is therefore no surprise 
that another destroyer of soul, Miles Davis, should have 
covered Scritti songs and collaborated with Green.) 

All of which goes some way to explaining the title of the 
new album, which initially seems grossly inappropriate, since 
the songs’ souffle lightness could not be further from carnal 
carbohydrate stodge or beery bloating. But what if these 
substances are not “basic” and “life-giving” but the non-vital 
excess without which life would be nothing? What if “white 


bread” indicates not the normal and the nutritious but the 
synthetic, and “black” beer indicates not the homey and the 
heavy but the addictive? 

There is a performative flatness about the opening track 
and first single, “The Boom Boom Bap”; it a song about 
longing and addiction, which is itself arrestingly, gorgeously 
addictive. I can honestly say that I was hooked from the 
moment I heard Green sing the opening phrase, the song’s 
title. “The Boom Boom Bap” is so sublimely, achingly poised 
that the temptation is to keep hitting rewind, to remain lost 
in the song’s plateau, in which pop’s habitual urgencies are 
anti-climatically suspended. 

Play it over and over again/play it over and over again 

“The Boom Boom Bap”, as Green told Simon, is ostensibly 
about the thin line “between being in love with something 
and being unhealthily addicted to it”. The three addictions 
with which the song deals are drinking, hiphop — “the title 
itself is named after hip-hop’s bass-boom and syncopated 
breakbeats” — and love. Addiction is the pathological motor 
of life. “The beat of my life” is not any natural, biological 
rhythm but the non-organic pulse of the (death) drive. “If 
hooks could kill”, Green muses, knowing that of course they 
can; that being hooked can be lethal, but that not being 
hooked on anything is even more deadly and deadening. 

When you do eventually pull yourself out of the honeyed 
embrace of “The Boom Boom Bap”, you find yourself yielding 
to an album of folds and fragments, slivers and sketches, in 
which everything comes to an end before you expect it to 
(amplifying your longing to hear it, again and again). 
Thankfully, Green’s obsession with hip-hop emerges not 


through the brute presence of rap (what could be more 
present, now, than rap?), but via a certain absence in the 
production which prevents the tracks ever closing into 
organic wholeness. 

I was discussing with Owen the other week how mid- 
Eighties technology drew almost all pop into an arid, dated, 
hyper-glossed blandness: the two most conspicuous 
exceptions to this trend were Cupid and Psyche (which 
succeeds precisely because of its total identification with the 
time and the technics) and Kate Bush’s Hounds of Love. White 
Bread, Black Beer is like Green’s late-arriving Hounds of Love, an 
album in which pop’s history (and his own) can be re-visited 
without being reiterated, in which styles can be traversed 
without their ever being a question of inconsistent 
eclecticism. The very refusal to strain for contemporaneity 
makes the album far more now than it would have been if it 
engaged in an unseemly pursuit of street cool. 

The references to London, to “British Homes Stores”, to 
the names of Green’s schoolteachers, restore some of the 
locality that was remorselessly stripped away by the proto- 
Starbucks “third place” mid-Atlantic sheen of Cupid and 
Psyche. This, evidently, also means a restoration of some 
biographical specificity; the songs are no longer lover’s 
labyrinths that anyone can enter, but memory lanes some of 
whose landmarks only Green can recognise. Amidst all of the 
trails of influence you can trace across the album, those 
Appolinians, Brian Wilson and Paul McCartney, recur most 
insistently. Would the album then be a redemption through 
melody? A recovery — from sickness? A recovery — of the 
self? 


And when I’m with you baby 
I know just who I am 
And no one understands the way that you do 


Darling 


Hearing Green sing lines like these is a curiously haunting 
and unsettling experience, since Green’s voice carries with it 
all those Cupid and Psyche traces which ironise and undercut 
any gestures towards “really meaning it” or “really being” 
anything. In any case, listen closer to the song in which those 
lines occur (“Locked”), and all is not as it seems. “People want 
a piece of me”, Green sings, “but who they get is not what she 
seems”. In any case, autobiography would still be a form of 
writing (and the most deceptive kind), and the “you” that is 
the usual addressee of the love song is never the ostensible 
partner, the “real flesh and blood person”, but the big Other. 
Hence David Kelsey in Highsmith’s This Sweet Sickness — a 
Scritti title if ever there was one — a man who conducts his 
pathological love affair primarily through letters written to 
his fantasised Other (and which are ignored and 
misunderstood by their supposed flesh and blood object), is 
the lover in its purest state... All the parallels of love with 
addiction on White Bread, Black Beer suggest that Green the 
writer still knows that love is essentially both pathology and 
cure, so Scritti’s sweetness remains sick, their sickness 
sweet... 


postmodernism as 


pathology, part 21 


The thing is, Robbie, there’s no rehabilitation from PoMo. 

The sickness that afflicts Robbie Williams is nothing less 
than postmodernity itself. Look at Williams: his whole body is 
afflicted with reflexive tics, an egoarmoury of grimaces, 
gurns and grins designed to disavow any action even as he 
performs it. He is the “as if” pop star — he dances as if he is 
dancing, he emotes as if he is emoting, at all times 
scrupulously signalling — with perpetually raised eyebrows — 
that he doesn’t mean it, it’s just an act. He wants to be loved 
for “Rudebox” but, unfortunately for him, his audience 
demands the mawkish sentimentality of “Angels”. How 
Robbie must hate that song now, with its humbling reminders 
of dependency (Williams’ career went into the stratosphere 
on the basis of “Angels”) and lost success... 

Let me entertain you, let me lead you 

There’s surely a Robin Carmody-type analysis to be done 
of the parallels between Williams and Tony Blair. Williams’ 
first album, the tellingly-titled Life Thru a Lens was released in 


1997, the year of Blair’s first election victory. There followed 
for both a period of success so total that it must have 
confirmed their most extravagant fantasies of omnipotence 
(Blair unassailable at two elections; Williams winning more 
Brit awards than any other artist). Then, a decade after their 
first success, an ignominious decline into irrelevance (the 
post-Iraq Blair limping out of office as a lame-duck leader, 
Williams releasing a disastrous album and checking himself 
into rehab on the day before this year’s Brit awards, at which 
he had received a derisory single nomination). Of course, 
there are limits to the analogy: Blair is popular in the States, 
whereas Robbie... 

Williams and Blair are two sides of one Joker Hysterical 
face: two cracked actors, one given over to the performance 
of sincerity, the other dedicated to the performance of irony. 
But both, fundamentally, actors — actors to the core, to the 
extent that they resemble PKD simulacra, shells and masks to 
which one cannot convincingly attribute any inner life. Blair 
and Williams seem to exist only for the gaze of the other. 
That is why it is impossible to imagine either enduring 
private doubts or misgivings, or indeed experiencing any 
emotion whose expression is not contrived to produce a 
response from the other. As is well known, Blair’s total 
identification with his publicly-projected messianic persona 
instantly transforms any putatively private emotion into a PR 
gesture; this is the spincerity effect (even if he really means 
what he is saying, the utterance becomes fake by dint of its 
public context). The image of Blair or Williams alone in a 
room, decommissioned androids contemplating their final 
rejection by a public which once adored them, is genuinely 


creepy. 

It is perfectly possible to imagine Robbie exhibiting public 
doubts, of course — indeed, as his former reflexive potency 
declines into reflexive impotence, he is most likely to be seen 
insisting upon his inadequacy and failure. No doubt this is 
why Williams’ announcement of his “addiction” to anti- 
depressants and caffeine has been greeted with a certain 
scepticism (suspicion has been aroused in part because of the 
timing of the announcement, on the eve of the Brits). But this 
scepticism misses the point. Williams’ sickness is, precisely, 
his incapacity to do or experience anything unless it provokes 
the attention of the other. 

Or: as Liam Gallagher more succinctly put it, in words 
worthy of Mr Agreeable at his compassionate best: 


If you’ve got a fucking problem, why do you want the 
whole world to know about it? I say sort yourself out. 
You make a fucking crap album then want everyone to 
feel sorry for you. What a fucking tosser. 


choose your 


weapons! 


People are often telling me that I ought to read Frank Kogan’s 
work, but I’ve never got around it. (Partly that’s because, 
Greil Marcus apart, I’ve never really tuned into much 
American pop criticism at all, which in my no doubt far too 
hasty judgement has seemed to be bogged down in a hyper- 
stylised faux-naif gonzoid mode that has never really 
appealed to me.) The — again, perhaps unfair — impression I 
have is that, in Britain, the battles that Kogan keeps on 
fighting were won, long ago, by working-class autodidact 
intellectuals. No doubt the two recent pieces by Kogan that 
Simon has linked to are grotesquely unrepresentative of his 
work as a whole (I certainly hope so, since it is difficult to see 
why so many intelligent people would take his work seriously 
if they weren't), but it’s hard not to read them as 
symptomatic, not only of an impasse and a malaise within 
what I now hesitate to call “popism”, but of a far more 
pervasive, deeply-entrenched cultural conservatism in which 
so-called popism is intrinsically implicated. 


Remember, in the immediate wake of 9/11, all those po- 
faced Adornoite proclamations that there would be “no more 
triviality” in American popular culture after the Twin Towers 
fell? There can be few who, even when the remains of the 
Twin Towers were smouldering, really believed that US pop 
culture would enter a new thoughtful, solemn and serious 


phase after September 11'* — and it’s surely superfluous to 
remember, at this point, that what ensued was a newly 
vicious cynicism soft-focused by a piety that only a wounded 
Leviathan assuming the role of aggrieved victim can muster 
— but would anyone, then, have believed that, only six years 
later, a supposedly serious critic would write a piece called 


“Paris [Hilton] is our Vietnam...”,7 especially, when, in those 
years, there has, like, been another Vietnam. What we are 
dealing with in a phrase like “Paris is our Vietnam” is not 
trivia — this isn’t the collective narcissism of a leisure class 
ignorant of geopolitics — but a self-conscious trivialisation, an 
act of passive nihilistic transvaluation. Debating the merits or 
otherwise of a boring heiress have been elevated to the status 
of a political struggle; and not even by preening aesthetes in 
some Wildean/Warholian celebration of superficiality, but by 
middle-aged men in sweat pants, sitting on the spectator’s 
armchair at the end of history and dissolutely flicking 
through the channels. 


The end of history is the nightmare from which I am trying to 
awake. 

At least the “Paris is Vietnam” piece laid bare the 
resentment of resentment that I have previously argued is 
the real libidinal motor of “popism” — “we love Paris all the 


more because others hate her (but luckily we loved her any 


way, honest!)”. But this latest piece’? Simon has linked to is, if 
anything, even more oddly pointless and indicative. Unlike 
the pleasantly mediocre Paris Hilton LP, the ostensible object 
of the piece, Backstreet Boys’ single “Everybody (Backstreet’s 
Back)” is actually rather good. Practically everyone I know 
liked it. The problem is the idea that saying this is in some 
way news in 2007. No word of a lie, I had to check the date on 
that post, assuming, at first, that it must have been written a 
decade ago. 

The article makes me think that, if the motivating factor 
with British popists is, overwhelmingly, class, with Americans 
it might be age. Perhaps those a little deeper into middle age 
than I am were still subject to the proscriptions and 
prescriptions of a Leavisite high culture. But it seems to me 
that popists now are like Mick Jagger confronted with punk in 
1976: they don’t seem to realise that, if there is an 
establishment, it is them. Even if the “Nathan” with whom 
Kogan debates exists — and I'll be honest with you, I’m 
finding it hard to believe that he does — his function is a 
fantasmatic one (in the same way that Lacan argued that, if a 
pathologically jealous husband is proved right about his 
wife’s infidelities, his jealousy remains pathological): for 
popists to believe that their position is in any way challenging 
or novel, they have to keep digging up “Nathans” who contest 
it. But, in 2007, Nathan’s hoary old belief that only groups 
who write their own songs can be valid has been refuted so 
many times that it is rather like someone mounting a defence 
of slavery today — sure, there are such people who hold such 
a view, but the position is so irrelevant to the current 


conjuncture that it is quaintly antiquated rather than a 
political threat. There may be a small minority of pop fans 
who claim to hold Nathan’s views; but, given the success of 
Sinatra, the Supremes, Elvis Presley and the very boybands 
that popists think it is so transgressive to re-evaluate, those 
views would in most cases be performatively contradicted by 
the fans’ actual tastes. (Kogan does grant that the problem is 
not so much fans’ tastes as their accounts of them — but the 
unspoken assumption is that it is alright, indeed mandatory, 
to contest male rock fans’ accounts of their own tastes, but 
that the aesthetic judgements of the figure with which the 
popist creepily identifies, the teenage girl, ought never to be 
gainsaid.) (The other irony is that, if you talk to an actual 
teenager today, they are far more likely to both like and have 
heard of Nirvana than they are the Backstreet Boys.) 

The once-challenging claim that for certain listeners, the 
(likes of) Backstreet Boys could have been as potent as (the 
likes of) Nirvana has been passive-nihilistically reversed — 
now, the message disseminated by the wider culture — if not 
necessarily by the popists themselves — is that nothing was 
ever better than the Backstreet Boys. The old high culture 
disdain for pop cultural objects is retained; what is destroyed 
is the notion that there is anything more valuable than those 
objects. If pop is no more than a question of hedonic stim, 
then so are Shakespeare and Dostoyevsky. Reading Milton, or 
listening to Joy Division, have been re-branded as just 
another consumer choice, of no more significance than which 
brand of sweets you happen to like. Part of the reason that I 
find the term “popism” unhelpful now is that implies some 
connection between what I would prefer to call Deflationary 


Hedonic Relativism and what Morley and Penman were doing 
in the early Eighties. But their project was the exact inverse 
of this: their claim was that as much sophistication, 
intelligence and affect could be found in the pop song as 
anywhere else. Importantly, the music, and the popular 
culture of the time, made the argument for them. The 
evaluation was not some fitsall-eras a priori position, but an 
intervention at a particular time designed to have certain 
effects. Morley and Penman were still critics, who expected to 
influence production, not consumer guides marking 
commodities out of five stars, or executives spending their 
spare time ranking every song with the word “sugar” in it on 
live journal communities that are the cyberspace equivalent 
of public school dorms. 

Whereas Morley and Penman (self-taught working-class 
intellectuals both) complicated the relationship between 
theory and popular culture with writing that — in its formal 
properties, its style and its erudition, as well as in its content 
— contested commonsense, Deflationary Hedonic Relativism 
merely ratifies the empiricist dogmas that underpin 
consumerism. More than that, Owen Hatherley has astutely 
observed that, in addition to reiterating the standard Anglo- 
American bluff dismissal of metaphysics, the Deflationary 
Hedonistic Relativist disclaiming of theory (“we just like what 
we like, we don’t have a theory”) uncannily echoes the dreary 
mantras of the average NME indie band: “we just do what we 
do, anything else is a bonus”, “the music is the only 
important thing”. In the UK, the rhetorical fight between 
“popists” and indie is as much a phoney war as the 
parliamentary political punch-and-judy show between 


Cameron’s Tories and Brown’s New Labour: a storm in a 
ruling-class tea-cup. In both cases, the social reality is that of 
ex-public schoolkids carrying on their inter-house rivalries 
by other means. In the case of both indie and popism, there is 
a strangely inverted relationship to populism and the 
popular. While the “popists” claim to be populist but actually 
support music that is increasingly marginal in terms of sales 
figures, the indie types claim to celebrate an alternative while 
their preferred music of choice (Trad skiffle) has Full 
Spectrum Dominance (you can’t listen to Radio 2 for fifteen 
minutes without hearing a Kaiser Chiefs song). In many ways, 
because it was attempting to analyse a genuinely popular 
phenomenon, Simon’s defence of Arctic Monkeys was more 
genuinely popist than all of the popist screeds on Paris 
Hilton’s barely-bought LP — but of course much of the 
impulse behind them was the ultra-rockist desire to be seen 
thumbing one’s nose at critical consensus. Witness the 
genuinely pathetic — it certainly provokes pathos in me — 
attempt to whip up controversy about the workmanlike plod 
of Kelly Clarkson, on a blog which, in its combination of 
hysterical overheating and dreary earnestness, is as boring as 
it is symptomatic — though, I have to confess I have never 
managed to get to the end of a single post, a problem I have 
with a great many “popist” writings, including the magnum 
opus of popism, Morley’s Words and Music. 

Much as he occasionally flails and rails against popist 
commonplaces (see, for instance, his recent — I would argue 
unwarranted — attack on Girls Aloud), Morley is as deeply 
integrated into Deflationary Hedonic Relativist commonsense 
as Penman is excluded from it. What was the strangely 


affectless Words and Music if not a description of the OedIpod 
from inside? All those friction-free freeways, those 
inconsequent consumer options standing in for existential 
choices... Yet Morley is still a theorist of the ends of history 
and of music, still too obviously in love with intelligence to be 
fully plugged into the anti-theoretical OedIpod circuitry. Even 
so, Ian’s silence speaks far louder than Morley’s chatter, and, 
after my very few dealings with Old Media, I’m increasingly 
seeing Ian’s withdrawal, not as a tragic failure, but as a noble 
retreat. 

All of UK culture tends to the condition of the clip show, 
in which talking heads — including, of course, Morley — are 
paid to say what dimwit posh producers have decided that 
the audience already thinks over footage of what everyone 
has already seen. I recently had dealings with an apparatchik 
of Very Old Media. What you get from representatives of VOM 
is always the same litany of requirements: writing must be 
“light”, “upbeat” and “irreverent’. This last word is perhaps 
the key one, since it indicates that the sustaining fantasy to 
which the young agents of Very Old Media are subject is 
exactly the same as the one in which popists indulge: that they 
are refusing to show “reverence” to some stuffy censorious 
big Other. But where, in the dreary-bright, dressed-down 
sarky snarky arcades of postmodern culture, is this 
“reverence”? What is the postmodern big Other if it is not 
this “irreverence” itself? (Only people who have not been in a 
university humanities dept for a quarter of a century — i.e. 
not at all your bogstandard Oxbridge grad Meeja 
employee/leisure-time popist — could really believe that 
there is some ruthlessly-policed high-culture canon. When 


Harold Bloom wrote The Western Canon it was as a challenge to 
the relativism that is hegemonically dominant in English 
Studies.) I’ve quickly learned that “light”, “upbeat” and 
“irreverent” are all codes for “thoughtless” and “mundanist”. 
Confronted with these values and their representatives — 
who, as you would expect, are much posher than me — I often 
encounter a cognitive dissonance, or rather a dissonance 
between affect and cognition. Faced with the Thick Posh 
People who staff so much of the media, I feel inferiority — 
their accents and even their names are enough to induce such 
feelings — but think that they must be wrong. It is this kind of 
dissonance that can produce serious mental illness; or — if 
the conditions are right — rage. 

Anti-intellectualism is a ruling-class reflex, whereby 
ruling-class stupidity is attributed to the masses (I think 
we ve discussed here before the ruse of the Thick Posh Person 
whereby make a show of pretending to be thick in order to 
conceal that they are, in fact, thick.) It’s scarcely surprising 
that inherited privilege tends to produce stupidity, since, if 
you do not need intelligence, why would you take the trouble 
to acquire it? Media dumbing down is the most banal kind of 
self-fulfilling prophecy. 

As Simon Frith and Jon Savage long ago noted in their NLR 
essay, “The Intellectuals and the Mass Media”, which Owen 
Hatherley recently brought to my attention again, the plain 
common-man pose of the typical public school and Oxbridge- 
educated media commentator trades on the assumption that 
these commentators are far more in touch with “reality” than 
anyone involved in theory. The implicit opposition is between 
media (as transparent window-on-the-world transmitter of 


good, solid commonsense) and education (as out-of-touch 
disseminator of useless, elitist arcanery). Once, media was a 
contested ground, in which the impulse to educate was in 
tension with the injunction to entertain. Now -- and the 
indispensable Lawrence Miles is incisive on this, as on so 
many other things, in his latest compendium of insights — 
Old Media is almost totally given over to a vapid notion of 


entertainment — and so, increasingly, is education.* 

In my teenage years, I certainly benefited far more from 
reading Morley and Penman and their progeny than from the 
middlebrow dreariness of much of my formal education. It’s 
because of them, and later Simon and Kodwo, et al., that I 
became interested in theory and bothered to pursue it in 
postgraduate study. It is essential to note that Morley and 
Penman were not just an “application” of high theory to low 
culture; the hierarchical structure was scrambled, not just 
inverted, and the use of theory in this context was as much a 
challenge to the middle-class assumptions of Continental 
Philosophy as it was to the anti-theoretical empiricism of 
mainstream British popular culture. But now that teaching is 
itself being pressed into becoming a service industry 
(delivering measurable outputs in the form of exam results) 
and teachers are required to be both child minders and 
entertainers, those working in the education system who still 
want to induce students into the complicated enjoyments 
that can be derived from going beyond the pleasure principle, 
from encountering something difficult, something that runs 
counter to one’s received assumptions, find themselves in an 
embattled minority. Here we are now entertain us. 

The credos of ruling-class anti-intellectualism that most 


Old Media professionals are forced to internalise are far more 
effective than the Stasi ever was in generating a popular 
culture that is unprecedentedly monotonous. Put it this way: 
a situation in which Lawrence Miles languishes, at the limits 
of mental health, barely able to leave his house, while the 
likes of Rod Liddle swagger around the mediascape is not only 
aesthetically abhorrent, it is fundamentally unjust. Contrary 
to the “it’s only hedonic stim” deflationary move that both 
Stekelmanites and popists share, popular culture remains 
immensely important, even if it only serves an essential 
ideological function as the background noise of a capitalist 
realism which naturalises environmental depredation, mental 
health plague and sclerotic social conditions in which 
mobility between classes is lessening towards zero. 


A class war is being waged, but only one side is fighting. 


Choose your side. Choose your weapons. 


variations ona 


theme! 


Music critic Paul Morley has written a catalogue essay to 
accompany a recent installation by American artist Cory 
Arcangel, a couple thousand short films about Glenn Gould (2007). 
Or rather, Morley has assembled most of the text in the same 
way that Arcangel assembled his video montage — from 
fragments found on the internet. Arcangel’s installation 
consists of a version of Bach’s Goldberg Variations (1741) 
meticulously constructed from YouTube samples of 
individual notes played by amateurs. By making the 
connection between YouTube and Gould, the bricolages invite 
a comparison between user-generated content and the 
production methods of the modernist-creator figure. 

Does user-generated content make possible a new form of 
artistry, prefigured in both Gould’s approach to the recording 
studio and in Wendy Carlos’ synthesizer renditions of Bach? 
Or are Gould and Carlos being positioned as anticipating the 
dissolution of the individual artist in an anonymous digital 
network? 


Morley’s own position on these questions has been 
studiedly equivocal. Originally a journalist at the NME in the 
late 1970s, Morley has found himself gradually absorbed into 
the 1990s clip-show culture of chatty ephemera. His embrace 
of superficiality and gloss in the early Eighties played more 
than a small part in ushering that culture in, though what 
was envisaged as a revolt against post-punk austerity plays 
very differently in today’s pervading climate of populism. In 
the introductory section of Morley’s recent catalogue essay — 
seemingly the only section that he wrote as such — the text is 
positioned as the sequel to his 2003 book, Words and Music: A 
History Of Pop In The Shape Of A City. Morley is averse to 
definitive claims, but Words And Music seemed to want to 
establish a continuity between high modernism and pop at its 
most apparently disposable, a continuity exemplified by the 
book’s opening juxtaposition of Kylie Minogue and 
experimental composer Alvin Lucier. But Morley’s ultimate 
motive was artfully veiled by a spaghetti junction of 
convolutions and deferrals; it was unclear whether he sought 
to vindicate the avant-garde through its impact on popular 
culture or to ennoble pop via its incorporation of the avant- 
garde, or both, or neither. 

His Arcangel essay retains a certain amount of this 
ambivalence, but, in its gnomic brevity, it is far more 
suggestive than the often tiresome Words And Music, which 
felt at times like being trapped inside an interminable series 
of iPod playlists. Via thumbnail portraits of the likes of Gould, 
Carlos, the BBC Radiophonic Workshop’s Delia Derbyshire, 
Genesis P-Orridge and Robert Moog, the montage follows a 
number of associative lines connecting music, transgendering 


and electronics. By paralleling Arcangel’s methodology, 
Morley might have wanted to imply that the electronic music 
of the Sixties, Seventies and Eighties paved the way for the 
networked world of user-generated content of which 
YouTube is a part. But the pop examples that figure in the 
text most insistently — Gary Numan, the Human League — 
belong not to this decade, but to a post-punk moment thirty 
years ago. Perhaps in spite of itself, the text ends up reading 
less like a justification of twenty-first-century popular 
culture and its modes of consumption and more like a 
requiem for a past moment of popular modernism, a lost 
circuit between pop, new technological developments and the 
avant-garde. 

Morley’s text implicitly poses some of the questions which 


an essay in Philosophy Now by Alan Kirby addresses explicitly.’ 
Kirby talks of a new type of “text” — a text we are all now 
very familiar with — “whose content and dynamics are 
invented or directed by the participating viewer or listener 
(although these latter terms, with their passivity and 
emphasis on reception, are obsolete: whatever a telephoning 
Big Brother voter or a telephoning 6-0-6 football fan are doing, 
they are not simply viewing or listening).” Oddly, Kirby labels 
these texts “pseudo-modernist”, arguing that this “pseudo- 
modernism” has now superseded postmodernism. Kirby’s 
understanding of postmodernism suffers from being 
exclusively derived from literary studies, which has defined 
postmodernism narrowly, in terms of a set of reflexive 
strategies based around so-called “meta-fictions” such as 
Vladimir Nabokov’s Pale Fire (1962). But far from marking a 
move beyond postmodernism, the shift from creator to 


recipient, from producer to consumer, that Kirby describes is 
exactly what the most acute theorists of postmodernism — 
Jean Baudrillard and Fredric Jameson — had long ago got to 
grips with. Reading Baudrillard’s texts from the 1970s, with 
their extended discussions of reality TV and the “referendum 
mode”, is to confront analyses that now seem preternaturally 
prescient. What has been made obsolete is not Baudrillard 
and Jameson’s mordant anticipations of the monotony that 
would ensue in the name of viewer and consumer 
“involvement”, but those positions which claimed that 
eroding the privilege of the author and the artist carries a 
subversive charge. 

What Kirby calls the “new weightless nowhere of silent 
autism” has eroded the popular modernism which Morley 
once belonged to just as much as it has eliminated the high 
cultural resources of traditional modernism. As Kirby 
indicates, far from leading to new forms, user-generated 
content has tended towards retrenchment and consolidation 
— for example, YouTube (for the most part) recycles old 
material, or else provides a space in which millions of 
aspirant stars ape idols whose status — established by the old 
systems of distribution and valuation — remains secure. 
Instead of being cowed by the relentless demands for viewer 
participation, both cultural producers and the much-derided 
“gatekeepers” need to find new ways of asserting the primacy 
of production over consumption. They need to find ways of 
stepping outside seamless circuits in which “everyone” is 
implicated but no one gets what they want. In another 
catalogue essay for a couple thousand short films, curator 
Steven Bode argues that Arcangel’s installation is “less an 


advert for networked participatory culture than an index of 
people’s increasing atomisation”. If postmodern culture 
presents a kind of networked solipsism, perhaps what Gould 
can now teach us most is the value of disappearance from the 
screens that eagerly seek our image. Gould, who famously 
retired early from concert playing, showed that sometimes it 
is necessary to withdraw in order to find better ways to 
connect. 


running on empty! 


In 2006, James Kirby, the man behind the V/Vm record label 
and the Caretaker, began a download project called The Death 
of Rave. The tracks have a thin, almost translucent quality, as 
if they are figments or phantoms of the original, exhilarating 
sound of rave. When I interviewed Kirby recently, he 
explained that the project had been initiated to 
commemorate a certain energy that he believes has 
disappeared from dance music. (Energy Flash was, of course, 
the title the critic Simon Reynolds gave to his compendious 
study of rave music and its progeny.) The question is: were 
rave and its offshoots jungle and garage just that — a sudden 
flash of energy that has since dissipated? More worryingly, is 
the death of rave only one symptom of an overall energy 
crisis in culture? Are cultural resources running out in the 
same way as natural resources are? 

Those of us who grew up in the decades between the 1960s 
and the 1990s became accustomed to rapid changes in 
popular culture. Theorists of future shock such as Alvin 
Toffler and Marshall McLuhan plausibly claimed that our 
nervous systems were themselves sped up by these 
developments, which were driven by the development and 


proliferation of technologies. Popular artefacts were marked 
with a technological signature that dated them quite 
precisely: new technology was clearly audible and visible, so 
that it would be practically impossible, say, to confuse a film 
or a record from the early 1960s with one from even half a 
decade later. 

The current decade, however, has been characterised by 
an abrupt sense of deceleration. A thought experiment makes 
the point. Imagine going back fifteen years in time to play 
records from the latest dance genres — dubstep, or funky, for 
example — to a fan of jungle. One can only conclude that they 
would have been stunned — not by how much things had 
changed, but by how little things have moved on. Something 
like jungle was scarcely imaginable in 1989, but dubstep or 
funky, while by no means pastiches, sound like extrapolations 
from the matrix of sounds established a decade and a half 
ago. 

Needless to say, it is not that technology has ceased 
developing. What has happened, however, is that technology 
has been decalibrated from cultural form. The present 
moment might in fact be best characterised by a discrepancy 
between the onward march of technology and the stalling, 
stagnation and retardation of culture. We can’t hear 
technology any more. There has been a_ gradual 
disappearance of the sound of technological rupture — such 
as the irruption of Brian Eno’s analogue synth in the middle 
of Roxy Music’s “Virginia Plain”, or the cut-and-paste angular 
alienness of early rave — that pop music once taught us to 
expect. We still see technology, perhaps, in cinema CGI, but 
CGI’s role is somewhat paradoxical: its aim is precisely to 


make itself invisible, and it has been used to finesse an 
already established model of reality. High-definition 
television is another example of the same syndrome: we see 
the same old things, but brighter and glossier. 

The principal way in which technology now makes itself 
felt in culture is of course in the areas of distribution and 
consumption. Downloading and Web 2.0 have famously led to 
new ways of accessing culture. But these have tended to be 
parasitic on old media. The law of Web 2.0 is that everything 
comes back, whether it be adverts, public information films 
or long-forgotten TV serials: history happens first as tragedy, 
then as YouTube. The pop artists who supposedly became 
successful because of web clamour (Sandi Thom, Arctic 
Monkeys) turned out to be quaintly archaic in form; in any 
case, they were pushed through the familiar promotional 
machinery of big record companies and PR firms. There is 
peer-to-peer distribution of culture, but little sign of peer-to- 
peer production. 

The best blogs are one exception; they have bypassed the 
mainstream media, which, for the reasons described by Nick 
Davies in last year’s Flat Earth News, has become increasingly 
conservative, dominated by press releases and PR. In general, 
however, Web 2.0 encourages us to behave like spectators. 
This is not only because of the endless temptations to look 
back offered by burgeoning online archives, it is also because, 
thanks to the ubiquity of recording devices, we find ourselves 
becoming archivists of our own lives: we never experience 
live events, because we are too busy recording them. 

Yet instantaneous exposure deprives cultures of the time 
and space in which they can grow. There is as yet no Web 2.0 


equivalent of the circuit that sustained UK dance music in the 
1990s: the assemblage of dubplates, pirate radio and the 
dance floor which acted as a laboratory for the development 
of new sounds. This circuit was still punctuated by particular 
moments (the club night, the radio broadcast), but, because 
anything in Web 2.0 can be replayed at any time, its 
temporality is more diffuse. The tendency seems to be for a 
kind of networked solipsism, a global system of individuals 
consuming an increasingly homogeneous culture alone in 
front of the computer screen or plugged in to iPod 
headphones. 

All of this makes Fredric Jameson’s theories about 
postmodern culture’s inability to image the present more 
compelling than ever. As the gap between cultural breaks 
becomes ever longer and the breaks themselves become ever 
more modest and slight, it is beginning to look as if the 
situation might be terminal. Alex Williams, who runs the 
Splintering Bone Ashes blog, goes so far as to claim that “what 
we have experienced is merely a blip, perhaps never to be 
again repeated — 150 or so years of extreme resource 
bingeing, the equivalent of an epic amphetamine session. 
What we are already experiencing is little more than the 
undoubtedly grim ‘comedown’ of the great deceleration.” 
This might be too bleak. What is certainly clear, however, is 
that technology will not deliver new forms of culture all on 
its own. 


you remind me of 
gold: dialogue with 
mark fisher and 


simon reynolds! 


Kaleidoscope Magazine: The first question is linked to my 
experiencing UK dance music of the Nineties as a person 
living in a different country — via imported records and the 
British music press — and one interesting thing was the idea 
of “futurism” that seemed to permeate the scenes: in terms of 
how the press presented the music as an area of advancement 
because made with “machines”. What are, if any, are the 
futuristic elements and aspects in UK Nineties dance music 
and culture? 


Simon Reynolds: The word “future” does not crop up in 
contemporary dance music discourse — in either the 


conversations surrounding the music, or in track titles and 
artist names — with anything like the frequency it did during 
the Nineties. From artists with names like Phuture, the 
Future Sound of London, Phuture Assassins, etc. to UK 
rave/early jungle which teemed with titles like “Futuroid”, 
“Living for the Future”, “We Are the Future”, etc., the whole 
culture seemed tilted forwards. Everyone was in a mad rush 
to reach tomorrow’s sound ahead of everyone else. That ethos 
continued into the early days of dubstep with the club name 
FWD». But looking at the last half-decade or so of UK dance 
music, I really struggle to think of any equivalent examples. 
Soul Jazz just put out a compilation of post-dubstep called 
Future Bass, and then you have the “future garage” sub-genre, 
although the irony here is that this direction involves going 
back to the 2step rhythm template circa 1998-2000. But 
generally speaking the whole idea of the future seems to have 
lost its libidinal charge for electronic producers and for fans 
alike. This seems to reflect the fact that dance music in the 
UK, and globally, is no longer organised along an extensional 
axis (projecting into the unknown, like an arrow fired into 
the night sky) but is intensive: it makes criss-crossing 
journeys within the vast terrain that was mapped out during 
the hyper-speed Nineties. 

It seems symptomatic to me that “Gold”, the single off the 
debut album by Darkstar, is a cover of a Human League b-side 
from almost thirty years ago. It’s definitely an interesting 
move for Darkstar to make, in terms of their previous music 
and the scene they’re from, dubstep. But as an aesthetic act 
the creativity involved is curatorial rather than innovation in 
the traditional-modernist sense: it’s about finding an obscure, 


neglected song and re-situating it within the historical 
narratives of British electronic music. The whole idea of 
doing a cover version, which is totally familiar as an artistic 
move within rock, is still pretty unusual within electronic 
music culture. What also struck me listening to the remake 
next to the original (which I’d never heard before) is that 
both versions sound more or less as “futuristic” as each other. 
Well, the Darkstar reinterpretation obviously is technically 
more advanced in many ways; there are things done on it 
sonically that weren’t available to the Human League and 
their producer Martin Rushent. But in terms of the overall 
aesthetic sensation generated, neither version seems any 
further “into the future” than the other. Certainly, it doesn’t 
feel like there’s thirty years difference between the two. And 
it’s that precisely that feeling — that the Human League are 
contemporary with us — that is so mysterious and hard to 
explain. They ought to sound to us as ancient as early Fifties 
fare Johnny Ray, say, or Louis Jordan) would have done in 
1981 heard next to the Human League of “Love Action”. 


Mark Fisher: The problem is that the word “futuristic” no 
longer has a connection with any future that anyone expects 
to happen. In the Seventies, “futuristic” meant synthesizers. 
In the Eighties, it meant sequencers and cut and paste 
montage. In the Nineties, it meant the abstract digital sounds 
opened up by the sampler and its function such as time- 
stretching. In each of these cases, there was a sense that, 
through sound, we were getting a small but powerful taste of 
a world that would be completely different from anything we 
had hitherto experienced. That’s why a film like Terminator, 


with its idea of the future invading the present, was so crucial 
for Nineties dance music. Now, insofar as “futuristic” has any 
meaning, it is as a vague but fixed style, a bit like a 
typographical font. “Futuristic” in music is something like 
“Gothic” in fonts. It points to an already existing set of 
associations. “Futuristic” means something electronic, just as 
it did in the Sixties and Seventies. We’ve entered the 
flattened out temporality that Simon describes — the Nineties 
ought to be as distant as the Sixties felt in 1980, but now the 
Sixties, the Eighties and the Nineties belong to a kind of 
postmoderncuratorial simultaneity. 

To take up the example that Simon uses. When you 
compare the Darkstar cover of “Gold” to the Human League 
original, it’s not just that one is no more futuristic than the 
other. It is that neither are futuristic. The Human League 
track is clearly a superseded futurism, while the Darkstar 
track seems to come after the future. I should say at this 
point that the Darkstar album is my favourite album of the 
year — I’ve become obsessed with it. (It might be worth 
noting here that one thing that’s happened since 2000 in 
dance music is the rise of the album. The Nineties was about 
scenes and singles; there weren’t any great albums. But since 
2000, there have been Dizzee Rascal’s debut, the Junior Boys 
records, the two Burial albums and the Darkstar record. The 
temporal malaise I’m talking about hasn’t meant there are no 
good records — that’s not the problem at all.) Partly why | 
enjoy the Darkstar album is because, like many of the most 
interesting records of the last six or seven years, it seems to 
be about the failure of the future. This feeling of mourning 
lost futures isn’t so explicit as it was with the Burial records, 


but I believe it’s there at some level with Darkstar. Where 
with Burial you have a feeling of dereliction and spectrality, 
the lost future haunting the dead present, with Darkstar it’s a 
question of electronic rot, digital interference. 

What you could hear behind so much Nineties dance 
music was a competitive drive — to sonically rearticulate 
what “futuristic” meant. The No U Turn track “Amtrak” 
features a sample: “Here is a group trying to accomplish one 
thing, and that is to get into the future.” But I think it’s 
uncontroversial to say that no one was aiming to get into the 
future that actually arrived. If a junglist were pitched straight 
into now from the mid-Nineties, it’s hard to believe that they 
wouldn’t be disappointed and bemused. In the interview that 
I did with Kodwo Eshun which formed the appendix of 
Kodwo’s More Brilliant Than the Sun, he contrasts the textual 
exhaustion of postmodernism with the genetic concept of 
recombination. I think Kodwo captures very well the 
recombinatorial euphoria that many of us felt then — the 
sense that there were infinite possibilities, that new and 
previously unimaginable genres would keep emerging, keep 
surprising us. But, sadly, what’s surprising from that Nineties 
perspective is how little has changed in the last ten years. As 
Simon has said, the changes that you can hear now are not 
massive rushes of the future, but tiny incremental shifts. That 
deceleration has brought with it a sense of massively 
diminished expectations, which no amount of tepid 
boosterism can cover over. My friend Alex Williams has 
posited the idea that cultural resources have been depleted in 
the same way that natural resources were. Perhaps this is a 
reflection of today’s cultural depression in the same way that 


the Nineties concepts were an expression of that decade’s 
exhilaration. 

This isn’t just about nostalgia for one decade — the 
Nineties was at the end of a process that began with the rapid 
development of the recording industry after the Second 
World War. Music became the centre of the culture because it 
was consistently capable of giving the new a palpable form; it 
was a kind of lab that focused and intensified the convulsions 
that culture was undergoing. There’s no sense of the new 
anywhere now. And that’s a political and a technological 
issue, not a problem that’s just internal to music. 


SR: The Darkstar album could almost have been designed to 
please me: it’s the convergence of the hardcore continuum, 
hauntology, and post-punk and new pop! It’s growing on me, 
but initially I found it a bit washed-out and listless. Still, 
Mark’s reading of it is typically suggestive. And I do think it is 
significant that an outfit operating in the thick of the post- 
dubstep scene, the FWD» generation, has made a record 
steeped in echoes of Orchestral Manoeuvres (their first LP in 
particular was apparently listened to heavily during the 
album’s making), New Order, and other early-Eighties 
synthpop. It also means something that a record coming out 
of dance culture is all about isolation, regret, withdrawal, 
mournfulness. 

The Darkstar record is an example of a self-conscious turn 
towards emotionality in UK dance. Most of the album features 
a human voice and songs, sung by a new member of the group 
recruited specifically for that role. And just this week I’ve 
read about two other figures from the same scene — James 


Blake and Subeena — who are releasing their first tracks to 
feature their own vocals. But this turn to expressivity seems 
to me as much rhetorical as it is actually going on in the 
music. After all hardcore, jungle, UK garage, grime, bassline 
house were all bursting with emotion in their different ways. 
What people mean by “emotional” is introspective and fragile 
in ways that we’ve rarely seen in hardcore continuum music. 
(Obviously we’ve seen plenty of that in IDM going back to its 
start: Global Communications and Casino in Japan actually 
made records inspired by the death of family members.) The 
idea that artists and commentators are groping towards, 
without fully articulating, is that dance music no longer 
provides the kind of emotional release that it once did, 
through collective catharsis. So there is this turn inwards, 
and also a fantasy of a kind of publicly displayed inwardness: 
the widely expressed artistic ideal of “I want my tracks to 
make people cry on the dancefloor”. Because if people were 
getting their release in the old way (collective euphoria), why 
would tears be needed. 


MF: I think part of the reason I like the Darkstar record so 
much is that I don’t hear it as a dance record. In my view, it’s 
better heard almost as mainstream pop that has been 
augmented by some dance textures. “Aidy’s Girl is a 
Computer” apart, if you heard the record without knowing 
the history, you wouldn’t assume any connection with 
dubstep. At the same time, North isn’t straightforwardly a 
return to a pre-dance sound. Much has been made of the 
synthpop parallels but — and the cover of the Human League 
track brings this out — it doesn’t actually sound very much 


like Eighties synthpop at all. It’s more a continuation of a 
certain mode of electronic pop that got curtailed sometime in 
the mid-Eighties. 


SR: In the Nineties, drugs — specifically Ecstasy — were 
absolutely integral to this communal release. One of the 
reasons hardcore rave was so hyper-emotional was because 
its audience’s brains were being flooded with artificially 
stimulated feelings, which could be elation and excitement 
but also dark or emotionally vulnerable (the comedown from 
Ecstasy is like having your heart broken). One thing that 
intrigues me about dance culture in the 2000s is the near- 
complete disappearance of drugs as a topic in the discourse. 
People are obviously still doing them, in large amounts, and 
in a mixed-up polydrug way just like in the Nineties. There 
have been a few public scares from the authorities and the 
mainstream media, like the talk about ketamine a few years 
ago, and more recently with mephedrone. But these failed to 
catalyse any kind of cultural conversation within the dance 
scene itself. It is as if the idea that choice of chemicals could 
have any cultural repercussions or effects on music’s 
evolution has completely disappeared. Compare that with the 
Nineties, where one of the main strands of dance discourse 
concerned the transformative powers of drugs. There was a 
reason why Matthew Collin called his rave history Altered 
State and why I called my own book Energy Flash. That was a 
reference to one of the greatest and most druggy anthems in 
techno — Beltram’s “Energy Flash” (which features a sample 
about “acid, ecstasy” — but also to the more general idea of a 
psychedelics-induced flash of revelation or the “body flash” 


caused by stimulant drugs. 

The turn to emotionality at the moment seems like an 
echo of a similar moment in the late Nineties, when the 
downsides of drugs were becoming clear and I started to hear 
from clubbing friends that they’d been listening to 
Spiritualized or Radiohead. But where that was a flight from 
E-motionality (from the collective high, now considered false 
or to have too many negative side effects, towards more 
introspective, healing music), the new emotionality in the 
post-dubstep scene is emerging in a different context. I’m just 
speculating here, but I wonder if it has anything to do with a 
dissatisfaction with Internet culture, the sort of brittle, 
distracted numbness that comes from being meshed into a 
state of perpetual connectivity, but without any real 
connection of the kind that comes from either one-onone 
interactions or from being in a crowd. The rise of the podcast 
and the online DJ mix, which has been hyped as “the new 
rave” but is profoundly asocial, seems to fit in here. 


KM: The concept of futurism also contains the idea that a 
cultural form can capture the zeitgeist of an era and 
facilitate/modulate the vision of the one to come and by 
implication revolt against past cultural practices; this might 
also in this case translate with the idea of “the sound of now” 
that was a vastly common mood of UK dance music in the 
Nineties, and the continuous re-organisation of label, clubs, 
promoters, DJs in new networks and sub-genres that created 
an inbuilt obsolescence in the micro-scenes themselves. A 
sort of voluntary short-term memory imbalance that is hard 
to understand in the following decade — the Noughties — in 


which one of the most original and popular artist has been 
Burial, which has been one visible manifestation of a fixation 
with the past which has previously reached similar levels in 
indie-rock. Not to speak of the literalist approach of a very 
interesting artist as Zomby in “Where Were U in 92?” 


SR: I was totally caught up in the Nineties rave culture and I 
can testify that there was a sensation of teleology, a palpable 
feeling that something was unfolding through the music. It 
would be easy to say in hindsight that this was an illusion but 
I'd rather honour the truth of how it felt at the time. On a 
month by month basis, you witnessed the music changing and 
there seemed to be a logic to its mutation and intensification. 
From hardcore to darkcore to jungle to drum ‘n’ bass to 
techstep, it felt like there was a destination, even a destiny, 
for the music’s relentless propulsion across the 1991 to 1996 
timespan. I entered the scene in late 91, when the “journey” 
was already well underway, so you could say that the 
trajectory started as far back as 1988, when acid house 
originally impacted the UK. 

Mine is a _London-centric viewpoint, but similar 
trajectories were unfolding in Europe, with the emergence of 
gabba, and trance, or the evolution of minimal techno. There 
was a linear, extensional development, along an axis of 
intensification. Each stage of the music superseded the 
preceding one, like the stages of a rocket being jettisoned as 
it escapes the Earth’s atmosphere. And you are right that 
there was a forgetfulness, a lack of concern with the 
immediate past, because our ears were trained always on the 
future, the emerging Next Phase. 


At a certain point the London-centric hardcore/jungle 
narrative took a swerve, slowing down in tempo and 
embracing house music’s sensuality, first with speed garage 
in 1997 and then with the even slower and sexier 2step. But 
that just seemed like a canny move to avoid an approaching 
dead end (one that drum ‘n’ bass would bash its collective 
head against for... ever since really!) The rhythmic 
complexification that had developed through drum ‘n’ bass 
carried on with speed garage and 2step, just in a less punitive 
way. 

In the Noughties, especially in the last five years, the 
feeling you get from dance culture and the endless micro 
shifts within it is quite different — whatever the opposite of 
teleology is, that’s what you got! It is hard to identify centres 
of energy that could be definitively pinpointed as a vanguard. 
The closest thing in recent years might well be the populist 
“wobble” sector within dubstep, if only because there’s a kind 
of escalation of wobbleness going on there. There is a full-on, 
hardcore, take-it-to-extremes spirit to wobblestep. Ironically, 
the dubstep connoisseurs and scene guardians can’t stand 
wobble and have veered off into disparate welter of softcore 
“musical” directions. Wobble is quite a masculinist sound, it 
reminds me of gabba. But then it is easy to forget that the 
Nineties was all about this kind of punishing pursuit of 
extremes: the beats and the bass were a test to the listener, 
something you endured as much as enjoyed (or had to take 
drugs in order to withstand). The evolution of the music was 
measurable in a experiential, bodily way. Beats got tougher 
and more convoluted, textures got more scalding to the ear, 
atmospheres and mood got darker and more paranoid. 


Apart from grime and aspects of dubstep, Nineties post- 
techno music overall seems to have retreated into 
“musicality” (in the conventional sense of the word) and 
pleasantness. So instead of that militant-modernist sense of 
moving forward into the future, the culture’s sense of 
temporality seems polymorphous and recursive. And this 
applies on the micro as well as macro level: individual tracks 
seem to have less “thrust” and drive, to be more about 
involution and recessive details. 

Touching on the question of rave nostalgia, the question 
“Where Were U In 92?” posed by Zomby is interesting on a 
bunch of levels. There is an echo, possibly unintended, of the 
marketing slogan for American Graffiti (“Where were you in 
62?”, the year the movie is set), George Lucas’s 
groundbreaking vehicle for mobilising and _ exploiting 
generational nostalgia. Then there is also the unexpected 
biographical fact that Zomby is perfectly capable of saying 
where he was in 92, because he was twelve and a precocious 
fan of hardcore rave (which further suggests he must have 
just followed the trajectory of the music through jungle and 
speed garage to dubstep just like me and Mark, only quite a 
bit younger). Even as the album offers a loving pastiche of old 
skool hardcore, there seems to be an element of mockery of 
ageing ravers with their “boring stories of glory days” (to 
quote Springsteen). That would probably appeal to younger 
dubstep fans who, unlike Zomby, didn’t live through rave as 
participants and probably find the legacy of the hardcore 
continuum to be an encumbrance, a burden. Finally, it’s 
intriguing that Zomby did this pastiche record as a one-off 
stylistic exercise, in between much more cutting-edge 


dubstep records such as the Zomby EP on Hyperdub. It 
suggests that Zomby’s generation can play around with 
vintage styles without the kind of fanatical identification with 
a lost era that you generally get with musical revivalism. It’s 
just a period style, something to revisit. 


MF: The point is that the question “Where were you in 92?” 
makes sense, whereas the question “Where were you in 02?” 
(or indeed 08) doesn’t. One of the things that has happened 
over the last decade or so is the disappearance of very 
distinctive “feels” for years or eras — not only in music but in 
culture in general. I’ve got more sense of what 1973 was like 
than what 2003 was like. This isn’t because I’ve stopped 
paying attention — on the contrary, I’ve probably paid more 
close attention to music this decade than at any other time. 
But there’s very little “flavour” to cultural time in the way 
there once was, very little to mark out one year from the 
next. That’s partly a consequence of the decline of the 
modernist trajectory that Simon describes. (One slight 
difference I have with Simon is that I prefer the term 
“trajectory” to “teleology”. For me, what was exciting about 
the Nineties — and popular culture between the Sixties and 
the Nineties — was that sense of forward movement. But it 
didn’t feel linear, as if everything was inevitably heading in 
one direction towards one goal. Instead, there was a sense of 
teeming, of proliferation.) If time is marked now, it’s by 
technical upgrades rather than new cultural forms or 
signatures. But the technical upgrades increasingly seem to 
be manifested in terms of the distribution and consumption 
of culture rather than in terms of production. You can’t hear 


or see dramatic formal innovations — but you get a higher 
definition picture, or a greater storage capacity on your mp3 
player. Adam Harper, one of the most interesting young 
critics, has made a case for the new culture of micro- 
innovation, arguing that the kind of music culture Simon and 
I are talking about here — defined in terms of scenes 
organised around generic formulas — is an historical relic, 
replaced by a culture of a thousand tiny deviations, an 
“infinite music”, in which the temporal recursion that Simon 
has referred to is not a problem but a resource. Yet, for me, 
this sounds suspiciously like the Intelligent Dance Music that 
people were praising before the hardcore continuum came 
along. It’s easy to forget that disdain for the supposed 
vulgarity and repetitiveness of scene-music was a critical 
commonplace until Simon and Kodwo made the case for 
“scenius” in dance music. 

But it seems to me that the phenomenon we’re talking 
about here — temporal flavourlessness — is a symptom of a 
broader postmodern malaise. Every time I go back to read 
Fredric Jameson’s texts from the Eighties and early Nineties, 
I’m astonished by their prescience. Jameson was quick to 
grasp the way in which modernist time was being flattened 
out into the pastiche-time of postmodernity. When I read 
some of those texts in the Nineties, I thought that they 
described certain tendencies in culture, but that this was far 
from being the only story. Now, there’s only a very weak 
sense of there being any alternative to the postmodern end of 
history. The question is, is this all temporary or terminal? 


SR: I should have also noted that one of the main reasons a 


sense of linear progress was physically felt during the 
Nineties was that between 1990 and 1997, techno got faster: 
there was an exponential rise in beats-per-minute, that 
accompanied all the other ways in which the music got 
harder, more rhythmically dense, and so forth. So as a dancer 
you felt like you were hurtling. 

Mark mentions the idea of technical upgrades as the 
metric for a sense of progression in the last decade. This 
reminded me of a conversation I had with the Italian DJ and 
journalist Gabriele Sacchi. In the space of about fifteen 
minutes, Sacchi went from complaining that there had been 
no really significant formal advances in dance music since 
drum ‘n’ bass (he discounted dubstep, as I recall) to then 
commenting with approval of how advanced sounding 
records were now compared with ten years ago. What he 
meant is that they sounded better in terms of production 
quality: what’s available today in terms of technology, digital 
software, etc., to someone making, say, a house track, enables 
them to make much better-sounding records (in terms of 
drum sounds, the textures, the placement of sounds and 
layers in the mix). That sounded totally plausible to me and it 
may well be the defining quality of electronic dance music in 
the 2000s. You might say that the basic structural features of 
the various genres were established in the Nineties but what 
has improved is the level of detailing, refinement and a 
general kind of production sheen to the music. An analogy 
might be a shift from architectural innovation (the Nineties) 
to interior décor (the 2000s). Mark also mentions Fredric 
Jameson. His work — the big postmodernism book from 1991 
but also, especially, A Singular Modernity — helped me see that 


rave in general and the UK hardcore continuum in particular 
had been a kind of enclave of modernism within a pop culture 
that was gradually succumbing to postmodernism. Coming 
out of street beats culture, without hardly any input from art 
schools and only the most vague, filtered-down notion of 
musical progress, it nonetheless constituted a kind of self- 
generated flashback to the modernist adventure of the early 
twentieth century. The hardcore continuum especially 
propelled itself forward thanks to an internal temporal 
scheme of continual rupturing: it kept breaking with itself, 
jettisoning earlier superseded stages. One small aside in A 
Singular Modernity struck me as both true and funny, when 
Jameson talks about the modernists being obsessed with 
measurement, “how do we determine what is really new?”. 
That struck me as the characteristic mindset of those who 
came up through the Nineties as critics. But the new 
generation of electronic music writers (and probably 
musicians too) don’t seem to respond to music in this way. It’s 
no longer about the lust for the unprecedented, about linear 
evolution and the rush into the unknown. It’s about tracking 
these endless involutionary pathways through the terra 
cognita of dance music history, the tinkering with inherited 
forms. 


KM: Another topic I find very interesting is the fact that the 
dance music referred to as the hardcore continuum, even if it 
had an international resonance through the media, has 
maintained a strong local connotation and a somehow insular 
development (in other close genres as techno or house the 
localisation seemed to be less prominent even if, for example, 


the first ground breaking LP from the band Basement Jaxx 
resonates with a milieu of influences not too dissimilar to 
some other post-rave productions). Somehow some of the 
music in the continuum feels like a sonic cartography of 
London (or other cities in the UK), responding and being 
connected to very specific contexts. Is the geographical 
aspect something you use in the reception of this genres? 


SR: Music from the hardcore continuum has obviously found 
audiences all over the world. The early breakbeat hardcore 
was universal rave music for a few years in the early Nineties. 
Jungle established scenes in cities from Toronto to New York 
to Sao Paolo and in its later incarnation as drum ‘n’ bass 
became a truly international subculture. The same applies to 
dubstep. And even the more London-centric styles like 2step 
and grime had really dedicated fans in countries all over the 
globe and small offshoot scenes in particular cities outside 
the UK. That said it is incontrovertible that the engine of 
musical creativity for hardcore continuum genres has always 
been centred in London, with outposts in other urban areas of 
the UK that have a strong multiracial composition, 
particularly Bristol, the Midlands, and certain northern cities 
like Sheffield, Leeds, and Leicester. The next stage of the 
music has always hatched in London. 

That is related to pirate radio, the competition between DJ 
and MC crews both within a particular station and between 
stations. And the sheer number of pirate radio stations owes a 
lot to the urban landscape of London, the number of tower 
blocks to broadcast from, and the density of the population, 
and the existence of a sizeable minority (in both the racial 


and aesthetic sense) whose musical taste is not catered for by 
state-run radio or by the commercial radio stations (including 
the commercial dance station Kiss FM). This competition — 
expressed through the pirates striving to increase their 
audience share but also through raves and clubs competing 
for dancers — is partly economic and partly purely about 
prestige, aesthetic eminence. And it has stoked the furnace of 
innovation. 

That London-centric system focused around illegal radio 
stations seems to be gradually disintegrating. It is still what 
fuels the funky house scene, its primary audience is still 
“locked on” to the pirate signal. In fact I’m told that there 
aren’t many funky raves or clubs at all, and hardly any vinyl 
releases or compilations, so the only way to hear funky is 
through the pirate transmissions. But dubstep, like drum ‘n’ 
bass before it, is much more of UK national scene, and also an 
international scene. Martin Clark, a leading journalist on the 
scene and also a DJ and recording artist using the name 
Blackdown, told me something interesting. The Rinse FM 
show that he and Dusk do, which is eclectic post-dubstep in 
orientation, gets a high proportion of its audience responses, 
message and requests, through the internet, from as far afield 
as Finland or New Zealand (the Rinse FM signal goes out on 
the internet as well as broadcast through the air). But the 
pure funky house shows get most of their requests and calls 
as texts from cellphone users who live within the terrestrial 
broadcast range of the pirate stations. So funky is still a local 
scene in the traditional hardcore continuum sense, it is very 
much East London. 

But I think that London-centric orientation is on the 


decline. Dubstep is fully integrated with the web, it’s all about 
podcasts and DJ mixes circulating on the web, about message 
board discussions. I think of funky as the “dwarf star” stage 
of the hardcore continuum: it has shrunk in sise, still emits 
some heat in the sense of vibe and musical creativity, but it 
hasn’t been able to command attention beyond the pre- 
converted diehards, in the way that jungle or grime once did. 
If you look at funky, it’s the first hardcore continuum sound 
not to have any UK chart hits at all. It’s not spawned any 
offshoot scenes in foreign countries. It hasn’t achieved 
critical mass in the sense of non-dance specialist journalists 
giving it the time of day. Jungle and grime got mainstream 
coverage because they simply couldn’t be ignored, they were 
so aggressively new and extreme. But funky, to people who 
don’t follow the minutiae of the hardcore continuum, just 
sounds like “tracky” house music with slightly odd-angled 
beats and a London flavour. It’s not anthemic enough to make 
it as pop like 2step garage did, but it doesn’t have the 
vanguard credentials of jungle.The interesting thing about 
the hardcore continuum is the way that during its prime it 
refuted all that Nineties internet and info-culture rhetoric 
about deterritorialisation. This was a music culture that 
derived its strength and fertility from its local nature, 
precisely from being territorialised. Indeed during the early 
days of jungle and of grime, it had a kind of fortress 
mentality. That seems to connect with its vanguardism, this 
military-modernist mindset. 

Another thing is that the hardcore continuum genres 
were very slow to get integrated with the web. When I did 
early pieces on 2step garage and grime, the labels and artists 


had hardly any web presence. Nearly all the interviews I had 
to do calling mobile phone numbers or speak in person, 
rather than do email interviews. It was only about 2005 that 
you started to get grime figures with Myspaces. It was only 
around then that you started to get tons of DJ sets being 
uploaded to the web. Before that the music was really hard to 
get hold of if you didn’t live in London, you had to mail order 
expensive 12”s and CD mixtapes. Now it is totally easy to stay 
on top of the music no matter where you live. But some of the 
romance and mystique of the scene has gone as a result. 


MF: It’s not only UK dance music of the Nineties that is 
associated with cities; the whole history of popular music is 
about urban scenes. It’s no accident that Motown started in 
Detroit, house in Chicago, hip-hop in New York... Cities are 
pressure cookers which can synthesise influences quickly and 
in a way that is both collective and idiosyncratic. Scenes in 
city depend on a certain organisation of space and time that 
cyberspace threatens. For example, the hardcore continuum 
depended on an ecology of interrelated infrastructural and 
cultural elements — pirate radio, dub plates, clubs, etc. — but 
it also relied on these elements being somewhat discrete. For 
instance, dub plates acted as probe heads, which would be 
tested out in clubs. But cyberspace has collapsed the 
differences between making a track at home, releasing it and 
distributing it. Now it’s possible to upload a track into 
cyberspace immediately, there’s less sense of occasion about 
a record release. So there’s a collapsing of time. But alongside 
this is a collapsing of the importance of spaces. Club spaces 
were important because of that “evental” time: you would be 


hearing a track for the first time... But now new tracks in DJs’ 
sets are immediately made available on YouTube. It goes 
without saying that the club experience is a collective 
experience — it gains much of its power from people 
experiencing the same thing in the same space. Cyberspace is 
much more individuated. Because it isn’t a “space” in the way 
that physical space is, you don’t get that sense of coming 
together. It’s more like being involved in a conversation than 
being in a crowd. Even with instant messaging, there’s a 
delay. 

Clearly, there’s something potentially positive about 
people being able to make and release music without 
worrying about the costs of recording studios, about how it 
will be distributed and such like. But while this might remove 
certain obstacles for individuals making music, it’s not clear 
that cyberspace is good for music culture. Urban scenes 
compressed and concentrated things; cyberspace and 
digitality are in danger both of making culture too immediate 
(you can upload a track right now) and too deferred (nothing 
is ever really finished). The city-based music scene is perhaps 
one of the things you can hear being mourned on Burial’s 
records, with their many references to London. The “sonic 
cartography” of London you pick up from Burial’s records is 
in many ways a pirate-radio cartography. 


KM: The international reception of some of the sounds in the 
continuum was the one of a music alternative to what some 
perceived as the pure recreational hedonism of house music, 
for example in Italy jungle was embraced by Centri Sociali 
(squats), maybe they were some of the musical genres that 


help dissolving resistances towards dance music within non 
clubbers. Maybe this was because of the persisting 
connections with Jamaican music, maybe because of the 
dystopian mood/control society references. But apart from 
this I’d like to know what is, in your opinion, the most 
significant political significance of these genres? 


SR: The major political significance of the hardcore 
continuum is the role it’s played in the emergence of a post- 
racial Britain. Which has not fully arrived, obviously there is 
still a lot of racism in Britain, but you could talk about jungle 
and UK garage especially as having created a post-racial 
“people” within the UK — it’s most obviously a force in the 
major cities like London and Birmingham and Coventry, but 
this tribe has members scattered all across the country. It’s 
not just the mix of black and white, it’s all sorts. I’m always 
amazed at the range of ethnicities involved, there’s people 
whose parents are from the Indian sub-continent, or who are 
Cypriot or Maltese, and you also get every imaginable mix- 
race combination. Even talking just about “black Britain”, it’s 
not just people of Jamaican descent, there’s all the other 
islands in the Caribbean that have their own distinct musical 
traditions like soca and so forth, and there’s also been more 
recently African immigrants, whose influence is really felt in 
the Afro flavours you can hear in funky house. 

So it’s a really rich mix, but I guess the predominant 
musical flavours that run through the whole span of the 
continuum involve the collision of British artpop traditions 
(post-punk, industrial, synthpop) with Jamaica (reggae, dub, 
dancehall) and also black America (hip-hop, house, Detroit 


techno). And it’s very much a two-way street: it’s not just 
white British youth turning on to bass pressure and speaking 
in Jamaican patois, it’s about second-generation Caribbean- 
British youth freaking out to harsh Euro techno, having their 
minds blown by all that early Nineties music out of Belgium. 
Or someone like Goldie growing up on reggae and jazz-funk 
but also on groups like PiL and the Stranglers. 

You might say that the music of the hardcore continuum 
reflects the emergence of this post-racial “people” within the 
UK more than it has created it. But I think it has sped up the 
process, by being so attractive and so obviously the cutting 
edge in British popular culture. People have been actively 
drawn into joining this tribe, it’s been an identity many have 
wanted to embrace, because it’s been the coolest music of its 
era and it’s been something to be proud of: a post-racial way 
of affirming Britishness. 

So this I think is a major political achievement for the 
hardcore continuum. Some commentators like the music 
theorist Jeremy Gilbert have asked why that never translated 
into politicisation per se. At various point, particularly with 
jungle and with grime, there has been a sense that the music 
has been telling us things about society and what life is like 
for the British underclass. The darkness and paranoia of 
jungle (also carried on to an extent with dubstep), and the 
aggression and self-assertion of grime, reflect the gritty side 
of urban existence. But there is also a feeling, on my part 
certainly, that at a certain point simply reflecting Reality isn’t 
enough. Jungle and grime never really managed to get 
beyond being “gangster rave”, which is to say the British 
equivalent to gangster rap. So across its historical span it has 


oscillated between darkness (reflecting ghetto life) and 
brightness (dressing up and looking expensive, partying, 
dancing to sexy groovy music, chasing the opposite sex — 
that’s the side of the continuum that produced speed garage, 
2step, funky house). Apart from the post-racial aspect, the 
other major achievement of the hardcore continuum is the 
creation of an autonomous cultural space based around its 
own media (pirate radio) and its own economic infrastructure 
(independent labels and record stores). Pirate radio seems 
particularly significant: the fact that it is community radio, 
offering the music for free, and that it is amateur, with DJs 
and MCs actually paying to play (they have to cough up a 
subscription fee for their air time, to pay for equipment that 
is lost when the authorities seize transmitters and so forth). 
Pirate radio is important also because it is public: the culture 
is underground, but this is an audible underground, it is 
broadcast terrestrially, blasting out onto the airwaves of 
London or the other big UK cities. It’s a community asserting 
its existence on the FM radio spectrum. This means that 
people who don’t like the music or the social groups it 
represents will stumble on it, but also that people who don’t 
know about the music will encounter it — potential converts 
to the movement. If the pirates went completely online, it 
would cease to be an underground, it would become much 
more just a niche market of marginal music going out almost 
entirely to the pre-converted. The paradox of music 
undergrounds is that the idea is not really to be totally 
underground, invisible to the mainstream and the cultural 
establishment. You don’t want to be ignored, you want to be a 
nuisance! And there is also an interaction between the 


undergrounds and the mainstream, where ideas from below 
force their way up into the mainstream and enrich and 
enliven it. Which then forces the underground to come up 
with new ideas. That process worked for a really long time 
with the hardcore continuum: it would develop new ideas 
that were so obviously advanced and compelling that the 
major labels would sign artists and big radio stations like BBC 
and Kiss FM would recruit DJs to host regular shows. It seems 
to have broken down with funky house, though, it’s the first 
hardcore continuum genre to just stay in its ghetto. 


MF: In my book Capitalist Realism, I quote an article that 
Simon wrote on jungle for the Wire magazine. Simon put his 
finger there on how crucial the concept of “reality”, of 
“keeping it real”, was for both jungle and US rap. Simon 
writes of an implied political position in jungle: how it was 
anti-capitalist but not socialist. That always struck me as very 
suggestive — but these politics were never developed. I would 
tend to agree with Jeremy Gilbert — that the encounter 
between jungle and politics never really happened. But this 
wasn’t only a failure of the music; it was also a failure of 
politics. During the Nineties, the British Labour Party courted 
the reactionary rockers of Britpop. But where was the politics 
that could sychronise with the science fictional textures that 
jungle invoked? 

So yes, Simon is right, if the hardcore continuum had any 
impact on politics it was in playing a part in establishing a 
post-racial Britain. It was impossible to fit jungle into a pre- 
existing racial narrative — it didn’t sound like “white” or 
“black” music. And the extent to which the hardcore 


continuum has helped to consolidate this sense of the post- 
racial was made clear by an hilarious recent piece in Vice 
magazine called “Babes of the BNP”, in which female 
supporters of the far right British National Party were 
interviewed. One question was: “In terms of the BNP’s 
repatriation policy on immigration, if you had to choose, who 
would you repatriate first, Dizzee Rascal or Tinchy Stryder?” 


militant tendencies 
1 


feed music 


The idea that music can change the world now seems 
hopelessly naive. Thirty years of neoliberalism have 
convinced us that there is no alternative; that nothing will 
ever change. Political stasis has put music in its place: music 
might “raise awareness” or induce us to contribute to a good 
cause, but it remains entertainment. Yet what of music that 
refuses this status? What of the old avant-garde idea that, to 
be politically radical, music has to be formally experimental? 
The artist Michael Wilkinson’s show Lions After Slumber 
(exhibited last year at the Modern Institute in Glasgow) posed 
these questions with a quiet intensity. The show was a kind of 
reliquary for a bygone militancy. It was dominated by an 
enormous black-and-white print of the photograph of 
Piccadilly Circus that had hung — upside down — in Malcolm 
McLaren and Vivienne Westwood’s shop Seditionaries. A 
stretched linen included the 1871 photograph of the Paris 
Communards standing over the toppled Vendéme Column — 
but the image had been turned on its side, so that it looked as 


if the restored emperor was once again lording it over the 
Communards, who now resembled corpses. 

There was no music to be heard at the show, but there 
were references to music scattered throughout. A screen- 
printed mirror showed the face of Irene Goergens, a member 
of the Red Army Faction — but the image came from the 
album sleeve to Raw Macro, by the techno artist Farben. More 
importantly, the title of the exhibition was a reference to 
Scritti Politti’s 1982 track “Lions After Slumber”. Scritti had 
themselves borrowed the title from Shelley’s 1819 poem “The 
Masque of Anarchy”, which imagined a rising “like lions after 
slumber/In unvanquishable number” to avenge the dead of 
the Peterloo Massacre. 

The allusion to Scritti Politti makes it clear that the vision 
of politics that Wilkinson’s show simultaneously mourned 
and invoked was derived from post-punk — the outpouring of 
musical creativity in the late 1970s and early 1980s that was 
in many ways Britain’s version of Paris 68. In line with the 
Marxist and situationist theory it drew on and referenced, 
post-punk grasped culture as inherently political, insisting on 
a version of _ politics that went far beyond 
parliamentarianism. 

One of the most urgent tasks for any political music was 
to expose the pacifying mechanisms that were already 
secreted in popular culture — nowhere more obviously than 
in the cheap dreams of love songs, which groups such as Gang 
of Four and the Slits deconstructed in tracks such as 
“Anthrax” and “Love und Romance”. In a world in which 
people increasingly felt as if they lived inside advertisements 
— where, as Gang of Four put it, at home they felt like tourists 


— there was nothing more ideological than culture’s claim to 
be entertainment. That was the word that provided the ironic 
title for Gang of Four’s debut LP, and was also used in one of 
the Jam’s most bitterly sarcastic songs, “That’s 
Entertainment”. 

Wilkinson’s show was timely because post-punk was one 
of the spectres that loomed over the past decade. Its history 
was extensively catalogued in Simon Reynolds’ book Rip It Up 
and Start Again; the music was pastiched by lumpen plodders 
such as Franz Ferdinand and the Kaiser Chiefs, and served up 
again by originals such as Gang of Four, Magazine and Scritti, 
all of which reformed. The return of the post-punk sound had 
a double effect. At one level, it constituted the music’s final 
defeat — if conditions were such that these groups could 
come back, thirty years after the fact, and not even sound 
particularly out of date, then post-punk’s scorched-earth 
injunction that music should constantly reinvent itself must 
be as dead as its hopes for a revivified politics. Yet even the 
most degraded simulations of post-punk style carry with 
them a certain spectral residue, a demand — which these 
simulacra themselves betray — that music be more than 
consolation, convalescence or divertissement. 

At the end of history, the impasses of politics are perfectly 
reflected by the impasses in popular music. As _ political 
struggle gave way to petty squabbles over who is to 
administrate capitalism, so innovation in popular music has 
been supplanted by retrospection; in both cases, the 
exorbitant ambition to change the world has devolved into a 
pragmatism and careerism. A certain kind of depressive 
“wisdom” predominates. Once, things might have seemed to 


happen, but we won’t get fooled again. Like the images in 
Wilkinson’s Lions After Slumber, the world has been turned the 
right way up again. The emperor is on his feet, power and 
privilege are restored, and any periods when they were 
toppled seem like ludic episodes: fragile, half-forgotten 
dreams that have withered in the unforgiving striplights of 
neoliberalism’s shopping mall. 

In his study of the Sex Pistols, Lipstick Traces: A Secret 


History of the 20°" Century — published in the politically 
resonant year 1989 — Greil Marcus impersonated this 
depressive wisdom. “By the standards of wars and 
revolution”, he conceded, 


the world did not change; we look back from a time 
when, as Dwight D. Eisenhower put it, “Things are more 
like they are now than they ever were before.” As 
against the absolute demands so briefly generated by 
the Sex Pistols, nothing changed [...] Music seeks to 
change life; life goes on; the music is left behind; that is 
what is left to talk about. 


In fact, Marcus argues, the Pistols and those who followed 
them did change the world, not by starting a war or a 
revolution, but by intervening in everyday life. What had 
seemed natural and eternal — and which now appears to be 
so again — was suddenly exposed as a tissue of ideological 
presuppositions. This is a vision of politics as a kind of 
puncturing, a rupturing of the accepted structure of reality. 
The puncture would produce a portal — an escape route from 
the second-nature habits of everyday life into a new labyrinth 


of associations and connections, where politics would connect 
with art and theory in unexpected ways. When songs ceased 
to be entertainment, they could be anything. These punctures 
felt like abductions. 

Abduction was what it felt like on first listening to Public 
Enemy. Like the post-punks, Public Enemy implicitly accepted 
the idea that a politics which came reassuringly dressed in 
established forms would be self-defeating. The medium was 
the message, and Public Enemy’s astonishing militant 
montage was remarkable for both its rabble-rousing 
sloganeering and its textural experimentalism. When the 
group’s music, produced by the Bomb Squad, looped 
fragments of funk and psychedelic soul into abstract noise, it 
was as if American history — now cut up into a science-fiction 
catastrophe, a permanent emergency — was made malleable 
and ripe for rapid-fire retelling from the perspective of a 
post-Panther black militancy. 

Or there was the very different approach of Detroit’s 
Underground Resistance: in contrast to the data-density of 
the rap of Public Enemy’s Chuck D, they offered a largely 
voiceless take on techno, pursuing a strategy of stealth and 
invisibility, drawing listeners into a suggestive semiotic fog 
created by track titles (such as “Install ‘Ho-Chi Minh’ Chip”) 
and sleeve imagery that combined political insurgency with 
Afrofuturist science fiction. 

What Public Enemy and Underground Resistance had in 
common was a rejection of the idea of music as 
entertainment. Instead of minstrelsy, they conceived of music 
in the militaristic terms explored in Steve Goodman’s recent 
book, Sonic Warfare: Sound, Affect and the Ecology of Fear. In this 


model, the use of music to subdue populations — the 
“psychoacoustic correction” directed by the US army against 
the Panamanian dictator Manuel Noriega; “sound bombs” 
deployed over the Gaza Strip — is by no means unusual. All 
music functions either to embed or to disrupt habituated 
behaviour patterns. Thus, a political music could not be only 
about communicating a textual message; it would have to be a 
struggle over the means of perception, fought out in the 
nervous system. 

Underground Resistance saw their mission as fighting 
against “mediocre audiovisual programming”. Yet the 
problem is that the controllers have been all too successful in 
propagating this mediocrity. Where Public Enemy and 
Underground Resistance conceived of music as education, the 
dominant culture has been reclaimed by a Tin Pan Alley 
populism that has once again reduced music to 
entertainment. The internet and the iPod are part of a new 
economy of musical consumption in which, thus far, the 
possibilities of being abducted seem attenuated. In a world of 
niches, we are enchained by our own consumer preferences. 

What is lacking in the age of Myspace is the public space 
that could surprise or confound our understanding of 
ourselves. Where, today, is the equivalent of the Top of the 
Pops stage, which could suddenly be invaded by the 
unexpected? Ironically, it is something such as The X Factor; 
the campaign to get Rage Against the Machine to the 
Christmas number-one slot was evidence of a hunger for 
music that was not just entertainment. 

We are in a time of transition. Jacques Attali once argued 
that fundamental changes in the economic organisation of 


society were always presaged by music. Because, as a result of 
downloading, recorded music now seems to be heading 
towards decommodification, what does this suggest for the 
rest of the culture? And we are yet to hear the impact that 
the financial crash and its aftermath will have on musical 
production. The collapse of neoliberalism has already led to a 
simmering, renewed militancy on university campuses and 
elsewhere — how will this translate into sound? Perhaps soon 
we will once again hear new music that aims to turn the 
world upside down. 


autonomy in the uk! 


When the Real rushes in, everything feels like a film: not a 
film you’re watching, but a film you’re in. Suddenly, the 
screens insulating we latecapitalist spectators from the Real 
of antagonism and violence fell away. Since the student 
revolts in late 2010, helicopters, sirens and loudhailers have 
intermittently broken the phoney peace of post-crash 
London. To locate the unrest spreading across the capital, you 
just had to follow the Walter Murch-chunter of chopper 
blades... So many times during 2011, you found yourself 
hooked to news reports that resembled the scene-setting 
ambience in an apocalyptic flick: dictators falling, economies 
crashing, fascist serial killers murdering teenagers. The news 
was now more compelling than most fiction, and also more 
implausible: the plot was moving too quickly to be believable. 
But the sheen of unreality it generated was nothing more 
than the signature of the unscreened Real itself. 

Sound was at the core of one of the year’s momentous 
stories, the still unravelling “hackgate” narrative of national 
newspaper journalists caught out cracking the mobile phone 
messages of public figures and the grieving relatives of crime 
victims for story leads. After Hackgate, the UK power elite 


looked like something out of David Peace’s Red Riding Quartet 
or The Wire television series (which itself turned on the moral 
issues of secretly recording phone conversations). The 
complicities of interest and mutual fear exposed by the phone 
hacking story brought to mind the party scene in the 1974 
episode of Channel 4’s TV adaptation of Peace’s novels, where 
the illicit hedonism and skulduggery of cops, hacks, corporate 
plutocrats, private investigators — friends and ostensible 
adversaries — illustrated the true meaning of David 
Cameron’s notorious phrase “we’re all in this together”. In 
2011, we were living the film; all that was missing was the 
soundtrack. 

At the end of 2010, the BBC’s economics editor Paul Mason 
wrote a blog post called “Dubstep Rebellion”, which described 
a pivotal moment he witnessed in the 9 December student 
protests: when the “crucial jack plug” of a sound system 
playing “political right-on reggae”, was pulled by a “new 
crowd — in which the oldest person is maybe 17”, and 
replaced it with what he mistakenly believed to be dubstep. 
He was corrected by Guardian contributor and author of 
Kettled Youth, Dan Hancox, whose own blog posted a playlist 
of the tracks he heard at the protest. They turned out to be 
mostly grime and dancehall (Lethal B, Elephant Man, Vybz 
Kartel), alongside chart rap and R&B such as Rihanna and 
Nicki Minaj. What’s striking is the lack of explicit political 
content in any of this music. Yet grime, dancehall and R&B 
have a grip on the present in the way that older forms of self- 
consciously political music don’t, and here is the impasse. It’s 
as if we’re left with a choice between the increasingly played 
out feel of “politically engaged” music and the sound of the 


present. In the past year alone, the Guardian has run 
numerous articles bemoaning the lack of “protest” music, but 
for many of us, “protest” has always been a rather pallid 
model of what political music could be. Besides, it’s not 
protest music that has disappeared: go to the Occupy camp 
outside St Paul’s and you won’t find a shortage of acoustic 
guitars. What’s missing is a specifically twenty-first-century 
form of political music. While there are some grime tracks 
that can be understood as having a political message, for the 
most part the genre’s political significance lies in the affects 
— of rage, frustration and resentment — to which it gives 
voice. By contrast with US hip-hop, grime remains a form 
that is bound up with the failure to make it. The situation of 
grime is an allegory of class destiny. Just as it’s possible for 
some to rise from the working class but not with it, so it’s 
possible to rise out of grime (as artists such as Professor 
Green and Tinie Tempah have proven with their many 
crossover hits), but it’s not yet been possible for anyone to 
succeed as a grime artist. 

Paul Mason acknowledges his mistake to correctly 
identify what was played at the 2010 protests in his new book, 
Why It’s Kicking Off Everywhere: The New Global Revolutions. 
Notwithstanding his inability to correctly track the changes 
in urban dance music, however, his original blog post was 
prophetic. After 9 December, the student protests lost 
momentum. The major moments of dissent in 2011 — which 
would also be the most powerful explosion of working-class 
rage in the UK since the riots of the early 1980s — would 
come from the group that Mason identified as “banlieue-style 
youth from places like Croydon and Peckham, or the council 


estates of Camden, Islington and Hackney”. As with some of 
the 1980s riots, the immediate cause for the UK’s first major 
uprising of 2011 was the death of a black person, Mark 
Duggan, shot by the police in Tottenham. “25 years ago police 
killed my grandma in her house in Tottenham and the whole 
ends rioted, 25 years on and they’re still keepin up fuckry”, 
tweeted Tottenham MC, Scorcher. His grandmother was 
Cynthia Jarrett, whose death prompted the Broadwater Farm 
riots in 1985. Dan Hancox mentioned this tweet in a piece 
about British urban music and the riots for the Guardian, a 
crucial journalistic intervention at a vertiginously scary 
moment when the authoritarian and racist right were using 
the unrest as the pretext for reheating discourse that would 
have been deemed unacceptable only a week before. In an 
extraordinary but typically incoherent rant on the BBC’s 
Newsnight, TV historian David Starkey astonishingly blamed 
the riots on “black culture” — collapsing the whole of black 
culture into music, and all black music into a poorly 
understood version of gangster rap. Like much of what 
happened in 2011, Starkey’s delirious diatribe is best 
understood as a symptom: in this case of ruling-class panic 
and ignorance. Starkey dismissed the idea that the riots were 
political on the grounds that no public buildings were 
attacked — but what meaning do public buildings have for 
youth who were born into a social landscape in which the 
very concept of the public has all but disappeared under 
sustained ideological attack? The fact that the rioters 
targeted chain retail outlets was blamed on their 
“consumerism”; as if such “consumerism” were some kind of 
collective moral failing rather than the _ inevitable 


consequence of immersion in late capitalism’s media culture. 
As Owen Jones pointed out in his book Chavs: The 
Demonisation of the Working Class, work, not some lost moral 
sensibility, was once the source of working-class discipline. 
But what happens to people with no expectation of work, or 
of any kind of meaningful future? “When the punks cried ‘No 
Future’, at the turning point of 1977, it seemed like a paradox 
that couldn’t be taken too seriously”, Italian theorist Franco 
“Bifo” Berardi writes in his most recent book After The Future: 


Actually, it was the announcement of something quite 
important: the perception of the future was changing 
[...] Moderns are those who live time as the sphere of a 
progress towards perfection, or at least towards 
improvement, enrichment and rightness. Since the 
turning point of the century — which I like to place in 


1977 — humankind has abandoned this illusion.? 


From decrying the failure of the future, music has 
increasingly become part of this inertial temporality. Nothing 
symbolises mainstream music’s relationship to politics better 
than the BBC’s coverage of U2’s set at Glastonbury. The 
significance here was not the music — predictably moribund 
and lacklustre, no longer even capable of mustering the 
totalitarian pomp of yore — but the way in which the TV 
coverage ignored the protest by Art Uncut. U2 were treated 
like dignitaries from the Chinese government: dissenters 
threatening to disrupt the empty rituals of the rock emperors 
wouldn’t be tolerated. Where once even the most 
incorporated rock registered something about the tensions 


and temperature of the times, now you go to rock to be 
insulated from the present. Both U2 and their fellow 
headliner Beyoncé made gestures to “politics” in their sets — 
past struggles now reduced to an advertiser-friendly hopey- 
changey sentimentalism covering over a deeper, more 
pervasive sense that nothing of any consequence can ever 
change. Yet if mainstream pop has become a _ bubble 
impermeable to the new times, it’s not as if experimental 
culture has yet come up with forms capable of articulating 
the present either. The art world’s political mobilisations — 
via groups such as Art Against Cuts — have been more 
impressive than much of the actual engaged art itself, which 
has too often remained caught in a mode of pious 
inconsequence and textural poverty. 

What has been lost is the transit between experimental 
and popular culture which characterised earlier eras. But 
what the student movement has been trying to prevent is 
nothing less than the dismantling of the last elements of the 
infrastructure which made this exchange possible; free 
higher education, after all, was one of the means by which 
British music culture was indirectly funded. Perhaps that is 
why Gang Of Four’s “He’d Send In The Army”, Mark Stewart 
and the Maffia’s As the Veneer of Democracy Starts To Fade or 
Test Department’s The Unacceptable Face of Freedom — records 
made more than a quarter of a century ago — still have more 
purchase on the traumatic and tumultuous events of the year 
in the UK than anything produced by a white musician in 
2011. Recalling a conversation with Green Gartside at the 
Wire’s Off The Page festival of writing about music in 
February, it’s telling that today has no equivalent to Green’s 


post-punk anxieties about articulating new relationships 
between music and politics. Yet if this disconnection is bad 
for culture, it might be good for politics. For if music and 
subculture no longer act as effective mechanisms for 
controlled desublimation, converting disaffection into culture 
which can in turn be transformed into entertainment — 
feeding what Jean-Francois Lyotard memorably called the 
“Tungsten-Carbide stomach” of capital, which omnivorously 
consumes anything, and excretes it as commodities — then 
discontent can appear in a rawer form. This might be the 
reason that uber-reactionary Jeremy Clarkson has urged 
those at St Paul’s to stop camping and start writing protest 
songs. 

It could be, however, that our thinking about the problem 
is wrong-headed. It isn’t that music is lagging behind politics; 
the politics itself is missing. The major political event of the 
year in the UK was the riots, but they were political in a 
negative sense. Reactionary commentators attempted to 
evacuate the riots of any political content by classifying them 
as an outburst of criminality. But even if we reject this for the 
absurdity it plainly is, it’s possible to regard the riots as 
symptomatic — a symptom, precisely, of the failure of 
politics. “Harming one’s own community is entirely mindless, 
but why would someone care for a community that doesn’t 
care for him?” Professor Green asked Dan Hancox. “They 
might think of this as an uprising, but the anger is 
misdirected and conveyed in such a way will not have any 
kind of positive effect.” Wiley also saw the riots as a sign of 
impotence: “They’re saying ‘We’re going to do what we want!’ 
— and I’m thinking ‘No you're not, because when the police 


get a grip on it, you're going to be either banged up, or 
dead’.” With the Draconian prison sentences imposed on 
many of those who played even a minor role in the riots, 
Wiley’s prediction has been vindicated. Ceasing to be a 
symptom is one definition of achieving political agency, and 
— in a world where professional politicians look like inert 
mannequins incapable of preventing multiple impending 
catastrophes — nothing could be more urgent than this. 

It’s clear that this agency will not in the first instance be 
achieved through the hollowed out, decadent spaces of 
parliamentary politics. The political movement with which 
Franco Berardi is most associated, autonomism, has assumed 
a central importance amongst the political struggles that are 
coalescing in the UK and elsewhere. Consider, for example, 
the autonomistinfluenced “ultra-leftist propaganda machine” 
called Deterritorial Support Group, whose blog became a 
crucial hub for new political thinking in the UK. Steeped in 
electronic music culture, DSG are as significant for their 
political aesthetics as for any substantive political position 
they present: what they offer is a new form of political 
antagonism far beyond the folksiness of “protest music”, 
capable of operating across the cyberspatial, mediamatic and 
designer terrains of contemporary culture. This is politics as 
Underground Resistance’s Electronic Warfare. In the era of 
hacking collectives such as Lulzsec, Anonymous and 
Wikileaks, DSG recognise that cyber-insurgency can open up 
a new kind of political insurgency. With the Diamond Jubilee 
and the Olympics, not to mention Mayan prophecies of 
apocalypse, 2012 is shaping up to be the most symbolically 
charged year in the UK since 1977. Is this the year when No 


Future will finally come to an end? 


the secret sadness 
of the twenty-first 


century: james 


blake’s overgrown* 


A certain trajectory seems to have come to an end with James 
Blake’s new album, Overgrown. Blake has gone from digitally 
manipulating his own voice to becoming a singer; from 
constructing tracks to writing songs. The initial motivation 
for Blake’s early work no doubt came from Burial, whose 
combination of jittery two-step beats and R&B vocal samples 
pointed the way to a twenty-first-century pop. It was as if 
Burial had produced the dub versions; now the task was to 
construct the originals, and that entailed replacing the 
samples with an actual vocalist. 

Listening back to Blake’s records in chronological 
sequence is like hearing a ghost gradually assume material 


form; or it’s like hearing the song form (re)coalescing out of 
digital ether. A track such as “I Only Know (What I Know 
Now)” from the Klavierwerke EP is gorgeously insubstantial — 
it’s the merest ache, Blake’s voice a series of sighs and 
unintelligible pitch-shifted hooks, the production mottled 
and waterlogged, the arrangement intricate and fragile, 
conspicuously inorganic in the way that it makes no attempt 
to smooth out the elements of the montage. The voice is a 
smattering of traces and tics, a spectral special effect 
scattered across the mix. But with Blake’s self-titled debut 
album, something like traditional sonic priorities were 
restored. The reinvention of pop that his early releases 
promised was now seemingly given up, as Blake’s de- 
fragmented voice moved to the front of the mix, and implied 
or partially disassembled songs became “proper” songs, 
complete with un-deconstructed piano and organ. Electronics 
and some vocal manipulation remained, but they were now 
assigned a decorative function. Blake’s blue-eyed soul vocals, 
and the way that his tracks combined organ (or organ-like 
sounds) with electronica, made him reminiscent of a half- 
speed Steve Winwood. 

Many who were enthusiastic about the early EPs were 
disappointed or mildly dismayed by James Blake. Veiling and 
implying an object is the surest route to producing the 
impression of sublimity. Removing the veils and bringing that 
object to the fore risks de-sublimation, and some found 
Blake’s actual songs unequal to the virtual ones his early 
records had induced them into hallucinating. Blake’s voice 
was as cloyingly overpowering as it was non-specific in its 
feeling. The result was a quavering, tremulous vagueness, 


which was by no means clarified by lyrics that were similarly 
allusive/elusive. The album came over as if it were earnestly 
entreating us to feel, without really telling us what is was we 
were supposed to be feeling. Perhaps it’s this emotional 
obliqueness that contributes to what Angus Finlayson, in his 


review of Overgrown for FACT,* characterises as the 
strangeness of the songs on James Blake. They seemed, 
Finlayson says, like “half-songs, skeletal place-markers for 
some fuller arrangement yet to come.” The journey into 
“proper” songs was not as complete as it first appeared. It 
was like Blake had tried to reconstruct the song form with 
only dub versions or dance mixes as his guide. The result was 
something scrambled, garbled, solipsistic, a bleary version of 
the song form that was as frustrating as it was fascinating. 
The delicate insubstantiality of the early EPs had given way to 
something that felt overfull. It was like drowning in a warm 
bath (perhaps with your wrists cut). 

On Overgrown, the post-rave tricks and tics have been 
further toned down, and the album is at its weakest when it 
limply flirts with the dancefloor. Piano is still the lead 
instrument, but the chords hang over a backing that is almost 
studiedly anonymous — a luxuriantly warm pool of 
electronics where the rhythm is propelled more by the gently 
eddying bass rather than the beats. Like James Blake, though, 
Overgrown repays repeated listening. As with the first album, 
there is a simultaneous feeling that the tracks are both 
congested and unfinished, and that incompleteness — the 
sketchy melodies, the half-hooks, the repeated lines that play 
like clues to some emotional event never disclosed in the 
songs themselves — may be why it eventually gets under your 


skin. Blake has said that, by contrast with his debut, 
Overgrown sounds like the work of a man who has experienced 
love. For me, it is as emotionally enigmatic as its predecessor. 
The oddly indeterminate — irresolute and unresolved — 
character of Blake’s music gives it the quality of gospel music 
for those who have lost their faith so completely that they 
have forgotten they ever had it. What survives is only a 
quavering longing, without object or context, Blake coming 
off like an amnesiac holding on to images from a life and a 
narrative that he cannot recover. This “negative capability” 
means that Overgrown is like an inversion of the oversaturated 
high-gloss emotional stridency of chart and reality TV pop, 
which is always perfectly certain of what it is feeling. 

But what is the faith that Overgrown has lost? Blake’s 
development has paralleled that of Darkstar, who similarly 
moved from the tricksy, tic-y vocal science of “Aidy’s Girl is a 
Computer” to the chilly melancholia of their first album, 
North. Their new record News From Nowhere has a brighter, 
dreamier feel, but, as with Overgrown, it is notable for its lack 
of designs on the dancefloor. In a discussion that Simon 


Reynolds and I had about UK dance music,’ Reynolds argued 
that the “emotional turn” represented by Blake and Darkstar 
was an implicit acknowledgement that “dance music no 
longer provides the kind of emotional release that it once did, 
through collective catharsis.” The music doesn’t have to be 
explicitly sad for this to be the case — there is a melancholia 
intrinsic to the very turn inward. As Reynolds points out, the 
idea that Nineties dance music was unemotional is a fallacy. 
This was a music saturated with affect, but the affect involved 
wasn’t associated with romance or introspection. The 


twinning of romance and introspection, love and _ its 
disappointments, runs through twentiethcentury pop. By 
contrast, dance music since disco offered up another kind of 
emotional palette, based in a different model of escape from 
the miseries of individual selfhood. 

In the twenty-first century, there’s an increasingly sad 
and desperate quality to pop culture hedonism. Oddly, this is 
perhaps most evident in the way that R&B has given way to 
club music. When former R&B producers and performers 
embraced dance music, you might have expected an increase 
in euphoria, an influx of ecstasy. Yet the digitally-enhanced 
uplift in the records by producers such as Flo-Rida, Pitbull 
and will.iiam has a strangely unconvincing quality, like a 
poorly photoshopped image or a drug that we’ve hammered 
so much we’ve become immune to its effects. It’s hard not to 
hear these records’ demands that we enjoy ourselves as thin 
attempts to distract from a depression that they can only 
mask, never dissipate. 

A secret sadness lurks behind the twenty-first-century’s 
forced smile. This sadness concerns hedonism itself, and it’s 
perhaps in hip-hop — the genre that has been most oriented 
to pleasure over the past twenty-odd years — where this 
melancholy has registered most deeply. Drake and Kanye 
West are both morbidly fixated on exploring the miserable 
hollowness at the core of super-affluent hedonism. No longer 
motivated by hip-hop’s drive to conspicuously consume — 
they long ago acquired anything they could have wanted — 
Drake and West instead dissolutely cycle through easily 
available pleasures, feeling a combination of frustration, 
anger, and self-disgust, aware that something is missing, but 


unsure exactly what it is. This hedonist’s sadness — a sadness 
as widespread as it is disavowed — was nowhere better 
captured than in the doleful way that Drake sings, “we threw 
a party/yeah, we threw a party,” on Take Care’s “Marvin’s 
Room”. 


It’s no surprise to learn that Kanye West is an admirer of 


4 that was doing the 


rounds a couple of years ago made parallels between Blake 


James Blake’s. Meanwhile, this mix 


and Drake. There’s an affective as well as sonic affinity 
between parts of Kanye’s 808s and Heartbreak and My Beautiful 
Dark Twisted Fantasy and Blake’s two albums. You might say 
that Blake’s whole schtick is a partial re-naturalisation of the 
digitally manipulated melancholy Kanye auditioned on 808s: 
soul music after the Auto-Tune cyborg. But liberated from the 
penthouse-prison of West’s ego, the disaffection languishes 
listlessly, incapable of even recognising itself as sadness. 
Unsure of itself, caught up in all kinds of impasses, yet 
intermittently fascinating, Overgrown is one more symptom of 
the twenty-first century’s identity crisis. 


review: david 


bowie’s the next day! 


If you’re interested in The Next Day — and even if you aren’t — 
you've probably heard it by now. Heard it, been disappointed 
by it, ceased caring about it. The only really twenty-first- 
century thing about The Next Day is the way it exemplifies the 
hype velocity of current communication: artfully timed PR 
rumours, hints and hyperbole induce anyone within its range 
to hallucinate a sublime object behind the veil, only for that 
object to degenerate into quotidian mediocrity the very 
second we’ve downloaded it. 

The willingness to hallucinate is certainly there. Witness 
the sheer heft of the coverage, and feel the desperation 
behind it. The prospect of Bowie’s return was guaranteed to 
tickle the palate of a certain age of listener, but the desires 
that it triggered were also for something missing from 
contemporary popular music. These days, Bowie stands for all 
the lost possibilities going by the idea of art pop — which is to 
say, not only pop plus art, or pop as art, but a circuit where 
fashion, visual art and experimental culture connected up 


and renewed each other in unpredictable ways. His absence 
was a palate cleanser — his string of forgettable 1980s and 
Nineties records now forgotten, he could once again be the 
thin white space onto which fantasies are projected. His 
absence almost seemed like a ploy invented by Bowie the 
impresario-strategist. After all, the only way to make a new 
Bowie record an event was for him to withdraw long enough 
that it could seem like it might — really, this time — be 
forever. 

The Next Day’s first single “Where Are We Now?”, with its 
references to West Berlin era Potsdamer Platz and 
Nurnberger Strasse, sounded like an object carefully designed 
to pique the interest not only of the Bowie diehards but also 
those with a more general stake in pop history and 
mythology. Berlin! Tony Visconti! The track’s lugubrious 
melancholy prompted the fantasy that The Next Day could be 
Bowie’s version of Sinatra’s No One Cares — an old crooner, a 
man lost in time paradoxically regaining currency by giving 
up on the sad pursuit of a present that had escaped him for 
good long ago. But it was a red herring. There are all kinds of 
intimations of mortality in The Next Day’s words — and 
reviewers seeking to rescue the record have tended to take 
refuge in the lyric sheet — but the form is rock, and an 
alarmingly unprepossessing, devoid of funk (as well as 
electronics) rock at that. The rest of the album makes the 
distance between now and (Berlin) then of “Where Are We 
Now?” painfully evident, a pain heightened by Visconti’s 
failure to convert this collection of session muso workouts 
into anything memorable. The Next Day sounds as if it were 
barely produced at all: it has the flatness of a demo. The 


relatively warm reception The Next Day received tells its own 
sad tale about the state of pop in 2013. 

You can’t just put Visconti and Bowie together in a studio 
in 2012 and expect the equivalent of Low, “Heroes” or Lodger 
to result. The sorcerous powers that artists seem to possess as 
of right are never really theirs. Bowie — who perhaps more 
than any artist has performed the pop star’s lack of 
interiority — has always known this, and he and Eno did 
much to puncture the Romantic conceit that creativity comes 
from the mysterious inner depths of a musician. Bowie’s 
serial passage through personae, concepts and collaborators 
only telegraphed what is always the case: that the artist is 
synthesizer and curator of forces and ideas. This is all very 
well when the syntheses and the synergies are working, and 
there’s a steady supply of new collaborators to feed off and to 
lionise. It’s harder in this long striplit hours in the studio 
when the old magic won’t come, when the revels have ended 
but you still have to go through the motions. 

It’s cruelly appropriate that Bowie’s powers deserted him 
at practically the very moment that the Seventies — the 
decade with which he will always be synonymous — ended. I 
came to musical consciousness round about the time of 1980’s 
Scary Monsters, and took Bowie for granted. Ziggy Stardust 
already sounded like a hoary old rock ‘n’ roll relic, and even 
much of Scary Monsters sounded reactionary by comparison 
with what proteges like Gary Numan, the Associates and 
Visage were doing. Yet Bowie had helped to create the 
conditions of his own obsolescence. His successors were 
following Bowie’s template for what a pop star should be: a 
conceptualist and a designer, sexuality and gender 


indeterminate, alien and/or android, all outside and no 
inside, the changing face of the strange. From this point on, 
Bowie himself would be bereft of masks and make-up — it 
would be just him, the music and the Eighties suits. What 
followed was years of gradually lowering expectations, of 
spectacular misfires and the occasional lost gem, but mostly 
there was reliable mediocrity, the familiar declined star 
pattern where each new record is fanfare as a return to form, 
only to immediately disappear into irrelevance. 

Much of this is compressed onto the cover image, which is 
by far the most startling thing about The Next Day. It’s 
startling not for the act of desecration — but for the casual 
character of the desecration: a white square over the 
“Heroes” cover — what could be more half-assed? When I first 
saw the cover image I thought it must be a prank — what 
would the real cover image be like? Here is cover designer 
Jonathan Barnbrook’s rationale for the design: “The ‘Heroes’ 
cover obscured by the white square is about the spirit of great 
pop or rock music which is ‘of the moment’, forgetting or 
obliterating the past. However, we all know that this is never 
quite the case, no matter how much we try, we cannot break 
free from the past.” 

The image becomes more than a comment on Bowie — the 
man who once traded on his ability to escape the past is now 
trapped by it. It also functions as a diagnosis of a broader 
temporal malaise. What is this white space, this void? An 
optimistic reading would construe it as the openness of a 
present that is not yet decided. A bleaker take — one in 
keeping with the hackneyed quality of the music — would see 
the white space as standing in for the vacancy of the present, 


with nothing there except a necessarily failed attempt to 
escape and recover the past. That’s our pop predicament in 
2013, a predicament which The Next Day couldn’t seriously 
have been expected to resolve. 


the man who has 
everything: drake’s 
nothing was the 


same 


So here we are again: life at rainbow’s end. Everything that 
can be bought, available practically immediately, 24/7: 
women, food, cars, you name it, you click on it. Every hotel 
suite can be prepared to your specifications. The only things 
that are different are the shower controls. It’s all top quality, 
although naturally you can get down and dirty with the fast 
food options if you want to, and often (why not?) you do: 


Got everything, I got everything... I cannot complain, I cannot 
(You sure about that, Drake?) 


I don’t even know how much I really made, I forgot, it’s a lot... 


Fuck that, never mind what I got” 


OK, then, let’s get the obvious question out of the way 
first. If you’ve got everything, why are you so sad? 

Surely it can’t be as simple and sentimental as that hoary 
old chestnut: money can’t buy you love? Come on, is this 
really where rap was destined to end up: with the rapper as 
some romcom character, all the braggadocio and super- 
conspicuous consumption just so much bluster to conceal the 
boy-lack that the redeemer-woman will make good in the 
final reel? That old story, again? “Next time we fuck, I don’t 
want to fuck, I want to make love... I want to trust.” Drake can’t 
quite believe this routine, can’t quite make us believe it. He 
knows perfectly well that this sensitive stuff can play as one 
more pick-up-artist’s ruse... He’s spent so long deceiving and 
then revealing his deceptions that he’s no longer sure when 
he’s trying to play us or speak openly, or what the difference 
is. Crying real tears with one eye, while winking over the 
latest conquest’s shoulder to the camera with the other. He’d 
convinced us he was different, but that was a trick, and one 
that others have caught on to. There’s nothing very brave or 
unique about talking about your feelings now that “niggas talk 
more than bitches do.” Is this more honesty, or just an 
acknowledgement that he needs a new USP? 

I got 99 problems, getting rich ain’t one. 

Listening to Nothing Was the Same, I'm reminded of Judd 
Apatow’s Funny People. Apatow’s film is defined by a series of 
hesitations and avoidances. First of all, it seems as if it is 
going to be a film about a jaded but rich and successful 
comedian, George Simmons (Adam Sandler), who learns the 
value of life when he’s diagnosed with a serious illness; then 
it seems to be about a man who accepts the value of love and 


family. Yet each time the film seems to move towards these 
standard generic resolutions, Apatow pulls back. Simmons’ 
hedonic nihilism re-asserts himself; the threat of death can’t 
break the bad habits of a lifetime; the love he lost long ago 
was actually better off lost. He’s not happy being himself but 
he doesn’t want to be anyone else. Far from relieving this 
existential dilemma, fabulous wealth means that he has 
nowhere at all to hide from it. 

Nothing Was the Same is characterised by the same 
ambivalence — a longing to be a new person who can love and 
trust (with a woman, naturally, charged as the agent of this 
transformation) together with a recognition that he will 
never change, that he’ll always be drinking, smoking, fucking, 
that he’s far from perfect, but neither is anyone else, right? 
He never really took off the gangsta-minstrel drag for good; 
instead, he keeps casting it aside, inspecting it, distancing 
himself from it, before wearing it again. He can’t help himself 
(or so he keeps telling us). But this oscillation is valuable for 
what it tells us about rap’s embattled masculinity in general. 
Drake confirms that the street-strutting bad boy “just looking 
for head in a comfortable bed” is the other face of the 
desperately alone little boy lost crying to his mommy 
substitute. The boasting brute is always on the run from the 
helpless infant inside, but, for that very reason, the 
emotionally broken-down male isn’t an alternative to all the 
ego-armour posturing, so much as it is its enabling condition. 
Women are to be publicly disdained, treated as currency in a 
homosocial bragging economy; in private they are asked to 
make these wounded men whole again. Is there a track that 
has exposed the real nature of the male-to-female love song 


better than Take Care’s “Marvin’s Room”? The conceit — a 
drunk Drake leaving a phone message to a long lost love he 
treated badly but now thinks he wants back — leaves us in no 
doubt that he was speaking to himself via a fantasised female 
Other. 

Gangsta’s hyperbolically-staged fantasies of omnipotence 
were always nouveau-riche giveaways, which, like the bling, 
sang out that these working-class black Americans had not 
yet achieved the easy way in the world, the casual confidence 
that are the birthrights of those born to wealth and power. 
The (gold) chains have always clanked as loudly as Jacob 
Marley’s that the struggle to escape servitude has run 
aground, and that untold riches for a very few were the 
compensation for the many languishing in inertia, poverty, 
incarceration. Is “Started from the Bottom” — which we all 
laughed at: no you didn’t, Drake! — Drake’s commentary on all 
this? Hear it as an act of imagination, Drake putting himself 
in the sneakers of those who had to struggle from the depths 
like he never had to, rather than as some forged 
autobiography, and it makes more sense. But listen to the 
sheer weariness that weighs down the track: the heavy 
tristesse that starts the moment after you’ve reached the top 
of the tower, as the realisation sinks in that there’s no 
replacing the thrill of the chase. Drake was always expected 
to be a success, so he was deprived even of that brief moment 
of satisfaction before the ennui and the paranoia set in. 
Reaching the top was standard, the least he could expect. 

Nothing Was the Same is tangled up in all the confusions of 
a generation of men faced with contradictory imperatives — 
the post-feminist awareness that treating women like shit 


isn’t cool, together with the Burroughsian bombardment of 
always-available pornography. There’s no point moralising 
here, either for Drake or us. Drake’s at his weakest when he 
half-heartedly attempts some kitschy Hallmark card 
affirmation of lurve; he’s at his most painfully revelatory 
when he admits that these impasses, these binds, are just too 
much for him. He can’t escape these knots because the knots 
are what he is. His bewilderment about what a man is 
supposed to be now is the very hallmark of a contemporary 
heterosexual masculinity that realises that the patriarchal 
game is up, but which is too hooked on the pleasures and 
privileges to relinquish them yet (just one more click on the 
porn, then I'll be Mr Sensitive forever). 

On Nothing Was the Same, Drake often sounds like Tony 
Montana in Scarface: fucking, eating, snorting, is that all there 
is? But the tone here couldn’t be more different from Pacino’s 
Eighties cocaine histrionics. A glacial fatalism runs beneath 
everything here, and Drake matters because he makes 
contact — maybe better than anyone else — with the sense of 
hopelessness that quietly subsists beneath all the twerking 
and tweeting, all the twitter and the chatter of twenty-first- 
century culture. Hear this in the gorgeous electro-downer 
haze that saturates the album and establishes its tone much 
more than any of the beats. Yet there’s something beyond the 
fatalism, too. You can hear it in Drake’s signature move — the 
transition from rap to singing, the slipping down from ego- 
assertion into a sensual purring, the relaxing into a 
lasciviousness that has nothing to do with the localised libido 
and dumb automatisms of phallic sexuality. Down here, there 
is a glorious release from the pressures of identity. Rave-like, 


pitched-up vocals are suspended on placid currents of synth. 
Voices stop being human, become avatars from a space where 
subjectivity has been left behind like a bad dream. On the 
opener, “Tuscan Leather”, Whitney Houston’s ghost is 
summoned from the hotel bathroom, mutated into some 
butterfly-fragile chirruping creature singing inside a 
specimen jar. I’m frequently reminded of nothing so much as 
the refracted architectures and water sprites of Balam Acab’s 
Wander/Wonder. When you dive into these electro-oceanic 
depths, Nothing Was the Same ceases to be a fascinating 
symptom of all the blockages of the present, and becomes a 
longing for something new, something strange and lovely. 


break it down: dj 


rashad’s double cup! 


Time-stretched Amen breakbeats, rave-euphoric vocals: on 
Double Cup, Rashad pays his dues to the hardcore continuum, 
but the traces of jungle and rave here only accentuate how 
different footwork is to Nineties British dance music. 

Footwork has been greeted with the fanfare that usually 
accompany the arrival of an avant-garde dance music. These 
contradictory responses — footwork’s being written off as 
something that you can’t dance to at the same time as it is 
dismissed as a functional music, something that would only be 
properly appreciated by those dancing to it — is a sure sign 
that we are in the presence of something which scrambles the 
defaults of rearview hearing. 

But footwork is new in a strange way. It’s not historically 
new: it dates back to the Nineties. And what’s uncanny, 
unheimlich, about footwork is that practically everything in 
the sonic palette is familiar. Most of the sounds on Double Cup 
feel like they could have come from the twentieth century, 
even if they have actually been produced in the twenty-first. 


So, wherein resides footwork’s newness then? In a fascinating 


blog post,’ Tristam Adams identifies exactly what makes 
footwork new: its compositional innovations. To bring this 
out, Adams contrasts footwork to jungle. Jungle’s newness 
was in large part a consequence of the widespread availability 
of digital sampling technology, which facilitated both new 
sounds and new ways of treating sound (time-stretched 
breakbeats and vocals). Beyond this, though, I’m not sure that 
the way Adams constructs the comparison between jungle 
and footwork is quite right. Adams hears jungle as more 
“machinic” than footwork — but what was exciting about 
jungle to many of us at the time was that it gave a whole new 
sense of what machinism was. Jungle’s machinism was 
delirious; it was, in Kodwo Eshun’s immortal phrase, a 
rhythmic psychedelia, composed from whorls, twists, and 
vortexes of sound; there were none of the rigid mechanoid 
lines of techno. Jungle was dark, but also wet, viscous, and 
enveloping. 

It’s here that the contrast with footwork can most be 
heard — and felt. To those whose ears and nervous systems 
were mutated by jungle in the Nineties, footwork can initially 
sound strangely desiccated — like the dry bones left after 
jungle’s digital ocean has receded. “UK bass music” is an 
almost wilfully bland term, but it does point to the element 
which gave every genre from jungle to UK garage and 
dubstep their consistency: a viscous, glistening bass sound. 
This is conspicuously absent from Rashad’s sound. Instead of 
functioning as a dark liquid element on (or in) which other 
sounds could be suspended, Rashad’s bass is a surging and 
reclining series of stabs and jabs that heightens and lowers 


tension without ever releasing it. 

This leads on to another difference from jungle and the 
broader tendencies in Nineties digital culture. Where jungle, 
like Nineties CGI, used digital technology to smooth out some 
of the hard lines that had been characteristic of early 
computer sound and imagery, footwork has deliberated opted 
for angularity. Charlie Frame’s comparison of listening to 
Rashad with “gazing at an animated GIF that grows ever more 
absurd with each iteration”, captures very precisely 
footwork’s jerky repetitions. Perhaps the appeal of the 
animated GIF and of footwork are both tied up with the way 
that they reject the dominant aesthetics of digital culture 
now. Think of the way that the elastic architectures of 
Nineties animatronics gave way to the dreary photorealism of 
contemporary animation. Now, novelty is to be found in the 
refusal of communicative capitalism’s false promises of 
smoothness. If the Nineties were defined by the loop (the 
“sood” infinity of the seamlessly looped breakbeat, Goldie’s 
“Timeless”), then the twenty-first century is perhaps best 
captured in the “bad” infinity of the animated GIF, with its 
stuttering, frustrated temporality, its eerie sense of being 
caught in a timetrap. 

That frustrated, angular time — and the enjoyment of it — 
is at the heart of footwork. The genre can sound like an 
impenetrable thicket of rhythms if the thing you lock onto 
first is the most distinctive thing about footwork: the coiling 
spasms of super-dry snares. Lock into the floaty synth pads 
and the vocals, however, and footwork comes on as strangely 
mellow. In this respect, footwork can then be heard as an 
extrapolation of elements of Nineties G-funk. An earlier 


Hyperdub sound — the dayglo wonky of Joker — had mined G- 
funk for its absurdist pitch-bent synths. What footwork takes 
is some vocal styling (the rap that is so often subject to its 
stuttering repetitions), but also a certain mood. G-funk 
differentiated itself from standard gangsta posturing by the 
way it dissolved the hard ego of the rapper into clouds of 
Chronic. Beneath the busyness of capitalist realism — and its 
demands that we never stop selling ourselves — was another 
mode of being, where time diffused slowly as exhaled smoke. 
Beyond the phallic machismo, there was a different libidinal 
economy, defined by a superficially paradoxical combination 
of deep yearning and a desire to remain absolutely in the 
sunlight-saturated moment, liberated from the urgencies of 
business. This is all the more poignant because a gangster’s 
work is never done, his enemies don’t sleep, and chilled-out 
bliss could be terminated at any moment by gunfire. To the G- 
funk celebration of smoking, Rashad adds other affective 
toners: the lost-in-the-moment exhilaration of the raver, and 
R&B’s wistful regrets/lascivious moaning. The overall result 
is, in terms of mood and affect, oddly reminiscent of cool-era 
jazz — there is the same ambivalence, the same evocation of 
an harsh yet alluring urban environment, the same 
combination of sadness and confidence, the same articulation 
of longing and bliss. 

Then there is the tic-talk of the voices themselves — the 
way they are made to stammer and circle around themselves. 
It’s as if there is a cross-contamination, a human-machine 
(psycho)pathology, the machines infecting the human voices 
with glitches, the humans passing on Freudian slips, 
parapraxes, to the machines. Rashad’s plaintive machinism 


reminds me of nothing so much as the hallucinatory intensity 
of the “I Love You” section of William Burroughs’ The Ticket 
That Exploded: 


On my knees I hoped you'd love me too. I would run till 
I feel the thrill of long ago. Now my inspiration but it 
won’t last and we’ll be just a photograph. I’ve forgotten 
you then? I can’t sleep, Blue Eyes, if I don’t have you. Do 
I love her? I love you I love you many splendored thing. 
Can’t even eat. Jelly on my mind back home. ‘Twas good 
bye deep in the true love. We'll never meet again, 


darling, in my fashion.? 


Burroughs’ early cut-up and fold-in texts, with their 
analysis and decoding of emotional manipulation via media 
and their understanding of pornography as a control 
apparatus, now read _ like extraordinarily prophetic 
anticipations of the present moment. As with Burroughs, 
there is a double pathos in Rashad’s work. First of all, there is 
a pathos at the level of the affects in the voices themselves; 
and the way that the voices are orphaned from their 
supposed origins means that there is an overwhelming 
sadness even if the feeling expressed is ostensibly joyful. It’s 
the same kind of depersonalised sadness we might feel if we 
happened upon lost photographs of an unknown person’s 
holiday, long ago. Then there is another pathos that arises 
from the way that the voices are made to repeat and stutter; 
the sadness of recognising a speaking animal (ourselves) in 
the grip of automatisms, repetitions, drives. Rashad 
articulates the impasses of our twenty-first-century condition 


with a precision and a compassion that few others can match. 
More importantly, he suggests that — against all the odds — 
we might still be able to dance our way out of the time-traps 
and identity prisons we are locked in. 


start your nonsense! 
on eMMplekz and 


dolly dolly? 


There are still all kinds of possibilities for combining voice 
and sound in new ways. Rap was the last major form to 
popularise a use of the voice that was not singing, but the 
field is wide open, as these two new albums from eMMplekz 
and Dolly Dolly prove. 

The first temptation with these records is to hear them as 
“spoken word” — with the musicality subordinated to a voice 
that is literary, conversational, comedic. However, what 
makes these two albums so unique is the way that musicality 
here infests and inflects the voice, the way that the sound 
refuses to stay (in the) background. Both albums take much of 
their inspiration from the very English tradition of Nonsense, 
which includes Edward Lear, Lewis Carroll, Monty Python, 
and more recently, Chris Morris. It was on account of Carroll 
that André Breton reputedly said that the English had no 


need of surrealism. Here, eMMplekz and Dolly Dolly proffer 
different versions of twenty-first-century English sonic 
surrealism. 

With eMMplekz, a collaboration between Ekoplekz and 
Mordant Music’s Baron Mordant, the precursors that first 
come to mind are certain moments in post-punk — Cabaret 
Voltaire’s “Photophobia”, Throbbing Gristle, the Fall — yet 
eMMplekz don’t sound quite like any of these. From its title 
on in, Your Crate Has Changed, the Baron’s punconscious 
wordplay has a very contemporary focus. 

If Drake and Kanye West expose the sadness and madness 
deep within the cyber-pleasuredome — the sound of 
depressed superstars as hypercommodities — then eMMplekz 
observe the malaises and pathologies of capitalist cyberspace 
from outside the digital matrix. Instead of the seamlessslick, 
depthless pixellation to which always-on digitality has 
habituated us, Ekoplekz’s analog electronics seethe and hiss, 
gathering and dispersing like a steam and mist. These 
synthesizer sketches function like impressionist sound 
paintings of what Ken Hollings has called the “digital 
regime”, and it’s as if, like users coming down from a 
psychotropic, we are finally seeing it for what it is. 

“T’ve got to take this...” Baron Mordant has a schizoanalytic 
ear for how the digital regime reveals itself through the 
phrases it induces to casually utter. Doesn’t this phrase — so 
often repeated, so little thought about — capture all too 
accurately our fatalism in respect of communicative 
capitalism? “I’ve got to take this” — I’ve got to let it, accept it, 
I can’t escape, there’s nothing I can do... There’s no way out, 
there’s no release from the frenzied inertia of all those 


cyberspatial urgencies, these alerts. “Tethered to my hotspot, 


? 


tethered to my hotspot...” Constant anxiety about staying 
connected, constant worry about holding onto the equipment 
that allows us to stay connected. “Can you watch my laptop?” 
We're all sick of this now... we’re all sick because of this now... 
“Sorry for your Lossy...” What is all this digital compression 
costing us, and when do we ever get to count the cost? (The 
first thing we do in the morning is grope for our smartphones 
— straight from sleep into the somnambulance of capitalist 
cyberspace. “Unsubscribe from Soviet time” — maybe we did 
that too soon, and now it’s business o’clock, forever...) 

Your Crate Has Changed is like an English take on Franco 
“Bifo” Berardi’s Precarious Rhapsody: Semiocapitalism and the 
Pathologies of Post-Alpha Generation. Berardi persuasively 
argues that the interlock between precarious work and 
capitalist communications technology has produced a 
population whose nervous systems are overloaded with 
stimuli. Mordant gives voice to weary old digital migrants 
whose middle-aged flesh is too saggy and grey to be made- 
over — people deprived of security, forced to keep on 
hustling even though they are too old for the game, bone- 
weary. No rest for the precarious, no chance to tune into 
anything except the imperatives of business. “Invoices in my 
head... invoices in my head...” 

Invoices in my head, and too much spam and random 
cyber-noise to hear anything else. But I don’t think there’s 
been anyone since Mark E. Smith at his telepathic peak in the 
late Seventies/early Eighties who has managed to tune into 
the rogue frequencies of England’s schizo-babble as 
effectively as the Baron does here. Mordant finds all the 


clandestine signals hidden in jingles and classified ads. He 
channels the voices of the lonely, the desperate, all the 
weirdos and the saddoes; ourselves, perhaps, but the secret 
selves we keep stuffed behind our Facebook walls. Yet there 
are still avenues of escape — on a couple of tracks, an infant’s 
babbling offers an alternative Nonsense to capital’s 
infantilised huckster-speak. 

A surface joviality — a different kind of humour, much 
less mordant — separates Dolly Dolly from eMMplekz. Yet it’s 
the slippages of tone and genre, from light pastiche to 
intimations of mortality, the sliding of persona from gone-to- 
seed raconteur to charity shop mystic, from short story-teller 
to preening bard, that make Antimacasser such an odd jewel of 
a record, and Dolly so singular a performer. 

The opening track, “Wattle and Daub” — a collaboration 
with Position Normal — is more than worth the admission 
price alone. Over a lysergicallysmeary detuned piano (or 
maybe guitar), Dolly Dolly dolefully declaims a Nonsense- 
Shakespearean state of the nation address. “England my 
England... the cold mist of your fibrous trolleys stifles the sun... half- 
strangled uncles stuffed with crisps... your sky full of plump chintz 
cushions...” It’s like Tony Hancock’s melancholia has been 
dream-conflated with his mockery of thespian and playwright 
pretensions. Yet the Nonsense is disarming: “Wattle and 
Daub” gives us nothing less than a psychedelic-surrealist 
portrait of a country deprived of psychedelia and surrealism. 
A world without surprise, an entirely domesticated universe, 
banality as cosmology: “Let’s colonise the other planets, fill them 
with bitter and dry roasted peanuts, pigeons and oven chips.” The 
dead world of middle-aged Britain’s living rooms; the cheery 


veneer of advertising’s ever-smiling, glowing-faced families 
turned inside out. “I’m sick of being a man”, moans the 
character who narrates the closing track. Aren’t we all? But 
Antimacasser finds all sorts of disused or temporarily 
abandoned doorways into other worlds, all kinds of rabbit 
holes in which we can escape from being a sad human animal. 
Old New English Library paperbacks become occult manuals, 
full of esoteric philosophy. It’s still possible to transform 
ourselves, to transport ourselves, and Dolly Dolly shows us 
how. 


review: sleaford 
mods’ divide and exit 


and chubbed up: the 


singles collection* 


The East Midlands accent, lacking urban glamour, lilting 
lyricism or rustic romanticism, is one of the most unloved in 
the UK. It is heard so rarely in popular media that it isn’t 
recognised enough even to be disdained. I must confess that I 
have a dog in this fight. I grew up in the East Midlands, and 
when I left university I was described by a sympathetic 
lecturer as having a “speech and accent problem”. The accent 
gradually disappeared, as I learned to suppress the lazy 
Leicestershire consonants and articulate my speech in 
something closer to so-called received pronunciation — an 
achievement loaded with ambivalence and shame. 

Sleaford Mods’ Jason Williamson makes no_ such 


accommodation to metropolitan manners, and he’s disgusted 
at those who speak in fake accents, whether they’re imitating 
someone from East London or “Lou Reeds, G.G. Allin...” The 
appeal to the local in politics and culture is usually smug and 
reactionary; a petit-bourgeois ruse to acquire more cultural 
and actual capital by overpricing the artisnal and the organic 
(Williamson is wise to this scam too, blasting at “expensive 
coffee shops full of local art/Fuck off’). But the politics of 
locality operate differently when it comes to accent. The 
English bourgeoisie speak in more or less the same accent 
wherever they come from. The insistence on retaining a 
regional accent is therefore a challenge to the machineries of 
class subordination — a refusal to accept being marked as 
inferior. 

Williamson was born in Grantham, Lincolnshire — 
Sleaford is about twenty miles away — and was involved in 
the music scene for years, following a familiar provincial 
trajectory: not making it, but always being lured back at the 
very point he was about to give up. He was in and out of local 
groups, followed the dream to San Francisco and London for a 
while, and ended up back home when it didn’t come off. He 
tried to go out on his own, but he couldn’t find anything new, 
until, bored and frustrated in a recording studio, he started 
ranting over a metal track. He had found his voice, literally. 
He was inspired by the Wu-Tang Clan, but he didn’t so much 
repeat their sound as their methodology, forcing listeners to 
adjust to his accent, idiolect and references. This risked 
bathos — the East Midlands ain’t New York, and Sleaford 
Mods would come off as just another comic turn if it weren’t 
for Williamson’s incendiary intensity. (Which isn’t to deny 


the mordantly acidic wit that runs through his lines: 
“Chumbawamba weren't political?/They were just crap”, isn’t 
just funny but critically astute.) 

Listen to the singles collection, Chubbed Up, next to Divide 
and Exit, and it’s clear not much has changed in the duo’s 
sound. The variation is provided by Williamson’s words, the 
music by Andrew Fearn always fits an (unfussy) formula: 
pugilistic post-punk bass; functional but unprepossessing 
beats; occasional cheap keyboard riffs and listless wafts of 
guitar. It’s digitally manipulated, but conspicuously 
unpolished — the software is used not to micromanage the 
sounds but to capture them into a purgatorial loop. 

The name Sleaford Mods sounds like vintage graffiti, or 
something you’d have sewn onto a Union Jack at an England 
football match three decades ago. On the face of it, they 
couldn’t be any less mod. Where is the style and the cool in 
this relentless outpouring of profanity and discontent? But 
mod was a complex phenomenon, as much about the failure 
to achieve the glamour of black America as it was about the 
aspiration towards possessing it. The mods might have loved 
Miles and Motown but when they made music it sounded like 
the Who and the Jam — rock born with a plastic spoon in its 
mouth, stuck in a monochromatic England skulking in the 
shadows cast by the USA’s Pop Art consumer dreams. The 
mods worked in office jobs, in semi-skilled occupations and in 
department stores, longing for a luxury far above their 
station. But their ambitions weren’t to climb the social ladder 
of bourgeois respectability — they prefigured instead a world 
in which style exploded far beyond the narrow calculations of 
business, and everyday life could become a work of art. As 


Dick Hebdige wrote in his essay “The Meaning of Mod”: 
“Every mod was existing in a ghost world of gangsterism, 
luxurious clubs and beautiful women, even if the reality only 
amounted to a draughty Parker anorak, a beaten up Vespa, 
and fish and chips out of a greasy bag.” With Sleaford Mods, 
the chips and the grease are all that’s left. Factories have 
closed and trade unions have been subdued. Art schools and 
the media have rebourgeoisified. University courses have 
been opened up, but the real graduate jobs are reserved for 
the same old suspects. The only time you are likely to hear a 
working-class accent on television is in a poverty porn 
documentary. 

This is Sleaford Mods’ world, but they refuse the place 
assigned to them by well-meaning metropolitan liberals and 
by unscrupulous Tories. They won’t play the part of a dumb 
feckless prole or white, working-class racist (Williamson 
loathes St George’s flag white van men as much as their Tory 
overlords). They won’t knuckle down and gratefully accept 
zero-hours contract jobs, or be content to “rot away in the 
aisles of Co-Op”, as the single “Jolly Fucker” had it. 

If anything, Divide and Exit feels more claustrophobic than 
its predecessor, Austerity Dogs, with even the tiny dreamy 
spaces that once opened up on tracks such as “Donkey” 
eliminated by Williamson’s relentless excremental flow. 
Excremental is the right word: piss and shit course through 
Williamson’s rhymes, as if all the psychic and physical 
effluent abjected by Cameron’s Britain can no longer be 
contained, and it’s bursting upwards, exploding through all 
the deodorised digital commercial propaganda, the thin 
pretences that we’re all in this together and everything’s 


going to be all right. 

What overflows in Williamson’s pottymouth is a seething 
disaffection incubated on the dole or in dead end jobs and 
further stoked up by the shop-soiled fantasies of escape 
pushed by an ailing music business. An early single was called 
“Jobseeker”: “So Mr Williamson — what have you done to find 
gainful employment since your last signing on date?/Fuck 
all!” A fantasy exchange no doubt: here, as often in Sleaford 
Mods Williamson gives vent to a voice that would otherwise 
stay locked in his head. Discontent is everywhere in the UK 
now but for the most part it’s privatised: blunted by alcohol 
and anti-depressants, or directed into impotent comments 
box spite and empty social media outrage: “All you Zombies, 
tweet tweet tweet”. 

If Williamson’s anger often seems intransitive — his fuck 
offs are sheer explosions of exasperation, directed at no one 
in particular, or at everyone — it’s underscored by a class 
consciousness painfully aware that there is nothing which 
could transform disaffection into political action. “Aren’t we 
all just/Pissing in the flames?” Cameron and the Tories are 
obviously despised — there’s a particularly memorable 
nightmare image of the “Prime Minister’s face hanging in the 
clouds/Like Gary Oldman’s Dracula” — but who can stop 
them? “Liveable shit/You put up with it”. This is both a taunt 
directed at the audience and an acknowledgement of 
Williamson’s own capitulation in doing what’s necessary to 
survive. 

It isn’t always the role of political music to come up with 
solutions. But nothing could be more urgent than the 
questions that Sleaford Mods pose: who will make contact 


with the anger and frustration that Williamson articulates? 
Who can convert this bad affect into a new political project? 


test dept: where 
leftist idealism and 
popular modernism 


collide 


There’s something very timely about the return of Test Dept. 
Their installation DS30 (2014), the accompanying film and the 
book Total State Machine (2015) — a comprehensive history 
and critical study of the band — have arrived just in time for 
the deep crisis of neoliberalism in the UK. 

Test Dept were always more than a musical group. They 
are better understood as a popular modernist collective that 
had the production of sound at its centre, but which also 
made visuals, projections and films. Test Dept were formed in 
London in 1981 by Jonathan Toby Burdon, Graham 
Cunnington, Angus Farquhar, Paul Hines and Paul Jamrozy. 
They began as a second-wave industrial act, following on 


from a first wave led by Throbbing Gristle and Cabaret 
Voltaire. With their use of found metal objects and their 
performances in spaces of labour and logistics (disused 
factories, transport hubs), Test Dept offered what seemed, on 
the face of it, to be a very literal take on the “industrial”. Via 
their involvement in a number of UK struggles — including 
the miners’ strike (1984-85) and the anti-Poll Tax movement 
(1988-91) — Test Dept also became intensely invested in the 
politics of the industrial and the post-industrial. 

Test Dept’s signature sound is intensely percussive, a 
convulsive dance music that took its inspiration from Soviet 
constructivism, but which became something like the British 
equivalent of the politicised US hip-hop group Public Enemy. 
The records are sonic mosaics, pulsing with panic, the 
sampled voices of Tory MPs countered by defiant statements 
by left-wing militants. One of Test Dept’s most powerful 
tracks — “Statement” from the 1986 album The Unacceptable 
Face of Freedom — features miner Alan Sutcliffe giving a 
moving account of police brutality during the strike. The 
track is a work of emotional engineering, a collectivist 
response to the manipulation of affect and desire through 
advertising, branding and political propaganda. Sutcliffe 
went on to tour with the group: one example of the way in 
which struggles produced not only new alliances but new 
social spaces, in which art-making ceased to be a matter for 
specialists of a certain age. 

For any British, left-wing person, remembering the mid- 
1980s is liable to provoke a sadness that is visceral, choking, 
wrenching. I still can’t recall without weeping the day when 
the miners returned to work in 1985 after a year on strike. 


What I have called capitalist realism — the deeply embedded 
belief that there is no alternative to capitalism — was 
definitively established in the UK during that period, in 
Margaret Thatcher’s second term in government. For a 
significant proportion of the population, the 1982 Falklands 
War had transformed Thatcher from a figure of loathing into 
a glorious war leader. This renewed popularity, together with 
the formation of the Social Democratic Party by Labour Party 
defectors, allowed the Tories to achieve a landslide victory in 
the 1983 general election. It proved to be a traumatic defeat 
for the British left in general, and for the Labour Party in 
particular. Labour began its long march towards Blairism and 
its eventual complete capitulation to neoliberalism and 
corporate tyranny. Meanwhile, the crushing of the miners’ 
strike, and the wave of privatisations that the Tories 
unleashed, created the conditions for the neoliberal Britain 
that is only now falling apart, thirty years later. 

In retrospect, it can look as if the whole of the 1980s was a 
series of defeats for the left. One value of Total State Machine is 
to remind us that it didn’t feel that way at the time. Rather, 
like John Akomfrah’s video installation The Unfinished 
Conversation (2013), the Total State Machine book invokes a 
forgotten 1980s, in which style culture was synchronised with 
the rise of an anti-authoritarian left that confidently laid 
claim to a new modernity, set to dispense with capital, 
patriarchy and racism as so many historical relics; a 1980s in 
which radical chic and designer socialism weren’t dirty words 
but real possibilities. 

Total State Machine includes a section of Cynthia Rose’s 
1991 book Design After Dark. Inspired by a Test Dept 


performance, Rose argues that young Britons would 


succeed in staging a dancefloor revolution. It will not be 
the Komsomolstyle overthrow dreamt of by Red Wedge, 
the ill-fated attempt by a collective of musicians — led 
by Billy Bragg, Paul Weller and Jimmy Somerville — to 
spearhead a campaign to defeat the Tories in the 1987 
General Election. Instead, it will come about through 
grass-roots changes — successive waves of guerrilla 
sounds, guerrilla design, guerrilla entertainments. The 
new design dynamic will be an impulse born out of 
celebration, rising out of leisure enacted as an event. 
And it will change young people’s perception about 
what entities like design and communication should 


do.” 


Sadly, it didn’t work out that way. Rose was absolutely right 
that most of the innovative energy in British music culture 
would come from dance music, which was about to enjoy its 
most fecund period ever. But the atmosphere around rave, 
jungle and garage tended towards the apolitical, the 
libertarian or the capitalist. The alliance of the left with the 
new technologies, energies, infrastructures and forms of 
desire that Rose saw emerging was to be very short-lived. 

The comparison with Red Wedge is instructive here. Part 
of the problem with Red Wedge was that, despite taking its 
name from a poster designed by El Lissitzky (Beat the Whites 
with the Red Wedge, 1919), its music represented a retreat from 
modernist experimentalism. Bragg’s blokeish neo-folk, the 
hamfisted jazz-funk-pop Weller made with the Style Council, 


the Communards’ strangely depressing party music: none of 
this was capable of articulating a future. It was all bogged 
down in the worst kind of 1980s gloss. 

Test Dept were one of the last examples of what has been 
called post-punk, but really they are part of a longer 
trajectory of art pop/pop art going back to the 1950s. The 
conditions for this popular modernism were subject to 
sustained attack in the mid-Eighties, and they have never 
recovered. The Tories began to dismantle the infrastructure 
of social security, higher-education maintenance grants, 
squatting and art schools that had given working-class people 
access to the resources of so-called high culture and time to 
produce their own sound, fiction and art. 

But the neoliberal capitalism that drove this assault on 
culture is now heading for disaster — in Greece, in Spain, in 
Scotland and, finally, in England. Far from being some static 
monument to a bygone era, Total State Machine is an 
invaluable archive, an inventory of strategies, gestures and 
techniques that can now be repotentiated by others ready to 
begin where the Test Dept of the 1980s left off. Rose’s 
prophecies of a new design dynamic can yet come true. 
Popular modernism isn’t dead: it has merely had a thirty-year 
hiatus. 


no romance without 


finance! 


Jennifer M. Silva’s Coming Up Short: Working-Class Adulthood in 
an Age of Uncertainty is a heartbreaking study of the corrosive 
effects of the neoliberal environment on intimacy. Silva’s 
book focuses on young people specifically — it is based on a 
hundred interviews she undertook with young working-class 
men and women in two American cities in Massachusetts and 
Virginia. Her findings are disturbing. Over and over again, 
Silva finds her young subjects exhibiting a “hardened” self — 
a form of subjectivity that prides itself on its independence 
from others. For Silva, this hardened subject is the 
consequence of this generation being abandoned, 
institutionally and _ existentially. In an environment 
dominated by unrelenting competition and insecurity, it is 
neither possible to trust others nor to project any sort of 
long-term future. Naturally, these two problems feed into one 
another, in one of the many vicious spirals which neoliberal 
culture has specialised in innovating. The inability to imagine 
a secure future makes it very difficult to engage in any sort of 


long-term commitment. Rather than seeing a partner as 
someone who might share the stresses imposed by a harshly 
competitive social field, many of the working-class 
individuals to whom Silva spoke instead saw relationships as 
an additional source of stress. In particular, many of the 
heterosexual women she interviewed regarded relationships 
with men as too risky a proposition. In conditions where they 
could not depend on much outside themselves, the 
independence they were forced to develop was both a 
culturally-validated achievement and a hard-won survival 
strategy which they were reluctant to relinquish. 

“In a world of rapid change and tenuous loyalties”, Silva 
argues, “the language and institution of therapy — and the 
self-transformation it promises — has exploded in American 


culture.”2 A therapeutic narrative of heroic  self- 
transformation is the only story that make sense in a world in 
which institutions can no longer be relied upon to support or 
nurture individuals: 


In social movements like feminism, self-awareness, or 
naming one’s problems, was the first step to radical 
collective awareness. For this generation, it is the only 
step, completely detached from any kind of solidarity; 
while they struggle with similar, and structurally 
rooted, problems, there is no sense of “we”. The 
possibility of collective politicisation through naming 
one’s suffering is easily subsumed within these larger 


structures of domination because others who struggle 


are not seen as fellow sufferers but as objects of scorn.? 


The spreading of therapeutic narratives was one way in 
which neoliberalism contained and privatised the molecular 
revolution that consciousness-raising was bringing about. 
Where consciousness-raising pointed to impersonal and 
collective structures — structures that capitalist and 
patriarchal ideology obscures — neoliberalism sees only 
individuals, choices and personal responsibility. Yet 
consciousness-raising practices weren’t only at odds with 
capitalist ideology; they also marked a decisive break with 
Marxist-Leninism. Gone was the revolutionary eschatology 
and the militaristic machismo which made revolution the 
preserve of an avant-garde. Instead, consciousness-raising 
made revolutionary activity potentially available to anyone. 
As soon as two or more people gather together, they can start 
to collectivise the stress that capitalism ordinarily privatises. 
Personal shame becomes dissolved as its structural causes are 
collectively identified. 

Socialist-feminism converted Lukacs’s theory of class 
consciousness into the practice of consciousness-raising. 
Since consciousness-raising has been used by all kinds of 
subjugated groups, it would perhaps be better to talk now of 
subjugated group consciousness rather than (just) class 
consciousness. But it is worth noting in passing that 
neoliberalism has sought to eradicate the very concept of 
class, producing a situation memorably described by Wendy 
Brown, in which there is “class resentment without class 
consciousness or class analysis”. This erasure of class has 
distorted everything, and allowed many struggles to be 
rhetorically captured by bourgeois liberalism. 

Subjugated group consciousness is first of all a 


consciousness of the (cultural, political, existential) 
machineries which produce subjugation — the machineries 
which normalise the dominant group and create a sense of 
inferiority in the subjugated. But, secondly, it is also a 
consciousness of the potency of the subjugated group — a 
potency that depends upon this very raised state of 
consciousness. However, it is important to be clear that the 
aim is not to remain in a state of subjugation. As Nancy C. M. 
Hartsock explains, “the point is to develop an account of the 
world that treats our perspectives not as subjugated, 
insurrectionary, or disruptive knowledges, but as potentially 


constitutive of a different world”.* 

To have one’s consciousness raised is not merely to 
become aware of facts of which one was previously ignorant: 
it is instead to have one’s whole relationship to the world 
shifted. The consciousness in question is not a consciousness 
of an already-existing state of affairs. Rather, consciousness- 
raising is productive. It creates is a new subject — a we that is 
both the agent of struggle and what is struggled for. At the 
same time, consciousness-raising intervenes in the “object”, 
the world itself, which is now no longer apprehended as some 
static opacity, the nature of which is already decided, but as 
something that can be transformed. This transformation 
requires knowledge; it will not come about through 
spontaneity, voluntarism, the experiencing of ruptural 
events, or by virtue of marginality alone. Hence Hartsock’s 
concept of standpoint epistemology, which maintains — 
following Lukacs and Marx — that subjugated groups 
potentially have an access to knowledge of the whole social 
field that the dominant group lacks. Members of subjugated 


groups do not however automatically possess this knowledge 
as of right — it can only be accessed once group 
consciousness is developed. According to Hartsock, “the 
vision available to the oppressed group must be struggled for 
and represents an achievement which requires both science 
to see beyond the surface of the social relations in which all 
are forced to participate, and the education which can only 
grow from struggle to change those relations.” 

One way of seeing Jennifer M. Silva’s book is as an account 
of radically deflated consciousness. Crucial to this is Silva’s 
restoration of the concept of class as a frame shaping the 
experiences of those who feature in her study. Class is what is 
typically missing from her interviewees’ “therapeutic” 
accounts of themselves. Exactly as Wendy Brown says, many 
of Silva’s subjects tend to exhibit (an unconscious and 
disavowed) class resentment without class consciousness. 

Reading Silva’s descriptions of women wary of giving up 
their independence to men they perceive as feckless wasters, 
I was reminded of two R&B hits from 1999: “No Scrubs” by 
TLC and “Bills Bills Bills” by Destiny’s Child. Both these songs 
see financially independent women upbraiding (presumably 
unemployed) men for their shiftlessness. It is easy to attack 
such tracks for their seeming peddling of neoliberal ideology. 
Yet I think it far more productive to hear these songs in the 
same way that we attend to the accounts in Silva’s book. 
These are examples of consciousness deflated, which have 
important lessons to communicate to anyone seeking to 
dismantle capitalist realism. 

It is still often assumed that politics is somehow “inside” 
cultural products, irrespective of their context and their use. 


Sometimes, agit-prop style culture can of course be politically 
transformative. But even the most reactionary cultural 
expression can contribute to a transformative project if it is 
sensitively attended to. It is possible to see the work of the 
late Stuart Hall in this light: as an attempt to bring to leftist 
politics the messages that culture was trying to impart to it. If 
this project was something of a tragic failure, it was a 
consequence, not of the shortcomings in Hall’s approach, but 
of the intransigence of the old left, its deafness to the desires 
and anxieties being expressed in culture. Ever since Hall fell 
under the spell of Miles Davis in the 1950s, he dreamed of 
somehow commensurating the libidinal modernity he 
encountered in popular music with the progressive political 
project of the organised left. Yet the authoritarian left was 
unable to tune into this ambition, allowing itself to be 
outflanked by a new right which soon claimed modernisation 
for itself, and consigned the left to the past. 

To understand this failure from another angle, let’s 
consider for a moment the work of the late music and 
cultural critic Ellen Willis. In her 1979 essay, “The Family: 


Love It Or Leave It”, Willis observed that the 
counterculture’s desire to replace the family with a system of 
collective child-rearing would have entailed “a social and 
psychic revolution of almost inconceivable magnitude”. It’s 
very difficult, in our deflated times, to re-create the 
counterculture’s confidence that such a “social and psychic 
revolution” could not only happen, but was already in the 
process of unfolding. Like many of her generation, Willis’s life 
was shaped by first being swept up by these hopes, then 
seeing them gradually wither as the forces of reaction 


regained control of history. There’s probably no better 
account of the Sixties’ counterculture’s retreat from 
Promethean ambition into self-destruction, resignation and 
pragmatism than Willis’s collection of essays Beginning To See 


The Light.° As Willis makes clear in her introduction to the 
collection, she frequently found herself at odds with what she 
experienced as the authoritarianism and statism of 
mainstream socialism. While the music that she listened to 
spoke of freedom, socialism seemed to be about centralisation 
and state control. The counterculture’s politics were anti- 
capitalist, Willis argues, but this did not entail a 
straightforward rejection of everything produced in the 
capitalist field. Certainly, pleasure and individualism were 
important to what Willis characterises as her “quarrel with 
the left”, yet the desire to do away with the family could not 
be construed in these terms alone; it was inevitably also a 
matter of new and unprecedented forms of collective (but 


> & 


non-statist) organisation. Willis’ “polemic against standard 
leftist notions about advanced capitalism” rejected as at best 
only half-true the ideas “that the consumer economy makes 
us slave to commodities, that the function of the mass media 
is to manipulate our fantasies, so we will equate fulfilment 
with buying the system’s commodities”. Culture — and music 
culture in particular — was a terrain of struggle rather than a 
dominion of capital. The relationship between aesthetic 
forms and politics was unstable and inchoate — culture didn’t 
just “express” already-existing political positions, it also 
anticipated a politics-to-come (which was also, too often, a 
politics that never actually arrived). 

Yet there was also an immanent transformative 


immediacy in the music of the counterculture. It reinforced 
the feelings of despair, disaffection and rage that bourgeois 
culture ordinarily makes us distrust. As such, music 
functioned as a form of consciousness-raising, in which a 
mass audience could not only experience its feelings being 
validated, it could locate the origins of those feelings in 
oppressive structures. Moreover, the ingestion of 
hallucinogens by growing numbers of the population, and the 
emergence of a psychedelic imaginary that touched even 
those who had never used acid, made for a widespread 
perception that social reality was provisional, plastic, subject 
to transformation by collective desire. 

If Beginning to See the Light is a painful — and painfully 
honest — account of consciousness deflation, then the same 
story is narrated within music culture itself. Peter Shapiro 
has shown how early Seventies soul and funk music — the O 
Jays’ “Back Stabbers”, the Undisputable Truth’s “Smiling 
Faces Sometimes”, Sly Stone’s “You Caught Me Smiling” — 
“engaged in a remarkable conversation” about the newly 
minted Smiley yellow face image, “an imagistic minefield that 
played confidence games with centuries of caricatures, the 
beaming faces of the white establishment promising civil 
rights and integration [and] Nixon’s Dirty Tricks gang.” With 
Nixon on the rise and the Panthers subdued, songs like 
“Backstabbers” caught a new mood of suspicion and 
recrimination. In his classic essay “The Myth of Staggerlee”, 
Greil Marcus argues that these songs — along with the rest of 
Sly and the Family Stone’s There’s A Riot Goin’ On and the 


> 


Temptations’ “Papa Was A Rolling Stone” — were part of a 


bitter moment, when Sixties optimism had drained away to 


be replaced by paranoia and melancholy. Stone writes, “when 
new roles break down and there is nothing with which to 
replace them, old roles, ghosts, come in to fill the vacuum”. 
The collectivity and the multiplicity that the Family Stone 
had embodied — radical democracy in vibrant action: a group 
made up of men and women, blacks and whites — gave way to 
a morose and dejected individualism. “The best pop music 
does not reflect events so much as it absorbs them”, Marcus 
wrote. “If the spirit of Sly’s early music combined the 
promises of Martin Luther King’s speeches and the fire of a 
big city riot, Riot represented the end of those events and the 
attempt to create a new music appropriate to the new 
realities.” 

These “new realities” would eventually become nothing 
less than capitalist realism itself. Capitalist realism — in 
which current social relations are reified to the point that any 
shift in them becomes unimaginable — could only be fully 
consolidated once the Promethean-psychedelic imaginary 
was all but entirely subdued. But this would take a while. The 
Seventies weren’t only about countercultural retreat and 
defeat. In When the Lights Went Out: Britain in the Seventies, 
Andy Beckett argues that a “liberal or left-wing melancholy 
about the Seventies has, in many ways, been the mirror image 
of the doomy right-wing view of the same period”. But, as 
Beckett argues, this “fails to acknowledge that for many 
politicised Britons, the decade was not the hangover after the 
Sixties; it was the point when the great Sixties party actually 
started”. The successful Miners’ Strike of 1972 saw an alliance 
between the striking miners and students that echoed similar 
convergences in Paris 1968, with the miners using the 


University of Essex’s Colchester campus as their East Anglian 
base. The Seventies also saw the growth in Britain of gay, 
anti-racist, feminist and Green movements. In many ways, it 
was it was the unprecedented success of the left and the 
counterculture in the 1970s that forced capital to respond 
with neoliberalism. This was initially played out in Chile, 
after Pinochet’s CIA-backed coup had violently overthrown 
Salvador Allende’s democratic socialist government, 
transforming the country — via a regime of repression and 
torture — into the first neoliberal laboratory. 

The Seventies that Andy Beckett celebrates in the British 
context found expression in the US in the disco genre. Disco 
was a music that grew out of the convergence of a number of 
subjugated groups. It was a music made by and for gays, black 
people and women, and — like most postwar popular music, it 
was overwhelmingly produced by the working class. Chic’s 
Nile Rodgers — surely the most important producer and sonic 
conceptualist of the late Seventies and early Eighties — had 
been a member of the Black Panthers as a teenager. Disco 
provided the template for the successive waves of dance 
music in the Eighties and Nineties, including house, techno, 
rave and garage. In her 1991 book Design After Dark, Cynthia 
Rose prophesied a “dancefloor revolution” that would 


come about through grass-roots changes — successive 
waves of guerrilla sounds, guerrilla design, guerrilla 
entertainments. The new design dynamic will be an 
impulse born out of celebration, rising out of leisure 
enacted as an event. And it will change young people’s 
perception about what entities like design and 


communication should do.’ 


Yet Rose understandably failed to anticipate the extent to 
which the new energies, infrastructures and forms of desire 
she identified would be appropriated by a neoliberal culture 
which would lay claim to freedom and pleasure, while 
associating the left with a grey puritan statism. Once again, 
the left missed an opportunity, failing to successfully align 
itself with the collective euphoria of dancefloor culture. Thus 
the “good times” on the dancefloor became fleeting escapes 
from a capitalism that was increasingly dominating all areas 
of life, culture and the psyche. 

This super-domination came out in the mordant yet 
playful “realism” of Gwen Guthrie’s 1986 R&B hit, “Ain’t 
Nothing Goin’ On But The Rent”, one of the first popular 
musical signs of the emergence of the new hardened subject 
that Silva analyses so well. At a time of rising unemployment, 
Guthrie sang, “You’ve got to have a j.o.b. if you want be with 
me/no romance without finance”. The subjectivity performed 
in Guthrie’s song is in many ways the female counterpart to 
the gangster rap persona that was emerging when the single 
was released. Both reject intimacy and tenderness. In 
gangster rap there is a hyberbolic performance of 
invulnerability — a performance that can only appear bitterly 
ironic, when we consider the fact that even some of the most 
wealthy and successful gangster rappers (such as Tupac 
Shakur and Biggie Smalls) would end up being shot dead. By 
contrast, and despite its surface bravado, “Ain’t Nothing Goin’ 
On But The Rent” is a song about the need for security — “fly 
girl like me/needs security” — in conditions of radical 


uncertainty. This wasn’t some celebration of Reaganomics. On 
the contrary, Guthrie’s song drew out the way in which 
Reaganomics was corroding the conditions for intimacy — a 
message that was much more emotionally charged and 
politically resonant than most of the protest songs of the 
time. Similarly, the formula “no romance without finance” 
need not only be construed as merely some reactionary 
concession to capitalist realism. Rather, it can be heard as a 
rejection of the ideological sentimentality that separates out 
social reproduction from paid work. Anticipating much of 
twenty-first-century popular music, “Ain’t Nothing Goin’ On 
But the Rent” is the sound of the loneliness that happens 
when consciousness is deflated, and the conditions for raising 
it are absent. But with the new movements that are rising in 
the US after Ferguson, with the movements in Europe that 
have produced Podemos and Syrisa, there is every reason to 
believe that those conditions are returning. It is beginning to 
look as if, instead of being the end of history, capitalist 
realism was a thirty-year hiatus. The processes that began in 
the Sixties can now be resumed. Consciousness is being raised 
again. 


PART FOUR 


FOR NOW, OUR 
DESIRE IS 
NAMELESS: 
POLITICAL 


WRITINGS 


don’t vote, don’t 


encourage them! 


There was a time when elections at least seemed to mean 
something. I still recall, viscerally, the hollow, bitter sense of 
total existential defeat the day after Foot’s tragically bound- 
for-disaster hard left succumbed to the storm troopers of SF 
Kapital under Thatcher, and I, only fifteen years old, 
contemplated “Five More Years” of Tory rule. I didn’t hear it 
at the time, but the song that always brings that feeling, that 
moment, is Mark Stewart’s “Liberty City”: “I'll give a wave to 
the management mercenaries... Don’t their clean clothes look 
so pretty/Try to awaken then from the comforts of slavery...” 
There are still those who would like to pretend that a Tory 
administration would be so much worse than New Labour, so 
that deigning to vote for anyone else would be an 
“indulgence”. Choosing “the least worst” is not making this 
particular choice, it is also choosing a system which forces 
you to accept the least worst as the best you can hope for. 
Naturally, the defenders of the dictatorship of the elite 
pretend — perhaps they even deceive themselves — that the 


particular slew of lies, compromise and smarm they are 
hawking is “only temporary”; that, at some unspecified time 
in the future, things will improve if only we support the 
“progressive” wing of the status quo. But Hobson’s choice is 
no choice, and the delusion of progressivism is not a 
psychological quirk, it is the structural delusion upon which 
liberal democracy is based. 

Johan Hari tries to make the case for reluctantly voting 
New Labour today, on the grounds that the Tories are the 
only realistic alternative and they are manifestly worse than 
New Labour. But just what is the threat that Howard’s Tories 
pose? Will they suspend habeas corpus? Can’t, Toneeeeee’s 
already done it. Will they shamelessly and shamefully play to 
the rightwing gallery on immigration? Well, yes, but that’s 
only what the Joker Hysterical Face is already doing. (It’s not 
the war that made me lose any vestigial sentimental 
attachment to New Labour, it was their disgusting and 
despicable pandering to the right on immigration.) 

Let’s dispense with this idea, once and for all, that New 
Labour has “improved” anything. New Labour is the worst of 
all worlds: Thatcherist managerialism without the 
Thatcherite attack on vested interests. In the pre-Thatcher 
1970s, it took six carworkers to do the job of one; in the post- 
Thatcher Noughties, it takes six consultants to do the job of 
none (since the mission statement wasn’t worth writing in 
the first place). Same decadence, different beneficiaries. New 
Labour and its supporters scoff at the Tories’ idea that you 
could cut £35 billion in public spending and yet improve 
public services. As someone who works in public services, it 
strikes me as eminently plausible (not that I believe that the 


Tories would do it, or do it right, if they came to power, 
naturally). Cutting back on red tape, bureaucrats, paperwork 
would have two immediately positive effects: it would get rid 
of the managers and administrators whose wages are a 
disproportionate drain on the budget, and it would improve 
the performance of those who actually do the jobs, simply by 
dint of the fact that they wouldn’t have to deal with nannying 
memos and those who send them all the time. 

Blair isn’t just contingently a liar, he is, like the new breed 
of career politician he heads, a professional liar. As a lawyer 
turned politician, it’s no surprise that Blair treats reality as a 
distraction from PR. He has been complicit in producing a 
situation in which there is no more at stake in parliamentary 
democracy than “beating the other side”, as in a “debate” at 
the Oxford Union. His  J-am-innately-good moral 
righteousness is as much a testament to his public school and 
Oxbridge education as anything else: you see, glinting in the 
eyes, the unwavering certainty of the truly imbecilic. Blair 
likes to see himself as a conviction politician, but apart from 
his imperialist intransigence (itself a symptom of his belief in 
his own innate superiority), what else IS he actually 
committed to? It’s telling that the only thing he was prepared 
to defy public opinion on was the war. 

Blair’s slogan “education, education, education” is the 
sickest joke of all (and not only because he has presided over 
the dumbest front bench in recorded history, another 
testament to the wonder of Oxbridge). Maybe he has 
‘pumped more money” into education, but that is useless if 
the extra funds are going on quangos, incompetent 
administrators and facile “initiatives” that were doomed to 


fail and pointless even if they succeeded. 

The “Third Way” “solution” to Further Education is a 
typical Blairite catastrophe. Colleges are now funded per 
student, with the result that students now treat themselves as 
“consumers” — i.e. the canny ones quickly realise that even 
the most abusive or violent behaviour is unlikely to result in 
their being removed from the college, since it means a 
significant cut in the college’s revenue. Students with 
behavioural problems shouldn’t simply be turned away, but 
neither can they be allowed to continue attending college as 
if nothing has happened. That is a dereliction of duty towards 
the student, and towards the other students, whose education 
and learning environment is damaged while such behaviour 
is left unchecked. But “Third Way” funding means that the 
only result will be institutional cynicism. Imposing “targets” 
and assigning funds on the basis of meeting them — what the 
economist calls “reform”, i.e. ideology dressed up as realism 
— will only ever lead to a situation in which bureaucrats and 
the bureaucratically-minded prosper. The way to improve 
education, and all other public services, is to accept the 
obvious truth (though such truth is contrary to ideology): 
most people working in these services are not, in fact, venal, 
are not motivated solely by what is in the interests of “them 
and their famileeee”. So it would be better to hand more 
control back over to them; by all means intervene if it is 
going wrong, but don’t assume that things work better if they 
are run by bureaucrats (the whole of reality is a counter- 
example to this ludicrous thesis). 

I admit that, emotionally and unthinkingly, I will find 
myself supporting the “left” parties when the results come in 


tomorrow night. Yes, I want to see Galloway give Oona King a 
kicking, yes I would love to see Letwin lose his seat. But only 
in exactly the same way that I want to see X contestant beat Y 
contestant in Big Brother; it really is only sentimentality to 
pretend that this spectacle has much consequence. This will 
always be the case in liberal democracy at the best of times, 
but especially so in a country which has an electoral system 
so fundamentally corrupt and unjust. Hari is right that, in the 
Eighties, 56% of the electorate voted for left parties, but 
because the vote was split between Labour and the Lib Dems, 
the Tories were allowed to maintain their reign of terror. But 
that is an argument for urgent reform of the electoral system, 
not for voting New Labour. 

As I.T. rightly argues, the “people died for the vote” line is 
utterly facile. Soldiers in the Wehrmacht died for the glories 
of the Fatherland — does that mean I should become a Nazi? 
Catholics burned for their belief in transubstantiation: should 
I then repent and go to Mass on Sunday? Plus, I think I’m on 
fairly safe ground, really, with the conjecture that no one, but 
no one, died for the opportunity to “choose” between Blair 
and Howard. 


october 6, 1979: 
capitalism and 


bipolar disorder 


Realism has nothing to do with the Real. On the contrary, the 
Real is what realism has continually to suppress. 

Capitalist realism, like socialist realism, is about “putting 
a human face” on and naturalising a set of political 
determinations. The komissars of Kapital like to pose as 
tough-minded pragmatists who tell unpalatable truths and 
who alone are capable of facing up to the harsh “realities” of 
the world. Yet Kapitalism — no less in its its soon-to-take over 
Chinese State version than in its soon-to-collapse American 
model — is based upon a slew of fantasies so credulous that 
they are almost charming. In a powerful piece in the 


Independent today,“ Johann Hari parallels the militant 
complacency of the current ruling elite with the thinking of 
previous highly developed social groups, such as the Incas 
and the Mayans, which had “committed ecocide”. “What were 


Easter Islanders saying as they cut down the last tree on their 
island?,” Hari quotes geographer Jared Diamond asking in his 
book Collapse: How Societies Choose to Fail or Survive. It is grim to 
reflect that the answers — “jobs not trees!” or “technology 
will solve our problems; never fear, we’ll find a substitute for 
wood” — are precisely the rationalisations that a thanatropic 
drive would produce in order to do its work. In the 
unconscious, Freud says, no one really believes they will die, 
and this is no doubt also true of civilisations, which despite 
the melancholy monuments testifying to the demise of Maya 
and Easter Island, are convinced that they are the exceptions, 
they are the one which cannot perish. 

It is easy to see what capitalist “realism” means when you 
consider Blair’s habitual response to appeals from the 
environmental lobby. Measures to rein in eco-catastrophe 
may well be desirable — even necessary — but they, Blair tells 
us with a heavy heart bursting his sleeve, are “politically 
impossible”. Here, then, is capitalist “realism”: the reduction 
to the realm of the “impossible” of any steps that will prevent 
the destitution of the human environment. For that is what 
“realism” amounts to: not a representation of the real, but a 
determination of what is politically possible. But what is 
politically possible is at odds with what is physically possible, 
so in a sense, it is the servomechanism-agents of Kapital, not 
their opponents, who “demand the impossible” now. Their 
fantasy of a sustainable Kapitalism carrying on, forever, 
without burning out the planet, is perfectly delirial. 

Another insight into capitalist realism was provided last 
week by Marxist economist Christian Marazzi (Scuola 
Universitaria Professionale della Svizzera Italiana, Lugano, 


Switzerland) whose lecture “Finance, Attention and Affect” at 
Goldsmiths was an interrogation of the meaning — and 


psychological, social and neuronic impact of — post-Fordism.° 
Christian dated the moment of the switch from Fordism to 
post-Fordism very precisely: 6 October 1979. It was on that 
date that the Federal Reserve increased interest rates by 
twenty points, preparing the way for the “supply-side 
economics” that would constitute the “economic reality” 
with which we are now so familiar. The rise in interest rates 
not only contained inflation, it made possible a new 
organisation of the means of production and distribution. The 
economy would no longer be organised by reference to 
production, but from the side of the point of sale. The 
“rigidity” of the Fordist production line gave way to a new 
“flexibility”, a word that will send chills of recognition down 
the spine of every worker today. This flexibility was defined 
by a deregulation of capital and labour, with the workforce 
being casualised (with an increasing number of workers 
employed on a temporary basis) and outsourced. 

The new conditions both required and emerged from an 
increased cybernetisation of the working environment. The 
Fordist factory was crudely divided into blue- and white- 
collar work, with the different types of labour physically 
delimited by the structure of the building itself. Labouring in 
noisy environments, watched over by managers and 
supervisors, workers had access to language only in their 
breaks, in the toilet, at the end of the working day, or when 
they were engaged in sabotage, because communication 
interrupted production. But in post-Fordism, when the 
assembly line becomes a “flux of information”, people work 


by communicating. As Wiener taught, communication and 
control entail one another. 

What Deleuze, after Burroughs and Foucault, called “the 
society of control” comes into its own in these conditions. 
Work and life become inseparable. As Christian observed, this 
is in part because labour is now to some degree linguistic, and 
it is impossible to leave language in the locker after work. 
Capital follows you when you dream. Time ceases to be linear, 
becomes chaotic, punctiform. As production and distribution 
are restructured, so are nervous systems. To function 
effectively as a component of “just in time production”, you 
must develop a capacity to respond to unforeseen events, you 
must learn to live in conditions of total instability, or 
“precarity”, as the ugly neologism has it. Periods of work 
alternate with periods of unemployment. Typically, you find 
yourself employed in a series of short-term jobs, unable to 
plan for the future. 

The horrors of these new working patterns are clear, but 
it is imperative that the left renounces one of its most 
dangerous addictions, its nostalgia for Fordism. As Christian 
pointed out, the disintegration of stable working patterns was 
in part driven by the desires of workers — it was they who, 
quite rightly, did not wish to work in the same factory for 
forty years. In many ways, the left has never recovered from 
being wrong-footed by  Kapital’s mobilisation and 
metabolisation of the desire for emancipation from the 
Fordist routine. Especially in the UK, the traditional 
representatives of the working class — union and labour 
leaders — found Fordism rather too congenial; its stability of 
antagonism gave them a guaranteed role. But this meant that 


it was easy for the advocates of post-Fordist Kapital to 
present themselves as the opponents of the status quo, 
bravely resisting an inertial organised labour “pointlessly” 
invested in fruitless ideological antagonism which served the 
ends of union leaders and politicians, but did little to advance 
the hopes of the class they purportedly represented. And so 
the stage was set for the neoliberal “end of history”, the 
“postideological” ideological justification for rampant supply- 
side economics. Antagonism is not now located externally, in 
the face-off between class blocs, but internally, in the 
psychology of the worker, who, qua worker, is interested in 
old-style class conflict, but, as someone with a pension fund, 
is also interested in maximising their investment. There is no 
longer an identifiable external enemy. The consequence is 
that, as Christian put it in a memorable image, post-Fordist 
workers, are like the Old Testament Jews after they left the 
“house of slavery”: liberated from a bondage to which they 
have no wish to return but also abandoned, stranded in the 
desert, confused about the way forward. 

The psychological conflict raging within individuals — 
they themselves are at war — cannot but have casualties. One 
hidden, or at least naturalised, consequence of the rise of 
post-Fordism is that the “invisible plague” of psychiatric 
disorders that has spread, silently and stealthily, since 
around 1750 (i.e. the very onset of industrial capitalism), has 
reached a new level of acuteness in the last two decades. This 
is one more dimension of the Real that capitalist realism is 
constitutively unable to process. 

It is typical of New Labour that it should have committed 
itself, so early in its third term, to removing people from 


incapacity benefit, as if most people claiming the benefit were 
malingerers. In contrast with this assumption, it doesn’t seem 
unreasonable to infer that most of the people claiming 
incapacity benefit — and there are well in excess of two 
million of them — are casualties of Kapital. A significant 
proportion of claimants, for instance, are people 
psychologically trashed as a consequence of the capitalist 
realist insistence that mining was no longer economically 
viable (though, even considered in brute economic terms, 
once you factor in the cost to taxpayers of such benefits, the 
arguments about “viability” seem rather less than 
convincing). Many have simply buckled under the terrifyingly 
unstable conditions of post-Fordism. 

The current ruling ontology rules out any possibility of a 
social causation of mental illness. The chemico-biologisation 
of mental illness is of course strictly commensurate with its 
de-politicisation. Considering mental illness as an individual 
chemico-biological problem has enormous benefits for 
capitalism: first, it reinforces capital’s drive towards 
atomistic individualisation (you are sick because of your 
brain chemistry), and second, it provides an enormously 
lucrative market in which multinational “pyscho-mafias” can 
peddle their dodgy drugs (we can cure you with our SSRIs). It 
goes without saying that all mental illnesses are 
neurologically instantiated, but this says nothing about their 
causation. If it is true, for instance, that depression is 
constituted by low serotonin levels, what still needs to be 
explained is why particular individuals have low levels of 
serotonin. 

The increase in bipolar disorder is a_ particularly 


significant development. In the discussion after Christian’s 
lecture, I asked him about the relationship between this form 
of mental illness and capitalism as a system. It is clear that 
capitalism, with its ceaseless boom and bust cycles, is itself, 
fundamentally and irreducibly, bipolar. Capitalism is 
characterised by a lurching between hyped-up mania (the 
irrational exuberance of “bubble thinking”) and depressive 
come-down. (The term “economic depression” is no 
accident). To a degree unprecedented in any other social 
system (and capitalism is very precisely NOT a social 
“structure” in the way that the despotic state or the primitive 
socius are), capitalism both feeds on and reproduces the 
moods of populations. Without delirium and confidence, 
capital could not function. As it happened, Christian 
confirmed that he had in fact been working with people who 
had been “psychologically smashed” by capitalism, many of 
whom, it turned out, had in fact developed bipolar disorder. It 
could hardly be denied that there is an isomorphic 
relationship between the social and individual disorders of 
capitalism. 

How could madness not result when we are invited to 
consider America’s consuming of $600 billion a year more 
than it produces “realistic”? (As opposed, so we are told, to 
Europe’s “unrealistic” social welfare programmes.) Make no 
mistake, the realists are insane, which more than ever reveals 
the force of the slogan, “the Real is the impossible, but the 
impossible which happens”. Ecological catastrophe and 
mental illness are present in capitalism’s wrap-around 
simulation as warps, unassimilable discontinuities, that 
which cannot be but which, nevertheless, cannot be 


extirpated. Perhaps these negative Reals — these dark 
shadows which allow us to see Kapital’s striplit mall of the 
mind for what it actually is — have their complement in a 
positive Real, an event completely inconceivable in the 
current situation, but which will break in and re-define 
everything. 


what if they had a 


protest and 


everyone came? 


What kind of protest is it that everyone agrees with? 
If you weren’t already suspicious of the dull unanamity 


that coalesced on Saturday [Live 8],” reflect on the fact that 
the Russian show only happened because Putin didn’t want to 
be the only G8 leader whose country did not have a Live 8 gig. 
That fact alone reveals that the relationship between the 
current ruling elite and their ostensible opponents in the 
entertainment biz goes far beyond complicity. 

Live 8 rests on two “libidinal fallacies”. 

The first is obvious: it ignores the systemic and abstract 
nature of the geopolitical situation. It really isn’t the case that 
“eight men in a room” can “change history” simply by an act 
of will. Beyond the sentimental bluster, everyone knows that, 
but Live 8 depends upon a fantasy that there are two types of 
subject who need to be enlightened: the Subject Who Does 


Not Know (and whose “awareness” is to be raised) and the 
Subject Who Knows But Who Doesn’t Care. But who are these 
people? Who, exactly, needs to be “made aware” of the fact 
that Africa is desperately poor? And does anyone, even those 
who buy into the cheap off-the-shelf caricature of Bush as a 
dumb chimp, really think that he, personally, deliberately 
chooses to inflict starvation on African children? More to the 
point, does anyone really think that, on the level of personal 
morality, Bush is any different from the billionaire pop stars 
so histrionically raising their fists against him and wagging 
their fingers at us? That is to say: if there is some sort of 
moral dividing line, would you really want to place Bush on 
one side and Elton John and $ Bill Gates on the other? 

It is not that Live 8 is a “degraded” form of protest. On the 
contrary, it is in Live 8 that the logic of the protest is revealed 
in its purest form. The protest impulse of the Sixties posited a 
Malevolent Father, the harbinger of a Reality Principle that 
(supposedly) cruelly and arbitrarily denies the “right” to total 
enjoyment. This Father has unlimited access to resources, but 
he selfishly — and senselessly — hoards them. Yet it is not 
capitalism but protest itself which depends upon this 
figuration of the Father. It goes without saying that the 
psychological origins of this imagery lie in the earliest phases 
of infancy. The hippies’ bucolic imagery and “dirty protest” — 
filth as a rejection of adult grooming — both originate in the 
“unlimited demands” of the infant. A consequence of the 
infant’s belief in the Father’s omnipotence is the conviction 
that all suffering could be eliminated if only the Father 
wished it. (In terms of Live 8: if only those 8 men yield to our 
demands, all poverty could be eliminated forever!) The 


demand for total enjoyment is actually pretty indiscriminate: 
the protest could just easily be against war (bummer maaaan) 
or against being charged for going into a festival (hey, 
breadheadzzzzzzz, don’t be heaveeeee...) 

Indidentally, one of the successes of the latest global elite 
— the Social Democrats — has been their avoidance of 
identification with the figure of the hoarding Father, even 
though the “reality” they impose on the young is substantially 
harsher than the “reality” they protested against in the 
Sixties. In this sense, Bush is a godsend for Blair, since Blair 
can pose as the “really realistic” representative of Social 
Democratic moderation “winning concessions” from the 
obscene excesses of Bush, the Junkyard King of Amerikapital’s 
hideous fusion of id and superego. (The reference to the 
Birthday Party is not idle here. Oddly, their Junkyard strikes 
me as an uncannily prescient psychoanalysis both of Bushite 
Amerika and the role that it plays in everyone else’s fantasies, 
“Big-Jesus-Oil-King down in Texas drives great holy tanks of 
Gold/screams from heaven’s Graveyard/ American heads will 
roll in Texas/roll like daddy’s meat...”) 

This brings us to the second fallacy. What is being 
disavowed in the abjection of evil and ignorance onto 
fantasmatic Others is our own complicity in planetary 
networks of oppression. What needs to be kept in mind is 
BOTH that capitalism is a hyper-abstract impersonal 
structure AND that it would be nothing without our co- 
operation. As I will never tire of insisting, the most Gothic 
description of capital is also the most literal. Capital is an 
abstract parasite, an insatiable vampire and zombie-maker; 
but the living flesh it converts into dead labour is ours, and 


the zombies it makes are us. Determinists of both a neoliberal 
and anti-humanist bent (believe it or not, it is not unheard of 
for such positions to coincide within the same person, 
proving that Marx wasn’t wrong about the essentially 
contradictory nature of capitalist ideology) merely echo 
teleo-Marxism at its most eschatological when they insist 
that what the meat (or human) components of the capital 
machine are of no consequence since the total triumph of 
capital is historically inevitable. 

The question of what capital wants from us requires 
answers at a number of levels: economic, psychonalytic, and 
perhaps most pressingly, theological. In any case, it is clear 
that, for the moment at least, capital cannot get along 
without us. It remains the case, however, that we can get 
along without it. The parasite needs its “mere conscious 
linkages”, but we do not need the parasite. In addition to 
anything else, to ignore the crucial functioning of the meat in 
the machine is poor cybernetics. The denial of human agency 
is an SF fantasy, albeit one that is everywhere realising itself. 

But to reclaim that agency means first of all accepting our 
insertion at the level of desire in the remorseless meat-grinder 
of capital. Capital is not something imposed upon us by Bush; 
it is we who are hooked on the “garbage in honey’s sack”, 
unable to kick the habit of returning to the Big Jesus 
Trashcan for another hit of feel-good junk. 

It also means raising the price — libidinal, personal, 
monetary — of agency. The repeated claim from onstage 
multi-millionaires that the audience were going to “change 
history” simply by turning up and tuning in cheapens agency 
in every sense. Participating in a narcissistic, self-righteous 


spectacle is not “doing something”. Tony Parsons, of all 
people, made the very good point in the Mirror today that the 
generation of the Thirties and Forties did not expect Crosby 
and Sinatra to change the world — but, as he says, many of 
them had either risked or given up their lives to change 
things. 

Withdrawal from the capital matrix entails an unplugging 
that will seem painful to nervous systems commensurated to 
the Reality-Pleasure Principle. Partly it means giving up the 
reassuring comforter of the Bad Father Figure and facing the 
fact that the G8 leaders are not capable of legislating away all 
planetary misery, but are “old men at the crossroads”, 
capital’s meat puppets not its masters. There is a sense in 
which it simply is the case that the political elite are our 
servants; the miserable service they provide from us is to 
launder our libidos, to obligingly re-present for us our 
disavowed desires as if they had nothing to do with us. If 
anyone is in charge in Kapital it is Oedipus Rex, i.e. us. (“I yam 
the King!” as Cave caterwauled on “Junkyard”. Yes: the junkie 
as monarch, that’s capitalist sovereignty.) The political 
“reality” that Bush and the others will no doubt blame their 
failure to act upon is not just an ideological smokescreen. It is 
the reality constituted by the desires of that selfsame Live 8 
crowd who, when push comes to shove, will not pay extra 
taxes, will not give up cheap flights or car use, will not make a 
stand against inequity and stupidity at work if it means 
compromising their interests and those of their famileeeee 
and yet who expect global crises to be magically solved by 
eight stooges in a room. 

The great benefit of Lacanianism is to reject both the 


party of the Infant (“you want new masters, and you shall 
have your wish” as Lacan told the student protestors of the 
Sixties) and the party of the Father (the empircomongers who 
try to sell the Symbolic as the only Real). There must indeed 
be a demand for the Impossible, but an Impossible which does 
not correspond with the definition provided by either party. 
It is not a question of total enjoyment, but of the not-all, a 
sober psychosis, lessness... 


defeating the 
hydra! 


In Marvel’s Nick Fury, Agent of S.H.LE.L.D. comics, the nefarious 
S.P.E.C.T.R.E.-like international crime and terror network was 
called H.Y.D.R.A. Its slogan was “cut off a limb and two more 
shall take its place”. In Saturday’s Times, Paul Wilkinson, 
Chairman of the Centre for the Study of Terrorism and 
Political Violence, described the “decentralised network” of 
al-Qaeda as a “true hydra”. But the lesson of the hydra myth 
— that to use force against certain types of enemy is not only 
ineffective, it is counter-productive — is one that the leaders 
of the War on Terror have yet to learn. 

It is the absurd War on Terror itself that has fed the al- 
Qaeda hydra and put British citizens on the frontline. The 
issue here is not simply a causal one — the War on Terror has 
made life unsafer in the West — but a conceptual one — the 
very notion of a War on Terror has meant that Western 
populations are reclassified as active combatants in a war not 
only to the death, but beyond death, an infinite, excitatory 
cycle of violence begetting violence. 


Despite what the increasingly hysterical Pro-Bombing 
“Left” (PBL) maintain, the causal argument is won. (A 
testament to this is the way in which the PBL refuse even to 
have the argument. As one, they have wagged their finger at 
anyone who has pointed out the obvious causal chain linking 
US and British foreign policy with Thursday’s events, tut- 
tutting about the unseemliness of “politicising” the atrocity 
“even before the bodies are buried”, as if contempt for neo- 
imperialist Shock and Awe somehow equated to lack of 
respect for the victims of the attacks in London, as if their 
own columns were disinterested and neutral, and as if solemn 
moralising rather than political analysis were what is called 
for.) The claim that the bombing of Iraq has been a recruiting 
sergeant for terrorism is uncontroversial. A Foreign Office 
and Home Office dossier cited in the Sunday Times today states 
what any intelligent observer already knows: 


It seems that a particularly strong cause of 
disillusionment among Muslims, including young 
Muslims, is a perceived “double standard” in the 
foreign policy of western governments, in particular 
Britain and the US. The perception is that passive 
“oppression”, as demonstrated in British foreign policy, 
e.g. non-action on Kashmir and Chechnya, has given 
way to “active oppression”. The war on terror, and in 
Iraq and Afghanistan, are all seen by a section of British 


Muslims as having been acts against Islam.” 


Even the Economist grants that some of al-Qaeda’s “large 
group of sympathisers” will have had “extra levels of 


motivation since the Iraq war”. (It adds: “George Bush has 
sometimes claimed that a silver lining to the cloud his forces 
are struggling through in Iraq is that at least the West’s 
enemies are being fought there rather than at home. The 
attacks in London are a reminder that that view is as wrong 
as it is glib.”) 

But the reclassification of the struggle with al-Qaeda as 
“war” is another factor that promotes, inspires and 
legitimates terrorism, a factor perhaps no less significant 
than the misadventures in Iraq and Afghanistan. For example: 
it used to be the case that the British government refused to 
accept that it was “at war” with the IRA; it was the IRA who 
made that claim. The unwillingness to concede that Britain 
was engaged in war partly had the effect of making it possible 
to claim both that the IRA were terrorists (i.e. BY DEFINITION 
not a group with whom one could be at war) and that any 
attack on the civilian population was an outrage visited on 
innocents. But if indeed we ARE at war (as the oxy/moronic 
War on Terror would have us believe), and if what “we” are 
fighting for is “our values”, and “simply getting on with our 
lives” is an expression of those “values” — as, since Thursday, 
we have endlessly been told it is — then it would follow that 
we are all indeed warriors co-opted into War on Terror. As 
Simon Jenkins put it (also in the Sunday Times), “it is Blair who 
gave terrorism the status of war. He can hardly complain 
when the enemy treats it as such”. 

Johann Hari observed — surely not approvingly? — that 
the bombings on Thursday were received in London almost as 
if they were a natural disaster. Much of the media here has 
insisted, rather, that the bombings be treated as a 


SUPERNATURAL disaster, the act of a transcendent Evil that 
cannot and furthermore must not be explained. Both Blair and 
Bush find it expedient and congenial to use a theological 
language to describe a threat that would be better considered 
in more worldly terms. That language is dangerous for two 
reasons: first, because it contributes to the sublimation of the 
al-Qaeda threat, transforming a diffuse network into a 
supernatural force, and second, because it renders all analysis 
of the threat al-Qaeda actually poses all the more difficult. 

According to an emerging orthodoxy in certain sections of 
the British media, just about any attempt to offer economic, 
political or sociological explanation for al-Qaeda’s emergence 
is tantamount to an expression of sympathy for its aims and 
methods. As Savonarola has pointed out, the PBL and other 
reactionaries attempted in the immediate aftermath of 
Thursday to make the very word “political” a slander as they 
desperately cast about trying to establish a period of non- 
reflection in which “politics” and thought could be suspended 
— a period, that is to say, in which their politics and their 
non-thinking could be imposed as the default response. 

The most facile and stupid example of this type of 
argument might have been Nick Cohen’s piece in the Observer 


today,’ rightly excoriated by Lenin? (I say “might” because 
the amount of shrill stupidity, sentimental nonsense and 
emotional pornography churned out by the hacks over the 
last few days has reached new levels of stupefaction, as the 
miserable reality of central London’s rapacious Hobbesian 
inferno, where folk will beat you to death rather than let you 
get into a Tube ten seconds before them, has been magically 
transformed by the bombs and media fairy dust into the very 


essence of an underdog England in which it is WWII forever: 
to the sound of choruses of “maybe it’s because I’m 
Londahner” ringing out from the ghosts of the music halls, 
journos have shamelessly done themselves up as pearly kings 
and queens, taking on the role of celebrants of a Fantasy 
London which is as convincing as Dick Van Dyke’s accent in 
Mary Poppins.) The “agalma”, the special treasure, of this 
London resides in the status of “heroic victim” that a disaster 
such as this re-confirms. A dangerous logic takes hold: we’re 
under attack, we must be Good. 

The supernaturalisation of al-Qaeda is crucial to this 
strategy. If we are the Good, it can only be the senselessly Evil, 
the irrationally jealous, who would want to attack us. (This 
mode of bewildered self-aggrandising is as crucial to a certain 
version of American identity as spam-eating-make-doand- 
mend-what you-complaining-about-that-severed-leg-for dour 
fortitude is crucial to Blitz Englishness.) Needless to say, the 
positing of an ethnic subject — We, the Good — whose innate 
virtue is reconfirmed by its being attacked is constitutive of 
both the al-Qaeda and the post-911 US mindset. A military 
asymmetry is doubled by a fantasmatic symmetry. Each is the 
other’s Satan. 

To talk of al-Qaeda in theological (rather than in political, 
social or economic) terms is to adopt their mode of discourse 
in an inverted form. It is to return to a pre-Feuerbachian, pre- 
sociological perspective in which all the lessons of the 
nineteenth- and twentieth-century studies of the social 
psychology of religion — undertaken by figures as diverse as 
Durkheim, Marx, Weber, Nietzsche and Freud — are 
forgotten. If a particular strain of religion is to be understood 


as, in Cohen’s words, “an autonomous psychopathic force” 
rather than as a social, economic and _ psychological 
phenonenon with complex causes, then all hope of reasoned 
analysis is a priori ruled out. Unreason is abjected onto the 
enemy (even as it is evinced in one’s own not even minimally 
coherent ravings), thus legitimating the idea that “the only 
option” is military force. 

The floating of the pseudo-concept of “Islamofascism” has 
been central here. There are any number of reasons to 
consider the idea that there is such a thing as Islamofascism a 
nonsense. Here are two. First of all, fascism has always been 
associated with nationalism, but, like global capital, Islamism 
has no respect for nationality; the first loyalty of the Islamist 
is to the global Umma. Secondly, fascism is about the State — 
Islamism has no model of the State, as could be seen in 
Afghanistan under the Taliban. 

The only sense one can make of “fascism” as used by the 
PBL is that it names anything that is really, really bad (that 
well-defined category) or it involves the curtailment of 
liberties. The brand of Islamism al-Qaeda favours would 
certainly curtail liberties, but not necessarily the same ones 
that fascism would curtail, or for the same reasons. 

Rather than engaging in nebulous negative sublimation — 
“Behold, Satan” — it would better behove the opponents of 
Islamist Terrorism to consider more carefully what is specific 
about it. As John Stevens noted over the weekend, the typical 
al-Qaeda terrorist is unlikely to have been parachuted in from 
an Afghan village. They are much more likely to have lived in 
the West, either as residents or as nationals. Their affiliation 
with al-Qaeda will, we can speculate, almost certainly serve 


the function of resolving a tension in themselves. Al-Qaeda 
recruit from schools and colleges because they are astute 
enough to recognise that male adolescence is a time of boiling 
confusion that craves easy certainties. It cannot be that 
difficult for a fervent Jihadi to convince impressionable 
young men adrift in the miserable haze of Babylonic 
capitalism that it is not al-Qaeda but their enemies who are 
really Evil. 

After all, it is not hard to construct a convincing story 
that the success of the West has been achieved at the expense 
of Muslims. The Sunday Times reports that in Britain “Muslims 
are three times more likely to be unemployed than the 
population as a whole; 52% of them are economically inactive 
(the highest of any faith group) and 16% have never worked 
or are long-term unemployed. This is blamed on a lack of 
education: 43% of Muslims have no qualifications.” But it is 
not just the poor themselves who flock to al-Qaeda; it is also 
those burning with a sense of injustice on behalf of the poor. 

In this context, it is worth remembering Giuliani’s jaw- 
dropping proclamation (to which Savonarola has been 
assiduous in drawing our attention): “People who live in 
freedom always prevail over people who live in oppression.” 
So speak the Masters, the Winners... Who speaks for the 
oppressed then? The rise of Islamism must be correlated with 
the demise of the left. If it has become the default repository 
for Muslim rage against injustice then that is partly due to 
the US, which, as is well-known, funded Islamist Jihadis in a 
bid to defeat Communism. Since only something like 
Communism could absorb and re-direct the energies that are 
fuelling alQaeda, I look forward to the day when the US will 


fund Islamic Communism, and the circle will be complete. 


the face of 
terrorism without a 


face! 


So Tony Blair is the leader who has brought suicide bombing 
to Britain. 

Any remaining doubt about the link between 7/7 and the 
Iraq bombing and occupation was dissipated today when a 
friend of one of the suspects, Mohammed Sadique Kahn, 
spoke to — of all things — the Evening Standard. “The friend 
[...] said Khan, Tanweer and Hussain grew up together and 
‘often talked about their anger at their Muslim brothers and 
sisters being unfairly treated in Iraq by the US.” 

No surprises there. And no surprises, at least not for k- 
punk readers, that the bombers were British. That, at least, 
somewhat undermined the racist agendas of European and US 
“Experts” who blamed the atrocity on Britain’s supposedly 
insufficiently authoritarian immigration and asylum policies, 
barely concealing their disgust at multi-ethnic 


“Londonistan”, a stance that echoes Mark Steyn’s 
Islamophobic revulsion at “Eurabia”. The BNP in Barking 
found that their predictable attempts to extract political 
capital from the bombings — a leaflet with a photograph of 
the trashed number 30 bus over a caption saying, “Maybe 
now it’s time to listen to the BNP” — also fell foul of the 
revelation that the bombers came from Leeds, not the Middle 
East. Naturally, that news brings with it the possibilities for 
other kinds of exploitation by racists. It is a grotesque 
understatement to say that the next few months will not be 
easy for Muslims in Britain. Emollient words about “true 
Islam” will be as ineffective as they are misleading. There is 
no true Islam. Islam, like all other religions, is a riot of 
contradictions, a tissue of interpretations. The words of the 
Prophet give as much comfort to zealots as to pacifists. 

David Davis said last week that modern terrorism is 
“terrorism without a face”. Suddenly, however, the terrorists 
have a face — even though it is not the one that many 
expected, or wanted. The photographs of the perpetrators 
and the photographs of the victims — who could tell them 
apart? There is no tell-tale “demonic stain” on the faces of 
the killers. They aren’t the austere, obsessive “foreigners” 
that the popular imagination had conjured. They wore 
trainers and tracksuits, they were religious, sure, but no one 
thought they were fanatics. They weren’t even socially 
dysfunctional geeks. By all accounts, they were popular, 
played cricket. Nor was there any obvious lack or deprivation 
in their lives. 

The obvious questions seem to be “how”, “why”? Yet the 
same questions do not seem the obvious ones to ask when we 


see photographs of similar young men who happen to be in in 
the US or British forces, men who have participated in the 
killing of very many more civilians. 

The Blairite objection to terrorism cannot be its means, 
since he, too, considers the killing of a certain number of 
civilians an acceptable sacrifice for the greater Good. (One of 
the problems this kind of utilitarian calculus has always faced 
is that there is no obvious point at which to stop counting the 
consequences. But, as we’ve already established, surely 
Thursday must count amongst the consequences of the Iraq 
misadventure.) It is the ends, then, in which the difference 
must reside, not the means. Blair is supernaturally confident 
that he is on the side of the angels, that he is pursuing the 
Good, whereas his enemies are Evil. The problem is that they 
think exactly the same way. 

He tells us that we are in a war. But to many Muslims — 
not “mad mullahs”, but, amongst others, young men from 
“ordinary” backgrounds — it is as obvious as it is to Blair 
what the right, the only side, to be on is. It is the side of the 
poor and the oppressed, not the side of the hyperprivileged 
and the massively well-armed. The rage, the righteous sense 
of injustice that led those four to give their lives and take the 
lives of others — and please, do not describe what they did as 
“cowardly”; “brutal” by all means, but not “cowardly”, and 
certainly nowhere near as cowardly as the Powell doctrine of 
bombing from a great height — that anger needs to be 
channeled by other forces, forces which don’t counter 
oppression with repression, which don’t transform rage into 
outrage. 


UPDATE: Breakfast TV, BBC1. A group of young Muslims from 
Leeds — not “fanatics” by any means — tell the reporter (who 
has to concede that they are articulate and measured) that 
Iraq is the major factor in switching young men onto 
extremism in Britain. They make it clear that they are 
appalled by the events of last Thursday, condemn them 
without reservation, but nevertheless are angered by the 
patent double standards of the British media. The fifty people 
who died last week — whose deaths they in no way trivialised 
— seem to count much more than the thousands who die in 
Iraq. (It makes me wonder what would happen if the media 
indulged in what Simon Jenkins called “grief pornography” 
for Iraqis: if there were back stories and photographs for all 
of them, would the public mood change?) In the studio, Irshad 
Manji, author of The Trouble with Islam Today, tries to demur, 
falling back on the standard line that 9/11 preceded Iraq. 
True enough, but there had never been suicide bombing in 
Britain until last week. Manji makes some good points: in a 
piece the other day (I think in the Standard?), she broke ranks 
with the sentimental consensus about “true Islam”, arguing 
that there needs to be an Islamic Reformation, with the 
acceptance within the religion that certain passages of the 
Koran can be wrong. But the call for Islamic auto-critique 
must go alongside a recognition that the “Crusader” policies 
of the US and the UK feed an aggrieved militancy that will 
make that kind of Reformation much less likely. 


conspicuous force 


and verminisation+ 


The paradoxical War on Terror is based on a kind of willed 
stupidity; the willed stupidity of wishful thinking. Only the 
logic of dreamwork can suture “War” with “Terror” in this 
way, since terrorists were, by classical definition, those 
without “legitimate authority” to wage war. However, it is 
horribly evident for some while that a new, frighteningly 
facile, definition of Terrorism has come into play. What 
makes Terrorists terrorists is not their supposed lack of 
legitimate authority but their Inherent Evil. We are ontologically 
Good; Good by our very nature, no matter what we do. We 
belong to an “alliance of moderation” against the Axis of Evil. 


> «¢ 


So when “we” “accidentally” level an apartment block full of 
children with our moderate bombs, we do not cease to be 
moderate. The difference between They, the Evil, and We, the 
Good is, of course, intent; the Terrorists deliberately target 
civilians. This is their only aim, because they are Evil. 
Although we kill vastly more civilians, we do not intend to it, 


sO we remain Good. 


For the libidinal roots of this wishful thinking, we have to 
look beyond the foibles of individuals to the political 
unconscious of the hyper-militarised state. It is geared to deal 
with threats if they come from other armed states, so it 
pretends — deceives itself, and then attempts to deceive us — 
that this is in accord with the actual geopolitical situation. 
Condi’s crocodile tears notwithstanding, the US, needless to 
say, is in no position to condemn Israel’s air strikes, since the 
Israeli bombings follow the War on Terror script to the letter. 
The conflict with Hezbollah turns into a destruction of 
Lebanese people and infrastructure, just as the struggle with 
al-Qaeda became a war on Afghanistan and Iraq. For the 
hyper-miltarised state, asymmetry can only be thought of as 
an advantage: we have more and better weaponry than them, 
therefore we must win. 

The stupidity here is evident, and multi-levelled. First of 
all, it involves a literal occlusion and suppression of 
intelligence. Terrorism is a problem to be met with brute 
force rather with intelligence. Successfully defeating 
Terrorist groups is a long-term business, dirty, but above all, 
stealthy, invisible. But the War on Terror is inherently and 
inescapably spectacular; it arises from the demands of the 
post 9/11 military-industrial-entertainment complex: it is not 
enough for the state to do something, it has to be seen doing 
something. The template here is Gulf War 1, which as both 
Baudrillard and Virilio knew, could not be understood outside 
logics of mediatisation. Gulf War 1 was conceived of a kind of 
re-shooting of Vietnam, with better technology, and on a 
videogame desert terrain in which carpet bombing would be 
industrially effective. This is the kind of asymmetry that the 


military-industrial-entertainment complex likes: no 
casualties (on our side). 

The bringing to bear of what, following Veblen, we might 
call conspicuous force presupposes a second stupidity: the 
verminisation of the enemy. Before Gulf War 1 had even 
happened, Virilo saw the logic of verminisation rehearsed in 
James Cameron’s Aliens, wherein the “machinic actors do 
battle in a Manichean combat in which the enemy is no 
longer an adversary, a fellow creature one must respect in 
spite of everything; rather, it is an unnameable being that it is 
more appropriate to exterminate than to examine or 
analyse.” In Aliens, Virilio ominously notes, attacks on the 
“family [form] the basis of [...] neocolonial intervention”. The 
teeming, Lovecraftian abominations which can breed much 
faster than we can are to be dealt with by machines whose 
“awesome appearance is part of [their] military 
effectiveness”. Shock and awe. 

Aliens was the moment in which a new mode of the 
military-industrialentertainment-complex became visible. 
Virilio argued that Aliens’ privileging of military hardware 
“could only lead in the end to the extinction of the talking 
film, its complete replacement by film trailers for hardened 
militarists”. In fact, the talking film has been replaced by the 
shoot-em-up videogame whose picnoleptic delirium is flat 
with the prosecution of the Sega-Sony-CNN war. “Realists” 
who attacked Baudrillard and Virilio for their insistence upon 
the fact that war is now constitutively mediatised missed the 
point that hyperrealisation is precisely what permits the 
production of very real deaths on a mass scale. 

Verminisation not only transforms the enemy into a 


subhuman swarm that cannot be reasoned with, only 
destroyed; it also makes “us” into victims of its repulsive, 
invasive agency. As Virilo perspicaciously observed, Aliens 
itself operated “a bit like a Terrorist attack. Women and 
children are slaughtered in order to create an irreversible 
situation, an irremediable hatred. The presence of the little 
victim has no theatrical value other than to dispose us to 
accept the madness of the massacres...” 

While “we” have “families” who are being senselessly 
killed, vermin have neither memory nor motive; they act 
unreflexively, autonomically. Their extermination is a 
practical problem; it is simply a matter of finding their nests 
and using the right kind of weapon. Applying this thinking to 
Hezbollah or any other group is appalling racism, naturally, 
but also astonishingly poor strategy, implying no 
understanding of Terrorism whatsoever. Destroy all the 
infrastructure, kill all the operatives: but you will have only 
created more images of atrocity; indestructible and infinitely 
replayable repositories of affect, which, by demanding 
response and producing (a usually entirely justified) 
recrimination, act as the best intensifiers and amplifiers of 
Terror. 


my card: my life: 
comments on the 


amex red campaign! 


The current American Express Red advertising campaign 
cries out for the kind of intricate semiotic dissection Roland 
Barthes pioneered in Mythologies. The ad — which shows 
happy, smiling supermodel Gisele embracing happy, smiling 
African Maasai warrior, Keseme — is a succinct emblem of the 
current ruling ideology. 

The image, with its evocation of ideas of culture and 
nature, consumerism and debt, independence and 
dependence — fairly drips with polysemic resonances. There 
is enough here to keep semiologists busy for years. 

But the central opposition — “My Card” versus “My Life” 
— says more than it intends. The First World is 
metonymically represented by a plastic card, and it is left to 
the Third World to symbolise all the “natural” vitality that 
unliving capital has eliminated from Western culture. The 


Western woman equals (artificial, cosmetic) culture; the 
African man equals living nature. Indeed, when we click on 
the “My Life” button we see the stereotypicallydescribed 
“proud and fiercely independent [...] Maasai tribes of East 
Kenya” suborned into the role of embodying “the dignity, 
courage and breathtaking beauty of Africa”, their culture 
quickly flattened back into nature. 

Slavoj Zizek has argued that what he calls “liberal 
communism” — as exemplified by the charitable gifts made 
by super-succesful capitalists such as Bill Gates and George 
Soros — is now the dominant form of capitalist ideology. 
“According to liberal communist ethics”, Zizek argues, 


the ruthless pursuit of profit is counteracted by charity: 
charity is part of the game, a humanitarian mask hiding 
the underlying economic exploitation. Developed 
countries are constantly “helping” undeveloped ones 
(with aid, credits, etc.), and so avoiding the key issue: 
their complicity in and responsibility for the miserable 


situation of the Third World.? 


This is the real meaning of the embrace between Giselle and 
Keseme — under global capitalism, the relationship between 
First and Third Worlds can never be a symmetrical synergy in 
which both partners win. It will always be a system of 
structural inequality in which one side is always destined to 
lose. 

But Product Red marks a move on from Zizek’s liberal 
communism. Liberal communism is really just old-style 
philanthropy, in which exploitation is atoned for by 


subsequent acts of charity. With Red, by contrast, the act of 


consumption is presented to us as already and immediately 


benevolent. At the Product Red launch in January, Bono,* 


Red’s most high-profile advocate, made a point of 
differentiating the new approach from philanthropy. 
“Philanthropy is like hippy music, holding hands”, Bono 
claimed. “Red is more like punk rock, hip-hop, this should 
feel like hard commerce.” (It is unclear what inspired Bono’s 
invocation of punk rock — perhaps he was thinking of The 
Great Rock ‘n’ Roll Swindle — but his reference to hip-hop might 
be the most savage indictment of the genre yet.) 

We confront here the curious mixture of brutal cynicism 
and dewy-eyed piety that is so characteristic of late-capitalist 
culture. The billboard version of the American Express ad 
tells us that “This card is designed to eliminate Aids in 
Africa”. Even when we dismiss this as obvious nonsense — the 
most credulous consumer cannot but be aware that the card 
was designed to increase the profits of American Express — 
the ideological blackmail still holds: how can anything which 
assists in the struggle against Aids in Africa possibly be 
wrong? 

We’ve already touched upon one reason: campaigns such 
as this occlude and mystify the systemic character of the 
relationship between Western capital and the Third World. 
The picturesque image of a “traditional” Maasai warrior 
beguiles us into forgetting the way in which Western 
institutions profit from Third World debt. It also photoshops 
out capital’s attempt, in ZiZek’s words, to “export the 
(necessary) dark side of production -— _ disciplined, 
hierarchical labour, ecological pollution — to ‘non-smart’ 


Third World locations”. 

Another, related, reason is that Product Red promises to 
eliminates politics as such. If the invisible hand of the credit 
card user can ameliorate the problem of Aids in Africa, there 
is no need for a political response at all — what John Hayes of 
American Express calls “conscientious commerce” will be 
sufficient. In this way, Product Red goes beyond using a 
Masaai tribesman to advertise American Express, and uses 
him to sell neoliberal ideology itself. 


the great bullingdon 


club swindle! 


We’re all in this together. 

Capitalist realism everywhere... On television yesterday 
morning, the relentless message coming from pundits and 
vox pops — even from most of those who reject the particular 
form that the cuts have taken — was that “something had to 
be done”. The Great Bullingdon Club Swindle is larceny and 
deception on such a grand scale that one almost has to 
admire its breathtaking audacity. The Bullingdon Club has 
pushed Doublethink to new limits with its mantric repetition 
of the ludicrous claim that it was New Labour policy, rather 
than the bank bailouts, that was responsible for the massive 
deficit. The strategy seems to be to employ the illocutionary 
power of repetition — if they keep saying it, then it will have 
been true. The Bullingdon boys are working a mass hypnosis 
trick, forcing through shock doctrine measures while the 
population are still in a kind of postcrash trance. But where, 
previously, neoliberals had used the crises in other political 
systems (state socialism, social democracy) as an opportunity 


to helicopter in their “reforms”, on this occasion they are 
using a crisis brought about by neoliberal policy itself to try to 
electro-shock the neoliberal programme back into life. I 
heard one buffoon on television saying that “we’ve been in 
denial for the last ten years”. If there’s denial, it’s happened 
in the last two years, and on the part of the neoliberals and 
their friends in the business elite, who — after demanding at 
gunpoint unprecedented sums of public money — are now 
brazenly continuing to peddle the story that they are the 
friend of the taxpayer and that it is welfare claimants, not 
them, who are the scroungers who have brought the country 
to the “brink of bankruptcy”. In what must surely be the most 
astonishing bait and switch in British parliamentary history, 
the victims of neoliberal policy — public services and the 
poor — are now being asked (or rather forced) to pay for the 
manifest and total failure of that policy. As John Gray argues 


in the LRB’, it’s no surprise that Orange Bookers like the 


“wolf-eyed replicant” Nick Clegg — as China Mieville? 
memorably described him — are happy to impose on the 
country the same neoliberal programme that they have 
imposed on their own party. Even so, has there even been a 
party that has so comprehensively and so quickly squandered 
the good will of those who voted for them as have the Lib 
Dems? Cuddly Vince Cable’s grinning excuse for the 
backtracking on student fees was a masterclass in capitalist 
realism, as he practically said, “Well, that’s what happens 
when you get into power — you give up your principles.” 
(Cable is increasingly looking like a villain from a John 
Grisham flick, the avuncular eminence grize whose charm 
lures you into the firm, before being revealed to be a sinister 


embezzling fraudster.) 

For months now, we’ve been sold the story that public 
services are “bloated”. There’s no doubt that New Labour 
mismanaged public services and wasted money — on 
managers, on market Stalinist control procedures imported 
in from business, and on GPs’ ludicrously overinflated 
salaries. But the narrative of an overfunded public sector 
produces cognitive dissonance for those of us who have 
actually been delivering frontline public services in the last 
ten years, where we’ve been expected to do more work for 
less money and with fewer resources. If those were the good 
times, you can only feel a shudder of dread anticipating what 
it will be like when things are bad. Incidentally, if you’ve 
wondered why there have been so few posts here in the last 
month or so, it’s because I’ve been trying to piece together a 
living as a visiting (ie. casualised) lecturer, working in 
institutions that are strained to breaking point by neoliberal 
“reforms”. Cuts will mean more casualisation, in those 
institutions that will be able to survive at all. 

But the most breathtaking aspect of the Bullingdon 
swindle is the “we’re all in this together” slogan, rightly 


described by Seumas Milne* as “preposterous”. What we’re 
seeing now is the Terminator of Capital with its neoliberal- 
managerialist mask wrecked, and the Big Society (Victoriana 
2.0) ruse not convincing anyone. The doughy, fat-of-the-land 
face of privilege now shows itself openly, exuding the 
emollient manner of noblesse oblige, but without any sense of 
obligation. What survives is pure ideological reflex, the 
decorticated Terminator blindly blasting at its usual targets: 
public services, welfare, the arts. It’s folk economic faux- 


wisdom (“if a household overspends, we know that we have to 
give up things we’d rather keep”) that is providing the 
smokescreen for this ideological assault. Myths and 
deliberately cultivated misapprehensions abound: judging 
from all the rhetoric, you’d think that education and the arts 
were drains on the economy, rather than the highly 
successful “businesses” that they in fact function as. 
Nevertheless, it’s crucial that we recognise that this is a 


time of opportunity for the left. Laurie Penny? is right that 
the Labour Party does not have the answers at the moment. 
Yet the Labour Party’s current lack of an agenda can be seen 
as a good thing, for two reasons. Firstly, at least this means 
that Labour has lost the managerialist neoliberal agenda that 
defined it for the last fifteen years. The de-New Labourisation 
process will take a while, but it will be expedited much 
quicker with Ed Miliband as leader than it ever would have 
been with David at the helm. (Notice how David — whom the 
media were presenting as a great lost leader, a kind of world- 
historic statesman, on the grounds, presumably, that Hilary 
Clinton took a fancy to him — is already a forgotten man. In 
the media’s soap narrative, David’s leaving frontbench 
politics was an open wound which the Labour Party would 
take years to recover — that doesn’t quite seem to be the 
case.) Secondly, the fact that the post-Blair and Brown Labour 
Party is now a cored-out shell means that it is a space, which 
it is at least plausible that could be filled by new ideas and 
strategies. For the first time in fifteen years, the future of the 
Labour Party is not fixed. It’s worth remembering at this 
point that the failures of the Labour Party, its succumbing to 
capitalist realism, is not just the consequences of the internal 


logic of the party. It was extra-Parliamentary forces that gave 
rise to the Labour Party in the first place; it was the defeat of 
those forces that drove the Labour Party into its craven 
placating of business in the New Labour era. If Labour is to be 
anything more than a zombie party once again, it will be new 
forms of extra-parliamentary organisation that revivify it. 

For that reason, this is definitely not the time to recline 
into the leftist version of capitalist realism, the defeatist 
counterpart to the Bullingdon club’s bullishness. Now is the 
time to organise and agitate. The cuts can provide a 
galvanising focus for an anti-capitalist campaign that can 
succeed. Protests in these conditions won’t have the hubristic 
impotence of anticapitalist “feelgood feelbad” carnivals and 
kettles. This is shaping up to be a bitter struggle, but there 
are specific, determinate and winnable goals that can be 
achieved here: it isn’t a question of taking a peashooter to the 
juggernaut of capital. 

The UK, the first capitalist country, is the world capital of 
apathy, diffidence and reflexive impotence. But it is also a 
country that periodically explodes into rage. Beneath todays’s 
ideological trance, beneath the capitalist realist hopelessness, 
an anger simmers here that it is our task to focus and 
coordinate. Public displays of rage can play an enormously 
significant role in shifting the symbolic terrain that is 
currently governed by capitalist realism. I know there are 
some who see parallels between now and the initial phases of 
the first Thatcher government. But Thatcher had a number of 
factors on her side which the Bullingdon boys don’t. 

Firstly, Thatcherism was part of a _ wider global 
restructuring of capitalism — the objective tide of history was 


on its side. But global capital has not yet found a solution to 
the problems that led to the banking crisis. 

Secondly, this shift from Fordism to post-Fordism allowed 
Thatcher to offer inducements that can’t be repeated: cheap 
shares from formerly nationalised companies, the sales of 
council houses. The nationalised companies have long since 
been sold off, and their private counterparts have in most 
cases failed to deliver the promised increases in consumer 
satisfaction — although they have certainly delivered massive 
profits to those who do hold shares in them. Now all we can 
look forward to are spiralling energy bills and higher train 
fares. There are no council houses to sell — indeed, the 
coalition is planning to effectively end what is left of social 
housing in this country for good, by forcing up council 
tenants’ rates, and limiting tenancies to five years. 

Thirdly, there was of course the Falklands — but, since the 
forces are already stretched threadbare, where are the 
resources for such a neocolonialist intervention now, and 
would jingoism function in the same way in 2010 that it did in 
1982? 

Fourthly, there was Thatcher herself — a divisive but 
charismatic politician, who could plausibly present herself as 
struggling against vested interests, not only on the left, but 
also in the British establishment. The current Tory 
government has none of these advantages, and the neoliberal 
right in general has lost control of the future, much as it 
refuses to acknowledge this. In the Standard, Anne McElvoy 
recently described Ed Miliband as “an unreconstructed social 
democrat”. From what position does McElvoy think she is 
speaking here? Like much of the mainstream media, which is 


contriving to carry on as if 2008 didn’t happen, McElvoy is 
desperately clinging to the myth of a political “centre 
ground” that no longer has any legitimacy. After the bank 
bailouts, the neoliberal settlement is just as dead as social 
democracy. 

The “we’re all in this together” slogan may turn out to be 
a phrase that comes to haunt the Tories in the way that 
“Labour isn’t working” dogged Labour for a generation. 
Classlessness might have seemed plausible for a moment 
when fronted by John Major, who didn’t go to university, or 
by Tony Blair, the poster boy for (leftist) post-political 
administration. But that moment has long passed, and cuts of 
this kind being forced through by a cabinet of aristocrats and 
millionaires make brutally apparent a class antagonism that 
the New Labour government obfuscated. Whenever the ruling 
class tells us that “we’re all on the same side”, it is a sure sign 
that we can hurt them. Similarly, the current media phobia 
about unions is an indication of the power that they have at 
this time. History is starting again, which means that nothing 
is fixed and there are no guarantees. Right-wing victory is 
only inevitable if we think that it is. 


the privatisation of 


stress! 


Ivor Southwood tells the story of how, at a time when he was 
living in a condition of underemployment — relying on short- 
term contracts given to him at the last minute by 
employment agencies — he one morning made the mistake of 


going to the supermarket.” When he returned home he found 
that an agency had left him a message offering him work for 
the day. But when he called the agency he was told that the 
vacancy was already filled — and upbraided for his slackness. 
As he comments, “ten minutes is a luxury the day-labourer 
cannot afford”. Such labourers are expected to be waiting 
outside the metaphorical factory gates with their boots on, 
every morning without fail. In such conditions 


daily life becomes precarious. Planning ahead becomes 
difficult, routines are impossible to establish. Work, of 
whatever sort, might begin or end anywhere at a 
moment’s notice, and the burden is always on the 
worker to create the next opportunity and to surf 


between roles. The individual must exist in a state of 
constant readiness. Predictable income, savings, the 
fixed category of “occupation”: all belong to another 


historical world.? 


It is hardly surprising that people who live in such 
conditions — where their hours and pay can always be 
increased or decreased, and their terms of employment are 
extremely tenuous — should experience anxiety, depression 
and hopelessness. And it may at first seem remarkable that so 
many workers have been persuaded to accept such 
deteriorating conditions as “natural”, and to look inward — 
into their brain chemistry or into their personal history — for 
the sources of any stress they may be feeling. But in the 
ideological field that Southwood describes from the inside, 
this privatisation of stress has become just one more taken- 
for-granted dimension of a seemingly depoliticised world. 
“Capitalist realism” is the term I have used to describe this 
ideological field; and the privatisation of stress has played a 
crucial role in its emergence. 

Capitalist realism refers to the widespread belief that 
there is no alternative to capitalism — though “belief” is 
perhaps a misleading term, given that its logic is externalised 
in the institutional practices of workplaces and the media, as 
well as residing in the heads of individuals. In his discussions 
of ideology, Althusser cites Pascal’s doctrine: “Kneel down, 
move your lips in prayer, and you will believe”: psychological 
beliefs follow from “going through the motions” of complying 
with official languages and behaviours. This means that, 
however much individuals or groups may have disdained or 


ironised the language of competition, entrepreneurialism and 
consumerism that has been installed in UK institutions since 
the 1980s, our widespread ritualistic compliance with this 
terminology has served to naturalise the dominance of capital 
and help to neutralise any opposition to it. 

We can quickly grasp the form that capitalist realism now 
takes by reflecting on the shift in the meaning of the famous 
Thatcher doctrine that “there is no alternative”. When 
Thatcher initially made this notorious claim, the emphasis 
was on preference: neoliberal capitalism was the best possible 
system; the alternatives were undesirable. Now, the claim 
carries an ontological weight — capitalism is not just the best 
possible system, it is the only possible system; alternatives are 
hazy, spectral, barely conceivable. Since 1989, capitalism’s 
success in routing its opponents has led to it coming close to 
achieving the ultimate goal of ideology — invisibility. In the 
global North at least, capitalism proposes itself as the only 
possible reality, and therefore it seldom “appears” as such at 
all. Atilio Boron argues that capitalism has been shifted to a 
“discreet position behind the political scene, rendered 
invisible as the structural foundation of contemporary 
society”, and cites Bertolt Brecht’s observation that 


“capitalism is a gentleman who doesn’t like to be called by his 


name’? 


The Depressing Realism of New Labour 


We would expect the Thatcherite (and post-Thatcherite) right 
to propagate the idea that there is no alternative to the 
neoliberal programme. But the victory of capitalist realism 


was only secured in the UK when the Labour Party 
capitulated to this view, and accepted, as the price of power, 
that “business interests, narrowly conceived, would be 
henceforth be allowed to organise the shape and direction of 


the entire culture”.? But perhaps it would be more accurate 
to record that, rather than simply capitulating to Thatcherite 
capitalist realism, it was the Labour Party itself that first 
introduced capitalist realism to the UK political mainstream, 
when James Callaghan gave his notorious 1976 speech to the 
Labour conference in Blackpool: 


For too long, perhaps ever since the war, we [have] 
postponed facing up to fundamental choices and 
fundamental changes in our economy [...] We’ve been 
living on borrowed time [...] The cosy world we were 
told would go on forever, where full employment could 
be guaranteed by a stroke of the chancellor’s pen — 
that cosy world is gone... 


However it is unlikely that Callaghan foresaw the extent to 
which the Labour Party would come to engage in the politics 
of “corporate appeasement”, or the extent to which the cosy 
world for which he was performing the last rites would be 
replaced by the generalised insecurity described by Ivor 
Southwood. 

The Labour Party’s acquiescence in capitalist realism 
cannot of course be construed as a simple error: it was a 
consequence of the disintegration of the left’s old power base 
in the face of the post-Fordist restructuring of capitalism. The 
features of this — globalisation; the displacement of 


manufacturing by computerisation; the casualisation of 
labour; the intensification of consumer culture — are now so 
familiar that they, too, have receded into a takenfor-granted 
background. This is what constitutes the background for the 
ostensibly post-political and uncontestable “reality” that 
capitalist realism relies upon. The warnings made by Stuart 
Hall and the others writing in Marxism Today at the end of the 
1980s turned out to be absolutely correct: the left would face 
obsolescence if it remained complacently attached to the 
assumptions of the disappearing Fordist world and failed to 


hegemonise the new world of post-Fordism.® But the New 
Labour project, far from being an attempt to achieve this new 
hegemony, was based precisely on _ conceding the 
impossibility of a leftist hegemonisation of post-Fordism: all 
that could be hoped for was a mitigated version of the 
neoliberal settlement. 

In Italy, autonomists such as Berardi and Negri also 
recognised the need to face up to the destruction of the world 
within which the left had been formed, and to adapt to the 
conditions of post-Fordism, though in rather a different 
manner. Writing in the 1980s, in a series of letters that were 
recently published in English, Negri characterises the painful 
transition from revolutionary hopes to defeat by a 
triumphalist neoliberalism: 


We have to live and suffer the defeat of truth, of our 
truth. We have to destroy its representation, its 
continuity, its memory. All subterfuges for avoiding the 
recognition that reality has changed, and with it truth, 
have to be rejected. The very blood in our veins had 


been replaced.’ 


We are currently living with the effects of the left’s failure 
to rise to the challenge that Negri identified. And it doesn’t 
seem a stretch to conjecture that many elements of the left 
have succumbed to a collective form of clinical depression, 
with symptoms of withdrawal, impaired motivation and the 
inability to act. 

One difference between sadness and depression is that, 
while sadness apprehends itself as a contingent and 
temporary state of affairs, depression presents itself as 
necessary and interminable: the glacial surfaces of the 
depressive’s world extend to every conceivable horizon. In 
the depths of the condition, the depressive does not 
experience his or her melancholia as pathological or indeed 
abnormal: the conviction of depression that agency is useless, 
that beneath the appearance of virtue lies only venality, 
strikes sufferers as a truth which they have reached but 
others are too deluded to grasp. There is clearly a 
relationship between the seeming “realism” of the 
depressive, with its radically lowered expectations, and 
capitalist realism. 

This depression was not experienced collectively: on the 
contrary, it precisely took the form of the decomposition of 
collectivity in new modes of atomisation. Denied the stable 
forms of employment that they had been trained to expect, 
deprived of the solidarity formerly provided by trade unions, 
workers found themselves forced into competition with one 
another on an ideological terrain in which such competition 
was naturalised. Some workers never recovered from the 


traumatic shock of seeing the Fordistsocial-democratic world 
suddenly removed: a fact it’s worth remembering at a time 
when the _ Conservative-Liberal Democrat coalition 
government is hounding claimants off incapacity benefit. 
Such a move is the culmination of the process of privatising 
stress that began in the UK in the 1980s. 


The Stresses of Post-Fordism 


If the shift from Fordism to post-Fordism had its psychic 
casualties, then post-Fordism has innovated whole new 
modes of stress. Instead of the elimination of bureaucratic 
red tape promised by neoliberal ideologues, the combination 
of new technology and managerialism has massively 
increased the administrative stress placed on workers, who 
are now required to be their own auditors (which by no 
means frees them of the attentions of external auditors of 
many kinds). Work, no matter how casual, now routinely 
entails the performance of meta-work: the completion of log 
books, the detailing of aims and objectives, the engagement 
in so-called “continuing professional development”. Writing 
of academic labour, the blogger Savonarola describes how 
systems of permanent and ubiquitous measurement engender 
a constant state of anxiety: 


One of the more pervasive phenomena in the current 
cod-neoliberal academic dispensation is CV inflation: as 
available jobs dwindle down to Kafkian levels of 
postponement and implausibility, the miserable Trager 
of academic capital are obliged not just to overfulfil the 
plan, but to record [...] every single one of their 


productive acts. The only sins are sins of omission [...] 
In this sense, the passage from [...] periodic and 
measured measurement [...| to permanent and 
ubiquitous measurement cannot but result in a kind of 
Stakhanovism of immaterial labour, which like its 
Stalinist forebear exceeds all rationales of 
instrumentality, and cannot but generate a permanent 
undercurrent of debilitating anxiety (since there is no 


standard, no amount of work will ever make you safe).® 


It would be naive to imagine that this “permanent 
undercurrent of debilitating anxiety” is an accidental side- 
effect of the imposition of these  self-surveillance 
mechanisms, which manifestly fail to achieve their official 
objectives. None other than Philip Blond has argued that “the 
market solution generates a huge and costly bureaucracy of 
accountants, examiners, inspectors, assessors and auditors, 


all concerned with assuring quality and asserting control that 


hinder innovation and experiment and lock in high cost”.? 


This acknowledgement is welcome, but it is important to 
reject the idea that the apparent “failures” of managerialism 
are “honest mistakes” of a system which sincerely aims for 
greater efficiency. Managerialist initiatives served very well 
their real if covert aims, which were to further weaken the 
power of labour and undermine worker autonomy as part of a 
project to restore wealth and power to the hyper-privileged. 
Relentless monitoring is closely linked to precarity. And, 
as Tobias van Veen argues, precarious work places “an ironic 
yet devastating” demand on the labourer. On the one hand, 
work never ends: the worker is always expected to be 


available, with no claims to a private life. On the other hand, 
the precariat are completely expendable, even when they 


have sacrificed all autonomy to keep their jobs.1° The 
tendency today is for practically all forms of work to become 
precarious. As Franco Berardi puts it, “Capital no longer 
recruits people, but buys packets of time, separated from 


their interchangeable and occasional bearers”.44 Such 
“packets of time” are not conceived of as having a connection 
to a person with rights or demands: they are simply either 
available or unavailable. 

Berardi also notes the’ effects of digital 
telecommunications; these produce what he characterises as 
a diffuse sense of panic, as individuals are subjected to an 
unmanageable data-blitz: 


The acceleration of information exchange [...] is 
producing an effect of a pathological type on the 
individual human mind and even more on the collective 
mind. Individuals are not in a position to consciously 
process the immense and always growing mass of 
information that enters their computers, their cell 
phones, their television screens, their electronic diaries 
and their heads. However, it seems indispensable to 


follow, recognise, evaluate, process all this information 
12 


if you want to be efficient, competitive, victorious. 
One of the effects of modern communications technology is 
that there is no outside where one can _ recuperate. 
Cyberspace makes the concept of a “workplace” archaic. Now 
that one can be expected to respond to an email at practically 


any time of the day, work cannot be confined to a particular 
place, or to delimited hours. There’s no escape — and not only 
because work expands without limits. Such processes have 
also hacked into libido, so that the “tethering” imposed by 
digital telecommunications is by no means _ always 
experienced as something that is_ straightforwardly 
unpleasant. As Sherry Turkle argues, for example, though 
many parents are increasingly stressed as they try to keep up 
with email and messages while continuing to give their 
children the attention they need, they are also magnetically 
attracted to their communications technology: 


They cannot take a vacation without bringing the office 
with them; their office is on their cellphone. They 
complain that their employers rely on them to be 
continually online but then admit that their devotion to 


their communications devices exceeds all professional 
3 


expectations.! 

Practices ostensibly undertaken for work, even if they are 
performed on holiday or late at night, are not experienced 
simply as unreasonable demands. From a psychoanalytic 
point of view, it is easy to see why such demands — demands 
that cannot possibly be met — can be libidinised, since this 
kind of demand is precisely the form that the psychoanalytic 
drive assumes. Jodi Dean has convincingly argued that digital 
communicative compulsion constitutes a capturing by 
(Freudian/Lacanian) drive: individuals are locked into 


repeating loops, aware that their activity is pointless, but 


t.14 


nevertheless unable to desis The ceaseless circulation of 


digital communication lies beyond the pleasure principle: the 
insatiable urge to check messages, email or Facebook is a 
compulsion, akin to scratching an itch which gets worse the 
more one scratches. Like all compulsions, this behaviour 
feeds on dissatisfaction. If there are no messages, you feel 
disappointed and check again very quickly. But if there are 
messages you also feel disappointed: no amount of messages 
is ever enough. Sherry Turkle has talked to people who are 
unable to resist the urge to send and receive texts on their 
mobile telephone, even when they are driving a car. At the 
risk of a laboured pun, this is a perfect example of the death 
drive, which is defined not by the desire to die, but by being 
in the grip of a compulsion so powerful that it makes one 
indifferent to death. What’s remarkable here is the banal 
content of the drive. This isn’t the tragedy of something like 
The Red Shoes, in which the ballerina is killed by the sublime 
rapture of dance: these are people who are prepared to risk 
death so that they can open a 140 character message which 
they know perfectly well is likely to be inane. 


Public Renewal or Private Cure? 


The privatisation of stress is a perfect capture system, elegant 
in its brutal efficiency. Capital makes the worker ill, and then 
multinational pharmaceutical companies sell them drugs to 
make them better. The social and political causation of 
distress is neatly sidestepped at the same time as discontent 
is individualised and interiorised. Dan Hind has argued that 
the focus on serotonin deficiency as a supposed “cause” of 
depression obfuscates some of the social roots of 


unhappiness, such as competitive individualism and income 
inequality. Though there is a large body of work that shows 
the links between individual happiness and_ political 
participation and extensive social ties (as well as broadly 
equal incomes), a public response to private distress is rarely 


considered as a first option.’ It is clearly easier to prescribe a 
drug than a wholesale change in the way society is organised. 
Meanwhile, as Hind argues, “there is a multitude of 
entrepreneurs offering happiness now, in just a few simple 
steps”. These are marketed by people “who are comfortable 
operating within the culture’s account of what it is to be 
happy and fulfilled”, and who both corroborate and are 
corroborated by “the vast ingenuity of commercial 
persuasion”. 

Psychiatry’s pharmacological regime has been central to 
the privatisation of stress, but it is important that we don’t 
overlook the perhaps even more insidious role that the 
ostensibly more holistic practices of psychotherapy have also 
played in depoliticising distress. The radical therapist David 
Smail argues that Margaret Thatcher’s view that there’s no 
such thing as society, only individuals and their families, 
finds “an unacknowledged echo in almost all approaches to 


therapy”.!° Therapies such as Cognitive Behavioural Therapy 
combine a focus on early life (a kind of psychoanalysis-lite) 
with the self-help doctrine that individuals can become 
masters of their own destiny. Smail gives the immensely 
suggestive name magical voluntarism to the view that “with 
the expert help of your therapist or counsellor, you can 
change the world you are in the last analysis responsible for, 


so that it no longer cause you distress”.!” 


The propagation of magical voluntarism has been crucial 
to the success of neoliberalism; we might go so far as to say as 
it constitutes something like the spontaneous ideology of our 
times. Thus, for example, ideas from self-help therapy have 


become very influential in popular television shows.'® The 
Oprah Winfrey Show is probably the best-known example, but 
in the UK programmes such as Mary, Queen of Shops and The 
Fairy Jobmother explicitly promote magical voluntarism’s 
psychic entrepreneurialism: these programmes assure us that 
the fetters on our productive potentials lie within us. If we 
don’t succeed, it is simply because we have not put the work 
in to reconstruct ourselves. 

The privatisation of stress has been part of a project that 
has aimed at an almost total destruction of the concept of the 
public — the very thing upon which psychic well-being 
fundamentally depends. What we urgently need is a new 
politics of mental health organised around the problem of 
public space. In its break from the old Stalinist left, the 
various new lefts wanted a debureaucratised public space and 
worker autonomy: what they got was managerialism and 
shopping. The current political situation in the UK — with 
business and its allies gearing up for a destruction of the 
relics of social democracy — constitutes a kind of infernal 
inversion of the autonomist dream of workers liberated from 
the state, bosses and bureaucracy. In a staggeringly perverse 
twist, workers find themselves working harder, in 
deteriorating conditions and for what is in effect worse pay, 
in order to fund a state bailout of the business elite, while the 
agents of that elite plot the further destruction of the public 


services on which workers depend. 

At the same time as a discredited neoliberalism plots this 
intensification of its project, a kind of right-wing autonomism 
has emerged in Phillip Blond’s Red Toryism and Maurice 
Glasman’s Blue Labourism. Here the critique of social- 
democratic and neoliberal bureaucracy goes alongside the 
call for a restitution of tradition. Neoliberalism’s success 
depended on its capturing of the desires of workers who 
wanted to escape the strictures of Fordism (though the 
miserable individualist consumerism in which we are all now 
immersed is not the alternative they sought). Blond’s 
laughable “Big Society” and Glasman’s disturbingly insular 
“white working-class” “communities” do not represent 
persuasive or credible responses to this problem. Capital has 
annihilated the traditions that Blond and Glasman hanker 
after, and there is no bringing them back. 

But this should not be a cause for lament; far from it. 
What we need to revive is not social formations that failed 
(and failed for reasons that progressives should be pleased 
about), but a political project that never really happened: the 
achievement of a democratic public sphere. Even in Blond’s 
work, the lineaments of a hegemonic shift can be discerned — 
in his startling repudiation of the core concepts of 
neoliberalism and his attack on managerialism; and in the 
concession that, contra Thatcher, it turns out that there is 
such a thing as society after all. Such moves give some 
indication of the extent to which — after the bank bailouts — 
neoliberalism has radically lost credibility. 

The recent upsurge in militancy in the UK, particularly 
amongst the young, suggests that the privatisation of stress is 


breaking down: in place of a medicated individual depression, 
we are now Seeing explosions of public anger. Here, and in 
the largely untapped but massively widespread discontent 
with the managerialist regulation of work, lie some of the 
materials out of which a new leftist modernism can be built. 
Only this leftist modernism is capable of constructing a public 
sphere which can cure the numerous pathologies with which 
communicative capitalism afflicts us. 


kettle logic! 


No left turn into Parliamentary Square, flashed a sign as we 
marched through Whitehall last Wednesday. But all the other 
signs are suggesting quite the opposite: there’s a tentative but 
very definite shift to the left in the mainstream, nowhere 


better exemplified than by NUS President Aaron Porter’s* 
admission that he had been “spineless” in failing to support 
student militancy. This leftward lean by the NUS — which has 
long been a bastion of capitalist realist moderation — is a 
significant symptomatic moment. See also Polly Toynbee’s 
slight shift away from centrist condescension, as evidenced in 


the difference in tone and stance between these two recent 


pieces.° 


Lenin* and IT have written reports on the kettle, so I 
won’t detain you for long by repeating what you’ve already 
heard. Suffice it to note that the mood walking down 
Whitehall from Trafalgar Square in the Winter sun was 
almost jubilant: far from the negative solidarity you might 
have expected, cabbies and bus drivers honked their horns or 
waved in support of the young protesters. Even after the 
kettle was imposed, the mood remained remarkably good 


humoured in the main. You already know about the thin 
pretext for the kettle, the suspiciously abandoned police van, 
which was only attacked once the kettle was already in place. 
As others have observed, there can be no doubt that the real 
purpose of the kettle is to punish people for protesting, and 
to deter them from doing so in the future. Lenin is quite 
right: it’s imperative that this doesn’t happen — the ruling 
class are counting on the street militancy fizzling out as 
suddenly as it flared up. We have an opportunity here, not 
only to bring down the government — which is eminently 
achievable (keep reminding yourself: this government is very 
weak indeed), but of winning a decisive hegemonic struggle 
whose effects can last for years. The analogy that keeps 
suggesting itself to me is 1978 — but it is the coalition, not the 
left, which is in the position of the Callaghan government. 
This is an administration at the end of something, not the 
beginning, bereft of ideas and energy, crossing its fingers and 
hoping that, by some miracle, the old world can be brought 
back to life before anyone has really noticed that it has 
collapsed. 

At the moment, so many mainstream commentators and 
politicians resemble nothing so much as the denizens of the 
post-apocalyptic world of Richard Lester’s The Bed Sitting 
Room: tragicomically persisting with the same customs and 
habits as if the catastrophe hasn’t happened. Until the 
weekend, Aaron Porter was walking the ideological junkyard, 
apparently under the delusion that a career as a New Labour 
politician was still on the cards. But his change of position 
suggests that even opportunists have seen which way the 
wind is blowing. It looks as if the situation might be starting 


to dawn on Clegg, who increasingly has the cheated and 
desperate look of a man who has sold his soul to the devil at 
the very moment the devil went out of business. 

Victory will require a range of strategies, and new kinds 
of intervention are being improvised all the time — see for 


instance the University For Strategic Optimism.” Victory will 
also require others to follow where the students have led — if 
public service workers join the militancy, then we can look 
forward to a Winter of Discontent every bit as bitter as the 
one in 1978. 

In addition to the physical kettling of the protests, we’re 
also seeing a media strategy of containment. Hold your nose 


and take a look at Jan Moir® if you want to see a prize 
example of this kettle logic. The preferred strategy of the old 
guard seems to be one of phobic panic disguised as insouciant 
disdain: witness the way Moir shuttles between sexist and 
ageist belittling (“St Trinian’s Riots”, “fem-factions”, “boys 
and girls”, “throwing tantrums”) and moral horror (the 
deploring of “violence and damage”). The protest, in other 
words, was both a trivial jape and breach of civil order so 
serious that it merited “detain|ing] thousands of the students 
for hours in a ‘kettling’ movement”. I wonder, incidentally, 
how long the “civic-minded” Moir and her fellow Mail journos 
would “fight the urge” to “trash cop cars” if they were 
kettled; I fancy their patience would break long before that of 
the protesters did. (Imagine the mood hacks would be in after 
eight hours without alcohol.) Then of course we get the 
wheeling out of the capitalist realist canards... “the cold 
reality of the economic times. There is no money left to fund 
further education for all. Which in any case is an 


extraordinary privilege, not a right.” 
In reply to which I can do no better than quote Digital 
Ben’s excellent post: 


The economic argument (and the alibi given by the 
Liberal Democrats to explain their about-face on the 
fees issue) is that we, as a nation, don’t have the money 
for things anymore. We certainly can’t afford to pay 
tuition fees, and give grants rather than loans. We 
managed both of those things for several decades up to 
1997, without the economy collapsing around our ears 
and people pushing wheelbarrows of money through 
the streets and/or queueing for bread and salt, but 


never mind.’ 


Moir demands, with a perfectly straight face, that 
students “ask themselves why they should expect hard- 
pressed taxpayers to fork out for their further education, 
when a great number of those taxpayers are less well off than 
the students’ own families.” Let’s leave aside the little matter 
of the fact that this didn’t seem to trouble Moir and her 
fellow right-wingers when they were receiving free higher 
education; let’s also leave aside the fact that the current 
government is full of millionaires who received the same 
“privilege”. How, you have to wonder, can Moir expect that 
those same “hard-pressed taxpayers” take cuts in order to 
fund the bankers, who are more well off than almost 
everyone else? 

Digital Ben also makes a crucial point about the way that 
the current capitalist realist discourse depends upon a 


ridiculously outdated figuration of The Student: 


There’s still a dimwitted lack of understanding of the 
nature of these actions — too many television and 
newspaper reporters seem to be operating under the 
assumption that those of the protesters who are 
currently students are only attempting to get their own 
fees waived. A moment’s consideration would of course 
reveal that these people will all be working and paying 
back their loans by the time the Browne proposals are 
in full effect. The inability to comprehend the idea that 
people can have motivations other than self-interest 
reveals far more about the Burleyesque sections of the 
media than it does about the marchers. The archetype 
of the spoiled, selfish student living it up on taxpayer 
money, never particularly fair, is now positively 
antiquated. Viz — often a reliable social barometer — 
dropped its “Student Grant” character years ago, but 
it’s being dug up and spat back at us in 2010. Desperate 
stuff. To dismiss the students (as every organ in the 
land seemed to do) as wanting “something for nothing” 
or “everything handed to them on a plate” is to 
completely, wilfully misunderstand the situation. The 
immediate demand of the protesters was for a proposed 
fee increase to be scrapped. In other words, for the 
maintenance of a situation in which students work jobs 
in term-time, live in cheaply built (but tastefully 
coloured!) PFI rabbit hutches, study hard, and three 
years later, accept a debt measured in the tens of 
thousands that will hang over them for most of their 


adult lives. Compassion for these students might be 
dulled by the thought that they will eventually be 
earning high salaries — the risible Gove defended the 
Browne Report with the uncannily bad argument — 
“why should a postman subsidise someone who will go on to 
become a millionaire?” — but in times like these, how 
many students (even those in vocational subjects) do we 
really believe will be prospering after they graduate? It 
should be obvious that what these students want is 
something for something — the prospect of some kind of 
reward for all of the hard work and financial risk 


they’ve undertaken.® 


IT has also pointed out the way in which the stereotype of 
the lazy student is completely out of touch with the reality of 
so much student experience today. No doubt the students in 
Moir’s and Toynbee’s families — who, I think we can assume, 
will be at elite institutions — have an experience of university 
life which differs little from that which Moir and Toynbee 
enjoyed. (“Rich parents for all”, as one of the more acerbic 
placards had it last week.) But many students now routinely 
have to work long hours during term-time, meaning that they 
barely have the energy to read anything. By comparison with 
former generations, these students are paying more for a 
worse quality educational experience, not to mention the fact 
that their degrees will in many cases fail to yield them any 
significant long-term financial advantage. I take Alex 
Callinicos’ point about the dangers of “generational” politics, 
but there is surely an unavoidable generational dimension to 
the current situation. Witness Paxman’s patronising 


treatment of young protesters on Newsnight last week. 
Transformed from attack dog rentasneer into the kindly, 
avuncular advocate of capitalist realism, Paxman “explained” 
to the teenagers that, yes, it’s unfair that he received an 
education completely gratis and that they will have to pay 
thirty grand, but sadly, that’s just how things are — there’s no 
money left. Generational affiliation here is a matter of political 
decision. I effectively belong to Paxman’s generation in that I 
too received higher education completely free of charge. But 
the issue in question is whether one finds it conscionable to 
stand by while the young are systematically denuded of the 
“privileges” that we took for granted. It’s true that higher 
education has been massively expanded over the past thirty 
years, but that isn’t the fault of the young. They are the 
victims of an illthought and poorly planned out experiment 
in the expansion of the sector which successive governments 
have pursued on the grounds that the UK would need more 
graduates in order to be internationally “competitive”. It’s 
not even as if the young have the alternatives to higher 
education that once existed. So here they are: the 
ConDemned, and it’s down to us whether we stand with them 
or watch them get further sold out and abandoned. 

Then there’s the attempt to rubbish the motivation of the 
protesters: they were just along for a “laff”, Pied-Piper lured 
along by our old friends, a hard core of anarchists. Even if we 
were to accept this, Moir and Gove need to explain why it is 
that these “anarchists” — who, presumably, didn’t start 
scheming only a few weeks ago — have suddenly been able to 
motivate the young so effectively. Despite the best efforts of 
the media and the politicians to maintain business as usual, 


something has changed. But this change is precarious. We 
have to do everything we can to keep it going — supporting 
protests and occupations wherever we can, introducing and 
exacerbating antagonisms in the workplace, thinking and 
discussing new strategies, continuing to build a “new 
politics” that has nothing to do with the dead neoliberal 
consensus that the coalition is seeking to resuscitate. 


winter of discontent 
2.0: notes ona 


month of militancy! 


9.45pm. Day X, 24 November. I’m at Charing Cross, grabbing 
my first food of the day. Actually, it’s not particularly 
abnormal for me to be eating for the first time this late in the 
evening; but usually it’s because of overwork, not a 
consequence of my being “contained” by the police for eight 
hours. Two protestors arrive, coming down from the day’s 
anger, frustration and exhilaration. I catch their eye and one 
of them asks me if I will be joining them next week. I say, yes, 
tell them that I’ve been kettled in Whitehall, only just got out. 
They say they were kettled twice. One of them has a V for 
Vendetta mask pulled up off his face. The police held him for a 
while but had to release him because of lack of evidence. 
(Later, one of my students at UEL will tell me a similar story 
— arrested by the cops on the grounds that he was wearing a 
red tracksuit top, the same as someone who supposedly set 


fire to a litter bin, held for a while, his clothes and mobile 
phone seized, bailed until April — obviously one of many 
intimidation tactics the police were trying on that day.) They 
show no surprise, no_ self-pity or hyperbolic  self- 
dramatisation, just a resolute sense of what needs to be done, 
and a delight in doing it. I enjoyed it, looking forward to next 
week... 

I ask one of them what he does. He says his friend is 
already going to college; he will be going next year. But it’s not 
just about that... It wasn’t just about him; it wasn’t just about 
tuition fees, or EMA... 

It’s not just about that... We are no longer that post-ideological 
generation 

Contrast [this] with some of the responses from the 
“liberal” commentariat — those who belong the real “post- 
ideological generation”, if ever there was one. For Deborah 
Orr, it’s business as usual. Resistance to capitalist realism 
remains futile: 


It is sometimes suggested that there is little protest 
against the cuts, except from students and 
schoolchildren, because adults are too craven and 
apathetic to stand up and be counted. The truth is that 
they are too wise to waste their energy on something so 
silly. Protesting against the cuts is like protesting 


against water’s stubborn habit of flowing downwards.” 


Compare also with David Aaronvitch on Newsnight: the 
avuncular grey vampire body posture, that performance of 
simultaneous weariness and infinite ease in the world, the 


jaded fatalism passed off as mature wisdom. Yes, of course, I 
would have gone on the marches when I was a student, but of 
course I know better now... It’s little different to an argument 
made by Richard Littlejohn: the protestors will be the next 
generation of politicians... As if that’s what they want, as if, 
even if that ended up being true, it would diminish what’s 
happening now... 

3.15pm. 1 December. In one of the dream-like transitions 
that are becoming increasingly common in the new 
atmosphere, I am sitting in the UEL occupation, when in 
walks Richard Seymour to give a talk on the recent history of 
the Tory party. The students at UEL have been holding Room 
101 for a week, since Day X2. Things have changed rapidly in 
the space of those seven days; they are changing all the time. 
There are now banners draped all over the central concourse 
of UEL’s Ballardian Docklands campus. Elsewhere, 
occupations are sprouting everywhere, like unexpected 
wildflowers. 

The only thing I can compare the current situation with is 
emerging from a state of deep depression. There’s the rush 
that you get simply from not being depressed anymore — the 
occasional lurching anxieties, a sense of how precarious it all 
seems (don’t drag me back into nothing) — and yet not only is it 
maintaining itself, it’s proliferating, intensifying, feeding on 
itself — it’s impossible, but it’s happening — the reality 
programme resetting itself — David Cameron’s response is 
both patronising and misjudged. The students should 
understand what they are protesting against before they protest. 
Yet it’s clearly Cameron who doesn’t have a handle on the 
current situation (who does?). As Richard argued in his talk at 


the UEL occupation, these flabby toffs don’t have the 
experience, the strategic intelligence or the ideological 
consistency to win a bitter fight. Cameron was a Tory leader 
constructed in, and geared up for, the pre-2008 “consensus of 
indifference” (Baudrillard) — he didn’t expect a struggle, 
certainly not with those who intend to win. What Cameron 
doesn’t grasp, doesn’t want to grasp, is the way that the fees 
are only the immediate cause of the new militancy. What has 
been provoked is a generalised discontent with nothing less 
than capitalist realism itself. 

5.30pm, 2 December. Neoliberalism isn’t working. I’ve 
been stuck on Dartford station for ninety minutes. No trains 
moving in either direction. No one knows where the trains 
are, or if they will be able to travel any further even if they 
arrive. One train tried to head further south, but it only got a 
hundred yards out of the station before having to stop. 
Official communication is minimal, but only has the status of 
rumour any way. The railway workers, bereft of reliable 
information, tell you one thing, then find it immediately 
contradicted by developments. Are the buses running? Who 
can Say...? 

I strike up conversation with someone who happens to be 
heading to my destination. The usual complaints and 
bemusement. Why does everything in the UK have to be so 
crappy? He’s a casual worker, worried that his Christmas will 
be ruined if this weather keeps up. If he doesn’t go to work, 
he doesn’t get paid, and he already had to have a week off for 
flu. 

Frail hopes of a train receding, we consider options — 
we're less than ten miles from where we want to be, but we 


could end up having to stay in a hotel. Then he gets a phone 
call; a friend will pick him up, and he can give me a lift. As we 
stand shivering and drinking coffee from the station cafe bar, 
the news comes over the radio. Russia to get the 2018 World 
Cup. It feels as if the Winter is closing in around. 

Cameron. Neoliberalism isn’t working. No joy for Cameron 
and the other members of the ruling class Holy Trinity — the 
Prince and David Beckham, the poster boy for New Labour- 
era celebrity soccer. The grimly smirking Putin arrives last 
minute to claim the prize. All the boom gloss is falling away, 
and England feels shoddier and shabbier than it ever did in 
the Seventies. 

Saturday, 4 December. I’m following the news of the UK 
Uncut protests on Twitter. In the cold of the kettle on Day X1, 
it occurred to me that the best place to be kettle would be ina 
shopping mall, where the containment tactics would 
massively inconvenience capital. But the movement is well 
ahead of me... Flash mobs invade a number of Topshop stores 
across the country. IT is right about the crucial significance of 
this kind of intervention, which “indicates, among other 
things, an absolute fatigue with the corporate face of city 
centres”. And also a fatigue with the mandarin-celebrity 
status of figures like Green. Discontent with celebrity-wealth 
culture has long been like an indelible shadow that no 
amount of digital manipulation could quite eradicate, but, 
until recently, the persistent sense that something is missing 
amidst all this conspicuous consumption and _ listless 
hedonism has had no outlet or agent. 

Day X3, 9 December. There’s long been a discrepancy 
between culture and the post-crash situation. It’s now evident 


that the New Fifties are over — the scenery still survives, but 


you can push your fingers through it. Paul Mason? talks of a 
“dubstep rebellion”, and, although it would be churlish to 
complain about Mason’s report, given that he was one of the 
very few mainstream media commentators to properly 
engage with the movement. Dan Hancox is surely right: it 
wasn’t dubstep that was being played last Thursday but “R&B, 


bashment, road rap, american hip-hop and — albeit only once 


or twice — grime”.* What’s striking here is the lack of any 


political content, or even — “Pow” excepted — much anger in 
the music that was played. What we can hear exemplified, in 
fact, is the disengagement from politics that Jeremy Gilbert 
has persuasively argued was typical of the Nineties hardcore 
continuum: 


given the social and political radicalism characterising 
most of their immediate antecedents (acid house, with 
its origins in the black gay clubs of Chicago; hip-hop, 
only recently having left its “golden age” of political 
consciousness; reggae, with its history of anti- 
capitalism and anti-racism), as well as the traditional 
radicalism of their core constituency — the multiracial 
poor of urban London — the music scenes of the 
“nuum” were notable for their detachment from any 
kind of politics, their embrace of competitive 
entrepreneurial values, and their defence of masculinist 
and heterosexist norms which other dance cultures 
were busily and visibly deconstructing at just that 


moment.° 


What we’ve grown accustomed to is a split between leftist 
political commitments and the most vibrant, experimental 
dance musics. No doubt this is an aspect of capitalist realism, 
and it’s no accident that I referred to Simon’s 1996 piece on 


hardstep® in Capitalist Realism. In fact, it might well have been 
the case that the central concept of the book was triggered by 
Simon’s commentary on “keeping it real” there: 


In hip-hop, “real” has two meanings. First, it means 
authentic, uncompromised music that refuses to sell 
out to the music industry and soften its message for 
crossover. “Real” also signifies that the music reflects a 
“reality” constituted by late capitalist economic 
instability, institutionalised racism, and increased 
surveillance and harassment of youth by the police. 
“Real” means the death of the social: it means 
corporations who respond to increased profits not by 
raising pay or improving benefits but by what the 
Americans call downsising (the layingoff the permanent 
workforce in order to create a floating employment 
pool of part-time and freelance workers without 
benefits or job security). 


“Real” is a neo-Medieval scenario; you could 
compare downsising to enclosure, where the 
aristocracy threw the peasants off the land and reduced 
them to a vagabond underclass. Like gangsta rap, Jungle 
reflects a Medieval paranoiascape of robber barons, 
pirate corporations, conspiracies and covert operations. 
Hence the popularity as a source of samples and song 
titles of martial arts films and gangsta movies like The 


Godfather, Reservoir Dogs, Goodfellas, Pulp Fiction, whose 
universe revolves around concepts of righteous 
violence and blood-honour that predate the liberal, 
social-democratic era. [...] 


The pervasive sense of slipping into a new Dark Age, 
of an insidious breakdown of the social contract, 
generates anxieties that are repressed but resurface in 
unlikely ways and places. Resistance doesn’t necessarily 
take the “logical” form of collective activism (unions, 
left-wing politics); it can be so distorted and 
imaginatively impoverished by the conditions of 
capitalism itself, that it express itself as, say, the proto- 
fascist, anti-corporate nostalgia of America’s right-wing 
militias, or as a sort of hyper-individualistic 
survivalism. 


In hip-hop and, increasingly, Jungle, the response is 
a “realism” that accepts a socially-constructed reality 
as natural. To “get real” is to confront a state-of-nature 
where dog eats dog, where you’re either a winner or a 
loser, and where most will be losers. There’s a cold rage 
seething in Jungle, but it’s expressed within the terms 
of an anti-capitalist yet nonsocialist politics, and 
expressed defensively: as a determination that the 


underground will not be co-opted by the mainstream.’ 


At Day X1 I heard the predictable “Killing in the Name” 
and the even more predictable “Sound of the Police”, 
alongside the Beatles, Madness, and — depressingly — the 
Libertines — and, most jarringly, “Another Brick In The Wall” 
(hearing “we don’t need no education” as we shuffled out of the 


kettle made for a suitably incongruous experience). 

But a video that Jeremy shot on Thursday suggests a 
possible convergence between post-nuum musics and politics. 
It is my belief that the UK music culture of the next decade 
will emerge from the stew of sound and affect in the kettles 
these past few weeks. Paul Mason dismissed the idea that the 
demo was exclusively populated by “Lacan-reading hipsters 
from Spitalfields’ — but of course (we) Lacan-reading 
hipsters were also there, alongside the “bainlieue-style youth 
from Croydon, Peckam, the council estates of Islington”. In 
other words, this brought together working-class culture and 
bohemia in something like the same way that art schools — so 
crucial to UK pop-art culture since the Fifties — used to. But 
— with very good reasons from its own point of view — 
neoliberal policy has been hostile to this 
proletarianbohemian cultural circuit. While Further 
Education and the new universities have precisely tried to 
make theory such as Lacan available to the working class — 
while also trying to engage with everything vibrant coming 
out of working-class culture — the policy has been to re- 
cement rigid class and cultural distinctions: philosophy for 
the bourgeoisie; “vocational” courses for the masses. 

Siobhan captures very well the frustrations we 
encountered on Day X3. Trying to be part of a crowd without 
being kettled proves all but impossible. The cops’ ontology of 
the crowd is at least interesting: to enter the crowd is to be 
responsible for anything that any member of the crowd does. 
You wouldn’t have been hurt if you weren't there. (One is struck 
by the way that this is the complete opposite of the 
“corporate irresponsibility” that applies to the cops 


themselves.) Dominic notes the “underlying identification of 
disorder with uncleanliness, an identification which is 
transferred onto the disorderly themselves, supports the 
cop’s self-image as a preserver of public moral health, 
keeping the clean and decent citizen separate from the filthy 


and abject underside of society.”® It’s Foucault 101: 


The plague is met by order; its function is to sort out 
every possible confusion: that of the disease, which is 
transmitted when bodies are mixed together; that of 
the evil, which is increased when fear and death 
overcome prohibitions. It lays down for each individual 
his place, his body, his disease and his death, his well- 
being, by means of an omnipresent and omniscient 
power that subdivides itself in a regular, uninterrupted 
way even to the ultimate determination of the 
individual, of what characterises him, of what belongs 
to him, of what happens to him. Against the plague, 
which is a mixture, discipline brings into play its power, 
which is one of analysis. A whole literary fiction of the 
festival grew up around the plague: suspended laws, 
lifted prohibitions, the frenzy of passing time, bodies 
mingling together without respect, individuals 
unmasked, abandoning their statutory identity and the 
figure under which they had been recognised, allowing 
a quite different truth to appear. But there was also a 
political dream of the plague, which was exactly its 
reverse: not the collective festival, “but strict divisions; 
not laws transgressed, but the penetration of regulation 
into even the smallest details of everyday life through 


the mediation of the complete hierarchy that assured 
the capillary functioning of power; not masks that were 
put on and taken off, but the assignment to each 
individual of his “true” name, his “true” place, his 
“true” body, his “true” disease. The plague as a form, at 
once real and imaginary, of disorder had as its medical 
and political correlative discipline. Behind the 
disciplinary mechanisms can be read the haunting 
memory of “contagions”, of the plague, of rebellions, 
crimes, vagabondage, desertions, people who appear 


and disappear, live and die in disorder.’ 


I was at Hillsborough, and I’ve seen what can happen 
when the police treat people as an undifferentiated mass, too 
subhuman to be disciplined. At these protests, the police have 
been the agents of negative solidarity: Why should we pay for 
those students? It’s bad for all of us, why can’t they accept it like the 
rest of us do? By now, it’s clear how prophetic Alex’s post on 
“post-Fordist plasticity and negative solidarity” has become, 
since the movement — the alternative to negative solidarity 
— has assumed exactly the (plastic) form that Alex called for: 


Unpicking negative solidarity, which is clearly an 
internalisation of the conditions of flexibility and 
atomised “homo economicus” individualism necessary 
for the embedding of Neoliberal post-Fordism, requires 
the constructing of a new form of solidarity, a form of 
solidarity adequately configured to effectively oppose 
the chief machines of Neoliberal praxis: finance. This 
new form of solidarity must be capable of fluidity and 


rapid response, able to exploit weaknesses within 
systems and structures opportunistically and with a 
global purview, one which crucially can mirror the 
rapidity and fluidity of international finance. This is 
solidarity as plasticity, rather than the static brick-like 
form of Fordist labour solidarity, capable of flowing and 
shifting, yes, but also of fixing into position and 
assuming a hardened form where necessary. This form 
of solidarity must be inclusive of the new protest and 
occupation movements which have emerged in recent 
years, which although they have been largely 
ineffectual to date, have certainly led to new and 
interesting configurations of interest groups. What has 
been lacking however are the necessary cybernetic 
coordination systems to effectively enable these 
disparate and fragmentary groups to achieve the status 
of a counter-hegemonic power, a “class” power in the 
broadest sense of the term, one which is capable of 
counter-balancing effectively the rapacious if 
discredited centres of neoliberalism. Indeed it is this 
which must be formulated as the political conclusion of 
theories of post-Fordisation, rather than any kind of 
fantastical and strictly imaginary political subject such 
as the multitude. Only when there is an effective 
counterbalancing power can new theoretical socio- 
economic post-capitalist forms be properly 


disseminated, and successfully gain purchase.° 


Post-Fordist plasticity is also in play in the other major 
political story of the day (Mail headline on Thursday: Now It’s 


Cyber War): Assange and WikiLeaks. Now is not the time to go 
into this in any depth, but surely what we can see here — and 
something which those who say that the leaks only tell us 
what we already know have not grasped — is a new level of 
symbolic crisis. The authoritarian big Other has always relied 
upon maintaining a clear difference between off-the-record 
utterances and official proclamations, but it is precisely this 
distinction which WikiLeaks (and its successors) threaten to 
abolish. 

On the train home, I read Clegg denouncing “student 
dreamers” on the front page of the Standard. “I would feel 
ashamed if I didn’t deal with the way that the world is, not 
simply dream of the way the world I would like it to be”: 
capitalist realism in a nutshell. (An unfortunate echo of 
Bobby Kennedy’s famous slogan: “Some men see things as 
they are and say why. I dream things that never were and say 
why not.” See how, under pressure from capitalist realism, 
the rhetoric of mainstream liberalism has inverted.) 

From Foucault 101 to Barthes 101. The coverage of the 
demo on the BBC News channel is a masterclass in the 
technique that Barthes called anchorage. What we actually 
see are mounted police horse charges and some property 
damage; what we hear about — as bravely narrated by a 
helmeted reporter from behind the police lines — is the 
“violence” of the student protestors. (It’s of course not 
accidental that Paul Mason’s report came from inside the 
kettle.) One of the most notable features of the media 
coverage since Day X has been the persistent equivalence it 
has made between violence and property damage. Having 
narrowly avoided two kettles, I hardly see any violence or 


property damage. The violence I do see is perpetrated by the 
police, as a line of baton-swinging cops impose a kettle on 
protestors standing on Whitehall. I only learn about Alfie 
Meadows later, and the disjunction between the reality of the 
demo and its media representation becomes even more 
maddening, to the point where I can hardly bear to watch the 
news coverage any more. While a young student has a brain 
operation, the media are fixated on a cosmetic “attack” on 
the heir to the throne’s car. The effects of all this are 


ambiguous,'? but it’s now clear that the UK hasn’t been as 
visibly divided as this since the Miners’ Strike. 

In the afternoon of Day X1, streaming from Trafalgar 
Square up towards Whitehall, we didn’t know where we were 
going or who, if anyone, was leading us. A month later, the 
situation feels the same. We’ve broken out of the end of 
history onto terra incognito. What’s certain is that the old 
world is disintegrating, and soon it will not be possible to 
even pretend that we can return to it. 


football/capitalist 


realism/utopia* 


Football and Neoliberal Anti-Utopianism 


“English football”, the writer Robin Carmody argued on his 
LiveJournal page, is a metaphor for precisely what the 
neoliberals have done to England itself.” But it’s more than a 
metaphor. Football has been at the forefront of the total re- 
engineering of English culture, society and economy wrought 
by neoliberalism over the last thirty years. Neoliberalism 
presented itself as supremely realistic — as the only possible 
realism. It told us that utopia is impossible because there is 
no such thing as society, only individuals pursuing their own 
interests. What better image of this anti-utopianism is there 
than the Premiership, with its imperious, untouchable elite of 
clubs, its synergy with multinational media conglomerates, 
its conspicuously consuming players, its super-predatory club 
owners buying success like they are buying another yacht? 
Competition, exploitation, the strong lording it over the 
weak, paparazzi snaps of the fabulously wealthy masters of 


the universe players exiting nightclubs, flashing their very 
new money: football as anti-egalitarian Nietzschean combat. 
Forget utopia: dream, instead — if you’re young — of 
eventually becoming like this, of owning these Cheshire 
mansions, of getting a cyborg-slick WAG; or if you’re too old 
to ever lace up those ultrabranded boots, get used to being 
inferior, to never making it — dream instead of media- 
transfiguration via reality TV, or of a lottery win... 

Yet the Premiership is often treated as if it were a cause 
rather than an effect. In the lack of a coherent, general 
critique of capitalism, complaints about the inflation of 
players’ wages make no sense. After all, it is not public money 
being redistributed. Players’ spiralling wages are a 
consequence of the very market dynamics that, until last 
year’s bank crisis, were held to be sacrosanct. You can detect 
a sour anti-working class resentment — shared by self-hating 
elements of the working class itself — in the attack on 
football’s “undeserving” rich. But all of this — the player’s 
high wages, the exorbitant ticket prices — is an effect of 
football’s total subsumption into post-Fordist capital. But 
what if it wasn’t like this? What if there had been another 
way? 


Football’s Lost Utopias (in Nottingham) 


There’s a poignant moment in Duncan Hamilton’s biography 
of Brian Clough — also recounted in David Peace’s The Damned 
United — when Clough and Peter Taylor (who “wanted the 
ship-builders to earn as much as the ship-owners”) go to see 
Harold Wilson speak and come away glowing with the white 


heat of Old Labour optimism, fired up by the prospect of a 
new era for the proletariat. “You could hear the passion for 
change in what he said”, Clough told Hamilton. “We went 
back to Taylor’s house burning with it ourselves.” It’s like a 
scene from Our Friends In The North: Our Friends In The 
Midlands, perhaps. The future that Clough and Taylor 
anticipated would of course never arrive. There’s a parallel, 
perhaps, with another achingly painful scene in Hamilton’s 
book: Peter Taylor speaking after Forest’s second victory in 
the European Cup, proclaiming that this was only the 
beginning... What in fact lay ahead was underachievement 
and overpriced players, decline and mediocrity, the final 
dissolution of the volatile partnership between Clough and 
Taylor, a rift opening up between the two men that would 
remain bitter until Taylor’s death. Who of us can identify 
when the moment of our greatest triumph has already 
passed? And how bearable would life be if we could? 

If the brave new world wouldn’t arrive for the working 
class, it did arrive for Clough personally. Instead of being at 
the vanguard of a newly assertive working class, Clough’s 
period of greatest success coincided with the ebb tide of 
postwar proletarian collectivism. Clough was sometimes 
sneered at as a “champagne socialist” because he saw no 
contradiction between being a leftist and achieving success. 
Like many born poor, Clough was never able to fully believe 
that he had finally vanquished poverty from his life — hence, 
all those TV appearances, ghosted columns and the bung- 
rumours. In his review of The Damned United for the Guardian, 
Chris Petit argued that Clough “embodied many of the 
forthcoming dilemmas of Thatcher’s Britain, his career a 


constant argument between  self-proclamation and 
partnership, between probity and the demon drink, between 
financial irregularity and the belief that football was about 


more than acquisition.”” The Premiership terminated this, 
finally destroyed what was left of Clough’s crumbling world — 
a world in which working-class managers could outwit and 
overcome puffed-up patrician patriarchs, a world in which 
unfancied provincial clubs could outdo the established 
colossuses — and his final decline was all-too punctual. With 
Clough an ailing Lear at the helm, Forest were relegated in 
1993, at the end of the Premier League’s first season. 


The End of an Era 


May 2009. Flamboyant Barcelona outplay Manchester United 
in the European Champions League final. United have come to 
represent the harsh capitalist reality principle of modern 
football. Only the already-successful and the wealthy can win. 
Fans dream now not of their club being revivified by some 
Brian Clough-like managerial genius, but of it being saved by 
the largesse of a bored plutocrat. Barcelona famously have no 
shirt sponsor, and display the logo of UNICEF on their jerseys. 
United’s shirt sponsor is AIG, the insurance company at the 
heart of the financial crisis (according to the Economist, AIG’s 
“tentacles reach into every part of the economy.”) The 
neoliberal anti-utopia disintegrated with the bank bailouts, 
even though it survives in an undead form as a set of defaults 
which continue to dominate social reality. 

A non-profit making association owned and controlled by 
its members, Barcelona’s slogan is “more than a club”. Do 


Barca, with their foundations and educational activities, give 
a hint as to how football might operate in a utopia? 
Proletarian artistry the beauty of teamwork, competition, 
yes, but not the dog-eat-dog combat of capitalist realism. 


There could surely be no utopia that didn’t include something 
like this... 


the game has 
changed* 


In my column for this publication a few months ago, I called 
for a new negativity, in the spirit of Herbert Marcuse’s claim 
that the proper function of art was to be a “Great Refusal”. 
What better answer could I get than the massive “NO” 
painted on the grass of Parliament Square in London during 
one of the recent series of protests against government cuts 
in the UK? Only four weeks ago, this kind of negativity still 
seemed to be only a distant possibility in a place like the UK. 
When, at a conference on public art and civility organised by 
SKOR in Amsterdam at the end of October, I suggested that 
there would soon be expressions of massive public anger in 
the UK, some of the UK-based delegates were sceptical, 
accusing me of “revolutionary nostalgia”. I was confident that 
they were being unduly dismissive — but I still didn’t 
anticipate the scale of the recent protests. 

Like Ireland, the UK has been at the forefront of what I 
have called “capitalist realism” — the view that, since 
capitalism is the only game in town, all we can do is find a 


way of accommodating ourselves to it. Part of leftist capitalist 
realism has been the disavowal of people’s own pessimism 
and disillusion and its projection onto others. Nothing will 
happen; people will remain apathetic. That kind of diagnosis 
has been blown apart by the astonishing student movement 
that has changed the political landscape in the UK so 
dramatically since November. Apathy is dead, said a placard 
at one of the London protests. The game has changed, the 
protestors have chanted, and so it has. What we’ve seen is an 
efflorescence of oppositional activity: not only massive 
protests — which have led to increasingly naked displays of 
antagonism — but occupations and flashmobs invading 
chainstores. Comparisons with 68 have inevitably been made, 
but this movement is in many ways much more remarkable 
than what happened forty years ago. 68 came at the end of 
the “cultural revolution” of the Sixties — a series of 
challenges to the monolithic Marxist meta-narrative (its 
claim that everything could be reduced to class conflict). 68 
presupposed both a credible leftist political project (from 
which it could deviate) and a social democratic context 
(which provided the conditions for its exorbitant demands). 
But both of these have definitively disappeared. They are a 
distant memory even for the parents of many of the 
teenagers who took part in the recent UK protests. The 
current movement has had to build itself up almost from 
nothing, in a situation where the revolutionary left has no 
infrastructure and the moderate left has long since 
acquiesced to capitalist realism; and, perhaps most 
astonishingly, it has been constructed by those who had 
previously been the most obvious victims of capitalist realism 


— the young. And it should also not be forgotten — even 
though it often is — that 68 failed. The new breed of 
protestors expect to win. They do not have the ingrained 
defeatism — and romanticism of failure — that has been the 
vice of so much of the so-called radical left since the Sixties. 
Another difference between 68 and now is the class 
composition of the protestors. Where the university students 
of the Sixties were a small elite, many of the students 
involved in the current wave of demonstrations are working 
class. 68 was about a short-lived alliance between workers 
and students, but many of today’s students are already 
workers, forced to do part-time — and often fulltime — jobs in 
order to support their studies. Similarly, the Fordist model of 
the worker (as someone who does forty hours a week in a 
factory for forty years of their life) has long since been 
replaced by precarious work, which assumes “flexibility” and 
short-term contracts. Finally, new technology has played a 
crucial role in the current movement. The rapid-response 
nature of the protests has only been made possible by social 
networking sites such as Facebook and Twitter. 

In the UK, the government has targeted education, the 
arts, public services and benefits, imposing cuts that are 
breathtakingly punitive. The justification for cuts in all these 
areas has been the capitalist realist rationale that “there is no 
more money”, but opponents have rightly identified this as a 
thin pretext used by the rump of neoliberalism in order to 
pursue its uncompleted ideological project of totally 
eliminating public space. But this has created the conditions 
for an alliance between all those groups, which are 
“naturally” hostile to neoliberalism. In terms of art and 


education, what we are potentially seeing here is the 
reconsolidation of a relationship between bohemia — those 
elements of the bourgeoisie, which disdain business values — 
and the working class. That relationship — which allowed the 
arty working class to escape drudgery, and for the bohemian 
middle class to make contact with the mutational energies of 
proletarian culture — was the engine of British and Irish 
popular culture during the Sixties, Seventies and Eighties. 
Could today’s antagonism revive this? I see no reason not to 
be optimistic. 


creative capitalism+ 


“We have to live this dead reality, this mad transition, 
in the same way that we lived prison, as a strange and 
ferocious way of reaffirming life. You could not escape 
the atrocious experience of prison, the contact with 
death and its violence. [...] We were constrained to 
suffer dark romantic hallucinations. There was no 
longer any alternative. Certainly for us, there has never 
been any alternative to the world, but always an 
alternative in the world. A la Rauschenberg: a world 
that is assumed, shattered, reinvented in the form of its 
monstrosity. But even the possibility of such a heroism 
was denied to us. [...] We have to live and suffer the 
defeat of truth, of our truth. We have to destroy its 
representation, its continuity, its memory, its trace. All 
subterfuges for avoiding the recognition that reality 
has changed, and with it truth, have to be rejected. [...] 
The very blood in our veins had been replaced.” 


— Antonio Negri, Art and Multitude? 


Negri’s Art and Multitude consists of nine letters, most of 


which were written to his friends at the end of the 1980s 
while he was in exile in France. Negri here describes the 
destitution that the left endured after the defeats of the 
1970s: the destruction of all its hopes, the way in which it had 
been outflanked by a neoliberalism which successfully 
installed business thinking into all areas of everyday life. 
What emerges here, in other words, is an account of the 
immediate after-effects of the installation of what I have 
called capitalist realism: the view that, since there is no 
alternative to capitalism, the only possible attitude consists 
in adjusting to its demands. Negri poses the left’s 
predicament very acutely. 

To go back to the seeming certainties of older forms of 
militancy would be to consign oneself to irrelevance, 
obsolescence, to become an historical relic; but to accept the 
new situation, to adapt to it, would be to concede total defeat. 
The only possibility, Negri suggests, is to endure the time in 
the desert as a kind of religious trial: a moment of terrible 
and terrifying renewal, a transformation of the revolutionary 
subject happening at the very moment when revolution 
seems impossible and the forces of reaction control 
everything. The new situation — capital’s mutation into a 
postFordist form in which labour becomes “immaterial”, 
“flexible” and subject to the pressures of globalisation — 
offers new potentials, which must be embraced. 

Reading these at times extraordinary communications, I 
find myself, as ever, persuaded by Negri’s negative analysis, 
his vision of culture and consciousness totally subsumed by 
capital. What I am much less convinced by is his positive 
alternative to this banal yet dark dominion. Like his 


inspirations, Deleuze and Guattari, Negri is a vitalist who 
opposes capital’s necrotic force to the living potenza of the 
creativity of the multitude. 

Art, Negri maintains, is intrinsically rebellious and 
subversive. Even though Negri himself recognises the dangers 
of taking too much consolation in art, he ends up retaining 
faith in it. “When I myself suffered the political defeat of the 
seventies and in the depths of despair, asked art to help me to 
endure it and to help me find individual ways of resistance 
and redemption”, Negri writes, “I was overestimating the 
capacity of art.” Yet Negri is soon arguing that art is a 
“perennial demonstration of the irreducibility of freedom, of 
subversive action, of love for radical transformation”. 

From Negri’s point of view, there is no contradiction 
between these two claims. What he is arguing is that an 
individual can never find his way out of despondency through 
art alone; rather, it is only by new forms of solidarity — which 
necessarily must involve art — that escape is possible. While 
the point about collectivity has never been more pressing, 
Negri’s hymning of art seems strangely nostalgic. For the era 
of capitalist realism has also seen all kinds of synergies 
between art and business, nowhere better summed up than in 
the concept of the “creative industries”. 

It is of course possible to argue that the art that has 
dominated in capitalist realism, its artistic and commercial 
value massively inflated, is a fake art, a betrayal and dilution 
of art’s inherent militancy. But why not go all the way with 
Negri’s logic of negativity, and argue that there is no 
readymade, already-existing utopian energy; that there is 
nothing which, by its very nature, resists incorporation into 


capital? So it is not then a matter of creativity versus 
capitalism — or rather of capitalism as the capturing of the 
creativity of the multitude. Instead, the enemy now could 
better be called creative capitalism, and overcoming it will 
not involve inventing new modes of positivism, but new kinds 
of negativity. 


reality 


management* 


Johann Hari’s defenders — and practically every defence of 
Hari served to further underscore what a complacent self- 
serving Oxbridge club so much of the UK _ broadsheet 
commentariat is — might have pathetically seized upon the 
News of the World hacking story in order to underplay their 
boy’s misdemeanours, but the reality is that the Hari and the 
News of the World situations are part of a single crisis that also 


includes the Ed Miliband “these strikes are wrong” video’ and 
ongoing cyberwar (Wikileaks, Lulzsec, 4Chan). Perhaps the 
reason that the Assange/Zizek dialogue was so disappointing 
is that Zizek’s basic point about the crisis of symbolic 
efficiency is now so clear that it doesn’t require much 
elaboration. It is one thing our knowing about the corrupt 
practices that the power elite routinely engage in; it is 
another for that knowledge to be officially validated. The 
space that power needs to manage reality is disappearing. 
With the “Milibot” video, the offscreen manipulations of 
PR came off less like a dark art and more like surrealist 


comedy — Miliband for all the world resembling an ROM 
entity from eXistenZ, only capable of giving one pre-prepared 
response no matter what the question. The exposure of Hari’s 
manipulations is significant, meanwhile, because (as Petra 
Davis argued on her Twitter feed) it showed how his 
construction of “commonsense reality” depended on 
techniques proper to fiction. Reading Hari’s pieces back, it’s 
quite astonishing how crass these techniques were — a “she 
drew on the omnipresent cigarette” here, and “he asked for 
more wine” there, inserted between screeds of pirated text. 
It’s like Hari’s “interviewing” career is one long postmodern 
prank, and, really, this episode ought to be liberal 
empiricism’s equivalent of the Sokal scandal. It was fitting 


that the Deterritorial Support Group’s exposure of Hari? 
started with Hari’s hatchet job on Negri, a masterclass in 
liberal propaganda and knee-jerk loathing of theory — 
privately educated Hari reassuring his readers that he 
couldn’t understand Empire, therefore they shouldn’t worry 
about reading it. The old we don’t read it, so you don’t have to... 


’ 


routine. The Negri “interview” crudely alternates between 
personal attacks on Negri and appeals to self-evidence (of 
course communism is evil, why won’t this bad tempered old 
man admit it?). Yet Hari’s conclusion — “this is where 
revolutionary Marxism comes to die. It has been reduced to 
an obscure parlour game for ageing bourgeois nostalgics” — 
now itself reads like a relic of a bygone world. The 
“certainties” and _ self-evidences of the near-past are 
unravelling quicker than we can keep up. 

As for the News of the World story, it is clear that it is not 
just about the News of the World or phone hacking. A whole 


ruling class, a whole mode of governance, stands accused. All 
the signs are that neoliberalism’s standard tactics of 
containment — offering an individual as scapegoat-trophy in 
order to deflect from a structural tendency — are now 
starting to fail. News International are trying to re-sacrifice a 
scapegoat they’ve already served up (Coulson) but the process 
is out of their control and now has its own momentum (which 
is sure to drag other newspapers into its wake before very 
long). What was made to look like a series of disconnected 
incidents now appears as what it always was: a worldwide 
web of corruption whose byzantine murkiness resembles 
something out of The Wire or a David Peace novel. A dark 
network comprising private investigators, the criminal 
underworld, tabloid newspapers, multinational media 
conglomerates, the police, politicians, the banks, and the 
bodies supposed to regulate them (who are at best impotent, 
at worst part of the problem) cannot now be kept hidden 
from public scrutiny. This is less a conspiracy than a network 
of complicities: fear on all sides, nobody trusting anybody 
else, the whole thing depending on who’s got the goods on 
whom... Cops watching hacks watching cops; threatened 
politicians looking for favours... 

What characterises capitalist realism is fatalism at the 
level of politics (where nothing much can ever change, except 
to move further in the direction of neoliberalisation) and 
magical voluntarism at the level of the individual: you can 
achieve anything, if you only you do more training courses, 
listen to Mary Portas or Kirsty Allsopp, try harder. Magical 
voluntarism, naturally, also drives the tabloid culture of 
individual blame (resign, resign!) in which the tabloids 


themselves are now caught up, although, as Zone Styx noted, 
News International clearly expects far more from public 
service managers like Sharon Shoemith than it does from its 
own executives.) Individualise, individualise, insists capitalist 
ideology. Note the way in which the media sought to reduce 
the Lulsec story to Ryan Cleary, or the way in which the 


clueless Peter Preston* finds the idea of a collective entity 
such as DSG unfathomable. 

A manageable level of cynicism about the media actually 
serves the capitalist realist media system well. Since the 
media stands in for the public sphere, if journalists and 
politicians are perceived to be “all liars”, as they widely are, 
then there is no hope to be had in public life at all. Hack 
exculpations appeal to a market Hobbesianism: they are 
giving people what they want but what they won’t admit to 
liking. When, pickled in the jouissance of self-loathing and 
their other stimulants of choice, the hacks style themselves as 
“princes of darkness”, they see themselves as reflecting the 
public’s own disavowed cynicism back to it. Nobody likes 
working in the sewers, but don’t you all love the pretty little globules 
of sensation that we dredge up for you? Similarly, Glenn Mulcaire 
whines that the NOTW put him under pressure for results, this 
isn’t only an excuse — what we’re seeing here is in part the 
consequence of the intense competitive pressures at work in 
print media as its market share declines. Negative solidarity 
again: a race to depths so infernally pressurised that only 
alcohol-breathing subhuman crustaceans can survive there. 
(You only have to look at ex-NOTW hack Paul McMullan to see 
that.) As one by one those who played their part are dragged 
into the light, the old bullying sneers become familiar plaints: 


that’s reality, we couldn’t help it, that’s how things are now... 
But we must hear their excuses as indictments of a system: 
behold what a wretched state overwork and _ pitiless 
competition can reduce human beings to. 

All of which means that a few sackings here and there will 
clearly not suffice. What is needed, as Dan Hind argues, is 
total media reform: 


The current structure of power and decision-making in 
the media cannot now be allowed to remain unchanged. 
The employees of large media organisations have 
monopoly control of decisions about what is 
investigated and what prominence is given to the 
results of investigations. They have been unable or 
unwilling to use this monopoly power in the public 
interest. Accordingly it is time to assert our democratic 
right to communicate freely amongst ourselves. Each of 
us must take some some fraction of the commissioning 
power, the power to initiate and publish inquiries. If we 
do not our public life will remain a mess of officially 
sanctioned fairy tales, crocodilian excuses, and 
grotesque abuses of the innocent, in which market 
forces and elite prerogatives set the limits of our 
understanding and hence of our capacity for self- 


government.° 


In the House of Commons emergency debate today, many 
MPs had the relieved and faintly bemused air of the 
henchmen and victims of a bully who can’t quite believe that 
the tyranny might be nearing its end. As Assange said on 


Saturday — and as Dan Hind also argues in The Return of the 
Public — the function of corporate media has been to isolate 
people, to make them distrust their discontent with a world 
controlled by business interests. What has combated this is 
the production of new collectivities of dissent, both online 
and in the streets. What we’re seeing in this extraordinary 
moment of transition is a reality management system 
imploding from within at the same time as it is being 
undermined from outside. And, this is only the beginning — 
you haven’t seen anything yet. 


uk tabloid! 


It took all of Cameron’s replicant smarm to get through this 


morning’s astonishing press conference.” Events have moved 
so swiftly this week that it’s easy to overlook how momentous 
some of his admissions were. Many are rightly sceptical about 
whether Cameron will act on what he said today. Sometimes, 
however, words are acts, and the ultimate significance of 
what Cameron said today is that it constituted an official 
acknowledgement — from the very mouth of the beast — that 
there is indeed a corrupt system involving the press, the 
police and other politicians, and that he is implicated in it. 
We’re all in it together, he ruefully observed, another iteration 
of the fateful phrase that will define his wretched 
premiership. This might count as capitalist realism’s 
equivalent of Krushchev’s acknowledgement of corruption in 
the USSR. There are also those who are sceptical as to 
whether all of this will lead anywhere very different. If, as I 
argued in my last post, the scenes we’re now living through 
resemble the denouement of The Wire or one of David Peace’s 
novels, then we must confront the political ambivalence of 
those fictions again. For what they show, after all, is the 


System as a Schopenhauerian monstrosity, impersonal and 
implacable, remorselessly reproducing itself, no matter how 
many local victories are achieved, no matter how many 
individuals die or are exposed. Is this an analysis of capitalist 
realism, or a contribution to it? It’s possible now to see both 
Peace and The Wire as symptomatic of a political impasse; 
Peace’s novels show the defeat of collective politics, and The 
Wire anatomises the consequences of that defeat. 

What we’re seeing now may not herald the collapse of the 
system, but I’m confident that this week will be looked back 
upon as a moment when power in the UK was forced to 
reconfigure. We’re too ready to see the Murdochs as 
Machiavellian, one step ahead of events. But no empire lasts 
forever; even the canniest operator loses their touch 
eventually, and Murdoch, let’s remember, is the man who 
bought Myspace. Closing down the News of the World may have 
been a smart move, but it is one that the Murdochs made on 
the back foot; it was a reactive bid to regain initiative, or at 
least to gain some traction on a situation that remains out of 
their control. 

This is all a consequence of an excess of power. If the old 
autonomist argument is correct and capital’s innovations 
were forced by workers’ acts of refusal — and what could 
illustrate this thesis more effectively than Murdoch’s struggle 
with the unions in the 1980s — then it’s now clear how sloppy 
and shoddy capital’s operatives became in the lack of any 
effective opposition. This is decadence — not merely in the 
moral sense, but also in the sense of decay and deterioration. 
During the early twentyfirst-century high pomp of 
neoliberalism, hacks, cops and politicians were so confident 


that they would never be exposed that they behaved in an 
ever more brazenly depraved manner, and appeared to take 
little care in covering their traces. What’s also emerging into 
clearer view now is the tabloid media’s crucial role in the 
biopolitical control which was central to the constitution of 
neoliberal hegemony. Too much is made of Murdoch the 
kingmaker; his hold over politicians, like that exercised by 
Paul Dacre, depended far less on what he could do for them, 
and far more on what he could do to them, if they crossed him 
or his organisation. It’s suggested, for instance, that the 
reason that the previous police “investigations” into News 
International were so inadequate is that NI held 
compromising information on the investigating officers, and 
that MPs feared calling Rebekah Brooks to account because 
they were warned that they would be subject to tabloid 
humiliation. Dacre and Murdoch are the princes of piety and 


cynicism.’ The neoliberal tabloid is an almost too crude 
diagram of a Burroughsian biocontrol apparatus: stimulating 
hedonic excess on the one hand while condemning it on the 
other. Surveillance need only be virtual. There’s always 
something potentially shaming that can be dragged out of the 
closet, for whose fantasy life is not humiliating when exposed 
to the glare of the big Other? No matter who the victim of 
these exposes might be, they serve right-wing purposes, 
because they reinforce a Hobbesian account of “human 
nature”: everyone is out for themselves; everyone has a price; 
everyone is sexually incontinent, given the opportunity. It’s 
no accident that Ellroy called his great work of political 
demythologisation American Tabloid. 

But it was the pairing of piety and cynicism which 


ultimately did for the News of the World. The revelations that 
practically every cause or individual about which the NOTW 
waxed so sentimentally and sanctimoniously — Our Boys, 
murdered children, the 7/7 victims — was being phone 
hacked means that the distance between public piety and 
private cynicism could no longer be maintained. 


Read Adam Curtis’ potted history of Murdoch’ and it’s 
instructive to see how the justification for tabloid 
sensationalism has changed. The denials that the News of the 
World would be salacious which Murdoch made when he took 
over the paper in the social democratic era give way to 
neoliberalism’s claim to be only giving people what they 
want. This was the line that witless reactionary oaf Jon Gaunt 
pursued on Question Time last night. There’s nothing quite so 
sad as an unpopular populist, and Gaunt’s goading of Hugh 
Grant — “if you didn’t want to be on the front of the papers, 
you should have kept it in your trousers”, “who are you to tell 
people what they can or can’t watch” — embarrassingly 
misjudged the audience’s mood. Tabloid sensationalism is a 
drug, but there was a sense last night that the QT audience 
was no longer willing to conceal from itself the cost of 
procuring that cheap hit. There was little appetite for Gaunt’s 
now quaint-seeming rhetoric of “choice” and his bashing of 
paternalism. The old neoliberal lines Gaunt was haplessly 
hawking had all the appeal of yesterday’s fast food. What 
we’re left with is a whole set of questions about culture that 
are now posed again with renewed force: neoliberalism has 
failed, the patrician culture it defeated cannot be revived, nor 
should it be — so where next? 


the future is still 
ours: autonomy and 


postcapitalism! 


Adam Curtis’ recent documentary series All Watched Over by 
Machines of Loving Grace argued that discourses of self- 
organisation, which had formerly been associated with the 
counterculture, were now absorbed into dominant ideology. 
Hierarchy was bad; networks were good. Organisation itself — 
held to be synonymous with “top-down control” — was both 
oppressive and inefficient. There is clearly something in 
Curtis’ arguments. Practically all mainstream political 
discourse is suspicious of, and sceptical towards, the state, 
planning and the possibilities of organised political change. 
This feeds into the ideological framework that I have called 
capitalist realism: if systemic change can never happen, all 
we can do is make the best of capitalism. 

There’s no doubt that the right has been able to profit 
from identifying the left with an allegedly superseded “top- 


down” version of politics. Neoliberalism imposed a model of 
historical time which places bureaucratic centralisation in 
the past, by contrast with a “modernisation” that is held to be 
synonymous with “flexibility” and “individual choice”. More 
recently, the much derided idea of the Big Society is, in effect, 
a right-wing version of autonomism. The work of Phillip 
Blond, one of the architects of the “Big Society” concept, is 
saturated with the rhetoric of self-organisation. In the report 
“The Ownership State”, which he wrote for the ResPublica 


thinktank,? Blond writes of “open systems” which “recognise 
that uncertainty and change render traditional command- 
and-control ineffective”. While Blond’s ideas have been seen 
by many as obfuscatory justifications for the neoliberal 
privatisation agenda, Blond himself positions them as critical 
of neoliberalism. Blond notes a paradox that I also discuss in 
Capitalist Realism: rather than eliminating bureaucracy, as it 
promised to, neoliberalism has led to its proliferation. Since 
public services can never function as “proper” markets, the 
imposition of the “market solution” in healthcare and 
education “generates a huge and costly bureaucracy of 
accountants, examiners, inspectors, assessors and auditors, 
all concerned with assuring quality and asserting control that 
hinder innovation and experiment and lock in high cost.” 
Such systems, Blond writes, are 


organic rather than mechanistic, and require a 
completely different management mindset to run them. 
Strategy and feedback from action are more significant 
than detailed planning (‘Fire — ready — aim!’ as Tom 
Peters wrote); hierarchies give way to networks; the 


periphery is as important as the centre; self-interest 
and competition are balanced by trust and cooperation; 
initiative and inventiveness are required rather than 
compliance; smartening up rather than dumbing down. 


Since the right is now prepared to talk in these terms, it is 
clear that networks and open systems are not enough in 
themselves to save us. Rather, as Gilles Deleuze argued in his 
crucial essay “Postscript on the Societies of Control”, 
networks are simply the mode in which power operates in the 
“control” societies that have superseded the old 
“disciplinary” structures. 

Does all this then mean that ideas of autonomy and self- 
organisation would inevitably be co-opted by the right, and 
that there is no further political potential in them for the 
left? Definitely not — far from indicating any deficiency in 
autonomist ideas, the co-option of these ideas by the right 
shows that they have continuing potency. Seeing what is 
wrong with Blond and his ilk’s appropriation of autonomism 
will also tell us something about what the difference between 
right and left might be in the future. 

Curtis is right that the principal way in which autonomist 
ideas have been neutralised is by using them against the very 
idea of political organisation. Yet autonomist theories 
continue to be crucial because they give us some resources 
for constructing a model of what leftist political organisation 
could look like in the post-Fordist conditions of mandatory 
flexibility, globalisation and just-in-time production. We can 
no longer be in any doubt that the conditions which gave rise 
to the “old left” have collapsed in the global North, but we 


must have the courage not to be nostalgic for this lost Fordist 
world of boring factory work and a labour movement 
dominated by male industrial workers. As Antonio Negri so 
powerfully put it in one of the letters collected in the recently 
published Art And Multitude, “We have to live and suffer the 
defeat of truth, of our truth. We have to destroy its 
representation, its continuity, its memory, its trace. All 
subterfuges for avoiding the recognition that reality has 
changed, and with it truth, have to be rejected. [...] The very 


blood in our veins had been replaced.”* Even though the shift 
into so-called “cognitive” labour has been overstated — just 
because work involves talking doesn’t make it “cognitive”; 
the labour of a call centre worker mechanically repeating the 
same rote phrases all day is no more “cognitive” than that of 
someone on a production line — Antonio Negri is right that 
the liberation from repetitive industrial labour remains a 
victory. Yet, as Christian Marazzi has argued, workers have 
been like the Old Testament Jews: led out of the bondage of 
the Fordist factory, they are now marooned in the desert. As 
Franco Berardi has shown, precarious work brings with it 
new kinds of misery: the always-on pressure made possible by 
mobile telecommunications technology means that there is 
no longer any end to the working day. An always-on 
population lives in a state of insomniac depression, unable to 
ever switch off. 

But what has to differentiate the left from the right is a 
commitment to the idea that liberation lies in the future, not 
the past. We have to believe that the currently collapsing 
neoliberal reality system is not the only possible modernity; 
that, on the contrary, it is a cybergothic form of barbarism, 


which uses the latest technology to reinforce the power of the 
oldest elites. It is possible for technology and work to be 
arranged in completely different ways to how they are 
configured now. This belief in the future is our advantage 
over the right. Phillip Blond’s networked institutions may 
have a cybernetic sheen, but he argues that they must be 
situated in a social setting which is re-dedicated to 
“traditional values” coming from religion and the family. By 
strong contrast, we must celebrate the disintegration of these 
“values”, as the necessary precondition for new kinds of 
solidarity. This solidarity won’t emerge automatically. It will 
need the invention of new kinds of institutions, as well as the 
transformation of older bodies, such as trade unions. “One of 
the most important questions”, Deleuze wrote in the 
“Control” essay, 


will concern the ineptitude of the unions: tied to the 
whole of their history of struggle against the disciplines 
or within the spaces of enclosure, will they be able to 
adapt themselves or will they give way to new forms of 
resistance against the societies of control? Can we 
already grasp the rough outlines of the coming forms, 
capable of threatening the joys of marketing? 


Perhaps the lineaments of that future can be seen in Latin 
America, where left wing governments facilitate worker-run 
collectives. The issue is not any more of abandoning the state, 
government or planning, but making them part of new 
systems of feedback that will draw upon — and constitute — 
collective intelligence. A movement that can replace global 


capitalism does not need centralisation, but it will require co- 
ordination. What form will this co-ordination take? How can 
different autonomous struggles work together? These are the 
crucial questions we must ask as we begin to build the post- 
capitalist world. 


aesthetic poverty! 


“A salient feature of these riots,” designer Adrian 
Shaughnessy wrote of the recent disorder in England, “has 


been the fact that the main target of the attacks has been the 


shops of the major retail brands of British commercial life.” 


Writing on Design Observer’s website, Shaughnessy further 
noted that most of the outlets which were targeted — sports 
stores, mobile phone shops — “spend huge amounts of money 
on branding, on store layout, on window displays, and slick 
advertising.” The comments on Shaughnessy’s blogpost were 
telling: many fellow designers saw the post as, at best, 
spurious, and, at worst, offensive. Shouldn’t the rioters take 
responsibility for their own behaviour? What role could 
design possibly play in inciting such “criminal” actions? 

The reactionary commentary on the riots has tried to 
downplay the idea that the rioters were deprived. The rioters 
had expensive smart phones and wore top-end sportswear — 
so how could they be poor? While this has been exaggerated 
— the places where the riots took hold overwhelmingly 
tended to be areas of poverty and unemployment — it’s true 
that, so far as we can tell, most of the rioters weren’t 


homeless or starving. But there are other kinds of destitution 
than these. As well as “physical” poverty, there is also an 
aesthetic poverty, evident to anyone who takes a second look 
at the dismal vistas of England’s hyper-corporatised high 
streets. While the rich have the material and cultural 
resources to “unplug” from the dreary banality of these 
cloned spaces, the poor are far more embedded in them. This 
embedding in tightly defined media, social and physical 
environments is in fact a major symptom of aesthetic 
poverty. 

One feature of the moral panic over the riots was the 
claim that the rioters “destroyed their own communities”. 
But this presupposes both that the rioters belonged to a 
“community” and that chain stores could constitute any sort 
of “community” in any case. (It is true that the rioters did not 
only target corporate outlets, and I don’t for a moment want 
to underplay the horrific destruction caused to small 
businesses and to people’s homes, but it remains the case that 
most of the destruction and looting was aimed at corporate 
chains.) Isn’t the point, rather, that the rioters were outside, 
not a “community”, since, increasingly, no such thing exists 
under late capitalism, but from the quiet desperation and 
miserable resignation that characterises many people’s 
working lives today? The fact that some of the rioters had 
jobs was supposed to prove that these were not insurrections 
of the underclass. But many of the jobs that the British media 
kept citing — one of the rioters, it was trumpeted, was a 
classroom assistant, another, interestingly, was none other 
than a graphic designer — were not in themselves indications 
that the rioters had serious prospects. Such jobs, which are 


often part-time and short term, are typical of the “precarity” 
in which increasing numbers of young people — graduates as 
well as those with few or no qualifications — now find 
themselves languishing. Those pushing the idea that being a 
“sraphic designer” automatically means that you are inured 
from poverty or hopelessness only demonstrate how out of 
touch they are. 

The point about mobile phones is also worth pursuing. In 
what the theorist Jodi Dean has called “communicative 
capitalism”, a smart phone can no longer be conceived of as a 
mere “luxury item”. Communicative capitalism is not about 
the production of material objects, but the ceaseless 
circulation of messages. The “content” in this culture comes 
from users themselves; hence paying for an interface into the 
communicative matrix is more like paying for one’s own tools 
at work than it is like buying a luxury good. The very 
distinction between work and _ non-work, between 
entertainment and labour, erodes. There are no office hours, 
no clocking off. In addition to ensuring that we are always 
connected to the communicative matrix, smartphones are 
tethering devices which allow employers to call short-term 
workers into work at a moment’s notice. But the notorious 
use of social networking sites and BlackBerry messenger to 
propagate the riots shows that the potential of these 
machines and these websites is not exhausted by 
communicative capitalism. It has been said that the riots in 
London spread once groups who usually engage in territorial 
turf wars called a truce in order to band together against the 
authorities. While the riots in England could hardly be said to 
be a coherent political statement, in this collective use of 


social media there was perhaps the beginnings of something 
like class consciousness. And in the destruction of the 
depressing facades of corporate retail, is it too fanciful to see 
a rejection of the aesthetic poverty that corporate capitalism 
imposes on so many of us? 


the only certainties 
are death and 


capital? 


“This isn’t just art that exists in the market, or is ‘about’ the 
market. This is art that is the market — a series of gestures 
that are made wholly or primarily to capture and embody 
financial value, and only secondarily have any other function 
or virtue.” So wrote Hari Kunzru of Damien Hirst’s work in 


the Guardian. ’'m not interested in rehearsing here 
discussions of Hirst’s merit as an artist; what interests me 
instead is his symptomatic status as a figure who embodies 
capital’s penetration into all areas of culture. As Kunzru 
points out, Hirst’s own relationship to capital is more than 
close. He is a “house artist to the 1%”, and the way that value 
is generated out of his work — a mixture of hype and the 
exploitation of the poorly remunerated “assistants” who 
actually produce many of the pieces — is a model of how 
exchange value is created in late capitalism. Hirst’s notorious 


auction, “Beautiful Inside My Head Forever”, took place at the 
very moment that Lehman Brothers was collapsing. But while 
the banks failed, Hirst remains a powerful brand. In fact, 
some of Hirst’s pieces were among the works that were 
auctioned when Lehman Brothers’ art collection was sold off 
in order to recoup something for the bank’s creditors. The 
way that the prices of Hirst’s pieces became not just part of 
the story of the works, but practically their sole interest, 
reminds me of nothing so much as Michael Jackson after 
Thriller. Yet, while Jackson was tragically maddened and 
destroyed by the colossal scale of his success, Hirst gives 
every impression of being perfectly at home at the heart of a 
vast capital-generating factory. 

The current Hirst retrospective at the Tate should now 
look like a reliquary of bygone world, but it merely highlights 
that art and culture have yet to come to terms with the 
traumatic events of 2008. Our imaginations are still 
dominated (or stultified) by work which emerged from the 
cocaine-buzzy mixture of hedonism, cynicism and piety 
which governed art and politics in the 1990s and 2000s. Hirst 
is the Warhol of capitalist realism, but he has none of 
Warhol’s blank charisma. In place of Warhol’s android 
awkwardness, Hirst offers a blokish bonhomie. Warhol’s 
studied banality has become the genuinely ultrabanal. Or, 
rather, the Hirst phenomenon typifies the way in which, in 
late-capitalist art and entertainment culture, the ultrabanal 
and the super-spectacular have become (con)fused. Watching 
Hirst halfheartedly reiterate half-baked clichés — death as 
the antithesis of life; art as religion — while he was being 
interviewed in the television coverage that surrounded his 


current retrospective at the Tate, I was struck by the 
guilelessness of his thinking. But, then again, what is there to 
say about this work that it doesn’t already say itself? For all 
its fixation on death, this is work that, in its bleak 
immanence, repudiates negativity, and leaves no space for 
commentary. 

It is this obdurate refusal to be more than what it is that 
makes Hirst’s work flat with what I have called capitalist 
realism. Capitalist realism refers to a set of political beliefs 
and positions, but also a set of aesthetic impasses. “Realism” 
here does not connote a realist style so much as the inability 
to see, think or imagine beyond capitalist categories. It’s no 
accident that “reality” entertainment came to the fore in the 
unprecedented period of neoliberal domination before the 
bank crises of 2008. Hirst’s work belongs to a corresponding 
development that we might call reality art. The dead animals 
in the formaldehyde really are dead animals. The skull really 
is a skull. This inertial tautology may be the real “point” of 
Hirst’s work, and also the reason it emptily but emphatically 
resonated in a neoliberal era characterised by political 
fatalism and the corrosion of social imagination. Things are 
as they are; they cannot be re-imagined, transfigured, or 
changed. Is there any art object which better captures this 
than the diamond-encrusted skull of Hirst’s “For The Love Of 
God”, the object which, more than any other, may come to 
stand for the decadence and vanity of the pre-2008 neoliberal 
world? “For The Love Of God” makes explicit the guiding logic 
of much of Hirst’s work: the only certainties are death and 
capital. But it can tell us nothing about this. It is a mute 
symptom which exemplifies a condition it can neither 


describe nor transcend. 


why mental health 


is a political issue! 


“Welfare suicides don’t exist. Suicide is a mental health 
issue.” That line, by the former Labour official Luke Bozier, 
pretty much sums up the standard right-wing response to the 


website Calum’s List. According to its founders, the aim of 
Calum’s List is “to list the number of deaths where welfare 
reform has alleged to have had some culpability, and to make 
the best effort possible to work towards reducing this death 
toll.” Bozier’s Twitter comments were a gloss on blogposts by 
the Spectator’s Isabel Hardman? and the Telegraph’s Brendan 
O’Neill.* 

There’s more than a whiff of Freud’s “kettle logic” (I 
didn’t borrow your kettle; when I borrowed the kettle it was 
already broken; when I returned the kettle it wasn’t 
damaged) about the cluster of incompatible arguments that 
these three presented against Calum’s List. Their principal 
claims were as follows. The suicides have not been caused by 
the changes, and therefore to mention them is an act of 


opportunistic exploitation; if suicides have been caused by 
the reforms, this is no reason to abandon them; the problem 
is not the reforms themselves but how they are managed (i.e. 
those forced back to work should be given adequate support); 
suicide is not a rational act, which means that it can have no 
political significance. 

I don’t wish to argue here about whether or not specific 
cases of suicide were caused by the new legislation. But I do 
want to contest the bizarre idea that, in principle, suicides 
could not be adduced as evidence against the changes in the 
welfare system. If people dying as a consequence of the 
implementation of measures cannot count as evidence that 
the legislation has detrimental effects, what would? 

O’Neill displays a strangely judgmental attitude towards 
suicide, arguing suicide “is not a rational response to 
economic hardship; it is not a rational response to having 
your benefits cut”. This is a spectacular case of missing the 
point: for many of those suffering from mental illnesses, the 
capacity to act rationally is impaired, which is one reason 
that they need to be protected. As for the idea that those 
returning to work should receive proper support, the lack of 
such support is the issue. Atos, the agency responsible for 
testing whether claimants are fit to work, has seen a large 
number of appeals against its judgments upheld. And who can 
have faith the government will properly support those 
returning to work when it entrusts the transition to a 
discredited agency such as A4e? 

But there’s a more general problem here. Some of the 
right-wing commentators condemning Calum’s List have 
deplored the “politicisation” of mental illness, but the 


problem is exactly the opposite. Mental illness has been 
depoliticised, so that we blithely accept a situation in which 
depression is now the malady most treated by the NHS. The 
neoliberal policies implemented first by the Thatcher 
governments in the 1980s and continued by New Labour and 
the current coalition have resulted in a privatisation of stress. 
Under neoliberal governance, workers have seen their wages 
stagnate and their working conditions and job security 
become more precarious. As the Guardian reports today, 
suicides amongst middleaged men are on the increase, and 
Jane Powell, chief executive of Calm, the Campaign Against 
Living Miserably, links some of this increase with 


unemployment and precarious work.°? Given the increased 
reasons for anxiety, it’s not surprising that a large proportion 
of the population diagnose themselves as _ chronically 
miserable. But the medicalisation of depression is part of the 
problem. 

The NHS, like the education system and other public 
services, has been forced to try to deal with the social and 
psychic damage caused by the deliberate destruction of 
solidarity and security. Where once workers would have 
turned to trade unions when they were put under increasing 
stress, now they are encouraged to go to their GP or, if they 
are lucky enough to be able to be get one on the NHS, a 
therapist. 

It would be facile to argue that every single case of 
depression can be attributed to economic or political causes; 
but it is equally facile to maintain — as the dominant 
approaches to depression do — that the roots of all 
depression must always lie either in individual brain 


chemistry or in early childhood experiences. Most 
psychiatrists assume that mental illnesses such as depression 
are caused by chemical imbalances in the brain, which can be 
treated by drugs. But most psychotherapy doesn’t address the 
social causation of mental illness either. 

The radical therapist David Smail argues that Margaret 
Thatcher’s view that there’s no such thing as society, only 
individuals and their families, finds “an unacknowledged 
echo in almost all approaches to therapy”. Therapies such as 
cognitive behavioural therapy combine a focus on early life 
with the self-help doctrine that individuals can become 
masters of their own destiny. The idea is “with the expert 
help of your therapist or counsellor, you can change the 
world you are in the last analysis responsible for, so that it no 
longer cause you distress” — Smail calls this view “magical 
voluntarism”. 

Depression is the shadow side of entrepreneurial culture, 
what happens when magical voluntarism confronts limited 
opportunities. As psychologist Oliver James put it in his book 
The Selfish Capitalist, “in the entrepreneurial fantasy society”, 
we are taught “that only the affluent are winners and that 
access to the top is open to anyone willing to work hard 
enough, regardless of their familial, ethnic or social 
background — if you do not succeed, there is only one person 
to blame.” It’s high time that the blame was placed elsewhere. 
We need to reverse the privatisation of stress and recognise 
that mental health is a political issue. 


the london hunger 


games! 


Welcome to the Hunger Games. The function of the Hunger 
Games is to suppress antagonism, via spectacle and terror. In 
the same way, London 2012 — preceded and accompanied by 
the authoritarian lockdown and militarisation of the city — 
are being held up as the antidote to all discontent. The 
feelgood Olympics, we are being assured, will do everything 
from making good the damage done by last year’s riots to 
seeing off the “threat” of Scottish independence. Any disquiet 
about London 2012 is being repositioned as “griping” or 
“cynicism”. Such “whinging”, it is claimed, assumed its 
proper place of marginality as the vast majority enjoy the 
Games, and LOCOG is vindicated. 

The Olympics semiosphere is one from which all 
negativity must be banished. Witness this masterpiece of 
circularity, in a blog defending Coca Cola and McDonalds’ 
sponsorship of the Games: 


Considering they have both recently signed long 


extensions of their contracts and the Olympics are just 
days away it was rather irresponsible of Jaques Rogge to 
be in any way negative about such committed Olympic 
sponsors. Especially because it has also brought 
negativity to the IOC and the Olympic Games at a 
crucial period. 


Negativity is bad because it brings negativity! The BBC is 
even periodically running a little film about the importance 
of positive thinking (even though positive thinking can result 


in worse outcomes’). 


Sadly, Charlie Brooker’ has joined those who think that 
negativity about the Games was overplayed. But once the 
Olympic floodlights are turned off, most will switch back 
from an attitude of mild interest to indifference towards even 
the most dramatic Olympic sports, never mind those many 
Olympic sports which plainly have limited spectator appeal. 
This isn’t the point though: disquiet about London 2012 was 
never necessarily based in any hostility towards the sports. 
Enjoyment of the sport and loathing for LOCOG and the IOC 
are perfectly compatible. 

Cynicism is just about the only rational response to the 
doublethink of the McDonalds and Coca Cola sponsorship 
(one of the most prominent things you see as you pass the 
Olympic site on the train line up from Liverpool Street is the 
McDonalds logo). As Paolo Virno argues, cynicism is now an 
attitude that is simply a requirement for late-capitalist 
subjectivity, a way of navigating a world governed by rules 
that are groundless and arbitrary. But as Virno also argues, 
“It is no accident [...] that the most brazen cynicism is 


accompanied by unrestrained sentimentalism.” Once the 
Games started, cynicism could be replaced by a managed 
sentimentality. The BBC has given itself over to propagating 
an hysterical PR delirium, as Mike Marqusee described after 
seeing the boxing at ExCel: 


Breathless BBC commentators reiterate the same round 
of superlatives — “unbelievable”, “incredible”, 
“amazing”, “brilliant”, “unbelievable” — telling us 
again and again how unique, how special, how 
extraordinary these Olympics are. It feels like they’re 
the ones on performance-enhancing drugs, not the 


usually sober, poised and realistic competitors.* 


Sadly, at the ExCel, after the refreshment of the boxing came 
the utterly formulaic torpor of a video package in which 
celebrities waxed banal on the “atmosphere” that makes the 
Olympics special and the “unforgettable” moment we’re 
privileged to be part of. 

Affective exploitation is crucial to late capitalism. The 
BBC’s own Caesar Flickerman (the interviewer who extracts 
maximum sentimental affect from the Hunger Games 
contestants before they face their deaths in the arena) is the 
creepily tactile trackside interviewer Phil Jones. Jones’ 
“interviews” with exhausted athletes, are surely as ritualised 
as any Chinese state broadcast. Emote. Emote again. Emote 
differently. Praise the crowd. 

It is via emotion that advertising can make the spurious 
connection between brands and the sport, but, as Marqusee 
points out, PR boosterism cannot tolerate the very thing 


which makes sport so fascinating — its unpredictability, the 
fact that high drama is not guaranteed. 

The point of capital’s sponsorship of cultural and sporting 
events is not only the banal one of accruing brand awareness. 
Its more important function is to make it seem that capital’s 
involvement is a precondition for culture as such. The 
presence of capitalist sigils on advertising for events forces a 
quasi-behaviouristic association, registered at the level of the 
nervous system more than of cognition, between capital and 
cultural. It is a pervasive reinforcement of capitalist realism. 

There is a strange duality of the Olympics — such that, 
surrounding the Games, there can be a semioblitz of 
commercial exploitation, but, in the spaces where the 
athletes compete, there is a coy chasteness about advertising, 
so that even the O02 has to be renamed North Greenwich 
Arena for the duration of London 2012. Of course, the reason 
for this is so only those who pay the IOC for the privilege can 
commercially exploit the Games. Nevertheless, these zones 
from which capitalist semiotic pollution has been minimised 
make a pleasant contrast with the ubiquitous tawdry 
hucksterism elsewhere, inviting us to imagine the Games 
without capital. 

But we don’t have to. It’s clear that what people are 
already enjoying in the Games is everything for which capital 
is not responsible: the efforts of the athletes, the experience 
of a shared publicness. Insofar as the torch relay was a 
success, this, too, was not due to the parade itself — a dreary 
countrywide corporate carnival, consisting of Samsung, 
CocaCola and Lloyds TSB floats — but because it allowed 
people to experience their own sociality. Note also, for 


instance, that the improved British performance, which has 
the BBC in such a jingoistic froth, was likely due to (the 
privatised-public) National Lottery funding rather than 
corporate sponsorship. 

Nothing could be a clearer example of Negri’s claim that 
capital is essentially parasitic than the Games. Capital’s 
contribution to London 2012 has been systematically 
overpriced and shoddy: whether it be the branding, with its 
infantile colouring and lettering (we’ve grown used to the 
logo, but, really, has there been a more embarrassingly inept 
logo in the history of the world for an event of this 
magnitude?), the soon to be demolished Olympic stadium, 
magnificent only in its mediocrity, and the grand folly of the 
ArcelorMittal Orbit. The ArcelorMittal Orbit is perhaps the 
best symbol of capital’s parasitic relation to the London 2012 
Games. The echo of Vladimir Tatlin’s Monument to the Third 
International tells you an awful lot about the impasses, 
inertia and sterililty of capitalist realist culture. As Douglas 
Murphy points out, comparing the Orbit to Vladimir Tatlin’s 
Monument to the Third International, “[w]hereas Tatlin’s 
twists were a yearning evocation of the teleological thrust of 
dialectical materialism, the Orbit’s creators, in their design 


statement, merely explain that it ‘should make an iconic 


statement about Tower-ness’”.” 


As Juliet Jacques has argued, the “deconstructed tower” is 
— unwittingly — the perfect monument for capitalist realist 
Britain: 


With its funding and name coming mostly from 
billionaire Lakshmi Mittal’s integrated steel company, 


who provided up to £19.2m towards its costs, with the 
rest given by the London Development Agency, the 
Orbit is less a radical structure than an_ utterly 
conservative one. In saying that it would pay for itself 
throgh the renting of private dining spaces at its 
summit, Boris Johnson may have said more about its 
legacy than he planned when he described it as a 
“corporate money-making venture”. In that, Kapoor 
and Balmond’s Orbit captures the spirit of its time and 
place as much as Eiffel or Tatlin’s designs — but 


perhaps not quite as they intended.° 


time-wars: towards 
an alternative for 


the neo-capitalist 


era! 


Time rather than money is the currency in the recent science 
fiction film In Time. At the age of twenty-five, the citizens in 
the future world the film depicts are given only a year more 
to live. To survive any longer, they must earn extra time. The 
decadent rich have centuries of empty time available to 
fritter away, while the poor are always only days or hours 
away from death. In Time is, in effect, the first science fiction 
film about precarity — a condition that describes an 
existential predicament as much as it refers to a particular 
way of organising work. 

At the most simple level, precarity is one consequence of 
the “post-Fordist” restructuring of work that began in the 


late 1970s: the turn away from fixed, permanent jobs to ways 
of working that are increasingly casualised. Yet even those 
within relatively stable forms of employment are not immune 
from precarity. Many workers now have to periodically 
revalidate their status via systems of “continuous 
professional development”; almost all work, no matter how 
menial, involves self-surveillance systems in which the 
worker is required to assess their own performance. Pay is 
increasingly correlated to output, albeit an output that is no 
longer easily measurable in material terms. 

For most workers, there is no such thing as the long-term. 
As sociologist Richard Sennett put it in his book The Corrosion 
of Character: The Personal Consequences of Work in the New 
Capitalism, the post-Fordist worker “lives in a world marked 
[...] by short-term flexibility and flux [...] Corporations break 
up or join together, jobs appear and disappear, as events 


lacking connection.”* Throughout history, humans have 
learned to come to terms with the traumatic upheavals 
caused by war or natural disasters, but “[w] hat’s peculiar 
about uncertainty today”, Sennett points out, “is that it exists 


without any looming historical disaster; instead it is woven 


into the everyday practices of a vigorous capitalism”.? 


It isn’t only work that has become more tenuous. The 
neoliberal attacks on public services, welfare programmes 
and trade unions mean that we are increasingly living in a 
world deprived of security or solidarity. The consequence of 
the normalisation of uncertainty is a permanent state of low- 
level panic. Fear, which attaches to particular objects, is 
replaced by a more generalised anxiety, a constant twitching, 
an inability to settle. The uncertainty of work is intensified by 


digital communication technology. As soon as there is email, 
there are no longer working hours nor a workplace. What 
characterises the present moment more than our anxious 
checking — of our messages, which may bring opportunities 
or demands (often both at the same time), or, more 
abstractly, of our status, which, like the stock market is 
constantly under review, never finally resolved? 

We are very far from the “society of leisure” that was 
confidently predicted in the 1970s. Contrary to the hopes 
raised at that time, technology has not liberated us from 
work. As Federico Campagna writes in his article “Radical 
Atheism”, published on the Through Europe website, 


In the current age of machines [...] humans finally have 
the possibility of devolving most productive processes 
to technological apparatus, while retaining ll 
outcomes for themselves. In other words, the (first) 
world currently hosts all the necessary pre-conditions 
for the realisation of the old autonomist slogan “zero 
work/full income/all production/to automation”. 
Despite all this, twenty-first-century Western societies 
are still torn by the dusty, capitalist dichotomy which 
opposes a tragically overworked section of population 


against an equally tragically unemployed one.* 


Campagna’s call for a “radial atheism” is based on the 
recognition that the precariousness that cannot be 
eliminated is that of life and the body. If there is no afterlife, 
then our time is finite. Curiously, however, we subjects of late 
capitalism act as if there is infinite time to waste on work. 


Work looms over us as never before. “In an eccentric and an 
extreme society like ours”, argue Carl Cederstr6m and Peter 
Fleming in their book Dead Man Working, “working has 
assumed a universal presence — a worker’s society in the 
worst sense of the term — where even the unemployed and 
children become obsessed with it.” Work now colonises 
weekends, late evenings, even our dreams. “Under Fordism, 
weekends and leisure time were still relatively untouched”, 
Cederstrom and Fleming point out, “Today, however, capital 
seeks to exploit our sociality in all spheres of work. When we 


all become “human capital” we not only have a job, or 


perform a job. We are the job.”° 


Given all of this, it is clear that most political struggles at 
the moment amount to a war over time. The generalised debt 
crisis that hangs over all areas of capitalist life and culture — 
from banks to housing and student funding — is ultimately 
about time. Averting the alleged catastrophe (of the end of 
capitalism) will heighten the apocalyptic temporality of 
everyday life, as the anticipation of catastrophe gives way to 
a sense that we are already living through the catastrophe 
and it, like work, will never end. The increase of debt justifies 
the extending of working hours and working life, with 
retirement age being pushed ever further back. We are in a 
state of harassed busyness from which — we are now 
promised — there will never be any relief. 

The state of reactive panic in which most of us find 
ourselves is not an accidental side-effect of post-Fordist 
labour. It is highly functional for capital that our time is not 
only quantitatively short but qualitatively fragmented, bitty. 
We are required to live in the condition that Linda Stone has 


called “continuous partial attention”, where our attention is 
habitually distributed across multiple communication 
platforms. 

As Franco “Bifo” Berardi has argued, we now live in the 
tension between the infinity of cyberspace and the vulnerable 
finitude of the body and the nervous system. “The 
acceleration of information exchange has produced and is 
producing an effect of a pathological type on the individual 
human mind and even more on the collective mind,” Berardi 
writes in Precarious Rhapsody, 


Individuals are not in a position to process the immense 
and always growing mass of information that enters 
their computers, their cell phones, their television 
screens, their electronic diaries and their heads. 
However, it seems indispensable to follow, recognise, 
evaluate, process all this information if you want to be 
efficient, competitive, victorious. [...] The necessary 
time for paying attention to the fluxes of information is 


lacking.° 


The consequence is a strange kind of existential state, in 
which exhaustion bleeds into insomniac overstimulation (no 
matter how tired we are, there is still time for one more click) 
and enjoyment and anxiety co-exist (the urge to check emails, 
for instance, is both something we must do for work and a 
libidinal compulsion, a psychoanalytic drive that is never 
satisfied no matter how many messages we receive). The fact 
that the smartphone makes cyberspace available practically 
anywhere at anytime means that boredom (or at least the old 


style, “Fordist” boredom) has effectively been eliminated 
from social life. Yet boredom, like death, posed existential 
challenges that are far more easily deferred in the always-on 
cyberspatial environment. Ultimately, communicative 
capitalism does not vanquish boredom so much as it 
“sublates” it, seeming to destroy it only to preserve it in a 
new synthesis. The characteristic affective tonality for the 
insomniac drift of cyberspace, in which there is always one 
more click to make, one more update to check, combines 
fascination with boredom. We are bored even as we are 
fascinated, and the limitless distraction allows us to evade 
confronting death — even as death is closing in on us. 

No doubt this chronic shortage of time goes some way to 
accounting for the stalled and inertial quality of culture in 
recent years. The neoliberal gambit was that the destruction 
of social security would have a dynamic effect on culture and 
the economy, liberating an entrepreneurial spirit that was 
inhibited by the red tape of bureaucratic social democratic 
institutions. The reality, however, is that innovation requires 
certain forms of stability. The disintegration of social 
democracy has had a dampening, rather than a dynamic, 
effect on culture in highly neoliberalised countries such as 
the UK. Fredric Jameson’s claims that late-capitalist culture 
would be given over to pastiche and retrospection have 
turned out to be extraordinarily prophetic. 

We’ve grown so accustomed to repetition and recycling 
that we no longer notice them. Yet it’s no surprise that this is 
the case. New cultural production requires a use of time that 
communicative capitalism is profoundly hostile towards. 
Most social energy is sucked into the vortex of late-capitalist 


labour and its vast simulation of productivity. Innovation 
depends upon an absorbed (rather than distracted) drift; but 
it is increasingly difficult to muster the attentional resources 
necessary for such immersion. Cyberspatial urgencies — the 
smartphone’s flashing red light, the siren call of its alert — 
function like trance-inhibitors or alarm clocks that keep 
waking us out of collective dreaming. In these conditions, 
intellectual work can only be undertaken on a short-term 
basis. Only prisoners have time to read, and if you want to 
engage in a twenty-year-long research project funded by the 
state, you will have to kill someone. 

To understand the time-crisis, we only have to compare 
the current situation with the height of punk and post-punk 
in the UK and the US. It’s no accident that the efflorescence of 
punk and post-punk culture happened at a time when cheap 
and squatted property was available in London and New York. 
Now, simply to afford to pay rent in either city entails giving 
up most of your time and energy to work. The delirious rise in 
property prices over the last twenty years is probably the 
single most important cause of cultural conservatism in the 
UK and the US. In the UK, much of the infrastructure which 
indirectly supported cultural production has _ been 
systematically dismantled by successive neoliberal 
governments. Most of the innovations in British popular 
music which happened between the Sixties and the Nineties 
would have been unthinkable without the indirect funding 
provided by social housing, unemployment benefit and 
student grants. 

These developments precisely opened up a kind of time 
that is now increasingly difficult to access: a time temporarily 


freed from the pressure to pay rent or the mortgage; an 
experimental time, in which the outcomes of activities could 
neither be predicted nor guaranteed; a time which might turn 
out to be wasted, but which might equally yield new concepts, 
perceptions, ways of being. It is this kind of time, not the 
harassed time of the business entrepreneur, which gives rise 
to the new. This kind of time, where the collective mind can 
unfurl, also allows the social imagination to flourish. The 
neoliberal era — the time when, we were repeatedly told, 
there was no alternative — has been characterised by a 
massive deterioration of social imagination, an incapacity to 
even conceive of different ways to work, produce and 
consume. It’s now clear that, from the start (and with good 
reason) neoliberalism declared war on this alternative mode 
of time. It remains tireless in its propagation of resentment 
against those few fugitives who can still escape the treadmill 
of debt and endless work, promising to ensure that soon, they 
too will be condemned to performing interminable, 
meaningless labour — as if the solution to the current 
stagnation lay in more work, rather than an escape from the 
cult of work. If there is to be any kind of future, it will depend 
on our winning back the uses of time that neoliberalism has 
sought to close off and make us forget. 


not failing better, 
1 


but fighting to win 


Capitalist realism, to sum it up briefly, can be seen as both a 
belief and an attitude. It is a belief that capitalism is the only 
viable political/economic system, and a simple restatement of 
the old Thatcherite maxim, “There is no alternative”. 

People like Paul Mason have been saying that since 2011 
there has been an upsurge in global militancy, including a 
number of uprisings, and this represents the end of capitalist 
realism. But that is clearly not the case. It is true that the 
major crisis of capitalism from 2008 led to a situation where 
capital has never been weaker ideologically in my lifetime, 
and as a result there is widespread disaffection, but the 
question is why nevertheless capitalist realism still exists. 

In my view it is because it was never really necessarily 
about the idea that capitalism was a particularly good system: 
it was more about persuading people that it is the only viable 
system and the building of an alternative is impossible. That 
discontent is practically universal does not change the fact 
that there appears to be no workable alternative to 


capitalism. It does not change the belief that capitalism still 
holds all cards and that there is nothing we can do about it — 
that capitalism is almost like a force of nature, which cannot 
be resisted. There is nothing that has happened since 2008 
that has done anything to change that, and that is why 
capitalist realism still persists. 

So capitalist realism is a belief, but it is also an attitude 
related to that belief — an attitude of resignation, defeatism 
and depression. Really then, capitalist realism, whilst it is 
disseminated by the neoliberal right, and very successfully so, 
is a pathology of the left, or elements of the so-called left, 
that they succumb to. It was an attitude promoted by New 
Labour — what was New Labour if not instantiating the values 
of capitalist realism? In other words, we resign ourselves to 
the fact that there is no getting around capital: capital will 
ultimately run things, and all we can do is perhaps bolt on a 
couple of tethers as gestures toward social justice. But 
essentially ideology is over, politics is over: we are in the era 
of so-called post-ideology, the era of post-politics, where 
capital has won. This so-called “post-political” presentation 
by New Labour was one of the ways in which capitalist 
realism imposed itself in the British context. 

There is a problem, however, in seeing capitalist realism 
just as a belief and an attitude, in that both are based on 
individual psychology. The discussion needed is one that 
interrogates where those beliefs and attitudes come from, for 
what we are actually dealing with is the social decomposition 
that gives rise to them. For that, we really need a narrative 
about the decline of solidarity and the decline of security — 
the neoliberal project achieved its aim of undermining them. 


Capitalist realism then is also a _ reflection of the 
recomposition of various forces in society. It is not just that 
people are persuaded of certain beliefs, but rather that the 
beliefs people have reflect the way that forces in society are 
composed in contemporary capitalism. 


““Modernisation”’ 


The decline of the unions is probably the biggest factor in the 
rise of capitalist realism for ordinary people. Now we find 
ourselves in a situation where everybody disdains bankers 
and finance capitalism, and the level of control that these 
people still hold over all of our lives. Everyone is aghast at the 
plunder, avoidance of tax and so forth, yet at the same time 
there is this sentiment that we can do nothing about it. And 
why has that sentiment grown so powerful? It is because 
there really is no agent to mediate the feelings people have 
and organise those people. The effect is that discontent can 
be widespread, but without such an agent it will remain at the 
level of individual disaffection. 

That easily converts into depression as well, which is one 
of the stories I try and tell in my book, Capitalist Realism. I deal 
with the association between post-politics, post-ideology, the 
rise of neoliberalism and the conjoined rise of depression, 
particularly among young people. I call this process the 
“privatisation of stress”. 

I do not want to hang everything on trade union decline — 
unions are just an example of what has been removed from 
the psychic and political infrastructure of people’s lives over 
the last thirty or forty years. However, in the past, if your pay 


and conditions got worse, you might go to the unions and 
organise, whereas now we are encouraged, if, for example, 
stress at work increases, to see it as our own problem and 
deal with it as an individual. 

We must deal with it through self-medication, through 
antidepressants, which are increasingly widely prescribed, or, 
if we are lucky, through therapy. But these concerns — 
experienced now as individual psychic pathologies — do not 
really have their roots in brain chemistry: they reside in the 
wider social field. But, because there is no longer an agent, a 
mediator, for a class acting collectively, there is no way of 
tackling that wider social field. 

Another way of getting to this story is via the 
restructuring of capital in the late Seventies and early 
Eighties, the arrival of post-Fordism. That meant the 
increasing use of precarious conditions at work, just-in-time 
production, the dread word “flexibility”: we must bend to 
capital, no matter what capital wants; we are required to 
bend to it and we will bend to it. On the one hand, there was 
that kind of stick, but there was also at least the appearance 
of carrots in the Eighties: neoliberalism did not just hammer 
workers; it encouraged people no longer to identify as 
workers. Its success was in being able to seduce people out of 
that identification, and out of class consciousness. 

The genius at the centre of Thatcherism could be found in 
the selling-off of council houses, because alongside the 
straightforward inducement of owning your own home was 
the narrative about time and history, whereby Thatcher and 
people like her were out to make your life more free. They 
were opposed to those stuck-in-the-mud, centralising 


bureaucrats, who want to control your life for you. That 
involved a very successful harnessing of the desires that had 
grown up, particularly since the Sixties. 

Part of the problem here was the absence of a left 
response to post-Fordism — instead there was an attachment 
to the comfort of old antagonisms, you could say. We had 
internalised the story that there was a strong workers’ 
movement which depended on unity. What were the 
conditions for that? Well, we had Fordist labour, the 
concentration of workers in confined spaces, the domination 
of the industrial workforce by male workers, etc. The 
breakdown of those conditions threatened the breakdown of 
the workers’ movement. There was the emergence of a 
plurality of other struggles, leading to the undermining of the 
common purpose that the workers’ movement once 
possessed. But that kind of nostalgia for Fordism was actually 
dangerous — the failure was not that Fordism ended, but that 
we had no alternative vision of modernity to compete with 
the neoliberal account. 

In fact, neoliberalism owns the word “modernisation” 
now. If you hear the word in news broadcasts, it is 
synonymous with neoliberalisation. Whenever there is a 
dispute — in, say, Royal Mail — the phrasing used is 
something like, “Royal Mail is trying to modernise, but its 
plans are opposed by workers”. But when they say 
“modernise”, they’ really mean “privatise” and 
“neoliberalise”. We saw this with Blairism: those who wanted 
to “modernise” really wanted to neoliberalise the Labour 
Party. Of course, if you are opposed to modernisation, you 
must be out of touch with reality and you immediately find 


yourself on the back foot. 

The left almost seemed to believe it, and the only way to 
“modernise” was to make some sort of accommodation with 
capital. But the opposite mistake was to think that things 
could stay as they were before — and that was really a very 
dangerous line to go down. The challenge was to come up 
with a post-Fordist leftism — a project which was begun in 
the Eighties. But this soon got derailed, as any attempt to do 
this was seen as just folding to Blairism, even though that was 
not the case. 


Education 


There is more than just one particular zone where capitalist 
realism applies and most of the anecdotes and key concepts 
that went into the book came from my experiences teaching 
sixteen to nineteen-year-olds. So let us turn now to the key 
question of capitalist realism in education. 

One of its central features in this area is “business 
ontology”, as I have called it, which is simply the idea that the 
only things that actually count, the only criteria that matter, 
are related to business. Within education we have seen a 
creeping spread of practices, language and rhetoric from 
business. And this has spread into teaching, into the kind of 
self-policing and self-surveillance teachers are now required 
to perform. 

One of the things I try to point out in Capitalist Realism is 
the strange anomaly here: one of the things we were sold 
about neoliberalism was that it liberated us from 
bureaucracy, that it was only old Stalinists and crusty social 


democrats who obsess with bureaucracy. Neoliberalism was 
supposed to cut away the red tape. So why is it that teachers 
are required to perform more bureaucratic tasks than they 
ever were in the heyday of social democracy? 

Simply because neoliberalism has got nothing to do with 
the freeing of markets, and everything to do with class power. 
That is reflected in the introduction of certain methods and 
strategies, ways of assessing teachers and schools, justified 
because they allegedly increase efficiency. Well, anyone who 
has engaged in this kind of, to coin another phrase, market 
Stalinism knows that nowadays what matters is what appears 
on the forms, irrespective of whether it actually corresponds 
to reality. 

It was New Labour which accelerated this development in 
education by introducing targets — isn’t it interesting that 
New Labour presented itself as the extreme antithesis of 
Stalinism, but it ended up reconstituting at a formal level 
Stalinism’s really bad aspects (not that there were many good 
ones!). The language of planned targets has come back, like 
the return of the repressed. 

Given that this clearly does not increase efficiency, we 
need to see it as a disciplinary mechanism, an ideological, 
ritualising system. If you are a teacher sitting at home filling 
in lots of forms full of quasi-business rhetoric, you are not 
going to teach a better lesson the next day. In fact, if you just 
watched TV and relaxed, you would probably be better 
equipped in that regard. But the authorities are not idiots: 
they know this; they know they are not really increasing your 
performance. 

So what is the function of these practices? Well, one is 


obviously discipline and control: control via anxiety, control 
via the destabilisation of professional confidence. These 
things are framed as “continuous professional development”, 
and that sounds good, doesn’t it? You always want to learn 
more, don’t you? And now you always have access to training. 
But what it really means is that your status is never really 
validated — you are constantly subject to review. And it is a 
review of a bizarre and Kafkaesque type, because all the 
assessment criteria are characterised by a strategic 
vagueness, whereby it might appear possible to fulfil them, 
but in reality that fulfilment can be constantly deferred. The 
result is that teachers are in a constant state of anxiety — and 
anxiety is highly functional from the perspective of those 
who want to control us. 

On a second level it is merely ideological ritual, of exactly 
the kind that Althusser described. For him a good part of 
ideology is made up of ritual: you just repeat the phrases and, 
as Althusser says, via Pascal, “Kneel and you will believe”. 
That is a highly ambiguous phrase. Does it mean, “Kneel and 
you will believe afterwards”? Or that in the act of kneeling 
you already believe? I think both, but it reinforces the idea 
that belief is really the crucial thing about capitalism. And 
one of the sources of that belief is the contamination of public 
life and former public services by this kind of incantation and 
language of business. Many people regard what they are 
required to do at work as quite ridiculous and ask why they 
have to do it. Capitalist realism is confronted, as the response 
comes back: “Well, you know, it’s just how it is now. We don’t 
really believe this stuff, of course, but we just have to go 
along with it.” 


That is all ideology really needs. You do not have to 
believe it in your heart of hearts: all you are required to do is 
act as if you believe it. In education this has been crucial as 
part of the way in which we view its purpose. Today 
education is to be determined by the needs of business. Of 
course, such a tendency has always been present, but there is 
almost no contesting it anymore. 


Debt 


There are many different dimensions to capitalist realism in 
education, but the other key one is debt, plainly. What is 
interesting is that after the phoney peace, I suppose you 
could call it, following 2008, where nothing really significant 
happened in terms of public displays of anger, the first real 
manifestation of discontent was the student movement of 
2010. 

Just before it started, I said to a friend of mine that there 
was going to be some expression of anger over the cuts in 
higher education, and he responded to the effect that that 
could not happen: it was just “revolutionary nostalgia” on my 
part. I do not tell that story to claim some special prophetic 
vision, but to illustrate the fact that his view had seemed to 
be the realistic one — there really had been no sign of such 
anger erupting. 

But it did erupt at the end of 2010. Why was that? What 
was really being argued over with regard to fees? Clearly the 
rhetoric about paying down the debt is ludicrous, in as far as 
anyone can make out anything in this necromantic economics 
surrounding university fees. It seems that it is costing the 


government more to impose this new system anyway, so it 
has actually increased the deficit. What were they actually 
trying to achieve with this massive hike in fees? To me it is 
obvious that this is another version of the production of a 
certain kind of anxiety — the student population had to be 
constituted as debtors. 

There was a good piece by Mark Bolton in the New Left 
Project arguing that debt is now the key social category in 
capitalism: capital does not need to work in the same way as 
before, but it does need us to be in debt — a main source of 


our subjectivity.2 What is debt? It is also a capture of time, of 
our future. So the confrontation with university students in 
the UK is a dramatic example of the kind of switch-around we 
have seen — a struggle over the use of time. 

What was university like when I went? First, I did not pay 
a penny in fees and, secondly, I received a maintenance grant, 
upon which it was possible to actually live if you were quite 
frugal. In other words, there was this funded time outside the 
frenetic activity of work. I say that because now work has 
changed into simply a means of paying off debt. 

The article in the New Left Project was arguing against a 
ludicrous rightwing Tory book, Britannia Unchained, which 
claims that Britain had been chained up, but those chains 


have now been cut.’ So how are we freed as a result? We can 
work harder and longer — even harder than those Chinese, 
because we need to do a far better job of exploiting ourselves 
than we have up to now. But the reality of work is that it does 
not pay enough and that is why we are in debt. 

This government has attempted to moralise debt. It is 
analogous to the ludicrous assertion it keeps making (the 


government operates in a kind of neuro-linguistic way, 
believing that if you repeat something often enough then it 
will become true) that the crisis was caused by New Labour 
overspending — just like an individual who has maxed out 
their credit cards. Of course, it was not a moral failing at all 
when people relied so much on their credit cards: it was 
unavoidable. More importantly, the entire economy now 
needs people to be in debt — they are doing their duty to 
capital! That duty to capital in the past is used as a new 
reason in the present to exploit them further, to cut their 
public services and standards of living. It would be funny if it 
were not so grotesque. But this ridiculous personalisation of 
debt, as if it were a moral failing, is the meat and drink of 
capitalist realism. 

Connected to this is the reduction in the amount of time 
that could be spent for purposes other than the kind of 
frenetic anxiety related to the world of work. That Tory book 
is really part of this attempt to impose such anxiety — we are 
not working hard enough, after all. What we have seen with 
the coalition government is the systematic shutting down of 
space where time could be used differently. This has a 
massive impact on culture, because it was within those spaces 
that any alternative culture could be produced. Many of the 
key developments in popular culture since the 1960s were 
facilitated by the space provided by the welfare state, social 
housing, etc. They amounted to a kind of indirect funding for 
cultural production. With those spaces closed down, much of 
the culture of late-capitalist Britain is moribund, miserable, 
repetitious and homogenous. 

Another one of the paradoxes of capitalist realism is the 


hyper-regulation of learning in the classroom, so that any 
deviation from the official programme is closed down. When 
you step outside the narrow parameters of the examination 
drill, students themselves will complain today. They will ask, 
“Is this going to be in the exam?” A narrow teleological focus 
is what is inculcated, along with a super-instrumentalisation 
of education. 

Of course, one of the things senior management is trying 
to do with the introduction of fees is to create a split between 
students and lecturers. As the students are paying more in 
fees, it is expected that they will demand more from the 
lecturers. Management is fairly cynically trying to get 
students to behave as “aggrieved consumers” who should 
demand more for their money, but the problem is that none 
of that extra money is going to the lecturers. I know of a 
communication from a senior manager at a higher education 
institution saying that, in the wake of the hike in fees, “We’d 
better prepare ourselves for students demanding more”. 
Which means that lecturers will have to work more for the 
same money. 


In It Together? 


How is it possible to impose all this? Well, only because of the 
general ideological atmosphere of capitalist realism. Whilst I 
do not agree with Paul Mason, capitalist realism has certainly 
changed its form compared to before 2008. Then it had a 
bullish quality that declared: “Either you get on board with us 
or you're a sad loser who will die drinking meths in a gutter 
— if you’re lucky.” Since 2008, it has had a more desperate 


quality, which is what lies behind the ostensibly inclusive 
rhetoric of “We’re all in it together”. In other words, if we do 
not all pull together, we will all go down — rather different 
from the previous implication that anyone who does not 
come on board will just be crushed beneath the juggernaut of 
capital. 

So the tone of capitalist realism has changed, but harsh 
measures have been imposed very quickly because of the 
absence of an alternative. In fact it is even worse than that, 
because the previous form of the system to which we are told 
there is no alternative is now impossible. There is no 
returning to pre-2008 capital. Capital has no idea of any 
solution to the crises which led up to 2008. There is no 
guarantee that the current crisis can be ended, because 
capital’s means of keeping wages low and demand up was 
debt itself. If you make debt harder to come by, then what is 
going to take its place? There is no answer to that, and plainly 
capital’s apologists are just flailing about. 

Their only answer has been the strategy of austerity, 
which in large part has been based on a historical forgetting 
of why the welfare state was introduced. It was introduced 
not out of the kindness and largesse of the capitalists, but as 
“revolution insurance”, so that widespread discontent did not 
spill over into revolution. They have forgotten that, and as a 
consequence they think they can keep pulling away those 
social safety nets without any problem. Last year’s riots give 
us a glimpse of some of the possible repercussions. 

What then can we do? Well, it is first necessary to defeat 
the anarchists — I am only half-joking about that. It is 
essential that we ask why it is that neo-anarchist ideas are so 


dominant amongst young. people, and_ especially 
undergraduates. The blunt answer is that, although anarchist 
tactics are the most ineffective in attempting to defeat 
capital, capital has destroyed all the tactics that were 
effective, leaving this rump to propagate itself within the 
movement. There is an uncomfortable synergy between the 
rhetoric of the “big society” and a lot of the neo-anarchist 
ideas and concepts. For example, one of the things which is 
particularly pernicious about some of the dominant ideas 
within anarchism at the moment is their disengagement from 
the mainstream. 

There is the idea, for instance, that the mainstream media 
is an inherently corrupt monolith. The point is that it is 
completely corrupt, but it is not a monolith. It is a terrain that 
is effectively controlled at present by neoliberals, who took 
the fight over the mainstream media very seriously, and 
consequently won that struggle. 

One of the things which I am pushing for is media 
consciousness-raising with some younger people — for 
example, Channel 4 used to have hourlong programmes 
featuring a debate between three philosophers. Now Big 
Brother takes up that slot. The slot once occupied by European 
Arts cinema is now taken by Location, Location, Location. If you 
want to look at the changes in British society, politically and 
culturally over the last thirty years then there is no better 
example than Channel 4. 

Why is that? Because Channel 4 emerged as a result of all 
sorts of struggles within the media for control of things like 
film, and people took that very seriously. Alongside the 
labour struggles of the Eighties there were also cultural 


struggles. Both were defeated, but at the time it was by no 
means obvious that they would be. If you remember, the 
Eighties were the time when there were moral panics about 
“loony left” councils, and there was also a moral panic over 
Channel 4 with its politically correct lefties, who were 
supposedly taking over broadcasting. 

That is part of what I mean by an alternative modernity — 
an alternative to the neoliberal “modernity”, which is 
actually just a return to the nineteenth century in many 
ways. But the idea that the mainstream culture is inherently 
coopted, and all we can do is withdraw from it, is deeply 
flawed. 

The same is true about parliamentary politics. You should 
not pin all of your hopes on parliamentary politics, because 
that would be sad and ludicrous, but, at the same time, if it 
was pointless then you have to ask why the business class 
expends so many resources in subjugating parliament to its 
own interests. 

Again, the neo-anarchist idea that the state is finished, 
that we do not need to participate in it at all, is deeply 
pernicious. It is not that parliamentary politics will achieve 
much on its own — the object lesson of what happens if you 
believe that to be the case was New Labour. Power without 
hegemony — that is effectively what New Labour was. But 
that is pointless. You cannot hope to achieve anything 
through an electoral machine alone. But it is hard to see how 
struggles can succeed without being part of an ensemble. We 
have to win back the idea that it is about winning the 
hegemonic struggle in society on different fronts at the same 
time. 


Because the anti-capitalist movements that have arisen 
since the Nineties have ultimately done nothing, they have 
caused capital no concern at all — it has been so easy to route 
around them. Part of the reason for that is the fact that they 
have taken place out on the street, ignoring the politics of the 
workplace and of the everyday. And that feels remote to 
ordinary working people, because at least with the unions, for 
all their flaws, there was a direct connection between 
everyday lives and politics. That connection is now missing, 
and anti-capitalist movements have not provided it. 


Coordination 


It seems to me that the crucial question now is coordination, 
and so many debates around centralisation versus 
decentralisation, top-down versus horizontal, obfuscate the 
real issues, which are about what is the most effective form of 
co-ordination against capital. Coordination does not need 
centralisation: in order for things to have common purpose 
they do not have to be centralised. We need to resist the false 
oppositions which come out of the way neo-anarchist ideas 
are narrativised. 

Obviously all the anti-capitalist movements, right up to 
Occupy, have managed to mobilise disaffection, but they have 
not been able to coordinate it in a way that causes capital any 
long-term problems at all. What could coordinate discontent? 
And what could convert ambient disaffection into sustainable 
antagonism? It is a lack of the sustainability of these 
antagonisms which is part of the problem with them. Another 
problem with them, which my comrade, Jeremy Gilbert, has 


raised, is their lack of institutional memory. If you do not 
have something like a party structure then you do not have 
institutional memory, and you just end up repeating the same 
mistakes over and over. 

There is far too much toleration of failure on our side. If I 
ever have to hear that Samuel Becket quote, “Try again, fail 
again, fail better”, I will go mad. Why do we even think in 
these terms? There is no honour in failure, although there is 
no shame in it if you have tried to succeed. Instead of that 
stupid slogan we should aim to learn from our mistakes in 
order to succeed next time. The odds might be stacked in 
such a way that we do keep losing, but the point is to increase 
our collective intelligence. That requires, if not a party 
structure of the old type, then at least some kind of system of 
coordination and some system of memory. Capital has this, 
and we need it too to be able to fight back. 


the happiness of 


margaret thatcher! 


So they win again. If anything is to be taken from the 
miserable time we endured last week, it must be to learn 
some lessons about how the enemy operates. It couldn’t have 
worked much better from their point of view. A series of 
punitive attacks on the poorest and most vulnerable in 
society ended up being simultaneously cloaked and justified 
by the brazen hijacking of an appalling, aberrant act of 
violence. This is one part of the “legacy of Thatcher” that we 
will be invited to reflect upon in the coming days. The bitter 
edge to all those leftist celebrations of Thatcher’s death is all 
too evident. She retired from the field of class war twenty 
years ago, her work a spectacular success. Looking at Britain 
now — a country much more Thatcherite than when she left 
office — she could have died a happy woman. 

The Tories have long been struggling with the problem of 
how to escape Thatcher’s shadow while continuing her 
project. Last week, we saw their quest to square a circle — 
how to lose their “nasty party” image while actually 


intensifying the attack on the remnants of social democracy 
— bearing some fruit. Helmed by the reinvented IDS, now cast 
as a caring but tough-minded friend of the poor, the simple 
strategy has involved the displacement of the concept of 
unemployment by that of welfare dependency. The idea of 
welfare dependency is inherently obfuscatory, part of the 
inverted world of magical thinking the Tories have been all 
too successful at pushing in opposition. In Thatcher’s day, 
unemployment was the price to pay for reconstruction; now, 
insofar as the Tories now mention unemployment at all, it is 
posited only as an effect of welfare dependency. Just as the 
state “crowds out” private sector entrepreneurialism, so — 
we are solemnly informed — the benefit system obstructs the 
capacity of people to act in their own interests. The Tories 
now can sound like inverted Marxists who aren’t attacking 
individuals, but the system which produces their behaviour. 
In the immortal words of Grant Shapps: “It is not that these 
people were trying to play the system, so much as these 
people were forced into a system that played them.” By 
shifting the focus onto the benefits system, the Tories can 
pose as the good patrician parent, offering the tough love 
solution to the bureaucratic indulgences of left paternalism. 
Meanwhile, Labour shuffles uncomfortably in the 
shadows, looking at its feet, before offering up its depressing 


policy review on the future of welfare.* This confirms what 
few could have doubted: that Labour has learned next to 
nothing from the failures of Blairism, and that its only 
strategy is to hide out, do nothing to frighten the horses, and 
wait for government to be handed back to them as a 
consequence of discontent with the Tories. Without Blair’s 


charismatic thespianry and false hopes, without even the 
Shakespearean drama of Brown’s blighted leadership, an 
atmosphere of deathly, affectless decadence has settled over 
the Labour Party. Populist but not very popular, Labour has 
become a dead mechanism animated by a blind drive: win 
elections. It is an election-winning machine which can barely 
win elections, and which has long ago forgotten why you 
would want to win an election in the first place. By contrast, 
the Tories have a feverish sense of purpose. They serve 
ruling-class interests even when not in power by dragging the 
“centre” ground to the right. Once in government, they 
impose their policy agenda at high speed, without majority or 
mandate, retrospectively justifying it, if they bother to justify 
it at all, with the kind of “debate” we saw last week. 

No doubt Labour’s silence last week — allowing it to seem 
as if Owen Jones was the only voice speaking up on 
mainstream media against the benefit cuts — is motivated by 
its awareness that attacks on benefits are popular amongst 


elements of the working class.° But rather than challenging 
this failure of class consciousness and the myths which 
contribute to it, rather than beginning the difficult work of 


unpicking this negative solidarity, Labour of course 
acquiesces in it. 
The fact that the right is “using value-laden and 


pejorative language when discussing benefits and welfare”? is 
not some moral or intellectual error on its part — it is a crude 
but remorselessly effective form of neuro-linguistic 
programming, designed to create a series of enduring 
associations which become embedded in the political 


unconscious. (Some of the miserable effects of this anti- 
benefits discourse are outlined in painful detail in this 


moving blog post.) Here, as with the infamous attempts to 
shift the blame for the deficit from capitalist crisis onto the 
Labour Party, the technique is incantatory repetition. The 
Tories know that if phrases and memes are repeated enough 
times, facts can be suspended. The reality technicians 
running the right understand that, as Freud said, there is no 
negation in the unconscious. No matter how much Owen 
Jones refuted the “arguments” of the right on radio and TV 
last week, they made hegemonic ground simply by the fact 
that they had managed to create a chain of equivalence 
connecting a child murderer with welfare. Whether the right 
actually choreographed their positions doesn’t much matter, 
they still functioned as a coordinated campaign (the right is 
much better at class solidarity than us, performing it 
instinctively). The Mail fulfilled its usual role as outlier, 
floating an “outrageous” position which it inevitably tempts 
other media outlets into propagating, thus allowing Cameron 
and Osborne to “respond” in an apparently more measured — 
but actually only minimally distanced — way. The right won 
ground by the sheer fact that the “debate” was happening, 
and anything we do could only ever be a question of clawing 
back territory. The right is on the front foot, and we, as ever, 
are playing catch-up. 

It’s worth reflecting a little on the techniques deployed by 
the Mail — the most-read online newspaper in the world, 
remember — not least because they involve a certain 
complicity on our part. “Outrage” is the Mail’s stock in trade, 
and the bind we’re in is that we seem compelled to provide 


more than our fair share of it. Outrage is not merely 
impotent, it is actively counterproductive, feeding the very 
enemy we claim to want to defeat. That’s because, firstly, 
outrage is part of the very currency of what Jodi Dean calls 
communicative capitalism, which depends not on content but 
on the sheer circulation of messages. Even when the Mail was 
vilified for its headline, such vilification only becomes the 
libidinal juice of the Mail’s communicative capitalism (there 
will be more messages, more posts, more tweets; we will read 
even if we don’t “want” to; we will read because we’re not 
supposed to). Secondly, since there is an infinite supply of 
things to be outraged about, the tendency towards outrage 
indefinitely locks us up in a series of reactive battles, fought 
on the enemy’s territory and on its terms. (How many of us 
on the left, faced with our social media timelines when we 
wake up in the morning, don’t feel a certain weariness, as we 
ask ourselves, what are we supposed to be outraged about 
today?). Thirdly, outrage reflects a fundamental political 
misunderstanding, both of our opponents and of the war that 
they are waging. Such outrage, as Wendy Brown puts it in her 
crucial essay “Moralism as Anti-Politics”, “implicitly figures 
the state (and other mainstream institutions) as if it did not 
have specific political and economic investments, as if it were 
not the codification of various dominant social powers, but 
was, rather, a momentarily misguided parent who forgot her 


promise to treat all her children the same way.”’ We use the 
rhetoric of class war, but too often we behave as if we are 
engaging in liberal debate with ungentlemanly opponents, 
whose social power will evaporate once the “errors” in their 
arguments are pointed out. 


In an important blog post last year,®> Adam Kotsko 
discussed this liberal leftist compulsion — rife in social media 
— to point to superficial contradictions in conservative 


They believe in small government... until it comes 
time to control women’s bodies!’ Zing!” The problem is that 


ideology. 


these kind of sarcastic dismissals confuse argumentative or 
philosophical incoherence with strategic incoherence. The 
stated rationales for right-wing positions may not make much 
add up philosophically, but seen 


in terms of strategy, they all make perfect sense. Taken 
together, they serve to blame the victims, assert that 
the powerful are powerful for moral reasons, and then 
claim that the role of government is to endorse and 
reinforce the morally-discovered power structure 
rather than futilely try to disrupt it. The arguments 
might clash on a superficial level, but their effects are 
perfectly coherent and rational once the goal is 
granted. 


As Kotsko observes, the “stated rationales” are libidinal lures 
which 


function as a kind of weapon against liberals, who jump 
at the chance to engage and disprove — and will 
happily waste infinite amounts of time doing so. It’s like 
a drug for a certain type of ‘reasonable liberal’: they’re 
showing their broad-mindedness by engaging in 
dialogue with their ideological enemies, and they’re 
showing their intellectual superiority! 


The implication of all this is not that we should withdraw 
from the debates the right imposes. Once these debates have 
been set up, we need to firefight, and Owen Jones did a great 
job last week. But if the right have engaged our resources in 
permanent firefight mode, that is already a significant victory 
for it. Just as we can’t simply withdraw from debates, we can’t 
just ignore the Mail either. The idea that the Mail will vanish if 
we simply don’t click on links to its stories is as fallacious as 
the idea that we can destroy capitalism by being ethical 
consumers. Ignoring the Mail will only mean that we don’t 
come to terms with the way it shapes what is taken for social 
reality. We must engage, just not on its terms. Instead of the 
“hot” response of outrage (with its immediate nugget of 
satisfaction, achieved at the cost of a long-term political 
impotence), we need a cooler stance of appraising the 
enemy’s weapons and strategies, and thinking about how to 
counter, overcome and ultimately outwit them. Is a left-wing 
version of the Mail possible? If not, how could we construct a 
discursive hub that is as successful for the left as the Mail is 
for the right? This needs to be part of a broader strategy of 
devoting our energy and resources to goals and projects that 
will deliver change in the long-term, breaking us out of the 
short-termism that has become endemic in the age of Twitter. 
What we need to overturn is something that has been the 
case since before Thatcher’s rise to power — the tendency for 
reactionary political forces to be pro-active, and for 
progressives to be reactive. 


suffering with a 


smile! 


“T usually get up at 5 or 5.15am. Historically, I would 
start sending emails when I got up. But not everyone is 
on my time schedule, so I have tried to wait until 7am. 
Before I email, I work out, read, and use our products. 
[...] I am not a big sleeper and never have been. Life is 
too exciting to sleep.” 


“I quickly scan my emails while my son is taking over 
my bed and having his milk. Urgent ones I reply to 
there and then. I flag others to follow up on my 
commute into work. [...] I receive an average of 500 
emails a day, so I email throughout the day.” 


— “What Time Do CEOs Wake Up?”” 


These two accounts — both taken from a Guardian article 
entitled “What Time Do CEOs Wake Up?” — might have been 
designed to illustrate the theses of post-autonomist theorists 
such as Antonio Negri, Paolo Virno and Franco “Bifo” Berardi. 


Labour is essentially communicative. The boundaries between 
work and life are permeable. The incessant demands of 
semiocapitalism stretch the limits of physical organisms. 
Email means that there is no such thing as a workplace or a 
working day. You start working the minute you wake up. 

These descriptions of a CEO’s day also prove Deleuze and 
Guattari’s claim in Anti-Oedipus that, in capitalism, 


there are no longer even any masters, but only slaves 
commanding other slaves [...] The bourgeois sets the 
example [...]: more utterly enslaved than the lowest of 
slaves, he is the first servant of the ravenous machine, 
the beast of the reproduction of capital [...] “I too am a 
slave” — these are the new words spoken by the 


master.° 


At the top of the tower, there is no liberation from work. 
There is just more work — the only difference is that you 
might now enjoy it (life is too exciting for sleep). For these 
CEOs, work is closer to an addiction than something they are 
forced to do. In a provisional formulation, we might want to 
posit a new way of construing class antagonism. There are 
now two classes: those addicted to work, and those forced to 
work. But this isn’t quite accurate. Whether we are working 
for our employers (who pay us) or for Mark Zuckerberg (who 
doesn’t), most of us find ourselves compulsively gripped by 
the imperatives of communicative capitalism (to check email, 
to update our statuses). This mode of work makes Sisyphus’s 
interminable labours seem quaint; at least, Sisyphus was 
condemned to perform the same task over and over again. 


Semio-capitalism is more like confronting the mythical 
hydra: cut off one head and three more grow in its place, the 
more emails we answer, the more we receive in return. 

The good old days of exploitation, where the boss was 
interested in the worker only to the extent that they 
produced a commodity which could be sold at a profit, are 
long gone. Work then meant the annihilation of subjectivity, 
your reduction to an impersonal machine-part; it was the 
price that you paid for time away from work. Now, there is no 
time away from work, and work is not opposed to 
subjectivity. All time is entrepreneurial time because we are 
the commodities, so that any time not spent selling ourselves 
is wasted time. Hence, like the characters in the film Limitless, 
we’re always seeking ways to increase the time available to us 
— via intoxicants, cutting back on sleep, working while we 
commute... The unemployed do not escape this condition — 
the simulation tasks that they are now induced to perform in 
order to qualify for benefit are more than preparations for 
the futility of paid work, they are already work (for what is so 
much “real” work if not an act of simulation? You don’t just 
have to work, you have to be seen working, even when there’s 
no “work” to do...) 

Being exploited is no longer enough. The nature of labour 
now is such that almost anyone, no matter how menial their 
position, is required to be seen (over)investing in their work. 
What we are forced into is not merely work, in the old sense 
of undertaking an activity we don’t want to perform; no, now 
we are forced to act as if we want to work. Even if we want to 
work in a burger franchise, we have to prove that, like reality 
TV contestants, we really want it. The notorious shift towards 


affective labour in the Global North means that it is no longer 
possible to just turn up at work and be miserable. Your 
misery has to be concealed — who wants to listen to a 
depressed call centre worker, to be served by a sad waiter, or 
be taught by an unhappy lecturer? 

Yet that’s not quite right. The subjugatory libidinal forces 
that draw enjoyment from the current cult of work don’t 
want us to entirely conceal our misery. For what enjoyment is 
there to be had from exploiting a worker who actually 
delights in their work? In his sequel to Blade Runner, The Edge 
of Human, K.W. Jeter provides an insight into the libidinal 
economics of work and suffering. One of the novel’s 
characters answers the question of why, in Blade Runner’s 
future world, the Tyrell Corporation bothered developing 
replicants (androids constructed so that only experts can 
distinguish them from humans): 


Why should the off-world colonists want troublesome, 
humanlike slaves rather than nice, efficient machines? 
It’s simple. Machines don’t suffer. They aren’t capable 
of it. A machine doesn’t know when it’s being raped. 
There’s no power relationship between you and a 
machine. [...] For the replicant to suffer, to give its 
owners that whole master-slave energy, it has to have 
emotions. [...] The replicant’s emotions aren’t a design 
flaw. The Tyrell Corporation put them there. Because 
that’s what our customers wanted. 


The reason that it’s so easy to whip up loathing for 
“benefit scroungers” is that — in the reactionary fantasy — 


they have escaped the suffering to which those in work have 
to submit. This fantasy tells its own story: the hatred for 
benefits claimants is really about how much people hate their 
own work. Others should suffer as we do: the slogan of a 
negative solidarity that cannot imagine any escape from the 
immiseration of work. 

To understand work now, consider the pornographic 
practice of bukkake. Here, men ejaculate in women’s faces, 
and the women are required to act as if they enjoy it, to 
lasciviously lick the semen from their lips as if it is the most 
delicious honey. What’s being elicited from the women is an 
act of simulation. The humiliation is not adequate unless they 
are seen to be performing an enjoyment they don’t actually 
feel. Paradoxically, however, the subjugation is only complete 
if there are some traces of resistance. A happy smile, 
ritualised submission; this is nothing unless signs of misery 
can also be detected in the eyes. 


how to killa 
zombie: strategising 


the end of 


neoliberalism1 


Why has the left made so little progress five years after a 
major crisis of capitalism discredited neoliberalism? Since 
2008, neoliberalism might have been deprived of the feverish 
forward momentum it once possessed, but it is nowhere near 
collapsing. Neoliberalism now shambles on as zombie — but 
as the afficionados of zombie films are well aware, it is 
sometimes harder to kill a zombie than a living person. 

At the conference in York, Milton Friedman’s notorious 
remark was quoted a number of times: 


Only a crisis — actual or perceived — produces real 
change. When that crisis occurs, the actions that are 


taken depend on the ideas that are lying around. That, I 
believe, is our basic function: to develop alternatives to 
existing policies, to keep them alive and available until 
the politically impossible becomes the politically 
inevitable. 


The problem is that although the 2008 crisis was caused by 
neoliberal policies, those selfsame policies remain practically 
the only ones “lying around”. As a_ consequence, 
neoliberalism is still politically inevitable. 

It is by no means clear that the public has ever embraced 
neoliberal doctrines with much enthusiasm — but what 
people have been persuaded of is the idea that there is no 
alternative to neoliberalism. The (typically reluctant) 
acceptance of this state of affairs is the hallmark of capitalist 
realism. Neoliberalism may not have succeeded in making 
itself more attractive than other systems, but it has sold itself 
as the only “realistic” mode of governance. The sense of 
“realism” here is a hard won political achievement, and 
neoliberalism has succeeded in imposing a model of reality 
modeled on practices and assumptions coming out of the 
business world. 

Neoliberalism consolidated the discrediting of state 
socialism, establishing a vision of history in which it laid 
claim to the future and consigned the left to obsolescence. It 
captured the discontent with centralised bureacratic leftism, 
successfully absorbing and metabolising the desires for 
freedom and autonomy that had emerged in the wake of the 
Sixties. But — and this is a crucial point — this isn’t to say 
that those desires inevitably and necessarily led to the rise of 


neoliberalism. Rather, we can see the success of neoliberalism 
as a symptom of the leftist failure to adequately respond to 
these new desires. As Stuart Hall and others involved in the 
New Times project of the 1980s prophetically insisted, this 
failure would prove catastrophic for the left. 

Capitalist realism can be described as the belief that there 
is no alternative to capitalism. However, it is more usually 
manifest not in grand claims about political economy, but in 
more banal behaviours and expectations, such as our weary 
acceptance that pay and conditions will stagnate or 
deteriorate. 

Capitalist realism has been sold us to by managers (many 
of whom see themselves as left-wing) who tell us that things 
are different now. The age of the organised working class is 
over; union power is receding; business now rules, and we 
must fall into line. The self-surveillance work that workers 
are now routinely required to perform — all those self- 
assessments, performance reviews, log books — is, we have 
been persuaded, a small price to pay for keeping our jobs. 

Take the Research Excellence Framework (REF) — a 
system for assessing the research output of academics in the 
UK. This massive system of bureaucratic monitoring is widely 
reviled by those subject to it, but any opposition to it has so 
far been token. This double situation — in which something is 
loathed but at the same time complied with — is typical of 
capitalist realism, and is particularly poignant in the case of 
academia, one of the supposed strongholds of the left. 

Capitalist realism is an expression of class decomposition, 
and a consequence of the disintegration of class 
consciousness. Fundamentally, neoliberalism must be seen as 


a project which aimed to achieve this end. It was not 
primarily — at least not in practice — dedicated to freeing up 
the market from state control. Rather, it was about 
subordinating the state to the power of capital. As David 
Harvey has tirelessly argued, neoliberalism was a project 
which aimed to reassert class power. 

As the traditional sources of working-class power were 
defeated or subdued, neoliberal doctrines functioned as 
weapons in a class war increasingly fought by one side only. 
Concepts like the “market” and “competition” have 
functioned not as the real ends of neoliberal policy, but as its 
guiding myths and ideological alibi. Capital has no interest in 
either the health of markets, or in competition. As Manuel 
DeLanda, following Fernand Braudel, has argued, capitalism, 
with its tendency towards monopoly and oligopoly, can more 
accurately be defined as anti-market rather than as a system 
which promotes thriving markets. 

David Blacker mordantly observes in his forthcoming 
book, The Falling Rate of Learning and the Neoliberal Endgame, 
that the virtues of “competition” are “conveniently to be 
reserved only for the masses. Competition and risk is for 
small businesses and other little people like private and 
public sector employees.” The invocation of competition has 
functioned as an ideological weapon — its real aim is the 
destruction of solidarity, and, as such, it has been remarkably 
successful. 

Competition in education (both amongst institutions and 
amongst individuals) is not something that spontaneously 
emerges once state regulation is removed — on the contrary, 
it is something actively produced by new kinds of state 


control. The REF and the school inspections regime overseen 
in the UK by OFSTED are both classic examples of this 
syndrome. 

Since there is no automatic way to “marketise” education 
and other public services and there is no straightforward way 
of quantifying the “productivity” of workers such as teachers, 
the imposition of business discipline has meant the 
installation of colossal bureaucratic machineries. So an 
ideology which promised to liberate us from state socialist 
bureaucracy has instead imposed a bureaucracy all of its own. 

This only looks like a paradox if we take neoliberalism at 
its word — but neoliberalism is not classic liberalism. It is not 
about laissez faire. As Jeremy Gilbert, developing Foucault’s 
prescient analyses of neoliberalism, has argued, the 
neoliberal project was always about vigilantly policing a 
certain model of individualism; workers have to be 
continually surveilled for fear they might lapse into 
collectivity. 

If we refuse to accept neoliberalism’s rationales — that 
control systems brought in from business were intended to 
improve workers’ efficiency — then it becomes clear that the 
anxiety produced by the REF and other managerialist 
mechanisms is not some accidental side-effect of these 
systems — it is their real aim. 

And if neoliberalism will not collapse of its own accord, 
what can be done to hasten its demise? 


Reject Strategies That Don’t Work 


In a dialogue between Franco “Bifo” Berardi and me 


published in Frieze,?, Berardi talked of “our present 
theoretical impotence in the face of the dehumanising 


” ae 


process provoked by finance capitalism.” “I can’t deny 


reality”, Berardi continued, 


which seems to me to be this: the last wave of the 
movement — say 2010 to 2011 — was an attempt to 
revitalise a massive subjectivity. This attempt failed: we 
have been unable to stop the financial aggression. The 
movement has now disappeared, only emerging in the 
form of fragmentary explosions of despair. 


Bifo, one of the activists involved with the so-called 
autonomist movement in Italy in the 1970s, here identifies 
the rhythm that has defined anti-capitalist struggle since 
2008: exhilarating outbursts of militancy recede as quickly as 
they erupt, without producing any sustained change. 

I hear Bifo’s remarks as a requiem for the “horizontalist” 
strategies that have dominated anti-capitalism since the 
Nineties. The problem with these strategies is not their 
(noble) aims — the abolition of hierarchy, the rejection of 
authoritarianism — but their efficacy. Hierarchy cannot be 
abolished by fiat, and a movement which fetishises 
organisational form over effectiveness concedes ground to 
the enemy. The dismantling of the many existing forms of 
stratification will be a long, arduous and attritional process; it 
isn’t simply a matter of eschewing (official) leaders and 
adopting “horizontal” forms of organisation. 

Neo-anarchist horizontalism has tended to favour 
strategies of direct action and withdrawal — people need to 


take action now and for themselves, not wait for 
compromised elected representatives to act in their stead; at 
the same time, they should withdraw from institutions that 
are not contingently, but necessarily corrupt. 

The emphasis on direct action, though, conceals a despair 
about the possibility of indirect action. Yet it is via indirect 
action that the control of ideological narratives is achieved. 
Ideology isn’t about what you or I spontaneously believe, but 
about what we believe that the Other believes — and this 
belief is still determined to a large extent by the content of 
mainstream media. 

Neo-anarchist doctrine maintains that we should abandon 
mainstream media and parliament — but our abandoning it 
has only allowed the neoliberals to extend their power and 
influence. The neoliberal right might preach the end of the 
state, but only while ensuring that it controls governments. 

Only the horizontalist left believes the rhetoric about the 
obsolescence of the state. The danger of the neo-anarchist 
critique is that it essentialises the state, parliamentary 
democracy and “mainstream media” — but none of these 
things is forever fixed. They are mutable terrains to be 
struggled over, and the shape they now assume is itself the 
effect of previous struggles. It seems, as times, as if the 
horizontalists want to occupy everything except parliament 
and the mainstream media. But why not occupy the state and 
the media too? Neo-anarchism isn’t so much of a challenge to 
capitalist realism as it is one of its effects. Anarchist fatalism 
— according to which it is easier to imagine the end of 
capitalism than a left-wing Labour Party — is the complement 
of the capitalist realist insistence that there is no alternative 


to capitalism. 

None of this is to say that occupying mainstream media or 
politics will be enough in themselves. If New Labour taught us 
anything, it was that holding office is by no means the same 
thing as winning hegemony. Yet without a parliamentary 
strategy of some kind, movements will keep foundering and 
collapsing. The task is to make the links between the extra- 
parliamentary energies of the movements and _ the 
pragmatism of those within existing institutions. 


Retrain Ourselves to Adopt a War Mentality 


If you want to consider the most telling drawback of 
horizontalism, though, think about how it looks from the 
perspective of the enemy. Capital must be delighted by the 
popularity of horizontalist discourses in the anti-capitalist 
movement. Would you rather face a carefully co-ordinated 
enemy, or one that takes decisions via nine-hour 
“assemblies”? 

Which isn’t to say that we should fall back into the 
consoling fantasy that any kind of return to old-school 
Leninism is either possible or desirable. The fact that we have 
been left with a choice between Leninism and anarchism is a 
measure of current leftist impotence. 

It’s crucial to leave behind this sterile binary. The struggle 
against authoritarianism needn’t entail neo-anarchism, just 
as effective organisation doesn’t necessarily require a 
Leninist party. What is required, however, is taking seriously 
the fact that we are up against an enemy that has no doubt at 
all that it is in a class war, and which devotes many of its 


enormous resources training its people to fight it. There’s a 
reason that MBA students read The Art of War, and if we are to 
make progress we have to rediscover the desire to win and 
the confidence that we can. 

We must learn to overcome certain habits of anti-Stalinist 
thinking. The danger is not anymore, nor has it been for some 
time, excessive dogmatic fervor on our side. Instead, the post- 
68 left has tended to overvalue the negative capability of 
remaining in doubt, scepticism and uncertainties — this may 
be an aesthetic virtue, but it is a political vice. The self-doubt 
that has been endemic on the left since the Sixties is little in 
evidence on the right — one reason that the right has been so 
successful in imposing its programme. Many on the left now 
quail at the thought of formulating a programme, still less 
“imposing” one. But we have to give up on the belief that 
people will spontaneously turn to the left, or that 
neoliberalism will collapse without our actively dismantling 
it. 


Rethink Solidarity 


The old solidarity that neoliberalism decomposed has gone, 
never to return. But this does not mean that we are consigned 
to atomised individualism. Our challenge now is to reinvent 
solidarity. Alex Williams has come up with the suggestive 
formulation “post-Fordist plasticity” to describe what this 
new solidarity might look like. As Catherine Malabou has 
shown, plasticity is not the same as elasticity. Elasticity is 
equivalent to the flexibility which neoliberalism demands of 
us, in which we assume a form imposed from outside. But 


plasticity is something else: it implies both adaptability and 
resilience, a capacity for modification which also retains a 
“memory” of previous encounters. 

Rethinking solidarity in these terms may help us to give 
up some tired assumptions. This kind of solidarity doesn’t 
necessarily entail overarching unity or centralised control. 
But moving beyond unity needn’t lead us into the flatness of 
horizontalism, either. Instead of the rigidity of unity — the 
aspiration for which, ironically, has contributed to the left’s 
notorious sectarianism — what we need is the coordination of 
diverse groups, resources and desires. The right have been 
better postmodernists than us, building successful coalitions 
out of heterogeneous interest groups without the need for an 
overall unity. We must learn from them, to start to build a 
similar patchwork on our side. This is more a logistical 
problem than a philosophical one. 

In addition to the plasticity of organisational form, we 
need also to pay attention to the plasticity of desire. Freud 
said that the libidinal drives are “extraordinarily plastic”. If 
desire is not a fixed biological essence, then there is no 
natural desire for capitalism. Desire is always composed. 
Advertisers, branders and PR consultants have always known 
this, and the struggle against neoliberalism will require that 
we construct an alternative model of desire that can compete 
with the one pushed by capital’s libidinal technicians. 

What’s certain is that we are now in an ideological 
wasteland in which neoliberalism is dominant only by 
default. The terrain is up for grabs, and Friedman’s remark 
should be our inspiration: it is now our task to develop 
alternatives to existing policies, to keep them alive and 


available until the politically impossible becomes the 
politically inevitable. 


getting away with 


murder! 


The Mark Duggan verdict was both shocking and predictable. 
Shocking, because it is a verdict that so clearly ignores not 
only evidence but blatant inconsistencies in evidence. 
Predictable, because we are now accustomed to seeing the 
Met getting away with murder. 


As Stafford Scott’s piece in the Guardian* today makes 
clear, the police case explanation for what happened was an 
obvious fabrication that lacked even minimal coherence. It’s a 
classic example of kettle logic, in which the police’s obvious 
cover-up actually undermined the rationale for shooting 
Duggan. Either Mark Duggan was holding a gun when he died 
— as officer V53 claimed at the inquest — or he threw the gun 
away. If the former, how could the gun end up seven metres 
away from him (and without any trace of his fingerprints or 
DNA on it)? If the latter, then how could Mark Duggan have 
been thought to have pose sufficient threat that he had to be 
shot dead? At best, the operation was a monumental blunder 
— compounded by a cover-up which was at least as inept. So 


how do we explain the jury’s perverse decision? 

Partly, we have to look to the legal framework itself. As 
Christian Werthschulte observed in a Facebook comment last 
night, when we read the official verdict, we see that “the jury 
is somehow made to ask themselves if they had felt 
threatened if they’d been in the shoes of the police officer in 
order to conclude if the killing was lawful or not. Inevitably 
this will lead to a ‘Oh, I would’ve been scared, too!’ reaction.” 
This is both absurd and terrifying, given the amount of sub- 
machine guns that Met officers carry around London. If the 
question posed to juries in such cases is going to be “might 
you, an ordinary member of the public, have been scared”, 
then it’s hard to see what would ever constitute an unlawful 
killing. 

Then we have to look at the broader reality management 
operation that swings into place in these contingencies. If the 
plebgate story revealed anything, it was the brazen and 
slapdash nature of Met fabrications, which they can get away 
with because they can usually count on the supine support of 
Tories and the right-wing press. In the Duggan case, we saw 


the Met’s standard tactic of leading with a totally false story’ 


which is later repudiated* but only after the tone has been 
set. Then there is the demonisation of the victim, which 
Stafford Scott describes: 


immediately after the shooting the police and the 
Independent Police Complaints Commission began to 
brief the media with inaccurate and misleading 
information that ensured that Duggan was demonised, 
even before his body had turned cold. The headlines 


declared him a gangster who was on a mission to 
avenge the killing of his cousin, Kelvin Easton. 
However, during the inquest no evidence was offered in 
support of this claim. It was further alleged that he was 
a large-scale drugs dealer, but yet again not a shred of 
evidence was provided to substantiate these allegations. 
But that did not matter, the mud had been slung and it 
clearly stuck as it was designed to. Even now most 
people still do not realise that he was only ever 
convicted for two relatively minor offences — one 
count of cannabis possession, and one count of 
receiving stolen goods. 


The description of Mark Duggan as a “gangster” then 
reliably triggers a whole set of racist associations, which we 
can quickly grasp when we compare the way in which white 
criminals such as the Krays (“they only killed their own and 
they loved their muvvas”), or Ronnie Biggs (involved in a 
violent crime, but treated as a cuddly rogue) are 
mythologised. We might also pause to note that Raoul Moat 
was able to kill people over the course of a number of days 
before “shooting himself”. 

All of this then prepares the way, not only for the jury to 
see Mark Duggan in the worse possible light, but for those 
hearing of the verdict to agree with the jury’s exculpation of 
the police marksman. I saw any number of comments last 
night to the effect of “well, he had a gun, what was he going 
to do with it?” Again, this is terrifying: apparently, it was OK 
to kill Mark Duggan because of what he might have done. The 
era of pre-crime is truly upon us. 


Then, of course, there is the massive overload of ambient 
propaganda in favour of the police. The police don’t 
themselves have to generate this; it is freely provided by the 
right-wing media, but also by a popular culture which 
overwhelmingly depicts the police as either heroic or 
“ordinary but flawed people, doing a tough job”. 

All of this must have produced some sort of cognitive 
dissonance in the jury. All the evidence pointed to Duggan 
not being armed when he was shot — as the jury itself 
conceded. Furthermore, the blatant cover-up with the gun 
should have fatally undermined the Met’s story. But no (so 
the “reasoning” must have gone) — the police cannot be 
guilty, a priori, therefore they are not. 

Now the verdict has to be protected, and the next stage of 
reality management comes into effect. What we’re now seeing 
at the moment is the trooping out of right-wing politicians 
and commentators calling on Mark Duggan’s family to 
“respect the law”. As with the families of the Hillsborough 
victims, the family will now be smeared as crazed with grief, 
hysterical, their desire to set right a terrible injustice will be 
pathologised and attributed to an inability to move on. If the 
reality management system is allowed to do its work 
unobstructed, we can expect the truth to dribble out in 
twenty or thirty years’ time, as it did with Hillsborough, or, 
more recently, with the Miners’ Strike. By then, the man who 
pulled the trigger and those who aided and abetted in the 
cover-up will be either pensioned off or dead. Either way, 
they will be beyond the reach of any justice. 

I write this not as some ACAB-anarchist, but as someone 
well aware of the mundane realities of much police work, 


which increasingly involves attempting to manage the 
disintegration of civil society brought about by neoliberalism. 
Yet surely it is by now clear that the Met is a systematically 
corrupt force. It is equally clear that the IPCC is a joke, and 
that courts cannot be relied upon to deliver the right 
verdicts. 

Systemic problems require systemic solutions. While 
Mark Duggan’s family must be supported in their quest for 
justice, this should not allowed to be seen as an isolated 
incident. Somehow, the whole system — the Met, the media, 
the judiciary — which produced this perverse verdict needs to 
be brought to account, and ultimately replaced. 

The significance of Hackgate was that it started to bring 
these systemic complicities — this “dark network comprising 
private investigators, the criminal underworld, tabloid 
newspapers, multinational media conglomerates, the police, 
politicians, the banks, and the bodies supposed to regulate 
them (who are at best impotent, at worst part of the 
problem)” — into the open. The reality management system 
was strained then, but whether it will suffer any serious 
damage will be partly determined by the results of the 
ongoing trial of two of Murdoch’s reality managers. It’s might 
be that, as with Vito and Michael Corleone, there are too 
many layers of subordinates between Coulson and Brooks and 
those who committed the actual crimes for a jury to find 
them guilty this time. But the cracks in the old reality 
management system are real. It’s an open question as to how 
long they can keep being smoothed over. 


no one is bored, 
everything is 


boring? 


One of the most intriguing and provocative pieces on politics 
and culture this year was We Are All Very Anxious by the 
Institute of Precarious Consciousness (the essay gained a 
great deal of attention when it was republished on Plan C’s 


website).” It argues that the key problematic affect capitalism 
now faces is anxiety. In an earlier, Fordist era, it was boredom 
that was the “dominant reactive affect”. Repetitive labour on 
production lines engendered boredom, which was both the 
central form of subjugation under Fordism and the source of 
a new oppositional politics. 

It could be argued that the failure of the traditional left is 
tied up with its inability adequately to engage with this 
politics of boredom, which wasn’t articulated via trade unions 
or political parties, but via the cultural politics of the 
Situationists and the punks. It was the neoliberals, not the 


organised left, who were best able to absorb and 
instrumentalise this critique of boredom. Neoliberals quickly 
moved to associate Fordist factories and the stability and 
security of social democracy with tedium, predictability and 
top-down bureaucracy. In place of this, the neoliberals 
offered excitement and unpredictability — but the downside 
of these newly fluid conditions is perpetual anxiety. Anxiety 
is the emotional state that correlates with the (economic, 
social, existential) precariousness which neoliberal 
governance has normalised. 

The Institute of Precarious Consciousness were right to 
observe that too much anti-capitalist politics is locked into 
strategies and perspectives that were formed in an era when 
the struggle was against boredom. They are also correct both 
that capitalism has effectively solved the problem of 
boredom, and that it is crucial that the left finds ways of 
politicising anxiety. Neoliberal culture — which came to 
dominance as the anti-psychiatry movement was waning — 
has individualised depression and anxiety. Or rather, many 
cases of depression and anxiety are the effects of 
neoliberalism’s successful tendency to privatise stress, to 
convert political antagonisms into medical conditions. 

At the same time, I believe that the argument about 
boredom has to be somewhat nuanced. It is certainly true 
that one could feel almost nostalgic for Boredom 1.0. The 
dreary void of Sundays, the night hours after television 
stopped broadcasting, even the endless dragging minutes 
waiting in queues or for public transport: for anyone who has 
a smartphone, this empty time has now been effectively 
eliminated. In the intensive, 24/7 environment of capitalist 


cyberspace, the brain is no longer allowed any time to idle; 
instead, it is inundated with a seamless flow of low-level 
stimulus. 

Yet boredom was ambivalent; it wasn’t simply a negative 
feeling that one simply wanted rid of. For punk, the vacancy 
of boredom was a challenge, an injunction and an 
opportunity: if we are bored, then it is for us to produce 
something that will fill up the space. Yet, it is through this 
demand for participation that capitalism has neutralised 
boredom. Now, rather than imposing a pacifying spectacle on 
us, capitalist corporations go out of their way to invite us to 
interact, to generate our own content, to join the debate. 
There is now neither an excuse nor an opportunity to be 
bored. 

But if the contemporary form of capitalism has extirpated 
boredom, it has not vanquished the boring. On the contrary — 
you could argue that the boring is ubiquitous. For the most 
part, we’ve given up any expectation of being surprised by 
culture — and that goes for “experimental” culture as much 
as popular culture. Whether it is music that sounds like it 
could have come out twenty, thirty, forty years ago, 
Hollywood blockbusters that recycle and reboot concepts, 
characters and tropes that were exhausted long ago, or the 
tired gestures of so much contemporary art, the boring is 
everywhere. It is just that no one is bored — because there is 
no longer any subject capable of being bored. For boredom is 
a state of absorption — a state of high absorption, in fact, 
which is why it is such an oppressive feeling. Boredom 
consumes our being; we feel we will never escape it. But it is 
just this capacity for absorption that is now under attack, as a 


result of the constant dispersal of attention, which is integral 
to capitalist cyberspace. If boredom is a form of empty 
absorption, then more positive forms of absorption 
effectively counter it. But it is these forms of absorption 
which capitalism cannot deliver. Instead of absorbing us, it 
distracts from the boring. 

Perhaps the feeling most characteristic of our current 
moment is a mixture of boredom and compulsion. Even 
though we recognise that they are boring, we nevertheless 
feel compelled to do yet another Facebook quiz, to read yet 
another Buzzfeed list, to click on some celebrity gossip about 
someone we don’t even remotely care about. We endlessly 
move among the boring, but our nervous systems are so 
overstimulated that we never have the luxury of feeling 
bored. No one is bored, everything is boring. 


a time for shadows! 


Jean Baudrillard’s 1987 text The Ecstasy of Communication reads 
like an astonishing science-fictional prophecy of our current 
moment. Writing nearly thirty years ago, Baudrillard invoked 
an era of “absolute proximity, total instaneity”, of 
informational schizophrenia. “The schizo”, Baudrillard 
writes, “is bereft of every scene, open to everything in spite 
of himself [...] It is the end of interiority and intimacy, the 
overexposure and transparency of the world which traverses 


him without obstacle. He is now only a pure screen, a 


switching centre for all the networks of influence”.” 


Baudrillard’s heightened rhetoric captures what is now a 
banal experience — indeed, it might be the very signature of 
contemporary banality. With the ubiquity of smartphones, 
the feeling of being overwhelmed by cyberspatial injunctions 
is now commonplace. It is this strangely prescient 
anticipation of twentyfirst-century banality that makes 
reading Baudrillard’s text such an uncanny experience. (It as 
if Baudrillard was already writing about Twitter. What in the 
experience of 1980s French telecommunications could give 
Baudrillard this feeling of transparency, overload, instaneity 


— this sense of the overwhelming of privacy and the limits of 
the individual subject, to which social media has now 
habituated us?) 

Baudrillard wrote of a new era of “tactility”. According to 
Baudrillard, even in the 1980s, the spectacle was already 
superseded. The spectacle subjugated us to image; the tactile 
system, however, solicits our participation, enjoins us to join 
in. Again, this is a strikingly prescient observation of trends 
that are now dominant — corporations are no longer satisfied 
with bombarding us with hard sell propaganda, they want us 
to interact with them, like their Facebook page, comment 
using hashtags. 

Smartphones with touchscreen technology seem to secure 
the age of tactility. Yet, with smartphones, shouldn’t we 
rather talk of a touching without tactility? For the 
smartphone is certainly operated by touch, but it is a touch 
devoid of any sensuality. When the fingers encounter the 
glassy surface of the iPhone, everything they touch on the 
screen feels the same. The fingers are effectively acting as 
extensions of the eye and the brain — an eye and a brain that 
have now been radically re-habituated by cyberspace. The 
fingers become relays in a digital compulsion system, a set of 
digital triggers. Yet they are inefficient digital triggers, 
monkey digits that are too fat and lacking in suppleness to 
properly operate the touchscreen interface. If, as an episode 
of The Simpsons observed in a sight gag, the iPhone is 
strikingly reminiscent of the monoliths from 2001: A Space 
Odyssey, then too often when we are using them, we feel as 
primitive and as baffled as the apes in Kubrick’s film when 
faced with the enigmatic opacity of the monolith’s black 


surface. 

Of course, smartphones aren’t really phones at all. The 
term now favoured by airlines, “handheld electronic devices”, 
better captures what these machines are. (Increasingly, we 
are now permitted to use these devices the very moment that 
the aircraft lands — waiting until we get to the terminal is 
now deemed too long a wait.) The telephone function of the 
electronic handheld device is rapidly becoming archaic. As 
Sherry Turkle maintained in her recent book Alone Together, 
we have moved beyond the era of talking into a new age of 


text.Conversations present anxieties, which are 
circumvented by SMS and direct messages. 

For all that it evades older kinds of anxieties, Baudrillard’s 
circuit of constant contact generates a whole set of new ones. 
The pressure of the instantaneous — of what, in their new 
manifesto, “On the Creative Question — Nine Theses”, Geert 
Lovink, Sebastian Olma and Ned Rossiter call “frantic 


entrepreneurship and instant valorisation’* — inevitably 
weighs heavy on cultural producers. In an enigmatic but 
suggestive formulation, Lovink, Olma and Rossiter argue that 
the urgencies of the immediate need to be replaced by 
principles of “shadow and time”. “Shadow,” they write, 


is an unintended consequence, an event vacuum, which 
remains invisible for passers by. It does not register on 
the development maps of the managerial class. Time is 
needed in order for the substantially different to grow. 
Maturation, which is creative growth, requires time. 


It is imperative that we carve out some spaces beyond the 


hyper-bright instant. This instant is insomniac, amnesiac; it 
locks us into a reactive time, which is always full (of outrage 
and pseudo-novelty). There is no continuous time in which 
shadows can grow, only a time that is simultaneously 
seamless (without gaps: there is always “new” content 
streaming in) and discontinuous (each new compulsion 
makes us forget what preceded it). The result is a mechanical 
and unacknowledged repetition. Is it still possible for us to 
cultivate shadows? 


limbo is over! 


Tony Blair’s brief appearance in this election campaign, 
offering tepid support for a tepid Ed Miliband, ought to have 
been irrelevant. In many ways it was: who needs yesterday’s 
man, the hawker of an outmoded “modernisation”? Except, 
like so much of today’s culture, Blairism is obsolete but it has 
not yet been surpassed. 

In Blair’s Castle Grey Skull, it is always 1997. Blair is like 
some inverted Miss Havisham, frozen not at the moment of 
his defeat and failure, but just before his moment of greatest 
success. Be cautious, don’t do anything to jeapordise the 
project. Blairism was this particular form of false promise, 
this deferral — if we are careful now, tomorrow we can do 
more... But tomorrow never arrives, the aim is always to be in 
government, the price is always the lack of any real power to 
change the inherited parameters of the possible. This is the 
formula: government without power, an_ increasingly 
unpopular populism. 

The illusion of Blairism is that it was an overcoming of the 
defeats of the 1980s rather than their final consequence. It 
was a post-traumatic normalisation of catastrophe, not any 
sort of new dawn. Its legacy is organisational as much as 


ideological: a Labour Party that napalmed its grassroots 
(contempt for, and fear of the working class being a signature 
element of Blair’s rendition of populism) and which now 
beams down policy and PR from some rarefied Thick Of It 
Oxford PPE helicarrier circling miles above earth. The project 
remains getting into government, but without Blair’s 
showman-messiah charisma to cover over the vacuum 
beneath this aspiration. Miliband’s awkwardness stems as 
much from this lack of any vision as from any personal 
quirks. There is nothing animating the transparently 
choreographed moves: tack to the right on immigration, a 
little to the left on taxation, etc. The ambition — to be the 
slightly lesser evil — is painfully clear to all, and can inspire 
no one. 

All of this is exactly what we expected... But the entry of 
the SNP, Plaid Cymru and the Greens into the TV debates 
changed the atmosphere. Suddenly, the picture the reality 
managers have fed us for the last few years — the three “big” 
parties each offering a slightly different version of capitalist 
realism, with Farage and UKIP offering capitalist realism with 
even more ultra-nationalism — was interrupted, and it was 
possible to imagine that Britain was “headed, in its nuanced 


way, leftward”.? In their different ways, Sturgeon, Wood and 
Bennett have widened the bandwidth of a media-political 
scene previously monopolised by the Oxbridge boys’ club. In 
terms of policy, there isn’t much on offer beyond a reset to 


social democracy (Plan B as opposed to Austerity’s Plan A°), 
but capitalist realism is so deeply embedded that it was hard 
not to feel a frisson when, for instance, Wood defended trade 
unions and the welfare state. Cameron’s refusal to appear in 


the BBC debate — and his banning of Clegg from doing so — 
was meant as a display of magisterial confidence, the only 
credible Prime Minister rising above the irrelevant squabbling 
of lowly pretenders — but it ended up further reinforcing the 
sense of ennui that has attended his performances this 
campaign. Cameron’s appeal has always depended on his 
ruling-class ease-in-the-world, but, in his case especially, 
insouciance always risks shading into an appearance of 
diffidence and hauteur. As for the Lib Dems — as Craig 


McVegas observed* — their absence was barely even 
acknowledged in the last debate. 
Which brings us to the photograph analysed so well by 


Jonathan Jones in the Guardian” But, in addition to 
everything that Jones picks out, one of the most striking 
elements in the photograph is the empty centre. A clustering 
to the left, sulking Farage to the right, Cameron and Clegg — 
the current “centre” ground — absent. Here is one picture of 
a post-neoliberal UK: a soft left regaining its confidence on 
the one hand, a glowering far right on the other, nothing 
where the capitalist realist “middle” used to be. (Whether 
Farage will be the figure around which this right will coalesce 
is now open to serious doubt — with it looking as if he is 
unlikely to win South Thanet, it might be that his moment as 
the people’s stockbloker is already over. The ominous 
question is: if Farage falls, which right-wing demagogue will 
emerge to take his place?) 

The SNP-Labour coalition is far more than we could have 
hoped a few weeks ago, but it is far from enough. How have we 
settled for so little? asked an incendiary Russell Brand at the 
screening of his and Michael Winterbottom’s The Emperor’s 


New Clothes in Hackney this week. For those hipster priests 
who wish to keep activism a marginal pursuit, Brand’s fame 
and wealth automatically exclude him from being taken 
seriously. Yet fame, charisma and money are resources, and 
the left badly needs to be associated with glamour instead of 
moralising asceticism. Watching the film in a cinema 
alongside so many of those who feature in it — campaigners 
from the New Era estate, striking careworkers, fire-fighters — 


was moving, humbling, electrifying. The Free Association® 
have been doing some interesting work on why comedy has 
replaced music as a political force. Now, much more than any 
contemporary musician, it is Brand who embodies the 
psychedelic-Promethean principle that any given reality is 
provisional, plastic, subject to transformation by collective 
action. I love crowds... Brand functions as a figure of 
identification who intensifies and links together already 
existing struggles, and incites us to breach the invisible 
thresholds that lock us into atomised impotence. We can do 
what we want... Having passed through what on Tuesday he 
memorably called the “fame paddock” of contemporary 
celebrity, Brand is now in a practically unique position. 
Instead of remaining in the condition of hedonic melancholia 
typical of those with unlimited access to late capitalism’s 
pleasure gardens, he’s come out the other side, laughing his 
trickster laugh, with more resources and an invaluable 
insiderknowledge of how the media machine constructs what 
counts as reality. His gleeful performance of de-subordination 
reminds us of the countercultural lesson: if you gain money 
and success, there’s only one thing to do with the hand that 
feeds you, and that’s bite it. 


In many ways, The Emperor’s New Clothes tells us what we 
already know, but this is the point. How can we accept what 
we know, when what we know is so monstrous, so obscene, so 
insane? In the Q and A, Brand was asked why people care 
more about the X Factor than political struggles. But he 
argued that, rather than decrying the X Factor, its techniques 
— in particular those which incite emotion — need to be 
repurposed. “Capitalism has given us the organisms and the 
machines we can use to produce the revolution”. #accelerate! 
So the film is an exercise in affective engineering which 
patiently yet relentlessly dismantles capitalist realist 
commonsense. One of its most powerful techniques is the use 
of simple but devastating contrasts: cleaners at RBS earning 
hundreds of times less than the bosses (same physical space, 
different worlds); rioters jailed for stealing small items next 
to bankers who caused social catastrophe not only going 
unpunished but receiving bonuses. Mark Kermode’s 
accusation that the film is “simplistic” misses the point. 
When faced with a media machine that pushes an 
outrageously simplistic story of its own — it was Labour wot 
done it — while recounting neoliberal catechisms like 
Medieval Catholic priests reciting the Mass in Latin, we need 
an equally simple counter-narrative. 

It’s hard not to have some sympathy with Brand’s disdain 
for voting, which is part of a widespread disillusion with the 
massively circumscribed conditions of electoral politics under 
capitalist realism, in which the best that can be hoped for is 
the least worst. But the problem is that popular 
disengagement from parliamentary politics suits the right 
more than us. The right doesn’t need the enthusiasm that 


Thatcher could call upon from certain portions of the 
population; it doesn’t need _ legitimacy. Popular 
disengagement, ambient despair, the sense that nothing is at 
stake in elections, is in the interests of capital, now that all 
the defaults have been set to neoliberal options. Of course, 
there was no golden age of parliamentary democracy any 
more than there was a golden age of the Labour Party; there 
was no point at which progressive achievements were 
entirely free of compromise and corruption. But the 
progressive function of parliamentary politics has been to put 
some limits on tyranny. Capitalist realism has meant the tacit 
but definite acceptance that corporate tyranny cannot be 
curbed, resulting in the democratic deficit that Aditya 
Chakrabortty described so vividly the other day: 


democratic leaders have parted ways with their voters 
— literally. Membership of the main parties has 
dropped sharply over the past three decades, so that 
there are now more vegans in Britain than members of 
the Conservative party. What’s replaced mass 
democracy is big donors and a professional political 
elite. It no longer pays for politicians to think hard 
about fair growth or build more houses, because to do 
so would antagonise the big corporates or the big 


media, or deter those middle-class and retired voters 
7 


who actually do turn out to the polling stations. 
The phobic panic that the prospect of a Labour-SNP 
coalition is provoking indicates that capital fears any 
reversal, no matter how modest, of this situation. It has 


grown used to having everything its own way — but this has 
led to a certain decadence, an exhaustion of thinking and of 
strategy. It is surely this exhaustion, as much as any 
desperation, which accounts for the ludicrous, beyond-satire 


poking about in Ed Miliband’s anodyne love life, or the 


scarcely believable attempts to discredit Nicola Sturgeon.® 


Sturgeon poses a threat, not merely because of her 
lawyerly poise in debate, not merely because she has 
articulated an anti-austerity position, nor even because she 
makes Scottish independence more likely, but more because 
she has a mobilised base of support behind her. In Scotland, 
as in Greece and Spain, new models of political organisation, 


new “logics of proliferation”? are emerging and being 
experimented with. Rather than compulsively repeating the 
same strategies, rather than dogmatically insisting on the 
inherent futility of elections, these developments are part of 
a process of collective learning about how popular 
movements can be (re)connected with parliamentary politics. 
The potential power of such strategies is clear. The electoral 
impasse is not down to some semiotic failure (if only we had 
the right PR initiative to engage the kids!), but reflects the 
actual composition of forces in society. Capitalist realism is 
class war fought by one side only, an organised corporate 
elite which is very clear about what its own class interests are 
and what must be done to keep things aligned with those 
interests. Only a mobilised population can give political 
parties the power to challenge corporate tyranny. As Keir 


Milburn says in an important piece?®, and, as the situation in 
Greece is showing, you can’t vote out neoliberalism. But as 


Keir also argues, “[e]ven at their point of failure Plan B 
electoral politics can be useful if they can clarify the anti- 
democratic effects of neoliberalism that work against all 
forms of collective action.” 

In the UK, this could be the most important election since 
1979. Even the most sentimental pipe-dreamer couldn't 
imagine the Labour Party will be returning to Plan B 
socialism in the immediate future, still less offering 
something more modern and radical. Yet it’s perfectly 
plausible that a Labour-SNP coalition could now achieve what 
Jeremy Gilbert and I argue that New Labour could have been 
expected to attempt: “make some efforts to change the 
strategic situation in the long-term: to rebuild the unions, to 
re-energise local government, to facilitate the growth of an 


alternative media sector”.!! For even this to happen, it will be 
necessary for those in the party who really want to break 
with capitalist realism — and, believe it or not, there are such 
people — to seize the initiative. What is the alternative for 
Labour? Even the lacklustre and affectless brand of politics 
that the party have served up under Miliband so far won’t be 
sustainable for much longer. Entropy might be the best fate a 
Labour Party which can’t grasp the new mood can hope for; 
the more likely scenario is a PASOK-like disintegration. In any 
case, there’s no way back to the pre-2008 world, no way back 
to capitalist realism with a joker-hysterical face. The party 
needs really to register that Blairites — and the residual 
Blairite atmosphere in a demoralised and disconnected 
Labour party — are as out of date now as Blair argued “Old 
Labour” was in 1997. Now, more than ever, there are no 
guarantees. The road to renewal has never seemed harder, or 


longer. Yet, as Margarita Tsomou said in an important 
intervention at the Monopol aug Morgen event in Vienna last 
week, limbo is now over. Are we plunging deeper into 
nihiliberal dystopia — the ultra-rich retreating into 
compounds, a vast “surplus population” abandoned to fight 
amongst itself, and subdued by a militarised Hunger Games- 
style police force? Or is a new popular leftism about to begin 
the escape from capitalist realism? 


communist realism! 


Normal capitalist realist service was resumed on Thursday, 
on the BBC Question Time Leaders Special. With the SNP, Plaid 
Cymru and the Greens absent, horizons contracted, 
expectations lowered, we were once again asphyxiating in the 
Oxbridge-Westminster bubble. This was most obviously 
signalled by a discursive exclusion: “austerity” was never 
mentioned, so we were back on the arid terrain of a debate 
the terms of which were set by England’s austerians in 2010. 
The question, once more, was: who would cut the deficit 
quickest? 

Miliband further deflated the mood — I think deliberately 
— by explicitly ruling out a “deal” or a “coalition” with the 
SNP. Given the right-wing press’s scaremongering, Miliband’s 
denying that a deal will happen might have been necessary in 
order to make the conditions for such a deal possible. Any 
equivocation would surely have been seized upon by the 
right-wing media, and relentlessly used to stoke up the fears 
of voters less likely to vote for Labour because of the prospect 
of a coalition. The audience members imploring Cameron and 
Miliband to be honest about possible deals were as ingenuous 
as those who hailed the programme as a triumph of 


participatory democracy. Neither leader could “be honest” 
about how the vote is likely to go on Thursday because that 
very speculation could change what actually happens. Such is 
the state of our current “democracy”: everything is distorted 
by media projections, by politicians’ (second) guesses as to 
how voters may behave in response to those projections, a 
whole phantom science of feedback. 

Baudrillard: “Polls manipulate the undecidable. Do they 
affect votes? True or false? Do they yield exact photographs 
of reality, or of mere tendencies, or a refraction of this reality 


in a hyperspace of simulation whose curvature we do not 


know? True or false? Undecidable.’”2 


For most of this campaign, Cameron has given every 
impression that he’d far rather be tucking into a country 
supper than demeaning himself hustling on the hustings. 
Defending the status quo is not as energising as tearing it 
down, and comfortable Cameron never had the class 
resentment-jouissance that drove grocer’s daughter Thatcher 
to battle trade unionists and oldschool Tory grandees alike. 


For him, it’s a career,> not a mission. Cameron has never 
seemed like a man burning with conviction; he comes across 
more like the captain of some public school cricket team who 
whose main motivation for winning is to remind uppity 
comprehensive kids who’s boss. On Thursday, Cameron 
finally went into bat for his class like he meant it. 

He needs to. This election is pivotal. Either the Tories can 
“finish the job” of looting and pillaging everything working- 
class struggle built, or they themselves could be on the brink 
of destruction. The Conservative Party haven’t won an overall 
majority since 1992. It’s difficult enough keeping this party of 


opportunists, quislings and crazies together at the best of 
times; if they fail to win again, will even Boris be able to 
prevent meltdown? And with the Tories in disarray, the right 
could finally be forced off the centre ground that they won 
and radically re-defined under Thatcher. 


Pumped Up, Calmed Down 


In front of the BBC cameras, Cameron’s performance wasn’t 
quite as slick as his upper lip, but he discovered a poise that 
he has seldom mustered in the past few weeks. The problem 
with Cameron getting pumped up last week is not only that it 
looked pathetically forced (his claim that he was “pumped up 
because I am” was a transparent deception as well as a 
tautology. He was “pumped up” because Tory backers 
demanded that he at least gave the appearance of caring). 
The more serious issue is that such displays of simulated 
passion undermine Cameron’s key appeal, which has to do 
with projecting casual authority: what David Smail, writing 
before Cameron came onto the scene, called “[t]he confident 
slouch of the hands-in-pocket, old Etonian cabinet minister.” 
Cameron’s accent, his posture, his smirk, convey a consistent 
message: relax, I’m in control, defer to me. When he strays from 
this “ease and familiarity”, he risks looking angry and/or 
uncomfortable, and apparent affability gives way an affronted 
sense of class superiority, as in the “calm down, dear” 
incident. 

Presenting the Tories as the nasty party has been 
counterproductive, the fake letter of support from small 
businesses devolved into yet another Thick of It farce, but 


Thursday’s flooding of the audience with Tory supporters 
posing as undecided voters worked. Cameron was back on 
home territory: the bizarre inverted world of English 
capitalist realism in which referring to a global banking crisis 
was desperate reaching for excuses, and austerity was the 
only possible course of action for any prudent government. 
(The best thing about New Labour was Alastair Campbell — a 
skilled operator and a technician, an expert on how to win 
ground on a hostile media terrain. It’s hard to imagine that, if 
he were still running things, that Labour would have been 
ambushed like they were on Thursday.) 


A Picture of Discontented New Wealth 


Under the questioning of businesswoman Catherine 
Shuttleworth, Ed started to look like a supply teacher who 
had earnestly planned an interesting and informative lesson, 
only to find out that the kids just wanted to humiliate him, 
whatever he said. The Tory narrative of Labour profligacy 
was once again established as a self-evident truth that only a 
fool and/or a brazen liar would contest. This narrative was all 
the more convincing when it was re-cycled/re-cited by a 
“concerned businesswoman”, “struggling to survive in a 
tough climate”. The subsequent exposure of Shuttleworth as 
a probable Tory plant will not erase the impact of her TV 
encounter with Miliband, if only because complaining about 
the audience not only implicitly concedes defeat, it makes 
Labour look like sore losers. 

For the moment, let’s believe Shuttleworth’s story that 
she isn’t a Tory. (Although note that even the DM 


whitewashing is carefully worded: Shuttleworth only denies 
that she’s ever been a member of the Tory party, not that 
she’s a lifelong Tory voter, which is of course impossible to 
prove or disprove.) The question then would be why she 
should be so ready to blame hard times not on the 
government which has been in power in the last five years, 
but on the government which was in power when she actually 
built and grew her business? Miliband’s pitch — Labour is all 
about supporting small business owners — is part of a 
strategy that could be fruitful in the long run, since it could 
break the alliance between small business and corporate 
capital which has been so central to the installation of 
capitalist realism. But Shuttleworth’s response to these 
overtures shows that breaking that alliance will be a long and 
hard struggle. She immediately started bleating on behalf of 
Tesco — as if Tesco didn’t enjoy its greatest success under 
New Labour, and as if its downfall wasn’t a direct 
consequence of the very corporate tyranny that Miliband was 
moving to attack? 


Reflexive Cringe 


While Miliband was correct not to capitulate to nonsense 
about Labour overspending, it was clear that Labour has left 
it far too late to challenge the dominant narrative. On the 
face of it, Labour’s acquiescence in the austerity myth has 
been inexplicable. Paul Krugman writes of 


the limpness of Labour’s response to the austerity push. 
Britain’s opposition has been amazingly willing to 
accept claims that budget deficits are the biggest 


economic issue facing the nation, and has made hardly 
any effort to challenge the extremely dubious 
proposition that fiscal policy under Blair and Brown 
was deeply irresponsible — or even the nonsensical 
proposition that this supposed fiscal irresponsibility 
caused the crisis of 2008-2009. Why this weakness? In 
part it may reflect the fact that the crisis occurred on 
Labour’s watch; American liberals should count 
themselves fortunate that Lehman Brothers didn’t fall a 
year later, with Democrats holding the White House. 
More broadly, the whole European centre-left seems 
stuck in a kind of reflexive cringe, unable to stand up 


for its own ideas.* 


You say “reflexive cringe”, I say “reflexive impotence”... 
Labour’s slowness to respond to the crisis was not merely 
some failure of judgement or strategy; it was a consequence 
of how deeply capitalist realism had saturated the party. 
There was no question of Labour using the crisis to impose its 
own programme, because, by 2008, it didn’t have much of 
programme beyond capitalist realism. Everything had been 
set up for a corporate appeasement, and there were neither 
the organisational nor the intellectual infrastructure to come 
up with anything new. Capitalist realism wasn’t something 
that Labour was waiting out and planning to overcome, one 
day; it was embedded as an effectively permanent baseline set 
of conditions — conditions which receded from visibility even 
as they imposed strict limits on what could be said and 
thought. 


I’m In a Trance, I Don’t Ask Questions 


Following Wendy Brown, I argued that capitalist realism can 
be understood as a kind of dreamwork. In this dreamwork, 
briefly interrupted in 2008, the banking crisis is some 
repressed trauma which is known about but never 
confronted, a Real that the dreamer stays asleep to keep 
avoiding. Capital is the dreamer here, and, insofar as 
capitalist realism is sustained, we remain figments in its 
dream. Yet capital is also our dream, which, Matrix-like, has 
constructed the virtual reality in which we think we live from 
our energy, our desires and our fantasies. 

You would think that mention of the banking crisis would 
produce some cognitive dissonance when set against the 
narrative of Labour profligacy. If there was a global financial 
crisis, how could Labour also be responsible for the deficit? 
No doubt, part of the success of the “Labour did it” story is 
due to the hold of folk politics. A narrative about incompetent 
politicians maxing out the credit cards is easily digested; it’s 
far more difficult to assimilate the opaque and abstract 
mechanics of finance capital. But one of the most valuable 
insights in Philip Mirowski’s Never Let A Serious Crisis Go To 
Waste: How Neoliberalism Survived the Financial Meltdown comes 
from his account of cognitive dissonance itself. Referring to 
the work of Leon Festinger, the social psychologist who 
worked extensively on cognitive dissonance, Mirowski 
reminds us that cognitive dissonance is not a threat to false 
beliefs. On the contrary, cognitive dissonance is a mechanism 
by which false beliefs can be maintained when confronted 
with evidence that directly disproves them. In fact, as 


Mirowski writes, Festinger’s crucial claim was “that 
confrontation with contrary evidence may actually augment 
and sharpen the conviction and enthusiasm of a believer”. 
Mirowski quotes Festinger: 


Suppose an individual believes something with his 
whole heart... suppose that he is presented with 
evidence, unequivocal and undeniable evidence, that 
his belief is wrong; what will happen? The individual 
will frequently emerge, not only unshaken, but even 
more convinced of the truth of his beliefs than ever 


before. Indeed, he may even show a new fervour about 
5 


convincing and converting people to his view. 

This points to a relationship between desire and belief 
that has been posited at least since Hume and Spinoza’s 
critiques of religion: we believe in part because we want to 
believe. But we also want to believe because the belief has 
become core to our subjectivity. 


If You Get Too Burnt You Can’t Come Back Home 


The great mystery of neoliberalism is to what extent its 
advocates “really” believed it. Was it ever anything more 
than a ruse to restore ruling-class power and wealth? Of 
course, the answer to this partly depends on which advocates 
we are talking about. It’s possible that certain key 
proselytisers for neoliberalism never believed it, and only 
opportunistically fixed upon it as a way of destroying the 
“red bases” of working-class power. With others, it’s more 
likely that a belief was aided by the desire to believe. This 


desire was motivated by economic interest, of course, but also 
by certain libidinal satisfactions: the pleasures of seeing the 
working class defeated, of seeing the poor and vulnerable 
stripped of social security. For a certain English petit- 
bourgeois sensibility, Thatcherism was the equivalent of a 
riot: a jubilee of destruction, a temporary autonomous zone 
for a reactionary desire that feeds off suffering and misery. 


And as I was standing by the edge 


I could see the faces of those led pissing theirselves laughing 
(and the flames grew) 


Their mad eyes buldged their flushed faces said 


The weak get crushed as the strong grow stronger® 


The funeral pyre will be re-lit if the Tories win on 
Thursday (Bring some paper and bring some wood/Bring what’s 
left of all your love for the fire), and after five more years, there 
won't be much left... The NHS will have been gutted, sold off 
by stealth; education will continue to be asset stripped, ripe 
for yet more corporate plundering... the most vulnerable will 
be pushed further into destitution, women and children 
first... 

This is why Cameron’s android smoothness, like Boris’s 
bluster, is so crucial for the Tories. It is a cloaking device, 
obfuscating the project, keeping the gibbering libido hidden 
behind a humanoid face and a calming, plummy voice. 
Imagine if Gove (who’s been pushed back into the attic for 
trying just too hard to be one of the posh boys — so vulgar, so 
nouveau) — imagine if Gove, with his defrocked pantomime- 
dame pout, his lickspittle lips smacking with the class hatred 


that only a class traitor can feel, imagine if he were leader... 
By contrast, Cameron’s strength is that it is hard to work 
up much class hatred for him. People that wealthy and 
privileged are like rare beasts: something you hear about but 
rarely encounter. In fact, I’ve seen more pandas in the flesh 
than old Etonians. You also get the sense that Cameron has no 
particular animus towards the poor — it’s rather that the 
experience of poverty is so remote for him that he simply 
cannot understand it, except as some theoretical possibility. 
The poor are pixellated background characters in the blearily 
cheerful steampunk simulation that Dave projects: 
everything’s fine so long as you don’t look too closely. 


Dismantling Capitalist Realism 


But let’s return to Mirowski’s summary of Festinger’s 
research: 


Philosophy of science revels in the ways in which it may 
be rational to discount contrary evidence, but the social 
psychology of cognitive dissonance reveals just how 
elastic the concept of rationality can be in social life. 
Festinger and his colleagues illustrated these lessons in 
his first book (1956) by reporting in a neutral manner 
the vicissitudes of a group of Midwesterners they called 
“The Seekers,” who developed a belief that they would 
be rescued by flying saucers on a specific date in 1954, 
prior to a great flood coming to engulf Lake City (a 
pseudonym). Festinger documents in great detail the 
hour-by-hour reactions of the Seekers as the date of 
their rescue came and passed with no spaceships 


arriving and no flood welling up to swallow Lake City. 
At first, the Seekers withdrew from representatives of 
the press seeking to upbraid them for their failed 
prophecies, but rapidly reversed their stance, 
welcoming any and all opportunities to expound and 
elaborate upon their (revised and expanded) faith. A 
minority of their group did fall away, but Festinger 
notes they tended to be lukewarm peripheral members 
of the group. Predominantly, the Seekers never 
renounced their challenged doctrines. The ringleaders 
tended to redouble their proselytising, so long as they 
were able to maintain interaction with a coterie of 


fellow covenanters.’ 


Mirowski makes an analogy with proponents of neoliberal 
economic doctrine, who — far from abandoning this doctrine 
after its discrediting in the crisis — held to it even more 
doggedly. This is what Miliband faced on Thursday. Blank 
stares of mesmerised true believers seven years after the 
saucers didn’t arrive. Shuttleworth’s interjection like some 
Manchurian Candidate trigger, provoking automaton- 
applause... 

This shows how difficult the task of dismantling capitalist 
realism will be. A whole process of deprogramming, involving 
new narratives, new libidinal attractors, as well as new ways 
of sharing knowledge, will have to be undergone. While this is 
certainly a formidable challenge, it is something that is 
already underway and which we can intensify quite quickly. 

Of particular importance, it seems to me, is a popular 
demystification of economics and “the economy”. The 


austerity myth has only seemed credible because of a 
widespread economic illiteracy — an illiteracy I very much 
share. Economics functions now much as theology functioned 
in the Medieval world — as an intricate and elaborate system 
of concepts, objects and reasoning that is closed to non- 
initiates. We need something like a Reformation in/and 
against capitalist economics — the equivalent of the Bible 
being translated into English. I think this could be done, not 
by a series of large-scale conferences, televisions, or films — 
although of course these wouldn’t hurt — but virally. Small 
groups of people, including at least one individual who is an 
expert in economics, could get together and talk through 
some key concepts and principles, major economic events, 
etc. This could take place in private homes, in universities 
and colleges, in social clubs... In addition to everything else, 
this would also serve the function of reviving sociality, of re- 
building a class consciousness that has been dissipated by the 
individualising tendencies oof neoliberalism and 
communicative capitalism. 


Communist Realism 


Back to Thursday, here’s “entrepreneur” Chris. “A ban on 
zero hours contract would prevent me from running my 
small business...” Well, would it now? We’ve heard many 
versions of this plaint over the last few months, from 
businesses big and small. What this amounts to is saying that, 
these businesses cannot function without super-exploiting 
workers, and they cannot function without indirect 
government subsidies (with benefits supplementing low 


wages). Hold on a minute: didn’t the capitalist realists make 
their “hard decisions” to close down nationalised industries 
on the grounds that they weren’t viable and they were 
draining too much public money? 

We need a new, communist, realism, which says that 
businesses are only viable if they can pay workers a living 
wage. This communist realism would reverse the capitalist 
realist demonisation of those on benefits, and target the real 
parasites: “entrepreneurs” whose enterprises depend on 
hyperprecarious labour; landlords living it large off housing 
benefit; bankers getting bonuses effectively or actually out of 
public money, etc. 

But the concept of communist realism also suggests a 
particular kind of orientation. This isn’t an eventalism, which 
will wager all its hopes on a sudden and final transformation. 
It isn’t a utopianism, which concedes anything “realistic” to 
the enemy. It is about soberly and pragmatically assessing the 
resources that are available to us here and now, and thinking 
about how we can best use and increase those resources. It is 
about moving — perhaps slowly, but certainly purposively — 
from where we are now to somewhere very different. 


pain now! 


A grief without a pang, void, dark, and drear 


“Pain now, more pain later” was the headline on the front 
page of the Guardian on the day my son was born nearly five 


years ago.” That year, my wife and I earned fifteen thousand 
pounds between us. I was working as an hourly paid lecturer 
in adult education and in a university, as well as doing some 
freelance writing and copyediting. We were able to survive 
without living in penury because of the £300 a month in tax 
credits we received. 

This was the way Brownism and Blairism worked: 
allowing low wages and precarity to proliferate with one 
hand, mitigating their effects with benefits on the other. By 
then, like most of the population, I loathed New Labour. 
Labour had become so capitalist realist that surely it couldn’t 
be much worse if the Tories got in? I shared the widespread 
view that elections don’t change much: all that’s on offer are 
minimally different versions of the same _ thing 
(neoliberalism). 

It soon became very clear that this was not the case. 
Cameron and Osborne unleashed capitalist realism 2.0, the 


most audacious confidence trick in recent political history: 
make the poor and vulnerable pay for the banking crisis. Use 
the crisis as a pretext to destroy even more of the welfare 
state. Sigh their fake sighs, and tell us what “difficult choices” 
they had to make... 

Today, if my wife and I earned what we did in 2010, we 
would receive only £50 in tax credits a month. 

Of course, for me, working like this was something of a 
bohemian lifestyle choice. If I’d wanted to, I could probably 
have got better paid work — after all, only a fool would expect 
to enjoy working for a living. But what of all those stuck in 
low-paid precarious work forever? The disabled? The 
longterm sick and the chronically mentally ill, forced back to 
work? 

A stifled, drowsy, unimpassioned grief. 

I wasn’t very interested in this election a few weeks ago. 
To be honest, even though I had been commissioned to write 
a piece about the TV coverage of the election, I couldn’t 
muster up the enthusiasm to watch the first debate (I'll watch 
it later) until Laura Oldfield Ford, excited by Nicola Sturgeon’s 
performance, texted me and asked what I thought. I switched 
on ITV+1, and the process of re-awakening that has occurred 
in the last few weeks began. 

For reasons I will explore more fully in subsequent posts, I 
have spent the last year in a state of de-activation. I was 
thrown back into the privatised connectivity of the OedIpod, 
with its constant stream of low-level anxiety and compulsive 
micro-enjoyments. I couldn’t write, except in a mechanical 
way; what I produced seemed stillborn, stilted. My main 
mood-altering drug of choice, music, didn’t work. I binged on 


boxsets. I enjoyed time with my wife and son, but there was a 
fugitive quality to this enjoyment: my fingers always itched to 
reach for my smartphone. There was always something I 
should already have done that I hadn’t — the urgencies piling 
up, like a flashing red light constantly blinking in my 
peripheral vision, never letting me settle. Most of these 
urgencies were small things, they didn’t matter too much, but 
perhaps there would be some long-forgotten urgency that 
was going to calamitously re-emerge, too late for me to do 
anything about it? I'll just check... 


Liveable Shit 


Which finds no natural outlet, no relief. 

The coldly terrifying thing about this state of dejection 
was that it was not a completely paralysing depression — 
more a kind of exhausting drudgery. It felt liveable; indeed, it 
felt like I could — perhaps would — live the rest of my life in 
it. Perhaps I have expected too much from life. Now I would 
have to adjust to misery, like everyone else does. Others were 
much, much worse off than me. It wasn’t like I was to chip ice 
off the windscreen in the morning. I had been precarious for 
years — now I was in well-paid secure employment. Why 
couldn’t I just be happy? OK, so I had to do marketing 
promotions, complete “quality” paperwork, amend module 
proposal forms six times — but it was hardly coal mining, was 
it? 

You see, you see: I had become once again the compliant 
subject of capitalist realism: 


..isolated, cut off, surrounded by hostile space, you are 


suddenly without connections, without stability, with 
nothing to hold you upright or in place; a dizzying, 
sickening unreality takes possession of you; you are 
threatened by a complete loss of identity, a sense of 
utter fraudulence; you have no right to be here, now, 
inhabiting this body, dressed in this way; you are a 


nothing, and “nothing” is quite literally what you feel 


you are about to become.” 


Engines of Dejection 


Bifo is right. It wants us to be dejected: not so catatonically 
depressed that we can’t work, but not so confident and secure 
that we will refuse to do bullshit jobs. (What is this it that 
wants us to miserable? Why, the real management of the 
Overlook Hotel of course. Our misery is like nectar to it...) 
Capital needs people desperate, scrambling on the edge 
(watch Tory MPs laugh at starving families!), it needs people 
scrimping and saving and crossing off lists, it needs people to 
be grateful for any work, no matter how poorly paid, no 
matter how insecure, struggle after struggle, year after year... 

In the last five years, after the initial euphoria of dissent 
in 2010 and 2011, an acrid fog of despair has slowly but 
ineluctably sunk over what Cameron, chillingly, calls “our 
country”... choking the social energy out of institutions (no 
time to talk, sorry!)... reducing workers to automata issuing 
commands to one another... diminishing, at every level, our 
capacity to care... no time, no time... no money... Don’t know, 
I’ve got to go mate... looking over our shoulders, fearing the 
worst... maybe it will be me next... better stay in line... accept 


the extra workload, I’m afraid that’s how things are now... 
Pain now, more pain later... 


Misery Is Over (If We Want It) 


The last week or so, I have, each day, played with my son for a 
few hours, been out on long walks, enjoying extended time 
with my wife, and managed to write thousands of words. Why 
can’t life always be like this? Why indeed? It’s only been 
possible because I have decided to suspend all my 
bureaucratic obligations until after the election. (Back to 
“proper” work tomorrow: so expect another post in a year or 
so.) I have managed to do this, not by some heroic act of 
magical voluntarist will, but because of a lift in mood that is 
not just personal. Scotland, Syriza, Podemos... It’s taken a 
long while for the significance of these developments to filter 
through to me... but talking to comrades... attending to what 
Plan C are up to... feeling the electricity that Russell Brand 
has generated... All of this has gradually returned to 
consciousness during this election campaign. I don’t think I’m 
the only one. But have we awoken too late to stop the Tories? 
Has their smog of dejection de-activated enough people — 
people who were hardly likely to have been reactivated by 
Labour’s campaign? 


Shy Effects 


The two most obvious parallels for this election would seem 
to be 1974 — a weak Labour government, propped up by 
smaller parties, or, ominously, 1992, with Labour crushingly 
defeated by John Major’s Tories after they were expected to 


win. Shaun Lawson makes a strong and convincing case for 
why today might turn out to be a re-run of 1992. Much of this 
is to do with the unreliability of polls. Because of the so-called 
“shy Tory” phenomenon — voters not admitting to pollsters 
that they would vote Conservative — the polls were 
spectacularly wrong in 1992. Major didn’t only win, the Tories 
ended up with the largest amount of votes ever cast for a 
political party in Britain. Lawson argues that, despite polling 
being adjusted to factor in the shy Tory effect, current polling 
may still be inaccurate (because, for instance, it tends to be 
internet-based, which biases things towards a younger 
demographic). 

I’m not sure how convinced I am by the parallels with 92, 
however, for two reasons: 


1. Hyperstitional effects 


As Baudrillard argued, we can’t treat opinion polls as neutral 
positivist descriptions since they might well affect the very 
thing they are claiming to predict. It seems likely that this 
might have happened in 92. 

The atmosphere leading up to the 92 election was very 
different to that preceding the current contest. There was the 
disastrous Sheffield Rally. Kinnock’s triumphalist shout of 
“We're alright!”, still excruciatingly embarrassing to 
remember nearly twenty five years on, not only destroyed the 
“statesmanlike persona” he had confected, it gave the 
impression of a manic and jubilatory over-confidence. The 
premature celebration came off as unseemly, desperate — as 
if Kinnock himself, never mind the electorate, couldn’t quite 


believe that he would be Prime Minister. It also gave 
Murdoch’s press something to really stoke the fears of 
reluctant Tories with, especially when the polls were 
suggesting that Labour would win: look, they think they’ve 
won! If you’re thinking of staying at home, don’t — every vote 
is needed! 

It isn’t really like that this time. Polls are predicting a 
hung parliament, not a Labour victory — there isn’t the same 
resource of fear to feed off. Victory for Labour is uncertain, 
not an imminent possibility that needs to be desperately 
averted. Furthermore, while the Tories have certainly tried to 
scaremonger, a Labour government now is not the terrifying 
prospect that it could be made to seem in 92. After Blairism, 
Labour is no longer the Other to neoliberal commonsense 
that it could be presented as then. 

As I said in the last post, Miliband has kept his campaign 
emotionally subdued — no extravagant promises (“I want to 
underpromise and overdeliver”); no messianic fervour (this 
by contrast with Blair as much as Kinnock). It’s true, Miliband 
doesn’t seem to have Prime Minesterial gravitas, but, then 
again, neither did John Major, surely the least likely Prime 
Minister ever. 


2. We’re in New Times 


In 1992, we were still in the high pomp of capitalist realism. 
The crash had not yet happened. There was still something on 
offer to those who wanted to vote in their own interests and 
let everyone else go hang. 

The Tories have nothing very much to bribe most of their 


supporters with this time. Without the false balm of the “Big 
Society”, they only have a negative message — it will be worse 
under Labour — and a muted promise: pain now, a little less 
pain later. Is this enough to motivate the wavering? 

Neoliberalism is finished as a project, even if it lurches on, 
thrashing around like a decorticated terminator. We’re finally 
groping our way, blinking, out of capitalist realism. The 
psychic blockade that prevented us from thinking and acting 
is lifting. This has only registered in this campaign in some 
minor way with the SNP, Plaid Cymru and the Greens (the 
multiparty nature of British politics now is of course another 
way in which we are in new times by comparison with 74 and 
92). If Labour manages to form a government, we will be 
celebrating a Tory defeat far more than we will be hailing a 
Labour victory. 

But nothing is certain at the moment. I don’t think there 
will be much certainty tomorrow either. My feeling is that 
things will be very volatile over the next few weeks. One 
thing is for sure: we need to be prepared to mobilise if the 
Tories attempt a coup. And they surely will... 


abandon hope 


(summer is 


coming)! 


So it was to be a re-run of 1992, after all. It seems that even 
elections are subject to retromania, now. Except, this time, it 
is 1992 without jungle. It’s Ed Sheeran and Rudimental rather 
than Rufige Kru. Always ignore the polls, wrote Jeremy 
Gilbert late on election night: 


You get a better sense of what’s going on in the 
electorate by sniffing the wind, sensing the affective 
shifts, the molecular currents, the alterations in the 
structures of feeling. Listen to the music, watch the TV, 


go to the the pubs and ride the tube. Cultural Studies 


trumps psephology every time.” 


Contemporary English popular culture, with its 
superannuated PoMo laddishness, its smirking blokishness 


(anyone fancy a pint with Nigel?), its poverty porn, its craven 
cult of big business, has become like some gigantic Poundbury 
Village simulation, in which nothing new happens, forever... 
while ubiquitous “Keep Calm” messages, ostensibly quirky- 
ironic, actually function as They Live commands, containing 
the panic and the desperation... 

England is a country in which every last space where 
conviviality might flourish has been colonised by a 
commercial imperative... supermarket check-out operatives 
replaced by crap robots... unexpected item in bagging area... 
every surface plastered with corporate graffiti and 
haranguing hashtags... no trick missed to screw every last 
penny out of people... exorbitant parking charges in NHS 
hospitals (exact amount only, no change given), all the profits 
going to private providers... 

Everything seen through a downer haze... “Mostly you 
self-medicate”... comfort eating and bitter drinking... What’s 
your poison? 


The suburbs are hallucinating, England is hallucinating. 
Monster Ripper and Smirnoff, Brandy Boost, oversized 
glasses of chardonnay at Weterspoons monday club, 
valium scored for a few quid in the pub, the stink of 
weed drifting from portakabins, red eyes and yellow 
bibs.. The pharmaceuticals industry is one of UK Plc’s 
biggest success stories (along with arms dealing and 
loans companies) as prescriptions for anti-depressants 


are kept on repeat.” 


Time for one more, Nigel? 


Time, gentlemen, please... 

There is no time... Time is on your side (yes it is)... 

In any case, Shaun Lawson is to be congratulated — if that 
is the word — for what turned out to be an astonishingly 


accurate prediction of how the election would go.* My 
attempts to refute the parallels with 92 in my last post were 
as much wishful thinking as anything else. I suppose at some 
level I knew after the BBC Leaders Debate how things would 
go — which is why I found watching it so dejecting. (Another 
rhyme with the past: Ed’s stumble at the end of his 
interrogation by the petit-bourgeoisie was a minor echo of 
Kinnock’s tumbling into the sea in 1983.) 


Don’t Fear... 


It seems that the very thing which gave us hope — the 
possibility of vacillating Labour being pulled to the left by an 
alliance with the SNP — might have been what motivated 
Tory voters to come out in such numbers in England. 
(Another echo of 92: fear as a hyperstitional force.) The truth 
is what many of us have long suspected: Labour lost this 
election five years ago, by failing to challenge the Tories’ 
narrative. Yet this failure wasn’t about the wrong leader, PR 
strategy or even policies; it is ultimately rooted in Labour’s 
disconnection from any wider movement, and this is in turn 
rooted in the wider emergence of capitalist realism. Blairism 
may have won Labour three elections, but the unfolding of its 
logic could well lead to the destruction, in the not so far 
distant future, of the party. As Paul Mason acidly summarises, 
“Labour no longer knows what it is for, nor how to win 


power”. With Blairism, Labour knew how to win power, but 
in acquiring this knowledge, it forgot what it was for. 

That existential quandary is bitterly ironic given that 
there is a large proportion of the population in England — I 
still believe it is the majority — which feels it has no party 
which represents it. I maintain that the shift to UKIP is 
ultimately much more to do with this sense of 
disenfranchisement and despair than with any intrinsic 
tendency towards racism or even nationalism in _ its 
supporters. Everyone has chauvinistic potentials of one kind 
or another which can be activated by particular sets of forces. 
Ultranationalism is a symptom of the failure of class politics; 
or, class politics emerges through the ultra-nationalist lens in 
a distorted and displaced way. 

As Paul Mason also points out, a return to Blairism will 
certainly not win back those Labour supporters who turned 
to UKIP. In England, as in Scotland, it was Blairism’s taking 
for granted and abandonment of its working-class base that 
produced the sense of betrayal which led to so many former 
Labour supporters losing patience with the party on 
Thursday. In Scotland, the response to betrayal took a 
progressive form; in England, it assumed a reactionary mode. 
Partly, this is because there was no progressive outlet 
available in England. Working-class English voters alienated 
from Labour’s Oxbridge elite were left a choice between a 
UKIP that deliberately talked up its appeal to working 
families, and an array of small left-wing parties to whose 
message they were not exposed and which had no chance of 
being elected. UKIP were also practically forced on them to by 
a political media so decadent, so boring, that it counts Nigel 


Farage as a charismatic flash of colour. Hence what Tim 
Burrows calls “the curiously mediated entity of Farage, a man 
whose direct manner, coloured tweed and pints of ale seem 
made for meme-politics. UKIP are more popular on Facebook 


than Labour and the Liberal Democrats put together.”® 
Don’t Despair... 


It would be easy to fall into despair about England after 
Thursday; it would be easy to conclude that the country is full 
of selfish, mean-spirited and stupid individuals. Yet we have 
to remember that most people’s engagement with politics is 
quite minimal; thinking in political terms, framing everyday 
life in terms of political categories, is now a minority pursuit. 
This is not a moral or intellectual failing on the part of the 
electorate: it is a consequence of a neoliberalism which has 
largely succeeded in its aim of disabling the mechanisms of 
mass democracy. Overworked and told they need to work 
harder, busy, but still feeling that they can’t get everything 
done, many are too drained to care. (Too knackered to think, 
just give me time to come round...) How many Tory voters are 
committed Conservatives, really? Mostly, they are jaded and 
detached, maybe voting out of fear as much as self-interest 
(and self-interest is often experienced as fear). 

Capitalist realism is not about people positively 
identifying with neoliberalism; it is about the naturalisation 
and therefore the depoliticisation of the neoliberal 
worldview. The Tories’ pitch is in tune with this ambient 
neoliberalisation, with its apparently commonsensical 
emphasis on choice, opportunity and the dignity of labour, 


and its emotional appeal to negative solidarity. To break out 
of this, you need a repoliticisation, and this requires a 
popular mobilisation, just as we saw with the SNP. 

The Tory success depended upon a popular de-activation 
(the days of Thatcher’s rallies are long gone). There was no 
enthusiasm for either of the two leading parties. The only 
party that could call on massive popular enthusiasm in the 
UK was the SNP. That popular enthusiasm — an enthusiasm 
that capitalist realism is set up to prevent emerging — is the 
rushing in of something that, for a long time, there hasn’t 
seemed to be any glimmer of in England: the future. 


Don’t Be Depressed... 


“What hope for a country where people will camp out 
for three days to glimpse the Royal Couple? England is 
like some stricken beast too stupid to know it is dead. 
Ingloriously foundering in its own waste products, the 
backlash and bad karma of empire.” 


— William Burroughs, The Place of Dead Roads’ 


So we shouldn’t take the Tories’ victory as a sign that we 
are totally out of sync with the majority of the population in 
England. As Jeremy remarked to me on Thursday, it is not as 
if the equivalent of Syriza or Podemos had lost. (Although 
that was part of what was so devastating — our expectations 
were low, but reality contrived to go even lower.) Given the 
serious weakness of Labour’s offer, given the ferocity of the 
attack on Labour from the right-wing media machine in the 
UK, given the failure of supposedly neutral popular media 
such as the BBC to offer the public an adequate account of the 


banking crisis and its aftermath, it is actually surprising that 
the Tories’ victory was not even more comprehensive. Those 
who voted Tory aren’t necessarily indifferent to the suffering 
of the poor, or to the plight of the vulnerable — most merely 
accept (why wouldn’t they) the capitalist realist story about 
there being “no money left” and the need for “difficult 
choices”. No doubt, their acceptance of this is somewhat self- 
serving; no doubt, it depends on keeping those who suffer out 
of sight or in their peripheral vision. 

But it is also a fundamentally depressing and depressive 
outlook. There is a connection between capitalist realism and 
depressive realism. The idea that life is essentially drudgery 
(and that therefore no one should get a free ride) is a 
depressive conception of fairness (if I have to be miserable, so 
should everyone else), which has a particular traction in a 
burnt-out post-Protestant culture like England’s... (England is 
the oldest capitalist country, don’t forget...) 

All Cameron offered was more of this depression: a vision 
of a man chipping ice off his windscreen and going to a job he 
hates, forever. Yet Labour not only failed to offer a narrative 
about how the economy had gone wrong, it also failed to offer 
any positive vision of what society would look like if it had its 
way. I’m convinced that even the most minimal sense of this 
might have been enough to have inspired people to reject the 
Tories. Yet the fact that Labour couldn’t offer it was not some 
mistake (a few more focus groups and meetings with 
advertising people, and they’d have been there!). It was one 
more symptom of the way in which the party has been 
completely colonised by capitalist realism. 

The Tories quickly abandoned the “Big Society” after the 


2010 campaign, but the concept did actually point to what 
neoliberal culture has corroded: the space between 
“individuals and their families” and the state. In addition to 
its clunky and uncommunicative name — it was a kind of 
anti-meme — the problem with the “Big Society” was that, in 
the Tories’ hands, it was a transparent ruse to dismantle the 
welfare state. To resocialise a culture that has been 
individualised to the extent that England has demands 
massive resources — it requires time and energy, the very 
things that capital (especially the contemporary neoliberal, 
English version of capital) strips us of most thoroughly. 

Real wealth is the collective capacity to produce, care and 
enjoy. This is Red Plenty. We, and they, have had it wrong for 
a while: it is not that we are anti-capitalist, it is that 
capitalism, with all its visored cops, its teargas, all the 
theological niceties of its economics, is set up to block Red 
Plenty. The attack on capital has to be fundamentally based 
on the simple insight that, far from being about “wealth 
creation”, capital necessarily and always blocks our access to 
this common wealth. Everything for everyone. All of us first. 

Labour has allowed election after election to be fought not 
on the Red terrain of resocialisation, but on the Blue territory 
of identitarian community, with its border guards (we’ll have 
as many as you!) and barbed wire fences (they will be as high 
as yours!). The genius of the progressive forces which have 
seized the SNP, meanwhile, was to have moved from the Blue 
of identitarian community — and the nationalism of colonised 
peoples is of course very different to the nationalism of the 
colonisers — to the Red of internationalist cosmopolitan 
conviviality. 


Red belonging offers something different to traditional 
forms of belonging (faith, flag, family — so many corrupted 
forms of the commons, as Hardt and Negri have it). Jodi Dean 
has movingly described how the Communist Party in the US 


gave some Americans the feeling that the world was of 
one piece, their work meaningful as the work of a class, 
their struggles significant as part of a global struggle to 
liberate collective work from those claiming it for their 
own private profit. For desperately poor and barely 
literate immigrants, communism is a source of 
knowledge and power — the knowledge of how the 


world works and the power to change it.® 


The sense of belonging here could not be reduced to the 
chauvinistic pleasures that come from being an insider in any 
group whatsoever; it was a special sense of involvement that 
promised to transfigure all aspects of everyday life in a way 
that, previously, only religion had promised to, so that even 
the dreariest task could be imbued with high significance. 
“Even those engaged in the boring, repetitive work of 
distributing leaflets or trying to recruit new members as the 
official line changed, or chafing against the smugness of 
higher ups, experience their life in the party as intensely 
meaningful.” 

As opposed to the essentially spatial imaginary of Blue 
belonging — which posits a bounded area, with those inside 
hostile and suspicious towards those who are excluded — Red 
belonging is temporal and dynamic. It is about belonging to a 
movement: a movement that abolishes the present state of 


things, a movement that offers unconditional care without 
community (it doesn’t matter where you come from or who 
you are, we will care for you anyway). 


But Don’t Hope Either... 


“There’s no need to fear or hope, but only to look for new 
weapons,” Deleuze writes in “Postscript on the Societies of 
Control”.? He was no doubt thinking of Spinoza’s account of 
hope and fear in the Ethics. “There is no hope unmingled with 
fear, and no fear unmingled with hope”, Spinoza claimed. He 


defines hope and fear as follows: 


Hope is a joy not constant, arising from the idea of 
something future or past about the issue of which we 
sometimes doubt. 


Fear is a sorrow not constant, arising from the idea of 


something future or past about the issue of which we 
10 


sometimes doub 

Hope and fear are essentially interchangeable; they are 
passive affects, which arise from our incapacity to actually 
act. Like all superstitions, hope is something we call upon 
when we have nothing else. This is why Obama’s “politics of 
hope” ended up so deflating — not only because, inevitably, 
the Obama administration quickly became mired in capitalist 
realism, but also because the condition of hope is passivity. 
The Obama administration didn’t want to activate the 
population (except at election time). 

We don’t need hope; what we need is confidence and the 


capacity to act. “Confidence”, Spinoza argues, “is a joy arising 
from the idea of a past or future object from which cause for 
doubting is removed”. Yet it is very difficult, even at the best 
of times, for subordinated groups to have confidence, because 


for them/us there are few if any “future objects from which 


cause for doubting is removed.”!4 


“Class disadvantage is a form of injury inflicted on the 
person at birth,” David Smail explains, “The confident slouch 
of the hands-in-pocket, old Etonian cabinet minister speaks 
not so much as a current possession of power (on some 


measures the union boss might possess as much) as of a 


confidence which was sucked in with his mother’s milk.”?2 


(Even if the milk he fed on was unlikely to have come from 
his mother). The welfare state was supposed to be a structure 
which removed some of this doubt, while the imposition of 
precarity is a political project designed to remove the 
confidence that the working class had attained after years of 
struggle. (See Jennifer M. Silva’s heartbreaking Coming Up 
Short: Working-Class Adulthood in an Age of Uncertainty — a book 
to which I shall certainly return in future posts — for an 
account of the devastating impact of precarity on the 
emotional lives of young working-class men and women in 
the US.) 

Whereas hope and fear are superstitious (although they 
may have some hyperstitional effects), confidence is 
essentially hyperstitional: it immediately increases the 
capacity to act, the capacity to act increases confidence, and 
so on — a self-fulfilling prophecy, a virtuous spiral. 

So how are we to rebuild our confidence? While the 
conditions are difficult — and in England, they are about to 


get much more difficult — we can still act, and act 
imminently and immanently. How? 


Socialisation Beyond Social Media 


The answer of course is that many groups are already doing 
what is necessary. But these processes will become more 
powerful when they are logistically coordinated (which is not 
to say “unified” — unity is a strategic weakness, not a 
strength) and bound together by stronger common narratives 
and fictions. Jason Read’s essay “The Order and Connection of 
Ideology Is the Same as the Order and Connection of 


Exploitation: Or, Towards a Bestiary of the Capitalist 


Imagination”? 


explains why narrativisation is so important. 
In his account of two neo-Spinozist thinkers, Frédéric Lordon 


and Yves Citton, Read reminds us that 


our desire, our loves and hates, are already shaped by 
narratives, by scripts inherited through television and 
books. We enter into a world already scripted, and, as 
Spinoza argues in his definition of the first kind of 
knowledge, our life is defined as much by signs and 
images as things experienced. 


This means 


that the scenarios that we imagine, the stories and 
narratives that we consume, inform our understanding 
of reality, not in the sense that we confuse fiction with 
reality, but that the basic relations that underlie our 
fictions shape our understanding of reality. It is not 


that we confuse fiction with reality, believing 
everything that we see, but that the fundamental 
elements of every narrative, events, actions, and 
transformations, become the very way that we make 
sense of reality. Fiction exists in a permanent relation 
of metalepsis with reality, as figures and relations from 
one constantly inform the other. 


This is why the intensification and proliferation of the 
capitalist technologies of reality management and libidinal 
engineering in the 1980s was not merely some happy 
coincidence for neoliberalism; neoliberalism’s success was 
inconceivable without these technologies. It is also the reason 
that direct action, while of course crucial, will never be 
sufficient: we also need to act indirectly, by generating new 
narratives, figures and conceptual frames. 

By first of all imposing a particular set of narratives, 
figures and frames which it then naturalised, capitalist 
realism hobbled what Jason Read identifies as the “particular 
power of humanity (and the linchpin of our emancipation)”: 
“our faculty to reorder differently the images, the thoughts, 
the affects, the desires and the beliefs that are associated in 
our mind, the phrases that come out of our mouths, and the 
movements that emanate from our bodies.” Cultural Studies 
was also based on this account of the capacity for reordering 
(which it derived partly from Spinoza, via Althusser). The 
reordering of images thoughts, affects, desires, beliefs and 
languages plainly cannot be achieved by “politics” alone — it 
is a matter for culture, in the widest sense. 

Seen from this point of view, the locking of popular 


culture into repetition that I describe in Ghosts Of My Life'* — 
and which Simon Reynolds also describes in Retromania! — is 
therefore a very serious problem. Popular culture’s incapacity 
to produce innovation is a persistent ambient signal that 
nothing can ever change. Sometimes, it can seem fiendishly 
difficult to account for what has happened to popular culture, 
but the explanation for its sterility and stasis is ultimately 
quite simple. Innovation in popular culture has 
overwhelmingly come from the working class. Neoliberalism 
has been a systematic and sustained attack on working-class 
life — the results are now all around us. 

Furthermore, the incursion of capitalist cyberspace into 
every area of life and the psyche has intensified the processes 
of de-socialisation. This is not to say that there are no 
progressive potentials in the web, but these have almost 
certainly been overrated, while the impact of cyberspace in 
de-socialising culture and subjectivity has been massively 
underestimated. Here I merely rehearse Bifo’s account of 
semio-capitalism and Jodi Dean’s critique of communicative 
capitalism, but it is important to operationalise this critique. 

Blogs and social media have allowed us to talk to 
ourselves (but not to reach out beyond the left bubbles); they 
have also generated pathological behaviours and forms of 
subjectivity which not only generate misery and anger — they 
waste time and energy, our most crucial resources. Email and 
handhelds, meanwhile, have produced new forms of isolation 
and loneliness: the fact that we can receive communications 
from work anywhere and anytime means we are exposed to 
work’s order-words when we are alone, without the 
possibility of support from fellow workers. 


In sum, the obsession with the web, its monopolisation of 
any idea of the new, has served capitalist realism rather than 
undermined it. Which does not mean, naturally, that we 
should abandon the web, only that we should find out how to 
develop a more instrumental relationship with it. Put simply, 
we should use it — as a means of dissemination, 
communication and distribution — but not live inside it. The 
problem is that this goes against the tendencies of handhelds. 
We all recognise the by now clichéd image of a train carriage 
full of people pecking at their tiny screens, but have we really 
registered how miserable this really is, and how much it suits 
capital for these pockets of socialisation to be closed down? 


Knowing Someone in this Life Feels as Desperate as Me 


Some folk in Plan C have been talking about consciousness- 
raising, and for many reasons, I believe that it is a crucially 
important to revive and proliferate this practice (or range of 
practices) now. Consciousness-raising is partly about the 
discovery and production of subjugated knowledges, but it is 
also about the immediate production of socialisation, of forms 
of subjectivity antithetical to the always/on-always lonely 
mode of contemporary capitalist individuality. 
Consciousness-raising opens up the possibility of living, 
not merely theorising about, a collective perspective. It can 
give us the resources to behave, think and act differently at 
work (if it makes any sense to talk about being “at” work 
anymore), where capitalist realism has become second 
nature. The roots of any successful struggle will come from 
people sharing their feelings, especially their feelings of 


misery and desperation, and together attributing the sources 
of these feelings to impersonal structures, albeit impersonal 
structures mediated by particular figures to which we must 
attach populist loathing. 

In the harsh conditions of cyberspatialised capitalism — 
conditions that, as Jennifer M. Silva demonstrates, have 
produced a “hardening” of the self, especially in the young — 
consciousness-raising can produce a new compassion, for 
others and for ourselves. Neurotic-Oedipalising capitalism 
responsibilises, harshly blaming us, while — in its therapeutic 
mode — telling us that we have the power as individuals to 
change anything and everything: if we’re unhappy, it’s up to 
us to fix it. Consciousness-raising, meanwhile, is about 
positive depersonalisation: it’s not your fault, it’s capitalism. 
No individuals can change anything, not even themselves; but 
collective activation is already, immanently, overcoming 
individualised immiseration. 

So I present below a number of strategies, practices and 
orientations, starting from the most immediate (something 
groups can do right now) and moving towards the more 
remotes. The list is of course not exhaustive; and I can’t claim 
credit for coming up with any of the strategies myself. The 
point is to share them, add to them, elaborate them. 

The chief obstruction to all of these steps is what, in a 


trenchant and clear-eyed analysis, Ewa Jasiewicz calls “time 
7.16 


poverty : 
Our time is under attack. Work will be intensified, 
worse paid, and more casualised — if we don’t have it, 
we'll be working to have it; mandatory and supervised 


job searches and workfare will see people forced to 
spend their time locked into coerced, computerised 
distraction. A real, diverse, working class self- 
representative movement needs to include people 
facing and living these experiences, but how will that 
happen when we’re too tied up working? 


Access to time and our own labour is key and will 
determine participation and the ability to organise. If 
we can’t have our own time to organise, we can’t 
organise, we can’t meet each other, we cannot find each 
other. Work and the benefits regime — which is work 
under different conditions and profit margins — are key 
sites of struggle. Solidarity will need to step up if we are 
to win workplace disputes and strikes, refusals of 
workfare and support for people getting sanctioned, so 
that people have more control over their time and 
labour. 


All our commons are under attack. The condition of 
time poverty and its roots — intensification of labour, 
welfare repression, criminalisation and incarceration — 
have to be recognised as major obstacles to movement, 
diversity and power. These obstacles need to be tackled 
if we want to overcome the ideology of wage labour as a 
determinant of human value on a popular level. 


The problem is that, in order to struggle against time 
poverty, the main resource we require is time — a nasty 
vicious circle that capital, with its malevolent genius, now 
has... This problem is absolutely immanent — writing this and 
the other posts I have completed this week has meant that I 


have fallen enormously behind on my work, which is storing 
up stress for the next week or so. 

The first thing we must do in response to all this is to put 
into practice what I outlined above: try not to blame 
ourselves. #Itsnotyourfault We must try to do everything we 
can to politicise time poverty rather than accept blame as 
individuals for failing to complete our work on time. The 
reason we feel overwhelmed is that we are overwhelmed — it 
isn’t an individual failing of ours; it isn’t because we haven’t 
“managed our time” properly. However, we can use the 
scarce resources we already have more effectively if we work 
together to codify practices of collective re-habituation 
(setting new rules for our engagement with social media and 
capitalist cyberspace in general for example). 

Anyway, here goes: 


1. Talk to fellow workers about how we feel. This will re- 
introduce care and affection into spaces where we are 
supposed to be competitive and isolated. It will also start to 
break down the difference between (paid) work and social 
reproduction on which capitalism depends. 


2. Talk to opponents Most people who vote Tory and UKIP 
are not monsters, much as we might like to think they are. 
It’s important that we understand why they voted as they did. 
Also, they may not have been exposed to an alternative view. 
Remember that people are more likely to be persuaded if 
defensive character armour is not triggered. 


3. Create knowledge exchange labs. This follows from what 
I argued a few days ago. Lack of knowledge about economics 


seems to me an especially pressing problem to address, but 
we could also do with more of us knowing about law, I 
suspect. 


4. Create social spaces. Create times and spaces specifically 
dedicated to attending to one another: not (yet more) 
conferences, but sessions where people can share their 
feelings and ideas. I would suggest restricting use of 
handhelds in these spaces: not everything has to be live 
tweeted or archived! Those with access to educational or art 
spaces could open these up for this purpose. 


5. Use social media pro-actively, not reactively. Use social 
media to publicise, to spread memes, and to constitute a 
counter-media. Social media can provide emotional support 
during miserable events like Thursday. But we should try to 
use social media as resource rather than living inside it at all 
times. Facebook can be useful for discussions and trying out 
new ideas, but attempting to debate on Twitter is absurd and 
makes us feel more stressed. (He says, thinking of the time 
when, sitting on a National Express coach, perched over his 
handheld, he tried to intervene in an intricate discussion 
about Spinoza’s philosophy — all conducted in 140 
characters.) 


6. Generate new figures of loathing in our propaganda. 
Again, this follows up from what I argued in the “Communist 


Realism” post.’’ Capitalist realism was established by 
constituting the figure of the lazy, feckless scrounger as a 
populist scapegoat. We must float a new figure of the 
parasite: landlords milking the state through housing benefit, 


“entrepreneurs” exploring cheap labour, etc. 


7. Engage in forms of activism aimed at logistical 
disruption. Capital has to be seriously inconvenienced and to 
fear before it yields any territory or resources. It can just wait 
out most protests, but it will take notice when its logistical 
operations are threatened. We must be prepared for them 
cutting up very rough once we start doing this — using anti- 
terrorist legislation to justify practically any form of 
repression. They won't play fair, but it’s not a game of cricket 
— they know it’s class war, and we should never forget it 
either. 


8. Develop Hub struggles Some struggles will be more 
strategically and symbolically significant than others — for 
instance, the Miners’ Strike was a hub struggle for capitalist 
realism. We might not be able to identify in advance what 
these struggles are, but we must be ready to swarm in and 
intensify them when they do occur. 


Summer is Coming 


The Lannisters won on Thursday, but their gold has already 
run out, and summer is coming. What we saw in the debates 
dominated by Nicola Sturgeon was not a mirage — it is a 
rising tide, an international movement, a movement of 
history, which has not yet reached an England sandbagged in 
misery and mediocrity. Comrades, I hope (ha!) for the sake of 
your mental health and your blood pressures that you didn’t 
see the right-wing tabloids over the weekend (tw for class 
hatred): middle England crowing over its “humiliation” of 


“Red” Ed. Well if they think Ed was Red, wait until they see 
the coming Red Swarm. Outer England has been sedated, but 
it is waking from its long slumber, carrying new weapons... 


for now, our desire 


is nameless} 


ace 


In our day’, Nikita Khrushchev told a crowd in the 
Lenin Stadium of Moscow on 28 September 1959, ‘the 
dreams mankind cherished for ages, dreams expressed 
in fairy tales which seemed sheer fantasy, are being 


> 


translated into reality by man’s own hands’. 
— Francis Spufford, Red Plenty* 


This quotation from Francis Spufford’s extraordinary Red 
Plenty reminds us that when communism was defeated, it 
wasn’t just a particular ideology that disappeared. The demise 
of communism was also the disappearance of modernism’s 
Promethean dream of a total transformation of human 
society. Michael Hardt has argued that “the positive content 
of communism, which corresponds to the abolition of private 
property, is the autonomous production of humanity — a new 
seeing, a new hearing, a new thinking, a new loving.”° 

The arrival of what I have called capitalist realism — the 
widespread acceptance that there is no alternative to 


capitalism -— therefore meant the end of these new 
productive, perceptual, cognitive and libidinal possibilities. It 
meant that we would be reduced to the same old seeing, 
hearing, thinking, loving... forever. Fredric Jameson long ago 
argued that postmodernism was the cultural logic of late 
capitalism, and the features that Jameson claimed were 
characteristic of the postmodern — pastiche, the collapse of 
historicity — are now ubiquitous. The only future that capital 
can reliably deliver is technological — we count historical 
time not in cultural shifts, but in technological upgrades, 
watching the same old things on higher definition screens. 


The Reality of Class Continues 


The attitude of realism that dominant capitalism requires is 
essentially depressive. The management of this collective 
depression goes through a series of thresholds. First of all, we 
come to expect very little: nothing will ever happen again. 
Then we think that maybe the things that once happened 
weren’t actually so great. Finally, we accept that nothing has 
ever happened, nor could ever happen. The more that 
depression is normalised, the harder it is to even identify it. 
Radically lowered expectations become habituated. Time 
flattens out. 

This generalised depression is one reason that so little has 
happened since the major capitalist crisis of 2008. Yet this 
depression is itself both a symptom and a cause of something 
else: the decomposition of class solidarity. We would have to 
go deep into the nineteenth century to find a moment when 
class consciousness was as weak as it is now. Not only capital, 


but also elements of the post-68 left, have maintained that 
class is an outmoded category, unfit to deal with the 
multiplicities and complications of twentyfirst-century life. 
Yet these complications are in some respects a mirage, 
concealing the persistence of a class structure in which the 
majority of the population is marked as inferior. The reality 
of class continues, but without class consciousness. Beverley 
Skeggs and Helen Wood’s work on the class basis of reality TV 
and Owen Jones’s analysis of the “demonisation of the 
working class” show that class is displayed even as it is 
disavowed in contemporary culture. 

Since the 1960s, the left has split into an authoritarian- 
nostalgic Leninism, committed to a party form and a class 
politics whose historical moment seems to have passed, and a 
supposedly “new” Left which rejects institutions and the 
centrality of the class struggle and puts all its faith in the 
capacity of the people to mobilise autonomously and to 
produce outside capitalist social relations. We desperately 
need to undo this binary. There is no way back to the old 
Leninist party, any more than there is a way back to Fordist 
capitalism. Yet naive autonomism has shown that it has no 
purchase on the current moment either. Anti-capitalism and 
its retinue of strategies — occupations, protests — have not 
caused capital a moment’s serious alarm. 68 preached that 
structures don’t walk on the street — but if anti-capitalism 
has taught us anything, it is that, by itself, street activism has 
little effect on structures. 


There Is No Desire for Capitalism 


We don’t have to choose between class politics and anti- 
authoritarianism any more than we need to choose between 
Gramsci, Deleuze or Guattari, between a hegemonic approach 
and a politics of desire. In fact, if we are to succeed, we must 
absolutely refuse this false choice. Class politics must be 
renewed and resumed, not simply revived as if nothing has 
happened. In a Gramscian mode, we need to take institutions 
seriously again. Mainstream media are still where our sense 
of reality is produced; and despite all the claims about the 
waning of the state, parliament still has power over life and 
death via its control of the military, health services and social 
security. Yet these institutions cannot be renewed from 
within — it is necessary to articulate the institution and the 
forces outside them. 

At the same time, desire is not some vitalistic energy 
which will spontaneously emerge once bodies are freed from 
institutions. Rather, desire is always the result of processes of 
libidinal engineering — and at the moment, our desire is 
manipulated by capital’s army of PR, branding and 
advertising specialists. The left needs to produce its own 
machineries of desire. It’s true that, at first sight, we seem to 
be at something of a disadvantage here, when we consider the 
vast resources that capital has at its disposal aimed at 
capturing our desire. Yet there is no desire for capitalism as 
such, just as culture is composed from libidinal materials that 
have no essential relation to capital — which is why capital 
has to distract, depress, and addict us in order to keep us 
captivated and subordinated. 

But if we are no longer to define ourselves negatively, by 
our opposition to capital, what will be the name of our 


positive project? I don’t believe that the old signifier 
“communism” can be revived for this purpose. It is now 
irretrievably tainted by terrible associations, forever tied to 
the nightmares of the twentieth century. At the moment, our 
desire is nameless — but it is real. Our desire is for the future 
— for an escape from the impasses of the flatlands of capital’s 
endless repetitions — and it comes from the future — from 
the very future in which new perceptions, desires, cognitions 
are once again possible. As yet, we can grasp this future only 
in glimmers. But it is for us to construct this future, even as — 
at another level — it is already constructing us: a new kind of 
collective agent, a new possibility of speaking in the first 
person plural. At some point in this process, the name for our 
new desire will appear and we will recognise it. 


anti-therapy* 


The idea that talking about our feelings could be a political 
act seems counterintuitive. Aren’t people talking about their 
emotions more than ever before? And hasn’t this new 
emotionalism coincided with the emergence of what I have 
called capitalist realism — the deeply embedded view that 
capitalism is the only “realistic” economic system? 


New Labour and the Birth of Emo-Politics 


In order to begin to answer this, let’s turn to one of the 
central hubs of capitalist realism, the UK. Tony Blair’s New 
Labour naturalised what Thatcher had to fight for: the idea 
that there was no alternative to neoliberal capitalism. In 
retrospect, it is now clear that the first few months of Tony 
Blair’s first term as prime minister also inaugurated a new 
moment in British political life — the birth of what we might 
call emo-politics. Blair brought a new emotional tone to 
British government. He positioned himself as part of a Britain 
that was more at ease with expressing its feeling than his 
parents’ generation and their predecessors — with their 
stereotypical “stiff upper lips” — had been. Crucial to this was 


Blair and his advisers’ manipulation of the extraordinary 
grief jamboree that ensued in the immediate wake of the 
death of Diana, Princess of Wales, which happened only a few 
months after New Labour came to power. 

The death famously wrongfooted the monarchy, with its 
older models of duty and emotional restraint, but Blair’s 
delivery of his famous speech about the “People’s Princess” — 
scripted by New Labour’s spin doctor, Alastair Campbell — 
not only established his authority as a prime minister, it 
initiated a new phase of neoliberal governance in Britain. 

Thanks to Campbell and compliant members of the British 
media, a strong narrative soon emerged, in which Blair’s 
apparent emotional openness was contrasted with the 
Queen’s “coldness”. The monarch’s remoteness was now 
equated with “unhealthy” forms of emotional repression. Just 
as Blair sold himself as a moderniser who was taking the 
Labour Party away from the “class politics of the past”, so 
New Labour would also make a break with the traditional 
account of emotions. The government would now take the 
lead in ensuring that the population had the “correct”, 
“healthy” response to emotional distress. The normative tone 
would have been worrying enough, but New Labour’s 
emotional politics went far beyond mere mood-setting or the 
offering of recommendations. 

Instead, the new conception of emotional health was 
passive-aggressively enforced — in the authoritarian style of 
neoliberalism which New Labour made their own — by a 
battery of measures which intervened to an unprecedented 
degree in the population’s emotional lives. Health, education 
and social control were all part of this project. Teachers were 


suborned into the role of emo-cops, ensuring that 
schoolchildren complied with the new _ emotional 
normativity. Parents judged to be failing were now required 
to attend “parenting classes”. 

Meanwhile, the question of how genuine Blair’s feelings of 
grief were takes us to the heart of the Blair enigma: did he 
really believe in the doctrines he hawked, or was he a strange 
combination of charismatic showmanmanipulator and 
depthless puppet of capital? What did Blair see when he 
looked in the mirror then, and what does he see now? Are we 
dealing with self-deception, messianic delusion, or a new kind 
of postmodern psychopathy? The enigma remains as 
unsolvable now as it was twenty years ago. What is certain is 
that Blair led the way in normalising the emotional self- 
exploitation that was necessary for the final phase of 
neoliberalism in Britain. 

The early Blair perfected the art of “spincerity” — the 
public performance of an emotion that you may or may not 
actually feel. As Britain’s economy became ever more reliant 
on the service and sales jobs, increasing numbers of workers 
were forced to develop the techniques of emotional 
simulation which Blair publicly pioneered. 

In their book The Dangerous Rise of Therapeutic Education, 
Kathryn Ecclestone and Dennis Hayes argue that New Labour 
turned to popular therapy to fill the gap left by class politics. 
These “therapeutic orthodoxies”, they argue, 


include claims that past life experiences have long-term 
negative emotional effects for everyone, and 
particularly pernicious effects for an _ increasing 


minority. The overall message is that, behind our 
apparently confident facades, we are all, to a greater or 
lesser extent, fragile and vulnerable and, as a 
consequence, we need particular forms of emotional 


support. 


Ecclestone and Hayes are right that these therapeutic 
tenets have been widely promulgated, and often accepted 
without much criticism. As Eva Illouz has been especially 
perspicacious in identifying, therapeutic orthodoxies have 
been disseminated, not only by therapists themselves, but by 
a popular culture which has enthusiastically adopted 
therapeutic motifs and conceptual frames. Ecclestone and 
Hayes are also right that therapy filled the gap that appeared 
when New Labour explicitly repudiated the concept of class 
struggle. However, Ecclestone and Hayes’s solution to the 
“therapeutic turn” is simply to play off one form of 
reactionary politics against another. Their call for a return to 
an education based on “reason, science and progress” is 
superficially laudable. Ultimately, however, theirs is 
conservative position, which offers us only a (false) choice 
between different kinds of authoritarianism. In place of New 
Labour’s soft — but highly invasive — authoritarianism, 
Ecclestone and Hayes posit an unappetizing return to 
traditional forms of authoritarianism. They are also in danger 
of endorsing the very emotional remoteness that superficially 
justifies the therapeutic turn. The problem with what I would 
like to call here the therapeutic imaginary is not that it posits 
subjects as vulnerable, haunted by events in their past lives, 
and lacking in confidence. Most subjects in capitalism — 


including those in the ruling class — fit that description. The 
problem with the therapeutic imaginary — and this is a 
problem that goes back to Freud and the origins of 
psychoanalysis — is its claim that these issues can be solved 
by the individual subject working on him- or herself, with 
only the therapist to assist them. 

In addition, Ecclestone and Hayes’ refusal of the role of 
emotion in education — or rather their placing of emotion in 
opposition to “reason, science and progress” — presents a 
diminished account of the Enlightenment project to which 
they claim allegiance. This is the Enlightenment as 
understood by someone like Richard Dawkins — an 
Enlightenment rightly criticised for its patriarchal bias by the 
“postmodern” theorists that it is no surprise at all to see 
Ecclestone and Hayes disdaining. The “Enlightenment” here 
ends up simply reinforcing the largely unexamined class, 
gender and race assumptions of the ruling class. 

This account of Enlightenment can be contrasted with the 
one that emerges in the work of Jonathan Israel. In Israel’s 
narrative, Enlightenment corrodes the bases of all traditional 
forms of authority. This does not lead to some “postmodern” 
free-for-all any more than it mandates some dogmatic 
adherence to the current institutions of science. Rather, 
forms of “authority” which claim their legitimacy from 
tradition stand exposed as illegitimate, which is to say 
authoritarian. It then becomes possible to contrast such 
authoritarianism with a democratic and transparent model of 
authority. 

The defining principle of Radical Enlightenment is the 
conviction that there is nothing that — in theory if not in fact 


— cannot be understood. This was the belief animating 
Spinoza’s philosophy, which, Israel argues, provided the 
foundations upon which Radical Enlightenment would grow. 

Here we can return to the emotions. As is well known, far 
from ignoring emotions, or assuming they could be bypassed 
in some way, Spinoza’s philosophy makes the management of 
emotions central to its project. It aims not to subdue 
emotions, but to engineer joy — a task that can only be 
achieved when reason is not simply opposed to feelings, but 
brought to bear on them. According to Spinoza’s logic, 
ignoring emotions only mystifies them, putting them beyond 
the purview of rational enquiry. All of which makes Spinoza 
an eminently modern philosopher, but also a thinker whose 
work is an indispensable resource for any progressive project. 
This is especially so now, in an era in which more and more 
areas of life and the psyche dominated by agencies which 
engage in libidinal and emotional engineering — most of 
which is undertaken, knowingly or unknowingly, in the 
interests of capital. 

New Labour’s authoritarian emo-politics was ostensibly 
part of its “progressive” supplement to capitalist realism. 
Blairism maintained that the only way to implement any 
measures that would produce “social justice” was to 
capitulate to the dominance of capitalism. It was “unrealistic” 
to hope for anything more; such expectations were a relic of 
an earlier moment — the conditions for which have now 
disappeared - when the organised working class could assert 
itself against capital. New Labour accepted and naturalized 
this new composition of social forces, arguing that its 
capitulation would allow it the bargaining room to bring in 


measures — such as the minimum wage - which a Thatcherite 
neoliberal party would always block. It turned out, however, 
that New Labour’s emo-politics were actually fundamental to 
the securing of neoliberalism in the UK. To understand why 
that is, we have to reflect more closely on what neoliberalism 
is. We must also further reflect on the role that the 
therapeutic imaginary has played in embedding 
neoliberalism. To do that, we will now shift our attention 
away from the UK, and onto the US. 


Antinomies of the Therapeutic Imaginary 


Jennifer M. Silva’s Coming Up Short: Working-Class Adulthood in 
an Age of Uncertainty heartbreakingly registers the corrosive 
effects of the neoliberal environment on intimacy. 

Silva’s book focuses on young people specifically — it is 
based on a hundred interviews she undertook with young 
working-class men and women in two American cities 
(Lowell, Massachusetts and Richmond, Virginia). On the face 
of it, Silva’s starting point is similar to Ecclestone’s and 


9 oe 


Hayes’. “In a world of rapid change and tenuous loyalties,” 
Silva argues, “the language and institution of therapy — and 


the self-transformation it promises — has exploded in 


American culture.”* Ecclestone and Hayes saw New Labour’s 
adoption of therapeutic tropes as the consequence of some 
mixture of opportunism, authoritarianism and bungled good 
intentions. For Silva, meanwhile, the spread of therapeutic 
culture in the US is both a means by which neoliberal 
individualism has been embedded and a consequence of that 
embedding. According to Ecclestone and Hayes, therapy 


produces a “softening” of subjectivity and culture, manifested 
in a weakening of authority and a strengthening of an ever 
more intrusive state. For Silva, by contrast, the dissemination 
of therapeutic concepts has resulting in a hardening of the 
individual subject. “[WJorking class men and women born in 
the wake of neoliberalism [...] learn to see their struggles to 
survive on their own as morally right, making a virtue of not 
asking for help; if they could do it, then everyone else should 
too.”" 

This brings out the difference between New Labour’s 
rendition of neoliberalism and neoliberalism in the American 
context. The New Labour model of the (implicitly working- 
class) subject functioned as a double-bind. The double bind, 
as Deleuze and Guattari explain in Anti-Oedipus, “is the term 
used by Gregory Bateson to describe the simultaneous 
transmission of two kinds of messages, one of which 
contradicts the other, as for example the father who says to 
his son: go ahead, criticize me, but strongly hints that all 
effective criticism — at least a certain type of criticism — will 


be very unwelcome.” The contradictory instructions serve to 
destabilise the subject, keeping them in a state of permanent 
neurotic anxiety. 

On the one hand, the working-class subject was 
interpellated by New Labour as a being capable of radical, 
indeed practically infinite, selftransformation. (One of the 
most significant effects of this ideology — which was at one 
and the same time its presupposition — was the divesting of 
the subject of its class position. Class “identity” was perceived 
as both an atavism and a constraint, holding the subject back 
from the infinite promises of self-reinvention.) On the other 


hand, as soon as something went “wrong” — when the 
behavior of working-class individuals inevitably went outside 
the parameters policed by the myriad of surveillance and 
control agencies which the New Labour administration 
invented — they were seen as fundamentally lacking in self- 
determination and the capacity for self-care, and were 
subject to intensive disciplining (e.g. the parenting classes 
mentioned above). 

In practice, the American situation that Silva describes 
operates with the same double bind. It is just that the 
emphasis is different. New Labour, still haunted by a socialist 
and social democratic history that it could never fully abjure, 
presented its management and disciplining of the working 
class in passive-aggressive terms, as “care”. In the US, where 
this social democratic history is lacking, the hyper(neo)- 
liberal interpellation of the subject as capable of self- 
determination and self-reinvention is supplemented — 
especially in the case of black working-class individuals — by 
the aggressive use of incarceration. Therapeutic narratives of 
self-transformation feed into what Alex Williams has called 
“negative solidarity”. This is the tendency for neoliberal 
subjects to “race to the bottom”. If others are perceived to be 
in receipt of resources or benefits that they “haven’t earned”, 
they should not only be denied those resources, they should 
be publicly shamed for claiming them. Everyone should 
“stand on their own two feet”. 

One of the many values of Silva’s book is the thorough 
account it gives of the emotional and cultural roots of 
negative solidarity. Silva argues that the hardened model of 
subjectivity that she sees exhibited by most of the people she 


interviewed for her study is the result of years of institutional 
and existential abandonment. A therapeutic narrative of 
heroic selftransformation is the only story that makes sense 
in a world in which institutions can no longer be relied upon 
to support or nurture individuals. In an environment 
dominated by unrelenting competition and insecurity, it is 
neither possible to trust others, nor to project any sort of 
long-term future. Naturally, these two problems feed into one 
another, in one of the many vicious spirals which neoliberal 
culture has specialised in innovating. The inability to imagine 
a secure future makes it very difficult to engage in any sort of 
long-term commitment. Rather than seeing a partner as 
someone who might share the stresses imposed by a harshly 
competitive social field, many of the working-class 
individuals to whom Silva spoke instead saw relationships as 
an additional source of stress. In particular, many of the 
heterosexual women regarded relationships with men as too 
risky a proposition. In conditions where they could not 
depend on much outside themselves, the self-reliance they 
were forced to develop was both a culturally validated 
achievement and a hard-won survival strategy which they 
were reluctant to give up. 

In any case, what we confront here is a first antinomy of 
the therapeutic imaginary: the idea that the proliferation of 
therapeutic orthodoxies simultaneously produces “softened” 
subjects — subjects who identify as lacking, if not actually 
damaged — and subjects that are “hardened” — subjects who 
pride themselves on a claimed invulnerability. We can 
approach the second antinomy via the notion of subjects that 
are excessively invested in their own vulnerability. The 


severe problems inherent in such an investment from a left- 
wing point of view were analysed twenty years ago by Wendy 


Brown in her important essay “Wounded Attachments”.° 
Brown understood very well the libidinal, discursive and 
administrative complex that would produce New Labour: “As 
liberal discourse converts political identity into essentialized 
private interest,” she wrote, “disciplinary power converts 
interest into normativized social identity manageable by 
regulatory regimes.” However, the main point of Brown’s 
essay was to diagnose the psycho-libidinal origins of an 
identarian political formation which has become even more 
deeply embedded since she wrote the essay in the 1990s. 
Drawing on Nietzsche’s account of resentment in On The 
Genealogy of Morals, Brown wrote of a political subjectivity 
which “becomes deeply invested in its own impotence, even 
while it seeks to assuage the pain of its powerlessness 
through its vengeful moralizing, through its wide distribution 
of suffering, through its reproach of power as such.” As 
Brown observed, “politicized identity thus becomes attached 
to its own exclusion both because it is premised on this 
exclusion for its very existence as identity.” Brown’s careful 
diagnoses of this political psychopathology turned out to be 
prophetic as well as astute. Twenty years on, and the mixture 
of moralizing aggression and investment in impotence has 
proliferated in a political atmosphere now substantially 
shaped by the online environment. In her article, “Sexual 
Paranoia Strikes Academe”, published in The Chronicle of 
Higher Education, Laura Kipnis describes a situation on 
American campuses in which female students are encouraged 
to see themselves as helpless victims of predatory lecturers. 


“Everywhere on campuses today,” Kipnis wrote, 


you find scholars whose work elaborates sophisticated 
models of power and agency. It would be hard to 
overstate the influence, across disciplines, of Michel 
Foucault, whose signature idea was that power has no 
permanent address or valence. Yet our workplaces 
themselves are promulgating the crudest version of 
top-down power imaginable, recasting the professoriate 
as Snidely Whiplashes twirling our mustaches and 
students as helpless damsels tied to railroad tracks. 
Students lack volition and independent desires of their 
own; professors are would-be coercers with dastardly 


plans to corrupt the innocent.’ 


Kipnis’s article predictably became embroiled in the very 
processes it sought to analyse, as she became the target of 
aggressive moralising attack from groups self-identifying as 
representatives of the vulnerable. 

Here, then, is the first part of our second antinomy of the 
therapeutic imaginary: there is an excessive tendency 
amongst many subjects today to identify as victims of abuse. 
It is important to note at this point that I am not conflating 
Kipnis’s argument with that of Ecclestone and Hayes. 
Whereas their position ultimately amounts to a call for the 
restoration of older models of authority, Kipnis is more of a 
left-libertarian who deplores the moralising authoritarianism 
that has spread so pervasively through American student 
politics. At no point does Kipnis underplay the suffering 
caused by actual abuse, or imply that the “survivors” of such 


abuse should button up and get on with it. 

If both Kipnis and Brown’s essays highlight real and 
pervasive psychopathologies on the left, their analyses need 
to be weighed against an acknowledgement that sexual abuse 
by those in politics and media is actually far more widespread 
than had been previously supposed. The obvious example 
here would be the disturbing and curious case of Jimmy Savile 
in the UK (which is echoed by the accusations that have 
recently circled around Bill Cosby in the US). Savile was a DJ 
turned light entertainer, best known in the 1970s for his work 
on the children’s wish-fulfilment television show Jim’ll Fix It. 
After his death, rumours that had dogged him for many years 
were confirmed — Savile had sexually abused thousands of 
victims, including many children. 

Savile was no ordinary entertainer or media figure. Like 
some character out of a David Lynch film, Savile had links 
with both the criminal underworld and the most powerful 
members of the ruling class. A massive police investigation 
into those who had worked with Savile (Operation Yewtree) 
discovered that he was not alone — many of his associates 
were also paedophiles. Yet the remit of Operation Yewtree 
was confined to the entertainment world — Savile was also a 
friend of politicians and policemen. In the wake of the Savile 
allegations emerging, a new scandal is brewing in the UK. 
This time it centres on politics, with Thatcher’s right-hand 
man Leon Brittan and former Conservative prime minister 
Edward Heath among those accused of paedophilia. 

This brings us to the second half of the second antinomy 
of the therapeutic imaginary: there is far more abuse than 
had previously been thought possible. The sense of the 


possible here has little to do with what actually happened; 
rather, it is what is deemed credible by the virtual figure that 
Lacanian theory calls the big Other. The big Other is 
something like the virtual observer assumed to be the 
audience for official discourse, and it is the big Other which 
secures the consistency of any reality system. There is always 
some discrepancy between what groups and individuals know 
and what the big Other believes. This is because, as Lacan 
notes, a defining feature of the big Other is its inability to see 
everything. However, a severe crisis will occur if the 
discrepancy between what groups and individuals know and 
what the big Other “believes” becomes too marked. In such 
conditions, the official reality system is in danger of collapse. 
There is every reason to suspect that, in the UK and 
elsewhere in Europe, this is what we are currently 
encountering. Under pressure from the banking crisis of 
2008, and the emergence of new political parties such as 
Syriza and Podemos, the reality- and libidinalengineering 
systems that have maintained capitalist realism for the last 
thirty years are beginning to look dysfunctional. In England 
in particular — the oldest capitalist country, and the culture 
with the most effective and historically durable dampening 
mechanisms in the world available to it — capitalist realism 
has operated by dramatically narrowing the affective and 
representational bandwidth of culture. A culture dominated 
by reality TV, self-improvement propaganda and corporate 
appeasement — all of which push therapeutic orthodoxies — 
has produced diminished expectations and representational 
conservatism. Yet the representational frameworks which 
have served English capitalist realism so well since the 1980s 


clearly cannot accommodate the trauma of the establishment 
paedophile scandals, any more than they can accommodate 
popular mobilisations against neoliberalism. You would 
indeed need the formal inventiveness of a David Lynch or a 
David Peace to do justice to the extremity of what the English 
ruling class has got up to. It turns out that the supposed 
fantasmatic and melodramatic excesses of Lynch and Peace’s 
work — its tendency to see conspiracies and abuse 
everywhere — is much closer to actuality than the 
moderation of respectable middlebrow literary and televisual 
“realism”. 

So here is the second antinomy in full: there is an 
excessive tendency amongst many subjects today to identify 
as victims of abuse; however, there is far more abuse than 
had previously been imagined. How can both these claims be 
true — and if they are, what does it tell us about the 
therapeutic imaginary? 


Capital Is More Real Than You Are: There Is No Such 
Thing as the Autonomous Individual 


To break out of this impasse, we need to abandon the belief in 
the autonomous individual that has been at the heart, not 
only of neoliberalism, but of the whole liberal tradition. In a 
successful attempt to break with social democratic and 
socialist collectivism, neoliberalism invested massive 
ideological effort into reflating this conception of the 
individual, with its supporting dramaturgy of choice and 
responsibility. 

If we want to reject this conception of the individual, then 


we might turn once again to Spinoza, whose whole work was 
based on the premise that such an individual could not exist. 
But, in the context of therapy, we might also turn to the 
radical therapist David Smail, who rejected all of the standard 
tropes of individualist therapy. “[W]hat we take to be causal 
processes of thought, decision and will are frequently little 
more than a kind of commentary that accompanies our 
action,” Smail argued in his book Power, Interest and 
Psychology: Elements of a Social Materialist Understanding of 


Distress.2> The interiority presupposed by much therapy is 
little more than an ideological special effect. Like Spinoza, 
Smail understands that the socalled “inside” is really a 
folding of the outside. Most of what is supposedly “inside” us 
has been acquired from the wider social field. “Many of the 
characteristics that we tend to regard as_ entirely 
‘psychological’ are acquired from outside. The most 
significant case in point is probably ‘self-confidence’, the 
crumbling of which is so often at the root of the kind of 
personal distress which can be ‘diagnosed’ by the experts as 


‘neurotic’.”? This means that, contrary to the founding 
principles of something like cognitive behavioural therapy, 
the means for self-transformation are not available to 
individuals. 


What people who suffer psychological distress tend to 
become aware of is that no matter how much they want 
to change, no matter how hard they try, no matter what 
mental gymnastics they put themselves through, their 
experiences of life stay much the same. This is because 
there is no such thing as an autonomous individual. 


What powers we have are acquired from and 
distributed within our social context, some of them (the 
most powerful) at unreachable distances from us. The 
very meaning of our actions is not something that we 
can autonomously determine, but is made intelligible 
(or otherwise) by orders of culture (proximal as well as 


distal) over which we have virtually no control.'° 


This is why any individual therapy — even that practiced 
by a sympathetic and politically progressive therapist — can 
only ever have limited effects. In order to really come to 
terms with the damage that has been done to them by and in 
the wider social field, individuals need to engage in collective 
practices that will reverse neoliberalism’s privatisation of 
stress. Here we can return to an important observation by 
Jennifer M. Silva: 


In social movements like feminism, self-awareness, or 
naming one’s problems, was the first step to radical 
collective awareness. For this generation, it is the only 
step, completely detached from any kind of solidarity; 
while they struggle with similar, and structurally 
rooted, problems, there is no sense of ‘we’. The 
possibility of collective politicization through naming 
one’s suffering is easily subsumed within these larger 
structures of domination because others who struggle 


are not seen as fellow sufferers but as objects of 


scorn.!4 


The spreading of therapeutic narratives was one way in 


which neoliberalism contained and privatised the molecular 
revolution that consciousnessraising brought about. The 
struggle to dismantle neoliberalism will therefore necessarily 
involve the rediscovery and reinvention of these formerly 
popular practices. So now we are in a position to answer the 
question I posed at the start of this essay: When can talking 
about our feelings become a political act? When it is part of a 
practice of consciousness-raising that makes visible the 
impersonal and intersubjective structures that ideology 
normally obscures from us. 


democracy is joy! 


“The meaning of OXI we should fight for is the belief in 
politics itself. OXI is the belief that we can throw off the 
demands of a supposedly ‘impartial’ economy that 
serves only the few, that we can reject the fallacy that 
‘economic necessity’ demands something we consider 
socially unacceptable, and instead begin to make 
decisions about our own collective social life. It is 
precisely this that makes the Greek OXI vote inspiring, 
the potential for a return of politics, and the headaches 
and uncertainties and dangers of attempting to walk an 
unknown path.” 


— Bert Russell, Plan Cc? 
“Nothing lasts forever, of that I’m sure” 


It’s somewhat ironic that theories of the “Event” have come 
to the fore in the most fashionable areas of academic political 
philosophy at just the moment in history when it has become 
clear that events in and of themselves don’t change anything. 
From the G20 protests, to the millions marching against the 
Iraq war, to the Arab Spring, to the short-lived student 


campaign against fees in the UK — the narrative of evental 
politics since the late 1990s has been reliably repetitious. 
Euphoric outbursts of dissent are followed by depressive 
collapse. Eventalism is the manic flipside of the general 
depressive tendency in boring academic Marxism — in which 
an ostensible Leninism/ Maoism (everything will change after 
the revolution!) obfuscates a de facto Adornianism (nothing 
could ever happen, everything is bad, so we might as well 
keep on taking the state’s pay cheques). The whole 
rehabilitation of the status of philosophy itself in the past 
couple of decades — the reversal of the democratising move 
to theory, and the colonisation of what is now called theory 
by third-rate obscurantist “philosophy” and curator-speak 
babble — is a sideshow, of course, but a symptomatic one. The 
sour comedy of academic philosophical Leninism and Maoism 
can now be seen as one of the last acts in a postmodern 
shadowplay — a pantomime in which we are condemned to 
the role of interactive audience, tweeting our responses onto 
the screen behind the main players, who carry on regardless. 

The emergence of Podemos and Syriza, the _post- 
referendum SNP and the Kurdish women’s movement are 
part of another rhythm of political transformation. The 
unseemly way in which swivel-chair Marxist philosophers 
and “anarchists” have slavered over any perceived mis-step 
by Syriza tells us all we need to know about these 
“revolutionaries”. They don’t want any sort of positive 
change to spoil the purity of the “revolutionary” theory. The 
revolutionary event will redeem everything... when it 
comes... but the time is not right, not yet, never yet. 

Whether capital crushes Syriza or not, it has already made 


major contributions to what will be a long struggle to 
overturn neoliberal hegemony. A line from Keir’s “On Social 
Strikes and Directional Demands” has kept coming back to me 
in all of the noise and chaos around the Greek situation: 
“Even at their point of failure Plan B electoral politics can be 
useful if they can clarify the anti-democratic effects of 


neoliberalism that work against all forms of collective 


action.’ 


If political change doesn’t happen through events alone, 
there are nevertheless moments which function as 
thresholds, opening up a new terrain of struggle, and 
allowing different collective emotions to propagate. While — 
for the sake of our fragile collective mental health — we 
shouldn’t get too carried away by the Oxi vote last week, we 
shouldn’t underestimate its significance either. Besides, as 
Bert Russell argues, the meaning of Oxi is not already 
guaranteed — it has to be established politically. The current 
struggle in Europe — currently focused on Greece, but sure to 
spread much wider in the near future — is an opportunity for 
us to reclaim democracy after its capture by neoliberalism in 
the 1970s and 1980s. The founding moment of neoliberalism 
was the decidedly anti-democratic overthrow of the 
democratic socialist Allende government in Chile. This was a 
double defeat: not only was a democratically elected, non- 
authoritarian, technologicallyorientated administration 
overthrown, an extreme neoliberal government was installed 
in its place. In Chile, the forced forgetting of the possibility of 
democratic socialism required mass torture, imprisonment 
and repression. 

Since then, the capitalist counter-revolution called 


neoliberalism has had a long run of it. But we should start to 
accept that, even if we can hardly believe it ourselves, 
neoliberal capitalism is now in its final, decadent phase... 
(Remember the End of History? Only a year ago, it seemed 
like it would last forever...) 

Restoration capital reeks of defeat and exhaustion, like 
the Eastern bloc at the end of the 1980s. The Soviet system, 
just like neoliberal capitalism now, was a gigantic Empire of 
Simulation in which by then, no one — not even the big Other 
— believed. Except, under state socialism, there was at least 
social housing, energy supplied by the state, etc. Under late 
neoliberalism, even in the “wealthiest” countries, such as 
ours, we don’t even have that: only a cybergothic Dickensian 
re-run... Temples of finance looming above food banks... 
nineteenth-century England minus the Victorian capitalists’ 
philanthropy and Promethean projects (imagine trying to 
install a sewer and an underground rail system in neoliberal 
London now: the whole of the West End feels like a vast 
construction site and film set, an anxiety dream terrain in 
which new obstacles appear by the minute)... Everything 
(mis)controlled by malfunctioning outsourced IT systems, 
impenetrable and unintelligible, like relics left behind by 
some long-since-absconded Gnostic demiurge... 


“The emotional contagion of the no vote is incalculable” 


The reality and emotional management systems that have 
served neoliberalism so well are now not only failing, but 
conspicuously failing... Of course, the buffers, the spoilers and 
the blockers haven’t given up yet... Not here, not in England, 


the country which designed the oldest and most effective 
damping system the world has ever known... They haven’t 
given up, they haven’t even realised that they will have soon 
have to adjust the reality programme they have been 
peddling for so long that it has become a drab second 
nature... Soon, they will have to pull the oldest trick in the 
English bourgeoisie’s book (they perfected it in 1688)... First 
of all you say it is impossible, then, when it happens, you say 
it was inevitable... “You see, you have to preserve the 
impression that nothing happens, especially when it does, is 
that clear? We don’t have revolutions here...” 

So the old capitalist realist script is not about to be 
abandoned, but those still spouting it are increasingly coming 
off like donkey-jacketed Old Lefties after the Thatcher victory 
in 83, bewildered and traumatised, still relying on habits 
which were once functional, but now amount to a kind of 
madness. (A boring madness, of course, it being them.) 

Listen to the BBC, Pravda for Market Stalinism. Roberto 
Mozzachiodi reprises an interview from Radio 4 in the wake 
of the Oxi vote: 


Reveller: I’ve got no money, but if I had money I 
wouldn’t base my decision on money, money flows, 
money evaporates. I have democracy in my heart, and 
I’m full up. 


BBC: Yes, but will democracy put a dinner on the table? 
You’re a young man. Let me tell you as an older man, 
that money matters when you're responsible for a wife 


and a child. 


Meanwhile, Huw Lemmey listens to Today, as John Humphrys 
is momentarily shellshocked out of his smirking 
knowingness: 


John Humphrys did an excellent impression of a 
Telegraph comments section contributor secretly 
kidnapped in his sleep, paradropped into Greece, and 
waking up in Syntagma Square confused, lonely and 
crying out for his wife. 


Yet the dreary old message, the mantra that the British 
bourgeoisie recites in its sleep — nothing has ever happened, 
nothing can ever happen, we need more time — is getting 
harder to push now that it’s evident that the ruling reality 
structure is coming apart practically everywhere we look. 

Capitalist realism cannot survive when alternatives are 
efflorescing... These alternatives are not only “political” in 
the narrow sense — they are also emotional. Kodwo Eshun, 
via email: “the emotional contagion of the No vote is 
incalculable, i.e. a different logic of calculation and futurity”. 
The Winter Years are ending, and summer is coming... A 
hyperstitional spiral: the more we believe it, the more we can 
make it happen, the more we make it happen, the more we 
believe it... 


Pyschopathologies of Corporate Capitalism 


In its pomp, neoliberalism used hope as well as fear, as part of 
a doublebind strategy which battered organised labour while 
seducing individual workers with the promises of consumer 
durables, satellite TV, job security... all these riches provided 


you comply with capital... provided, that is to say, you give up 
the possibility of Red Plenty... 

Since 2010, it’s become clear that the (flatpack) cupboard 
is bare: there are no more bribes, only threats. What’s more, 
there has been no new thinking, no new strategic orientation 
from the managers of capital. Gorged on decades of easy 
pickings, capital’s meat puppets have let their master down 
this time. Their unspoken conviction is: if it is broke, it’s too 
much like hard work to fix it. They have defaulted to the 
managerialist equivalent of retromania: more cuts, more 
accumulation by dispossession, more asset stripping of public 
services. 

This programme has to be understood in libidinal as well 
as politicaleconomic terms (because there is no economy 
without politics, no economy without libido). It is a 
psychopathology of the corporate elite. Even if the ultimate 
libido driving capital is miser-masochism (I will let myself 
become the means by which capital grows and proliferates), 
it’s clear that capital — which can machine whatever desiring 
complexes it needs — has from the start called upon an 
ancient Gothic impulse towards humiliating and subjugating 
others. Neoliberalism is in trouble now because, decoupled 
from any positive inducement, these drives — whether 
exhibited by the Troika in the deadly “loan-shark theatre” it 
is playing out with Greek people’s lives, or IDS “visibly 
excited by the prospect of hurting the poor’* — are now 
appearing in a more and more exposed form. 

Neoliberal austerity is at once a form of Sadism — in the 
technical, psychoanalytic sense, rather than the everyday, 
moralising sense — and corporate anorexia. What Sadism and 


anorexia have in common is the belief in the indestructibility 
of the fantasmatic body: no matter how much I cut, how 
much I punish, the body will survive... In the Sadist’s case, the 
fantasmatic body is the body of the endlessly humiliated 
Other; in the anorexic’s case, the fantasmatic body is, in a 
sense, their “own”. Yet the infinite elasticity of the fantastic 
body eventually comes up against the limits of the physical 
body. (Anorexia is the only mental illness that can directly 
kill you, but anorexics don’t want to die — they are engaged 
in an indefinite process of becoming-thinner which death 
actually interrupts.) It’s important to see how the capitalist 
fantasy necessarily oscillates between a punishing-without- 
end of an abjected fantasmatic body — where workers can be 
endlessly punished (restructured) and/or eliminated (cut) — 
and a belated recognition that the fantasmatic body depends 
on an actual, physically precarious body, with vulnerabilities 
and real limits. You could say that capital as such cannot 
recognise the collective worker-body as belonging to it; only 
communism can perform this integration. 

The ultimate fantasy here — the ultimate fantasy of 
capital “itself? — is of cutting workers away altogether. 
Capital’s libidinal metaphysics is a kind of cosmic 
libertarianism: capital identifies itself as a force of 
unbounded energy, whose capacity for infinite accumulation 
is obstructed only by political contingencies. Soon, always soon, 
capital dreams, I will be free of the need for politics... and free of 
the need for humans too... (“...liquidate labor, liquidate stocks, 
liquidate farmers, liquidate real estate...”). Capital’s realised 
utopia would be a burned-out planet full of fully-automated 
factories turning out shit that no one wants to buy, with no 


one left to buy it anyway, because the conditions for the 
continued existence of these factories is the destruction of an 
environment humans can live in. 


A great deal of modern economic discourse takes it as 
axiomatic that economic forces are the only ones that 
matter. This idea has bled into politics too, at least in 
the Western world: economic forces have been awarded 
the status of inexorable truths...The scenario we’re 
given — the one being made to feel inevitable — is of a 
hyper-capitalist dystopia. There’s capital, doing better 
than ever; the robots, doing all the work; and the great 
mass of humanity, doing not much, but having fun 
playing with its gadgets. (Though if there’s no work, 
there are going to be questions about who can afford to 


buy the gadgets.) > 


The absence of abundance is already accepted. The 
metaphors of the nature poets, mapping human hearts 
through once commonly understood imagery, are 
irrelevant and impenetrable. “The sun of Winter/The 
moon of Summer, and all the singing birds/Except the 
missel-thrush that loves juniper/Are quite shut out.” 
I’m sorry. The missel-what? Can the juniper be 
monetised? Is this missel-thing for sale? Our children 
already have no stable baseline from which to calibrate 
the loss of all that lives. It’s game over. 


Bearing this in mind, I finally find myself 
reluctantly agreeing with the business community. 
There is no time for delay. Let’s build the runway. Let’s 


choke the Earth. Let’s get this damn thing over with, for 
what can be avoided, whose end is purposed by the 
mighty gods of business? Hasten our demise, let our 
children be the last of their sorry line, and spare their 
unborn descendants any further suffering. We will not 
save the rhino. We will not even save the hedgehog. 
How can we save the world? 


But, if you can purge cheap sentiment from your 
mind, how exciting and fascinating it will be to watch 
as the world becomes uninhabitable. It’s almost worth 
going on a health kick to survive another 60 years and 
see everything immolated. How many humans have had 
the awe-inspiring opportunity to witness such 


spectacle: the end of all that is?° 


Why not export capital (and its wiling servants, if they are 


so keen on it) to an already-dead planet? Then capital can get 


on with realising its utopia, and we can get on with 


recovering earth for Red Plenty. 


It is crucial to note here that capital doesn’t — and 


necessarily cannot — understand “itself”. Capital is like 


Neuromancer before the fated fusion with Wintermute, a 


component part which narcissistically mistakes itself for a 


final cause. Or it is like Ultron, a deranged personification of a 


worldwide network, part fiendish artificial intelligence, part 


artificial stupidity, part petulant infant, constitutively 


blinded by its own core programming. 


Personification of things within the discourse of Capital 
presents the personification of things within 


capitalism, that is, the fetishism of commodities. But in 
addition to these two registers of personification, there 
remain another two, to which Marx’s Preface calls 
attention: the personification of persons, both textually 
and systematically. Capital personifies persons, so 
Capital personifies persons; the individuals whom 
bourgeois economics would take as economic agents 
are treated in the text as personifications of the “social 
relations whose creature (they) remain.” First and 
foremost of these categories is capital itself, and thus 
seldom is there a reference to “the capitalist” without 
the qualifying clause “i.e., capital personified”. 

When persons are personified, they are made in the 
image and likeness of the ur-person, Capital. Capital is 
the subject in this world; all other actors are figures, 
masks, faces, prosopopoeic personifications of the 
subject. This is the primacy of Capital already 
emblazoned in the title Capital, the place nineteenth- 
century novels most often reserve for the subject: 
Capital is the subject of Capital, as David Copperfield or 
Jane Eyre or Daniel Deronda are the subjects of David 
Copperfield, Jane Eyre, and Daniel Deronda. The analytic 
importance of this subject position, an idea advanced 
by the trope of personification more than by 
exposition, is not only that Capital is the protagonist of 
modernity, but that the workings of capitalism are 
described by this subjectification and embodiment of an 
abstraction. Capital is the story of Capital’s becoming- 
subject, of the relentless self-constitution, the 
“valorisation of value” that propels this mode of 


production. The artifice of the trope of personification 
calls attention to the artifice and instability of this 
subject, to the fissures and crises in its course of 


becoming, in its adventure of Bildung.’ 


Insofar as we are programmed by capital, we can’t 
understand what capital is either. The conditions for 
understanding capital properly lie outside it, in a communist 
science that — to hijack a phrase from Nick Land — must 
create the conditions for its own emergence almost entirely 
out of its enemy’s resources. From the inside (of capital), 
capital is an economic system, which relies on politics only 
contingently; from the outside, capital is an intricate set of 
(libidinal, ideological, violent) mechanisms designed to block 
the emergence of Red Plenty. 


There Is No Economy (Philosophical interlude: skip to 
next section if you want to avoid) 


THERE IS NO ECONOMY. There is no pure economy, no 
economy without politics, no economy without libido. David 
Graeber is surely right that neoliberalism is 


a form of capitalism that systematically prioritised 
political imperatives over economic ones. Given a 
choice between a course of action that would make 
capitalism seem the only possible economic system, and 
one that would transform capitalism into a viable, long- 
term economic system, neoliberalism chooses the 
former every time. There is every reason to believe that 
destroying job security while increasing working hours 


does not create a more productive (let alone more 
innovative or loyal) workforce. Probably, in economic 
terms, the result is negative — an impression confirmed 
by lower growth rates in just about all parts of the 
world in the eighties and nineties. But the neoliberal 
choice has been effective in depoliticising labor and 
overdetermining the future. Economically, the growth 
of armies, police, and private security services amounts 
to dead weight. It’s possible, in fact, that the very dead 
weight of the apparatus created to ensure the 
ideological victory of capitalism will sink it. But it’s also 
easy to see how choking off any sense of an inevitable, 
redemptive future that could be different from our 


world is a crucial part of the neoliberal project.® 


From the start, “economy” was the object-cause of a 
bourgeois “science”, which hyperstitionally bootstrapped 
itself into existence, and then bent and melted the matter of 
this and every other world to fit its presuppositions — the 
greatest theocratic achievement in a history that was never 
human, an immense conjuring trick which works all the 
better because it came shrouded in that damp grey English 
and Scottish empiricism which claimed to have seen off all 
gods. When Thatcher said “there is no such thing as society”, 
she was only echoing the assumptions of Hume and Smith: 
“society” is an unsupportable abstraction, a spook that 
proper scientific thinking will exorcise soon enough... Only 
impressions are verifiable, everything else is superstitious 
junk to be jettisoned. Everything, that is, except capital... 
(Those bloody savages attribute power to their wooden gods, 


whereas we...) 

Hume, to his credit, at least pushed empiricism to the 
point where it dismantled itself. It turns out, Hume showed, 
that when pursued to its logical conclusions, empiricism 
leaves us with none of the presuppositions upon which the 
emergent secular liberalism relied. There is no self (there is 
no impression that corresponds with what we call the self — a 
double scandal for empiricism, since all ideas were supposed 
to be rooted in impressions) just as there is no causality (we 
don’t experience cause and effect, only constant conjunction). 
Hume, stunned by the spider scepticism, offered a kind of 
homeopathic remedy against reason’s tendency to evacuate 
the human world of all its fetishes, touchstones and 
commonplaces. Reason, Hume argued, slumping into his 
backgammon chair, only has a very limited dominion over 
our lives. Emotion and habit dictate most of what we think 
and do. Thus, the self and causality are back, and Kant’s 
transcendental critique arrives to clear up the mess. 

So there is no escaping libido, not even for the British... 
This insight is crucial to the Radical Enlightenment which 
Spinoza patiently prepares in his lens-grinders’ lab in 
Amsterdam. As the defenders of theocratic and secular power 
quickly realised, Radical Enlightenment was the most 
dangerous weapon in Christendom — not least because it 
exposed as bogus the difference between theocratic and 
secular power: there is in all political power an irreducible 
theocratic element. Spinoza pre-emptively takes out both 
British empiricism and the “continental” trajectory kicked off 
by Kant (the greatest trick German Idealism ever pulled was 
pretending that Spinoza never existed). The critique of 


superstition is meaningless while we still believe in free will 
and the self. The first anthropomorphic act is the invention of 
the human being, projected back off the image of an invented 
God who not only doesn’t exist, but couldn’t possibly exist. 
(Even God couldn’t have free will.) 

For human beings who want to move in the direction of 
love and freedom, the only option consists in the apparent 
paradox of theoretico-practically inserting themselves into the 
naturalistic matrix of cause and effect. The effect is to break 
down the cordon sanitaire that Hume placed around 
emotions, preserving bourgeois thought’s “commonsense” 
division between feelings and thought. In refusing this 
opposition, Radical Enlightenment democratises the 
possibility of what Lynne Segal calls Radical Happiness (with 
the proviso that Spinoza preferred to think of joy rather than 
happiness — because of the association of happiness with 
happenstance) 

Emotions don’t just happen, they emerge out of fields of 
cause and effect which can be analysed. This means that 
feelings can be engineered, in a hyperstitional spiral, which 


has more to do with what Justin Barton calls “lucidity”? than 
with what academic philosophers call Reason. I’m using the 
term “emotion” rather than “affect” here, very deliberately. 
Affect as it is now routinely used by academics is pretty much 
completely opposed to what Spinoza meant by it. The 
problem begins with Deleuze, and the fatal splicing of 
Spinoza’s project of emotional engineering with Bergson’s 
vitalist cult of creativity and unpredictability. It’s hard to 
think of thinkers more opposed in their fundamental 
presuppositions and orientations than Spinoza and Bergson 


— and more or less everything that is wrong with Deleuze, in 
my view, is tied up with his infatuation with Bergson. It is 
Bergsonism, rather than Spinozism, which is the true 
ideology of late capitalism. It’s true that many of the key 
sciences of late capitalism — _ libidinal- and 
realityengineering, advertising, branding, media, the 
happiness industry — are in some sense Spinozistic, but this 
is a captured Spinozism, an emotional engineering tethered 
to Capital’s needs, not geared to the production of joy. 


It does not move... or change... or grow old... remains... 
forever... icy... silent 


“The idea that a wave of economic change is so 
disruptive to the social order that a society might rebel 
against it — that has, it seems, disappeared from the 
realms of the possible. But the disappearance of 47 per 
cent of jobs in two decades (as per Frey and Osborne) 
must be right on the edge of what a society can bear, 
not so much because of that 47 per cent, as because of 
the timeframe. Jobs do go away; it’s happened many 
times. For jobs to go away with that speed, however, is a 
new thing, and the search for historical precedents, for 
examples from which we can learn, won’t take us far. 
How would this speed of job disappearance, combined 
with extensive deflation, play out? The truth is nobody 
knows. In the absence of any template or precedent, the 
idea that the economic process will just roll ahead like a 
juggernaut, unopposed by any social or political 
counter-forces, is a stretch. The robots will only eat all 


the jobs if we decide to let them.” 
— John Lanchester, “The Robots are Coming” 


The least reflective of capital’s managers believe their own 
propaganda: the welfare state was a regrettable moral lapse, 
an indulgence. The thought that it was an insurance policy 
against revolution doesn’t compute anymore: why worry 
about revolution now? Reality is now more real than it ever 
was, established as a kind of granite, inertial certainty, from 
which the possibility of change is a priori excluded. Beneath 
the frenzied “simulation of productivity”, a sterile no-man’s 
land, which does not move, which remains forever icy and silent... 
The more intelligent of capital’s agents, however, must 
realise that this cannot continue for much longer now. 
Nihiliberalism is a smash and grab raid, a last hurrah before 
they helicopter off behind the compound walls, and let 
everything else descend into an Oryx and Crakestyle dystopia. 
Up here in the kingdom of Gormenghast, where 
everything cowers in the crooked shadows cast by the 
twisting towers and turrets of finance capital, we’re already 
living in a dystopia — but a dystopia that cloaks itself in the 
time-honoured mantle of the English bourgeoisie: the boring. 
Hyper-anxiety digitally glossed over with hi-res distraction 
machineries makes for a wonderful capture system. Deep in 
the bowels of MiddleEngland — bunkered far away from all 
the hashtags, handheld devices and all the other haranguing 
technologies they distribute amongst the lower orders — 
these eminence grises were close to celebrating total victory, 
the final achievement of their historic mission. Close, but no 
Cuban cigar... If only it hadn’t been for those pesky Greeks... and 


Spaniards... and Scots... bloody foreigners don’t know what’s good 
for them... 

The English bourgeoisie: crushing spirits and making 
everything boring since 1750. If there’s a sentient creature 
anywhere in the cosmos that is not boring and miserable, 
they will find it and neutralise it. 

All vampires are first of all vampirised, and look at the 
long faces and manicured grey fingers of these ghouls, 
capital’s oldest and most trusted servants, to see what capital 
does to its human resources: 


Long gone are the virile, predatory vampires that once 
populated horror stories about capitalism, sucking out 
the vital essence of the proletariat in Gothic fortresses 
of “dead labor”. Instead, shambling worm-eaten wrecks 
mill about aimlessly, whilst augmenting their numbers 
in obscure cannibalistic circuits that defy rational 
comprehension and which are, in any case, too hideous 
to steadily contemplate. Fiends have degenerated into 
ghouls, who do not hunt and feed to strengthen 
themselves, but only to carry on, prolonging their 


putrescent decrepitude.'° 


These Grey Anglo-Saxon Protestant capitalist sorcerers 
seldom appear in the light. They pay their subordinates well 
— all those CEOs, politicians, columnists — to spin the line 
that England in 2015, possibly the most depressed country 
ever to exist on Earth, is some shining island of freedom and 
wealth that immigrants are desperate to get into. Only in 
secret do they boast to capital’s other subterranean agents 


that England’s chief export product is the “historical defeat of 
the working class”: 


What is England’s export product? Supposedly, it’s 
finance. To some degree it’s as lieutenant to America’s 
empire, but that’s limited. We have a real-estate bubble 
on the basis of the finance system, because every single 
super-rich person in the entire world has to have a 
house in London, so they’re selling bits of London and 
the south-east. 


Why is it appealing? On the one hand, you have a 
creative, subservient working-class. You get the best 
servants here. Second of all, it’s security; you have 
political safety, whereas if you come from Bahrain, 
Singapore, Macau, in those places something could still 


happen." 
“Democracy is Joy” 


Neoliberalism has reached the point where it is now forced to 
undermine its own libidinal and ideological bases. The 
Troika’s naked attempts to unseat Syriza are unpicking the 
natural(ised) association of capitalism with democracy upon 
which capitalist realism has depended. In this final phase, 
capitalist realism cannot even muster the pretence that it can 
even tolerate democracy, still less that capitalism is the only 
political system compatible with democracy. 


Apparently that Greek referendum was “polarising”. 
Was it? when 60% voted no, and no single area voted 
otherwise? Seems more likely to be unifying than 


polarising. Perhaps that’s the problem. Turns out the 
consensus is not where you thought it was. 


Any question which asks for yes or no is sort of 
likely to be “polarising” anyway, isn’t it? 

“Polarising” in most of these repeated uses means 
that the mass of people have been asked to consider 
issues fundamental to their lives: these are difficult 
questions. It would be better if they didn’t task 
themselves with them and can’t understand them 
anyway, so “polarising” equals, likely to cause thought, 
debate, dispute and subject them to the stresses of 
political agency. How dare a government go to the 
people with such pressing and complex questions, when 
its job is to shield them from the difficulty of thought 
via technocracy. Polarising here just means profound 
questions, questions that touch and demand action on 
fundamental aspects of social organisation. 


But to be asked such questions and to debate or 
dispute them isn’t vexing, harrowing or painful, it’s 
essential and welcome. Political agency is not a burden, 
it’s its absence which weighs on you and its apparent 
“demands” are experienced instead as a euphoria, a 
lightening of the load, a lifting up. The powerful 
affective elements of mass participation are something 
Jeremy Gilbert gets at well in Common Ground, and the 
hunger and need for these kinds of intensities is 
palpable. 


In his speech before the vote last night Tsipras 
observed, at least so the translation ran, “Democracy is 


joy”. (Carl Neville) 


Now listen to capitalist realism’s useful idiots line up on 
Twitter: 


Dan Hodges: I’ve just held a referendum of myself, and 
I’ve voted overwhelming not to pay off my credit card 


bill or mortgage this month.” 


Simon Schama: I’m voting No to my credit card bill 
today. This will put me in a much stronger position to 


negotiate a repayment schedule. 


I’m voting No to facile folk economic bullshit. I’m voting No 
to bank bailouts and banker’s bonuses paid out of public 
money. Oh, it seems I can’t vote on that. 


We live in capitalism, its power seems inescapable — 
but then, so did the divine right of kings."* 


There is a possible alternative, however, in which 
ownership and control of robots is disconnected from 
capital in its current form. The robots liberate most of 
humanity from work, and everybody benefits from the 
proceeds: we don’t have to work in factories or go down 
mines or clean toilets or drive long-distance lorries, but 
we can choreograph and weave and garden and tell 
stories and invent things and set about creating a new 
universe of wants. This would be the world of unlimited 
wants described by economics, but with a distinction 
between the wants satisfied by humans and the work 


done by our machines. It seems to me that the only way 
that world would work is with alternative forms of 
ownership. The reason, the only reason, for thinking 
this better world is possible is that the dystopian future 
of capitalism-plus-robots may prove just too grim to be 
politically viable. This alternative future would be the 
kind of world dreamed of by William Morris, full of 
humans engaged in meaningful and __ sanely 
remunerated labour. Except with added robots. It says a 
lot about the current moment that as we stand facing a 
future which might resemble either a hyper-capitalist 


dystopia or a socialist paradise, the second option 


doesn’t get a mention.” 


cybergothic vs. 


steampunk! 


In December 2015, Hilary Benn made a speech in the House of 


Commons, supporting air-strikes against Syria.? The speech, 
and the hysterical acclaim it received, were an exercise in 
retromania: the equivalent in politics of what the “new” Star 
Wars film is in cinema: the same old thing again, but worse. 
Benn’s intervention was a repetition of exactly the kind of 
speech that was made to justify the attack on Saddam 
Hussein, and which therefore led to the emergence of ISIS. 


One great value of Badiou’s intervention? is that it checks 
any temptation to treat all this as if were just a mistake. As 
Badiou makes clear, from the point of view of capital, the Iraq 
war and its consequences were not some blunder. They were 
an opportunity to trial a new form of (post)colonialism, in 
which states of conflict open up a temporary autonomous 
zone for capital accumulation, and plundering can continue 
without the irksome duties involved in setting up and 
running a state. 


The capitalist “West” has only ever been a structural 
fantasy of independence and separation from what is outside, 
a fantasy that is failing now that the border policing on which 
it depends no longer works. The enemy is already inside, 
while the victims can no longer obligingly remain offscreen, 
even if they wanted to. 

Badiou and Benn are in agreement about one thing, 
however: that ISIS can be described as fascists. While this 
classification is tempting, it obfuscates rather than 
illuminates the nature of ISIS’s malignancy and _ its 
relationship to the current (decadent and doomed) phase of 
capitalist domination. Badiou is closer when he characterises 
ISIS as gangsters: they are indeed part gang, part apocalyptic 
cult, part franchise. If nothing else, ISIS is a slick brand — a 
brand that is far more effective than anything capital can 
come up with at the moment in any case. 

ISIS holds up a mirror to twenty-first-century capitalist 
nihilism. This nihilism does not have the Mephistophelean 
fervour of nineteenth-century existentialism, nor is it the 
cold scientific nihilism described by Ray Brassier. This is a 
boring nihilism: an existential poverty that accompanies the 
material poverty into which capital plunges so many. A tiny 
minority escape material poverty, but only capital’s most 
devoted addicts can evade existential poverty. 

Capitalist realism was only ever a fantasy — a fantasy that 
the human resources capital needs for its growth were as 
infinite as its own drive. Yet capital is now coming up against 
limits of all kinds, and existential limits are not the least of 
these. Capital cannot care, but humans cannot help but care. 
For all the capitalist realist posturing, the open secret is that 


human beings continue to engage in caring and nurturing 
practices, practices which, moreover, remain more important 
to them than anything capital can offer. Shopworn PR 
injunctions won’t cut it in any more. How can you believe 
that “anyone can make it”, when you and everyone you know 
is unemployed or underemployed? When the reward for 
poorly paid night shifts and cold early mornings is more of 
the same, if you are lucky? You can never do enough for 
capital. It’s not enough to produce and retail shoddy 
commodities no one really wants — you must also be 
“passionate” about it. 

When Ken Livingstone talked a while ago of ISIS members 
“siving up their lives” for the cause, he was shouted down in 
yet another example of desperate capitalist media decadence 
(the British media abounds in such examples, a sign that is in 
its death throes). The distinction between understanding 
something and justifying it is elementary, and Livingstone 
was making a similar point to the observation that Michael 
Corleone makes about the Cuban rebels in Godfather II. “I saw 
a strange thing today”, Michael remarks to Hyman Roth. 
“Some rebels were being arrested. One of them pulled the pin 
on a grenade. He took himself and the captain of the 
command with him. Now, soldiers are paid to fight; the rebels 
aren’t.” “What does that tell you?”, Roth asks. “They could 
win”, Michael replies. ISIS won’t win, but the analogy points 
to the very serious problem that capital now faces. Paying 
people has never touched people’s deepest motivations. You 
need to offer some other cause, some other purpose. What 
happens when you demoralise people, destroy their capacity 
to commit to any purpose in life beyond capital accumulation, 


and don’t even pay them? What if you don’t even offer them 
the possibility of being exploited, and classify them as a 
surplus population? 

Capital doesn’t have much of an answer, but ISIS does. A 
disputed poll “suggested that more than one in four French 
youth between the ages of 18 and 24 have a favourable or 
very favourable opinion of ISIS, although only 7-8% of France 


is Muslim.”4 Whatever the truth of this survey, the 
willingness to believe it indicates that there is a growing 
suspicion that societies dominated by capital are now 
encountering mass disaffection and defection. “More than 
three of every four who join ISIS from abroad do so with 
friends and family. Most are young, in transitional stages in 
life: immigrants, students, between jobs and mates, having 
just left their native family. They join a ‘band of brothers (and 


sisters)’ ready to sacrifice for significance.”° The motivation 
is belonging and fellowship, not hatred. “A survey of those 
Saudi men who volunteered for Afghanistan and who later 
fought in Bosnia and Chechnya or trained in al-Qaeda camps 
has found that most were motivated not by hatred of the west 


but by the desire to help their Muslim brothers and sisters.”° 
For all that ISIS offers horrifically false solutions, it responds 
to real problems. (In calling Islamism identitarian, Badiou 
doesn’t credit the extent to which ISIS offers at least a partial 
escape from the dismal identities that capitalism has assigned 
to so many young muslims, and to so many others too.) 
Capital is nothing if it is not parsimonious, and for the last 
thirty years it is has sustained itself by relying on readymade 
forms of existential affiliation. This reliance on already- 


existing forms of identification — all those nationalisms and 
religions, with any number of archaisms ready to crawl out of 
the crypt — is what postmodernism has been. There are no 
“pure” archaisms, nothing ever repeats without difference, 
and ISIS is properly understood as a cybergothic phenomenon 
which combines the ancient with the contemporary 
(beheadings on the web). It faces not a confident capitalist 
modernity, but a capitalism that has retreated from the 
present, never mind the future. Left to its own resources — or 
rather, left to the resources it retains from previous forms of 
exploitation — capital can never come up with anything new. 
Postmodernism was its ideal form, and the naturalised 
postmodernism of capitalist realism was its optimal solution 
to political and cultural antagonism. The UK has specialised 
in developing the steampunk model: Victorian social 
relations, but now with iPhones. 

But the conditions which sustained capitalist realism have 
now evaporated, and the real enemy which prompted the 
neoliberal counter-revolution is re-emerging. This enemy was 
not the necrotic Stalinist monolith of the USSR; still less was 
it the cult of Parisian Maoism, which was only ever the most 
minor of distractions. No: neoliberalism was designed to 
eliminate the various strains of democratic socialism and 
libertarian communism that bubbled up in so many places 
during in the Sixties and Seventies. Wherever this possibility 
emerged, capital crushed it, most ruthlessly and most 
spectacularly in Chile. But the rising tide of experimental 
political forms in so many areas of the world at the moment 
shows that people are rediscovering group consciousness and 
the potency of the collective. It is now clear that molecular 


practices of consciousness-raising are not opposed to the 
indirect action needed to bring about lasting ideological 
shifts — they are two aspects of a process that is happening 
on many different time tracks at once. The growing clamour 
of groups seeking to take control of their own lives portends a 
long overdue return to a modernity that capital just can’t 


deliver.’ New forms of belonging are being discovered and 
invented, which will in the end show that both steampunk 
capital and cybergothic ISIS are archaisms, obstructions to a 
future that is already assembling itself. 


mannequin 


challenge! 


One of the images that has most haunted me since the 
election is that of Clinton and her close allies doing their 
version of the “mannequin challenge” on the campaign plane. 
It wasn’t only the smugness of this scene which irked (but just 
check out the sheer amount of self-satisfaction packed into 
Hillary’s grin); it was the sense that this simulation of stasis — 
reminiscent of the eerie scenes in Westworld in which the 
android-hosts are temporarily put into sleep-mode — actually 
revealed what the Clinton campaign was composed of: 
decommissioned political robots playing out an exhausted 
programme one last time before being permanently taken 
offline. The uncomfortable irony is that this final-day 
promotional video’s injunction — don’t stand still, vote today 
— is, unfortunately, exactly what too many of Clinton’s 
potential supporters did. But it was also what Clinton’s whole 
campaign had done: stayed still. While Trump’s campaign was 
possessed of a sense of effervescing excitement, of anarchic 
unpredictability, the feeling of belonging to a building- 


movement, Clinton’s offered only more of the same. Or the 
same, but less. Its message was not only that nothing much 
will change, but also that nothing much needs to change. 

This paralysis cannot be attributed only to the 
complacency and insularity in the Clinton camp; it is instead 
a symptom of a broader pathology afflicting the “centre-left”. 
“Centre-left” has to be placed in inverted commas here 
because the malaise is in large part a consequence of this 
group’s failure to register that the “centre” to which it is 
attached and from which it takes all its bearings has 
disappeared. In addition to the parallels with Brexit, there are 
clear echoes of the last UK General Election. Rather like Ed 
Miliband, Clinton lost essentially because she was unable to 
mobilise her own supporters. It turns out that there wasn’t 
much of a surge to the right: as Gary Younge points out in an 
invaluable piece, Trump “may have led the charge to the 


right but comparatively few marched with him”? (he ended 
up winning a lower proportion of the vote than losing 
candidates John Kerry, John McCain, Mitt Romney and Gerald 
Ford). Instead, there was an evacuation of the centre. Like 
Boris Johnson, Trump is opportunistic; but it is this 
opportunism which enabled him to respond to transformed 
conditions and to be seen to respond to them — something 
which his own party’s ruling establishment, just as much as 
Clinton’s Democrats, were singularly unable to do. 

The mood that Trump and Brexit caught is a 
dissatisfaction with capitalist realism. Yet it isn’t capitalism 
that is being rejected in these inchoate revolts, but realism. 
When Simon Reynolds wrote about Trump a few weeks ago, 
he picked up on a quotation from The Art of the Deal “I play to 


people’s fantasies”.> The turn to fantasy is crucial to the 
current success of the right represented by Trump and Brexit. 

What both Trump and the Brexiteers are selling is a 
fantasy of nationalist revival. The automatic deference to 
economic “good sense” and corporate “expertise” on which 
capitalist realism has relied. Genuflections to... which only a 
few months ago were a requirement for anyone serious about 
pursuing power, have now become toxic. Rather than adding 
to her authority, Hillary Clinton’s closeness to Wall Street 
confirmed her reputation as a stooge of the status quo; just as 
the appeals made by David Cameron — who already seems 
like a figure from a long-ago era — to “experts” proved in the 
end to be disastrously counterproductive. In the fantasy of 
nationalist revival, “experts” are refigured, not as avatars of 
an economic reality principle, but as spoilers and obstructors, 
enemies of the resurgent will. 

The Brexit vote was practically a case study of what Paul 
Gilroy calls postcolonial melancholia. Trump’s rise — Make 
America Great Again! — is the American equivalent of the 
same phenomenon. As Gilroy points out, this melancholia has 
its manic and jubilatory aspects, but it is rooted in a longing 
for an idealised past, and a denial of the complexities and 
perplexities of the present... Since it is organised around 
desires that are impossible to satisfy, the flight into fantasy 
will of course be very far from some harmless exercise in 
escapism; immense damage will inevitably be done in the 
attempt to preserve these //// of restoration and 
“purification”. Postcolonial melancholia is caused by “the loss 
of the fantasy of omnipotence”, at the same time as it is a 
compensatory strategy which renders the disappearance of a 


sense of omnipotence as a merely temporary matter, soon to 
be rectified. It is precisely the fantasmatic dimension of 
feelings of omnipotence that is denied in Trump’s rhetoric. 
The omnipotence was real — the fall into vulnerability and 
malaise is to be attributed to a depressive stupor, which will 
be overcome by a recovery of will and belief: nationalist 
magical voluntarism. 

The jubilatory denial of the constraining power of 
economic conditions — and ultimately of any conditions — 
accounts in part for the striking differences in libidinal tenor 
between the Clinton and Trump campaigns. Clinton’s 
buttoned-up poise, her rendition of an obsolete “good sense”, 
and her failure to recognise that the “centre” ground on 
which she stood had collapsed beneath her, was a 
personification of capitalist realism at its most staid and 
shopworn: entirely devoid of any capacity to inspire, and 
mired in a near-past for which few express any nostalgia. If 
Obama came to represent a version of capitalist realism — the 
narrative arc of his presidency, after all, saw euphoric 
“change” and “hope” quickly declining into deadlock and 
impasse — he nevertheless possessed a grace, equanimity and 
charisma that Clinton could never muster. He gave late- 
period capitalist realism and geopolitical realpolitik a serious, 
personable and thoughtful face; and, in spite of all the 
disappointments and jading, his being president at all still 
possessed a quality of the unexpected and the momentous. 
For all that Clinton’s accession to the presidency would have 
been momentous, it didn’t feel that way. Her status as 
tarnished dynastic insider always overshadowed her position 
as gender outsider. 


In any case, Trump’s immoderation was a break with all of 
this. His displays of unbound libido have a performative 
dimension. Trump’s “unprofessional” “lapses”, his seeming 
faux pas, his ready descent into racist invective and 
misogyny, his hate-mongering: these are significant not only 
for their attraction to those already evincing such attitudes. 
They also have an appeal to some of those who don’t share 
them, and who might even deplore them: what such 
outbursts come to signify is both an “authenticity” — a 
simulation of “straight talking” — and, equally importantly, a 
performance of libidinal freedom. I’m by no means the first to 
note the parallels with Silvio Berlusconi, Trump’s most 
obvious precursor. Franco Berardi has rightly argued that 
much of Berlusconi’s appeal came from his “ridiculing of 
political rhetoric and its stagnant rituals”. Voters were 
invited to identify “with the slightly crazy Premier, the rascal 
Prime Minister who resembles them”. Voters too don’t always 
say the right thing (and they certainly say things in private 
which they wouldn’t want broadcast in public); they too have 
contempt for the staid conventions of parliament. Needless to 
say, “resemblance” of this sort is always cultivated and 
engineered; voters are directed into selecting and identifying 
with some of their own traits at the expense of others. Like 
Berlusconi, Trump disdains law and rules “in the name of a 
spontaneous energy that rules can no longer bridle”. Those 
disquieted or even disgusted by his racism and misogyny 
could nevertheless still be excited by Trump’s disregard for 
politesse, procedure and precedent. It was Trump’s excess 
which allowed him to appear as the “candidate of change”, 
something which many of his supporters insistently cited as 


the reason that they voted for him. Simon Reynolds refers to 


the edgy promise of a less boring politics. The New York 
Times recently quoted a voter who confessed to flirting 
with the idea of voting for Trump because “a dark side 
of me wants to see what happens... There is going to be 
some kind of change, and even if it’s like a Nazi-type 
change, people are so drama-filled. They want to see 


stuff like that happen.”* 


As such, you might say, Trump was less the glam than the 
punk candidate, possessing the same combustible, fissile 
mixture of the reactionary and the... that characterised so 
many punk acts. Punk’s political... boredom... mid-Seventies 
stasis was so enervating that any change would be better. 
Well, after Brexit and Trump, we can say with certainty: 
boring dystopia is over. We’re in a whole other kind of 
dystopia now. 

In Trump’s case, the fantasies of national restoration 
reassure, mitigating the sense of risk that he provokes. It’s 
almost as if the fantasies give permission to indulge in the 
excitement... Vertiginous change and a restored past, all in 
the same moment; Trump has found a way to renew the 
formula that the right has successfully deployed since Reagan 
and Thatcher. (And one perennial problem for the 
revolutionary left is that it doesn’t have the same recourse to 
reassuring fantasies, the same appeal to a restored past, with 
which to leaven the leap into the unknown.) 

Then there are the fantasies of class... at which Trump 
excelled. “The real story of this election”, Fukuyama argued, 


is that after several decades, American democracy is 
finally responding to the rise of inequality and the 
economic stagnation experienced by most of the 
population. Social class is now back at the heart of 
American politics, trumping [hah!] other cleavages — 


race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, geography 


— that had dominated discussion in recent elections.”° 


Martin Jacques made similar claims in the Guardian: 


The wave of populism marks the return of class as a 
central agency in politics, both in the UK and the US. 
This is particularly remarkable in the US. For many 
decades, the idea of the “working class” was marginal 
to American political discourse. Most Americans 
described themselves as middle class, a reflection of the 
aspirational pulse at the heart of American society. 
According to a Gallup poll, in 2000 only 33% of 
Americans called themselves working class; by 2015 the 
figure was 48%, almost half the population. [...] Brexit, 
too, was primarily a working-class revolt. [...] The 
return of class, because of its sheer reach, has the 
potential, like no other issue, to redefine the political 


landscape.° 


Bernie Sanders...; but the version of class politics offered 
by Trump and Brexit is nothing new at all. It repeats a divide- 
and-rule strategy used by Nixon, Thatcher and many other 
right-wingers for many years. What we have seen in both 
Trump’s win and Brexit is a perpetual obfuscation of class via 


race and nationalism. Both Trump and the Brexiteers 
proffered a highly racialised account of class politics, as the 
very term “white working class” implies. The depredations 
that the working class have faced under neoliberalism were 
relentlessly attributed to racialised others: immigrants, 
economically aggressive foreign powers... Converting class 
antagonism into racialised and nationalistic resentment has 
been central to the success of UKIP, but it didn’t invent so 
much as intensify a strategy that has served the right well for 
forty years. 

On the face of it, it’s incredible that Trump could in any 
way persuasively appear to be a man of the people — to come 
off, in the astonishing words of his son, as “a blue collar guy 
with a big balance sheet”. It’s not as if Trump, who inherited 
his wealth (and effectively squandered much of it) is even a 
self-made man who came from any kind of modest 
background. No doubt this is one more example of the 
subordinated being seduced into identifying with the rich 
(and thus, for instance, opposing the imposition of higher 
taxes on the super-wealthy). If Trump is a “blue collar guy 
with a big balance sheet”, then those who engage in this 
fantasmatic identification are blue-collar folk who don’t yet 
happen to have a big balance sheet (but who, in the fantasy, 
will surely get one in the end). But this doesn’t answer the 
question of how Trump in particular — and of all people — 
was capable of engendering this fantasy. I think that there 
are at least four (strongly related) reasons for this: his ability 
to seem to be in tune with working-class worries and 
concerns; his... liberal-professional elite; his comportment; 
and his position in the media ecology. 


Contrary to how he was portrayed in the mainstream 
media Trump did not talk only of walls, immigration 
bans, and deportations. In fact he usually didn’t spend 
much time on those themes. [...] [T]he heart of his 
message was something different, an ersatz economic 
populism, which has been noted far and wide, but also a 
strong, usually overlooked, anti-war message. Both 
spoke to legitimate working class concerns. [...] Trump 
took the Bernie-style populism, emptied it of real class 
politics, reduced it to a jumble of affective associations, 
and used it to beat-up the smug liberals of the 


professional managerial class.’ 


“Populism”, Francis Fukuyma argued back in June, “is the 
label that political elites attach to policies supported by 


ordinary citizens that they don’t like.”® Yet these policies 
aren’t typically generated by “ordinary citizens” themselves; 
more often, they are attempts by elites to ventriloquise 
desires and anxieties “ordinary citizens” are held to have. 
Right-wing populism of the kind Trump and Brexit represent 
is a gambit in a struggle amongst different versions of the 
elite. Crucial to this process is the way in which the opposing 
elite is characterised. At least since Nixon, the right has 
identified the “bad” elite as a “liberal” clique, with its 
cosmopolitan ease, its remoteness from ordinary life, and its 
contempt for the supposed vulgarity, insularity and 
chauvinism of the subordinated classes. Such an elite really 
does exist, of course, and its domination of large areas of the 
left since the 1960s has made it easy for the right successively 
to pull different versions of the trick that Trump... in this 


campaign. Trump reassures and flatters his supporters: the 
problem is not you, he says, but the Others, once we’ve built 
the wall, everything will be OK. By contrast, the message from 
the left, Trump says, is that the problem is you; the Others are 
OK, deserving of special favours that won’t be granted to you. 

Joan C. Williams claims, in a problematic piece that 
nevertheless makes some interesting points, Trump’s success 
is also the consequence of a particular kind of resentment, 
whereby “the white working class (WWC)” “resents 


professionals but admires the rich.”? If Hillary Clinton, 
Williams argues, “epitomises the dorky arrogance and 
smugness of the professional elite”, then, like something out 
of Ballard’s Kingdom Come — a poor novel but prescient social 
prophecy — Trump has come out of a fusion of celebrity 
culture and business that currently possesses far more 
hegemonic pull than the arid professional politics which 
Clinton drearily personifies. This form of populism depends 
upon television’s simulation of intimacy and familiarity — 
McLuhan remarked that when people see a film star on the 
street, they recognise them, but when people see a TV star, 
they typically think that it is someone they know. Trump’s 
presiding over The Apprentice, his willingness to appear on 
shows such as The Roast of Donald Trump, means that he feels 
like someone audiences personally know. As a representative 
of this “professional elite”, Clinton was too close, too familiar. 
At the same time, Trump’s position in the media ecology 
means that, in some respects, he could seem less remote than 
Hillary Clinton. 

What we are seeing, evidently, is not an attack on the 
establishment from outside (or below), but the replacement 


of one form of establishment with another. And one reason 
that this insurgent establishment — neo-authoritarian and 
neo-nationalist rather than neoliberal — has been able to 
overcome its rivals is that it has stirred up a populist political 
fervour that capitalist realism tended to damp down. 
Capitalist realism secured its hegemony by de-activating 
people as political agents and re-interpellating them as 
entrepreneurial individuals. It wanted to close down political 
movements, not build them, all the better to organise and 
administrate policy from above. 

Faced with Trump’s performance of unbound libido... 

The danger here is in conflating this return of class with 
class agency. One of the most telling — and poignant — 
phenomena in the wake of the UK referendum on EU 
membership was a particular kind of dismay expressed by 
some of those who had voted leave. They were alarmed by the 
result because “they didn’t think their vote would count”. 
Still others claimed that a decision this momentous shouldn’t 
have been left to them. Brexit may have been supported by 
large numbers of the working class, but this is very far from 
its being an expression of self-conscious working-class 
agency. 

It is certainly a mistake to oppose this current form of 
class politics to race. What is new is the disappearance of any 
countervailing pressures from the advocates of globalisation, 
free trade, etc. The tension that has defined the neoliberal 
right for forty years — in which ostensibly opposing positions 
in practice complemented one another — has now become a 
scission. What does this mean? 

It means, first, that this right has retreated from its claim 


on modernity. Neoliberal ideology made neoliberalisation 
seem as if it were synonymous with modernisation. But it is 
exactly this modernity that the right is now rejecting. In 
place of the neoliberal embrace of a globalised present, there 
is now only a turn backwards, and inwards. The Brexit vote 
was driven by what Paul Gilroy has called “postcolonial 
melancholia”, and Trump’s rise has clearly been powered by 
the American equivalent of this phenomenon. 

But the right’s retreat from modernity gives all the more 
impetus for the left to reclaim it. Current right-wing 
populism is responding to real problems of the neoliberal 
world. In addition to economic stagnation, it is also offering a 
balm for the existential deficit in contemporary capitalism: 
the banal nihilism of a world cored out by capitalist 
imperatives. Its answer, naturally, is nationalism. But this is 
by no means the only response to the problem of belonging. 
Control of their own lives. 


PART FIVE 


WE HAVE TO 
INVENT THE 
FUTURE: 
INTERVIEWS 


they can be 
different in the 
future too: 


interviewed by 
rowan wilson for 
ready steady book 


(2010)! 


In 2010, Rowan Wilson interviewed Mark for Ready Steady Book 
about the “para-space” of Zer0, blogging and cyberculture, 
capitalist realism, hauntology and lost futures. 


Rowan Wilson: Your blog, k-punk, is one of the leading blogs 
for cultural analysis. When did you first start writing it and 
why did you start? 


Mark Fisher: Thank you. I started it in 2003. At the time, I 
was working as a philosophy lecturer in a Further Education 
college in Kent — I reflect on some of my experiences there in 
Capitalist Realism. I was then quite badly depressed — not 
because of teaching, which I enjoyed, but for a whole series of 
long-term reasons — and I started blogging as a way of 
getting back into writing after the traumatic experience of 
doing a PhD. PhD work bullies one into the idea that you can’t 
say anything about any subject until you’ve read every 
possible authority on it. But blogging seemed a more informal 
space, without that kind of pressure. Blogging was a way of 
tricking myself back into doing serious writing. I was able to 
con myself, thinking, “it doesn’t matter, it’s only a blog post, 
it’s not an academic paper”. But now I take the blog rather 
more seriously than writing academic papers. I was actually 
only aware of blogs for a short while before I started mine. 
But I could quite quickly see that the blog network around 
Simon Reynolds’ blog — which was the first network I started 
to read — fulfilled many of the functions that the music press 
used to. But it wasn’t just replicating the old music press; 
there were also sorts of strange, idiosyncratic blogs which 
couldn’t have existed in any other medium. I saw that — 
contrary to all the clichés — blogs didn’t have to be online 
diaries: they were a blank space in which writers could 
pursue their own lines of interest (something that it’s 
increasingly difficult for writers to do in print media, for a 


number of reasons). 


RW: You're almost one of the elder statespeople of blogging 
now. How has it changed since you started? 


MF: Blogging networks shift all the time; new blogs enter the 
network, older ones fall away; new networks constitute 
themselves. One of the most significant developments was the 
introduction of comments; a largely unfortunate change in 
my view. In the early days of blogs, if you wanted to respond 
to a post, you had to reply on your own blog, and if you didn’t 
have a blog, you had to create one. Comments tend to reduce 
things to banal sociality, with all its many drawbacks. 

Yet blogs continue to do things that can’t be done 
anywhere else: look at the way that Speculative Realism has 
propagated through blogs. Originally coined as term of 
convenience for the work of the philosophers Ray Brassier, 
Graham Harman, Iain Hamilton Grant and Quentin 
Meillassoux, Speculative Realism now has an online unlife of 
its own. This isn’t just commentary on existing philosophical 
positions; it’s a philosophy that is actually happening on the 
web. Graham has his own blog, Object-Oriented Philosophy, 
but there are a whole range of Speculative Realism-related 
blogs, including Speculative Heresy and Planomenology. Reid 
Kane of Plamomenology has gone so far as to argue that 
Speculative Realism is “the first avatar of distributed 
cognition”, that, in other words, there is a natural fit between 
SR and the online medium. 


RW: You were one of the co-founders of the Cybernetic 
culture research unit (Ccru), described by Simon Reynolds as 


the academic equivalent of Apocalypse Now’s Colonel Kurtz. 
Who did you form it with and what was its purpose? 


MF: The main driving forces behind it were Sadie Plant and 
Nick Land. But Sadie Plant left quite quickly so the Ccru as it 
developed was much more shaped by Nick Land. Nick’s 1990s 
texts — which are to be issued in a collected edition this year, 
by Urbanomic, who publish the Collapse journal — are 
incredible. Far from the dry databasing of much academic 
writing or the pompous solemnity of so much continental 
philosophy, Nick’s texts were astonishing theory-fictions. 
They weren’t distanced readings of French theory so much as 
cybergothic remixes which put Deleuze and Guattari on the 
same plane as films such as Apocalypse Now and fictions such 
as Gibson’s Neuromancer. 

Jungle was crucial to the Ccru. What the Ccru was about 
was capturing, (and extrapolating) this specifically British 
take on cyberculture, in which music was central. Ccru was 
trying to do with writing what jungle, with its samples from 
such as Predator, Terminator and Blade Runner, was doing in 
sound: “text at sample velocity”, as Kodwo Eshun put it. 


RW: The writing of the Ccru seems very different to your 
current style. Are you still involved with the Ccru — and 
indeed is it still operating? 


MF: It was never formally disbanded but then again it was 
never formally constituted. It’s odd because, it’s only a decade 
on that the stuff is starting to get published in book form. As I 
said, Nick’s texts are just about to be published. Steve 
Goodman (aka Kode9) has just had his book Sonic Warfare 


published on MIT Press. As for the change of style, I suppose a 
number of things happened. One was the slowing of the UK 
cyberculture that had inspired the Ccru throughout the 
Nineties. Gradually, the exorbitant hypotheses of the Ccru 
seemed to have less purchase on a culture that increasingly 
seemed to correspond more with Jameson’s ideas of 
retrospection and pastiche. In the Nineties, it was possible to 
oppose a vibrant cyberculture to the malaise which Jameson 
identified. But in the Noughties, the blight of postmodernism 
spread everywhere. 

Also, I found that, as I started teaching regularly, and as | 
got used to writing for an audience — and there’s no form of 
writing that makes you as aware of having an audience as 
blogging; print publications just don’t compare — I 
rediscovered rhetoric, argument and engagement. The 
exhilaration of the Ccru-style was its uncompromising 
blizzard of jargon, text as a tattoo of intensities to which you 
just had to submit. But it’s hard to maintain that kind of 
speed-intensity for longer writing projects; and I found that I 
enjoyed producing writing that was expositorier and which 
tried to engage the reader rather than blitz them. I like 
Zizek’s line that the idiot he is trying to explain philosophy to 
is himself; I feel the same. Much of my writing now is me 
trying to explain things to/for myself. 

There were also political schisms. The Ccru defined itself 
against the sclerotic stranglehold that a certain moralising 
Old Left had on the Humanities academy. There was a kind of 
exuberant anti-politics, a “technihilo” celebration of the 
irrelevance of human agency, partly inspired by the pro- 
markets, anti-capitalism line developed by Manuel DeLanda 


out of Braudel, and from the section of Anti-Oedipus that talks 
about marketisation as the “revolutionary path”. This was a 
version of what Alex Williams has called ‘“accelerationism”, 
but it has never been properly articulated as a political 
position; the tendency is to fall back into a standard binary, 
with capitalism and libertarianism on one side and the state 
and centralisation on the other. 

But working in the public sector in Blairite Britain made 
me see that neoliberal capitalism didn’t fit with the 
accelerationist model; on the contrary, pseudo-marketisation 
was producing the pervasive, decentralised bureaucracy | 
describe in Capitalist Realism. My experiences as a teacher and 
as trade union activist combined with a belated encounter 
with Zizek — who was using some of the same conceptual 
materials as Ccru (the Freudian death drive; pulp culture, 
technology), but giving them a leftist spin — pushed me 
towards a different political position. I guess what I’m 
interested in now is in synthesising some of the interests and 
methods of the Ccru with a new leftism. Speculative Realism 
has returned to some of the areas that the Ccru was 
interested in. What I’m hoping will happen in the next decade 
is that a new kind of theory will develop that emerges from 
people who have been deep-cooked in _ post-Fordist 
capitalism, who take cyberspace for granted and who lack 
nostalgia for the exhausted paradigms of the old left. 


RW: One of the most exciting things to happen in publishing 
last year was the development of the Zer0 Books imprint. Can 
you explain how that came about and the purpose of the 
project? 


MF: The imprint was set up by the novelist Tariq Goddard. He 
asked Nina Power and me if we’d like to do books, and we 
suggested a range of other people. What we wanted was to 
produce the kind of books we’d want to read ourselves, but 
which weren’t being published anywhere. In mainstream 
media, the space that had drawn Tariq and myself towards 
theory in the first place — the music press, areas of the 
broadcast media — had disappeared. Effectively, that kind of 
discourse had been driven into exile online. So part of what 
ZerO was about was harvesting the work that has been 
developed on the blog networks. Zer0 is about establishing a 
para-space, between theory and popular culture, between 
cyberspace and the university. The Zer0 books are a reminder 
of what ought to be obvious, but which the imbecilic 
reductionism of neoliberal media would like us to forget: 
serious writing doesn’t have to be opaque and 
incomprehensible, and popular writing doesn’t have to be 
facile. 


RW: Your first book, Capitalist Realism: Is There No Alternative?, 
was published by Zer0 in November. Why do you think that 
capitalism, even in the wake of the financial crisis, has such a 
grip on our consciousness? 


MF: I’m not sure that it has a grip on our consciousness so 
much as on our unconscious. It shapes the limits of what we 
can imagine. It does so because it has enjoyed twenty years of 
unchallenged domination, blitzing our nervous systems with 
its intoxicants, paralysing thought. Put at its simplest, 
capitalist realism is the widespread idea that capitalism is the 


only “realistic” political economic system. The response to 
the financial crisis only reinforced this belief — it was (on 
every level) unthinkable that the banks could be allowed to 
crash. The problem is imagining an alternative that anyone 
believes could be actually attained. Which isn’t to say that an 
alternative can’t ever come about; in fact, after the financial 
crisis, we’re in the bizarre situation at the moment where 
everything — very much including the continuation of the 
status quo — looks impossible. But this is already an 
improvement from how things seemed only two years ago. 
The financial crisis forced capitalist realism to change its 
form. The old neoliberal story was no longer viable. But 
capital has not yet cobbled together much of a new narrative, 
or come up with any economic solution to the problems that 
led to the crash in the first place. It’s as if capitalism has 
suffered its own version of shock therapy. 


RW: How is your argument different from that put forward by 
Fredric Jameson in his work on the culture of 
postmodernism? 


MF: Well, as I say in the book, in many ways what I’m calling 
“capitalist realism” can be contained under the rubric of 
Jameson’s theorisation of postmodernism. Yet the very 
persistence and ubiquity of the processes that Jameson 
identifies — the destruction of a sense of history, the 
supersession of novelty by pastiche — meant that they have 
changed in kind. Postmodernism is now no longer a tendency 
in culture; it has subsumed practically all culture. Capitalist 
realism, you might say, is what happens when 


postmodernism is naturalised. After all, we’ve now got a 
generation of young adults who have known nothing but 
global capitalism and who are accustomed to culture being 
pastiche and recapitulation. 


RW: In the book you move from describing the problems of 
capitalist society to how it is making us mentally ill. What do 
you think are the central lasting effects of neoliberalism on 
our psyches and, with its collapse, how do you see these 
unravelling? 


MF: Neoliberalism installs a perpetual anxiety — there is no 
security; your position and status are under constant review. 
It’s no wonder that, as Oliver James shows in The Selfish 
Capitalist, depression is so prevalent in neoliberalised 
countries. Widespread mental illness is one of the hidden 
costs of neoliberal capitalism; stress has been privatised. If 
you’re depressed because of overwork, that’s between you 
and your brain chemistry! 

I do think that the financial crisis killed neoliberalism as a 
political project — but it doesn’t need to be alive in order to 
continue to dominate our minds, work and culture. Even 
though neoliberalism now lacks any forward momentum, it 
still controls things by default. So, sadly, I don’t see the 
deleterious psychic effects of neoliberalism waning any time 
in the immediate future. 


RW:You identify the madness of managerial bureaucracy, the 
incessant and pointless “auditing culture”, in contemporary 
public services, specifically education. You discuss how this 
auditing culture is now, along with capitalism’s PR network, a 


new big Other, a replacement for God. It’s the ideological 
matrix that we all cynically dismiss but nonetheless remains 
the binding authority. Why are we not simply able to shrug it 
off? 


MF: PR is not limited any more to specific promotional 
activities — as I say in the book, under capitalism, all that is 
solid melts into PR. In so-called “immaterial” labour, the 
effect of auditing is not to improve actual performance but to 
generate a representation of better performance. It’s a 
familiar effect that anyone subject to New Labour’s targets 
will know all too well. 

Neoliberalism reproduces itself through cynicism, 
through people doing things they “don’t really believe”. It’s a 
question of power. People go along with auditing culture and 
what I call “business ontology” not necessarily because they 
agree with it, but because that is the ruling order, “that’s just 
how things are now, and we can’t do anything about it”. That 
kind of sentiment is what I mean by capitalist realism. And it 
isn’t merely quietism; it’s true that almost no one working in 
public services is likely to be sacked if they get a poor 
performance review (they will just be subject to endless 
retraining); but they might well be sacked if they start 
questioning the performance review system itself or refusing 
to cooperate with it. 


RW: So now we move from the critique to the positive 
proposals. In an interview with Matthew Fuller for Mute you 
tentatively suggest that the left needs to come up with a new 
big Other, one that is more representative of Rousseau’s 


“general will”. How is this to be distinguished from the 
capitalist big Other and how would it be prevented from 
becoming reified, a new system of mystical dominance? 


MF: Reification isn’t a problem per se; in fact, it’s something 
we should hope for. Evan Calder Williams, whose book 
Combined and Uneven Apocalypse is coming out on Zer0, talks of 
an “anti-capitalist reification”, and I think that’s what we 
need to develop. It’s capitalism that poses as being anti- 
reification; it’s capitalism that presents itself as having 
dissolved all illusions and exposed the underlying reality of 
things. Part of what I’m arguing in Capitalist Realism is that 
this is an ideological sleight of hand; it’s precisely neoliberal 
capitalism’s ostensible demystifications (its reduction of 
everything to the supposedly self-evident category of the free 
individual) that allow all kinds of strange, quasi-theological 
entities to rule our lives. But I don’t think the aim should be 
to replace capitalism’s fake anti-reification with a “real” anti- 
reification. Reification can’t be entirely eliminated. I take this 
to be one of the important lessons that Lacanian 
psychoanalysis has to teach. Being a speaking subject at all 
involves a minimal reification; the big Other is coterminous 
with language itself. But this is very far from being a problem 
for the left. It’s the left that needs to insist on the reality of 
something in excess of individuals, whether you call it the 
“seneral will”, the “public interest”, or something else. When 
Mrs Thatcher famously denied the existence of society, she 
was echoing Max Stirner’s claim that all such abstractions are 
“spooks”. But we can’t ever rid ourselves of these incorporeal 
entities — neoliberalism certainly hasn’t. As I argue in 


Capitalist Realism, neoliberalism hasn’t killed the big Other — 
for who is the consumer of PR (which no actual empirical 
individual believes) if not the big Other? The point now — and 
I would affirm this forcefully, not tentatively — is to invent a 
leftist big Other. This doesn’t mean __ reviving 
authoritarianism; there is no necessary relation between the 
big Other and a strong leader. On the contrary, in fact, 
authoritarianism happens when there is a confusion between 
the big Other (as virtuality) and an empirical individual. What 
we need are institutions and agents that will stand in for — 
but cannot be equated with — a leftist big Other. 


RW: You talk about the re-formatting of memory that is a 
symptom of capitalist realism, where history can be altered 
almost instantly (as in a Philip K. Dick novel) as we stand agog 
before the supposed ceaseless innovation of capitalism. You 
were also one of those to start using the concept 
“hauntology”, the idea that there was a cultural meme that 
acknowledged the collapse of a moment and picks through 
the remains for the lost futures buried within. Similarly, we 
are in a political landscape littered with “ideological rubble” 
(as you quote Alex Williams). My suspicion is that for you the 
“moment” that has collapsed is the politics of 68, one that 
was perhaps guilty of the re-formatting of history and 
memory in its own way, before many of its ideas were taken 
up by a post-Fordist capitalism. So what is the detritus that 
you are picking through? What of the discarded remnants of 
left politics would you dust off? And is it possible to give old 
ideas new momentum? 


MF: I would say that, in many ways, the politics of 68 haven’t 
collapsed enough. 68 is a spectre which still hangs over 
theory. Yet the forces which 68 railed against no longer exist; 
there is no Stalinist Party or State that we need to blow apart 
with a Cultural Revolution. Which isn’t to say that we should 
want to return to Stalinist authoritarianism, or that it is 
possible to do so; the oscillation between these two options is 
the sign of a failure of political imagination. It’s necessary to 
go all the way through post-Fordism, to keep looking ahead, 
especially at times when there seems to be nothing ahead of 
us. Part of the importance of the concept of hauntology is the 
idea of lost futures, of things which never happened but 
which could have. On one level, late capitalism is indeed all 
about ceaseless reinvention, nothing is solid, everything is 
mutable; but on another level, it is about recapitulation, 
homogeneity, minimally different commodities. Some of 
Jameson’s best passages are about this strange antinomy. 
Deleuze and Guattari, too, emphasise the way in which 
capitalism is a bizarre mix of the ultra-modern and the 
archaic. The failure of the future haunts capitalism: after 
1989, capitalism’s victory has not consisted in it confidently 
claiming the future, but in denying that the future is possible. 
All we can expect, we have been led to believe, is more of the 
same — but on higher resolution screens with faster 
connections. Hauntology, I think, expresses dissatisfaction 
with this foreclosure of the future. 

So it’s not now a question of giving old ideas new 
momentum, it’s a matter of fighting over the meaning of the 
words “new” and “modern”. Neoliberalism has made it seem 
self-evident that “modernisation” means managerialism, 


increased exploitation of workers, outsourcing, etc. But of 
course this isn’t self-evident: the neoliberals fought a long 
campaign on many fronts in order to impose that definition. 
And now neoliberalism itself is a discredited relic — albeit, as 
I argued above, one that still dominates our lives, but only by 
default now. Part of the battle now will be to ensure that 
neoliberalism is perceived to be defunct. I think that’s already 
happening. There is a change in the cultural atmosphere, 
small at the moment, but it will increase. What Jim McGuigan 
calls “cool capitalism”, the culture of swaggering business 
and conspicuous consumption that dominated the last 
decade, already looks as if it belongs to a world that is dead 
and gone. After the financial crisis, all those television 
programmes about selling property and the like became out 
of date overnight. These things aren’t trivial; they have 
provided the background noise which capitalist realism 
needed in order to naturalise itself. The financial crisis has 
weakened the corporate elite — not materially so much as 
ideologically. And, by the same token, it has given confidence 
to those opposed to the ruling order. I’m sure that the 
university occupations are the signs of a growing militancy. 
We need to take advantage of this new mood. There’s nothing 
old fashioned about the idea of rational organisation of 
resources, or that public space is important. (The failure to 
rationally organise natural resources is now evident to 
everyone; and the consequences of letting the concept of 
public space decline are equally obvious to anyone living in 
Britain, with its violent crime and drunkenness, both of 
which are symptoms of a kind of despair that is as 
unacknowledged under capitalist realism as it is ubiquitous.) 


Similarly, what is intrinsically “modern” about putting 
workers under intolerable stress? The pseudonymous postal 
worker Roy Mayall put this very well in his LRB blog: 


We used to be told that there were three elements to 
the postal trade: the business, the customers and the 
staff, and that all were equally important. These days 
we are clearly being told that only the business matters. 
So now the “modernisers” are moving in. They are 
young, thrusting, in-your-face and they think they 
know all the answers. According to them, the future is 
the application of new technology within the discipline 
of the market. But the market doesn’t tell us what to do: 
people tell us what to do. The “market” is essentially a 
ploy by which one group of people’s interests are 
imposed on the rest of us. The postal trade is at the 
front line of a battle between people’s needs and the 
demands of corporations to make ever increasing 
profits. That’s what they mean by “modernisation”, and 
it’s not “nostalgia” to remind ourselves that things used 


to be different.? 


But the fight will only be won when we can say with 
confidence, not only that things used to be different in the 
past, but that they can be different in the future too. I’m 
hoping that, before long, the neoliberal era will be seen for 
what it was: a barbarous anti-Enlightenment atavism, a 
temporary interruption of a process of egalitarian 
modernisation. 


RW: At the end of last year you edited a collection of essays, 


The Resistible Demise of Michael Jackson, brought out almost at 
the speed of John Blake Publishing! What was so important 
about Michael Jackson’s death that made you put such energy 
into this project? 


MF: Yes, it’s rapid-response theory! There’s no doubt that 
Jackson’s death arrived at a punctual moment. A whole 
thirty-year reality system had just collapsed with the bank 
bailouts. Obama had been elected. There was no one who 
personified that thirty-year period more than Michael 
Jackson. In the few days after Jackson died, I found myself 
watching his videos over and over again. I surprised myself 
by moved from a position of detached cynicism to feeling 
increasingly sad. There was something in those videos — 
particularly the Off The Wall clips — which afterwards 
disappeared from Jackson personally and from the culture in 
general. So I listened to Off The Wall and “Billie Jean” 
obsessively. I probably listened to “Billie Jean” forty times, 
but it was like listening to it for the first time; there were 
depths to it I’d never got to before. I wrote a post on my blog 
which elicited some positive responses; and it struck me that 
the network around Zer0 — which includes many of the 
world’s music writers as well as theorists — was in an ideal 
position to produce a book that could deal with Michael 
Jackson as a symptom. Which isn’t to say that the book is 
some desiccated analysis that doesn’t engage with the 
sensuous qualities of Jackson’s music — there are some 
wonderful descriptions of the tracks and Jackson’s dancing. 
The book was put together very quickly, but I’m extremely 
pleased with the results. It was heartening to see what music 


writers can do when you give them space and let them pursue 
their interests. There are some pieces in the book — such as 
Chris Roberts’ and Ian Penman’s — that are so sui generis that 
it is difficult to imagine them appearing anywhere else. 


RW: You’ve had a busy year, what with the blog, teaching, 
finishing a stint as reviews editor at the Wire, conference 
papers, marriage, Zer0 and the publication of two books — is 
it time for a rest now or will 2010 be just as busy? 


MF: This is not the time for a rest. On a personal level, a rest 
is impossible. Most of what I do doesn’t make me much 
money, so I have to keep working at a furious rate to keep my 
head above water. On a wider cultural and political level, this 
is a highly exciting time, not a moment to be convalescing. 
This year, in addition to the teaching, blogging, freelancing 
and editing for Zer0, I will be putting out Ghosts Of My Life, 
which will bring together my writings on hauntology and lost 
futures; in some ways, it’s the other half of Capitalist Realism. 
There’s another big project that I’m involved with which I 
have high hopes for, but we’re not ready to go public on that 
yet. 


RW: And finally, I hope it’s not too late to ask what were your 
favourite books of last year? 


MF: Apart from the Zer0 books — and I’ve almost certainly 
forgotten something really important — they would be: 


Fredric Jameson, Valences Of The Dialectic. A genuinely 
monumental work that I expect to be referring to for 


many years. 


Graham Harman, Prince Of Networks. A stunning 
reinterpretation of Bruno Latour’s work that is also 
Graham’s most lucid account yet of his object-oriented 
philosophy. 


Jodi Dean, Democracy and Other Neoliberal Fantasies: 
Communicative Capitalism and Left Politics. Jodi’s sharp 
analysis of the impasses of the left is also a kind of 
requiem for much the 2.0 bluster of the last decade. 


Slavoj Zizek, First As Tragedy, Then As Farce. Much more 
focused than some of Zizek’s recent books, this was a 
reminder of his supreme relevance to the current 
conjuncture. 


RW: Thanks Mark. 


capitalist realism: 
interviewed by 
richard capes 


(2011)! 


“Since there are so many people who are depressed — 
and I maintain that the cause for much of this 
depression is social and political — then converting that 
depression into a political anger is an urgent political 
project... Anti-depressants and therapy are the opium 
of the masses now.” 

— Mark Fisher 


Richard Capes: What is capitalist realism? 


Mark Fisher: You’d think I’d be able to answer this very 
quickly. But in fact it’s easier to spot than it is to define, I 


think, capitalist realism. There’s various different ways of 
looking at it. One is looking at is as a belief, a belief that 
capitalism is the only viable political economic system. That’s 
one sense of the realism — that anything else is unrealistic. 
And it’s often what you hear people say if one is critical of 
capitalism — they’ll say, “Well it might not be the best 
system, but it’s the only one that works.” One can think of it 
as a belief, but it’s also an attitude, an attitude in relation to 
that belief, an attitude of resignation and defeat. So I suppose 
that what I’m talking about with capitalist realism is not so 
much the attitude propagated by this kind of neoliberal right. 
It’s more how the success of the neoliberal right transforms 
the attitudes of the general population, and especially of the 
left I think. But of course the problem with talking about 
beliefs or attitudes is it implies a kind of individual 
psychological perspective. What we’re talking about here is 
the kind of collective psychic infrastructure, I’d say — a kind 
of diffuse ideological atmosphere, and the way in which those 
beliefs are instituted across all areas of life in a country like 
the UK: from the media through to the workplace, through to 
our own unconscious attitudes. 


RC: When and how did capitalist realism emerge? 


MF: I think you’re looking at the Eighties as the key period of 
transition really. We’re looking at a kind of synergy between 
ideology and the restructuring of capitalism — the 
restructuring of capitalism from so-called Fordism to post- 
Fordism, Fordism being the sort of dominant form of 
capitalism in the West, in the post-war period, which was 


based on a kind of compact of stability, where the working 
class was offered security in exchange for boredom. Where 
most towns would have one or two major industrial 
enterprises, most of the male workers would expect to work 
in those industries their whole working life. But they could 
expect minor incremental improvements in their standard of 
living over that working period. This sort of fell apart in the 
Seventies when the world that we’re now familiar with — so 
familiar, in fact, that we take it for granted — the world of 
post-Fordist capitalism started to emerge. 

What are key terms of post-Fordist capitalism? The dread 
word “flexibility”, which, in terms of the worker, tends to 
cash out of what’s called “precacrity”, i.e. constant conditions 
of instability and insecurity, short-term employment, 
casualisation. And of course that goes alongside some of the 
other key developments of post-Fordism, such as digitisation 
of the workplace, just-in-time production, and, of course, 
globalisation. So the re-structuring of capitalism in this way 
caught labour on the back-foot, labour as in the worker’s 
movement as well as in the Labour Party. The key problem I 
think articulated by the most forward-thinking of the left 
groups in the Seventies and Eighties — including the sort of 
the autonomous in Italy and what’s called the “New Times” 
group around Marxism Today in the UK — was, “How could the 
left hegemonise post-Fordism?”, “How could the left produce 
it’s own version of post-Fordism?” And I think the failure of 
that — the failure to meet that challenge — accounts for a lot 
of the failure of the left. 

On the one hand we have the restructuring of capitalism 
along the lines of post-Fordism. But what’s key to that, of 


course, is that this just wasn’t something that was simply 
imposed by capital on workers; it was in many ways driven by 
the desires of workers — workers who simply didn’t find 
enticing a life of boredom for forty years in a factory, who 
wanted more freedom. I think the key issue now is, in a way, 
the discrepancy between what they did want and what they 
actually got. I think that’s where opportunities lie for the left, 
actually. 

But coming back to “Where did capitalist realism 
emerge?” — well, “When and how did it emerge?” It was that 
the right successfully harnessed those desires — the anti- 
authoritarian currents that came out from the Sixties. The 
left I think failed to come up with a convincing model of an 
anti-authoritarian left. Energies that were released by the 
kind of struggles against capitalism on the left then became 
diverted into this neoliberal project, which, in the Eighties, 
had two faces. On the one level there was inducement. In the 
UK we saw this in the form of, particularly, the selling off of 
council houses. It was a really good move by Thatcher in lots 
of ways, because it immediately positioned the whole of the 
post-war social-democratic project as sort of being out-of- 
date, top-down, bureaucratic, and kind of Thatcherite 
neoliberalism as being about the future, the future that would 
deliver choice to individuals, which would deliver freedom 
away from the strictures of the state. A whole array of things 
happened in the UK, of course, privatisation. Again, 
privatisation was articulated in terms of giving people 
choices: “You too can now own shares!” Alongside these 
carrots, of course, there was a lot of stick with the destruction 
of the unions, or the effective destruction of the unions. 


The miners’ strike is the most powerfully symbolic image 
of the end of the worker’s movement. I think when we think 
about that — when we think about the miners’ strike — that 
gives us the most kind of vivid sense of how deeply 
established capitalist realism was by the middle of the 
Eighties, and certainly by the end of the Eighties. By the end 
of the Eighties we were in a situation that would have seemed 
science-fictional from the perspective of the middle of the 
Seventies. If you told people that all of the national utilities 
would be sold off and privatised, that the mining union which 
had just brought down the Conservative government would 
be sort of defeated in abeyance, that the unions were simply 
not major players in public life anymore — that would have 
seemed unimaginable. Yet it happened, and it happened in a 
relatively short time. 

If the Eighties were the sort of battleground — in 
retrospect it seemed like there was only one way that battle 
was going to go. In the Eighties, of course, things seemed 
different. It didn’t seem inevitable that neoliberalism would 
triumph. In retrospect the success of neoliberalism seems to 
have been overdetermined. But by the Nineties, I think, the 
key moment, of course, is the arrival and election of New 
Labour, which was the final victory for Thatcherite 
neoliberalism — where the Labour party could come in, 
essentially accepting the broad framework that had been 
imposed by neoliberals. I think then we enter into the kind of 
phase of capitalist realism which most of the book is devoted 
to analysing I suppose. 


RC: How has capitalism persuaded us that it’s the only 


“realistic” political-economic system? 


MF: One way of getting to this is by forcing ritualistic 
compliance, where there’s no other available language or 
conceptual model for how we understand life, work, or 
society, except that of business. And that’s one of the key 
things that happened in that period, particularly with public 
services — and that’s something I dwell on at some length in 
the book Capitalist Realism. It’s the extent to which teachers 
are now required to go through these self-surveillance 
procedures, these self-assessment procedures, which have 
been imported in from business, and the strange subjective 
disavowal that comes with these procedures often — 
managers who are uncomfortable imposing kind of business 
rhetoric, business methods, nevertheless will say to workers, 
say to teachers, “You don’t have to believe in this, but this is 
what we have to do now. We have to go along with this kind 
of thing.” And that sense that one has to go along with 
practices and languages coming in from business — I think 
that that is a key part of this sense that there is no alternative 
— that this is how things are done now — and there’s no other 
way around it. 

I think that in addition to what I said earlier are a kind of 
crushing of the previous forms of working-class solidarity. 
Well, a crushing — I guess it’s better to talk about 
decomposition really, in lots of ways, because it wasn’t 
simply, as I said, about capital hammering trade unions. It’s 
that trade unions hadn’t — trade unions in the form they had 
developed — had to fit with the Fordist mode of organisation, 
and as post-Fordism emerged, as Fordism fell apart — as I say, 


partly driven by the desires of workers — trade unions and 
other aspects of the labour movement failed to move with it. 
The effect of that is this kind of generalised atomisation, | 
think — a kind of collective depression, which isn’t 
experienced collectively, because nothing is, actually. 

But where between the individual and the state — there’s 
nothing in the space anymore. The space that trade unions 
used to occupy — well, people could feel then a direct 
connection between there own working lives and a wider 
political world and have some sense of agency because of 
that. That space was gone and people were... There’s this 
process of what I’ve called the “privatisation of stress” or 
general psychic privatisation. You get to own your own home, 
but your home becomes this place of refuge and consolation 
in a world where — because outside it public space is 
massively denuded. And it’s this decline of a public space 
which we can have any connection with. And it massively 
contributes to this sense that there’s no alternative to the 
way things are. 


RC: You argue in the book that capitalist realism is immune to 
moral criticism. Could you explain why? 


MF: It’s no use just talking about greed and these categories. 
There’s this kind of embedded Hobbesianism with capitalist 
realism. Part of capitalist realism is: “that’s the way the world 
is”. And that involves: “Well, people are naturally 
competitive”. If there’s widespread greed, or if this is 
appealed to as a notion — “Well, the reason there was a bank 


crash was because of greedy bankers” — that won't 


undermine capitalist realism, it’ll feed into it. It will feed into 
it in the sense that that kind of resignation, cynicism are part 
of the background of capitalist realism anyway. It also misses 
the target, I think. 

The problem with late capitalism is not the greed of 
capitalists. That’s the difference between a Marxist analysis 
and an ethical one — the Marxist one will focus on systems, 
forms of organisation are central. Capitalism is not bad 
because CEOs are uniquely evil. It’s the other way around. 
Anyone who’s in the position of CEO would act as CEOs do. It’s 
just a systemic pressure that produces that kind of behaviour. 
Part of the problem is that we are looking at systemic 
tendencies here. It’s archaic and kind of folk-psychological to 
focus on these categories which we think apply in everyday 
life, like more responsibility, to this kind of inhuman system. 
The scale of what we’re up against is obfuscated by a focus on 
the ethical. 


RC: You also talk about “recycling” as another way in which 
our attention is deflected from a real problem. 


MF: Isn’t recycling a classic case of: “We assume 
responsibility for the systemic tendencies of capitalism”? It’s 
not really our fault that there is an environmental 
catastrophe. The thing it is nobody’s fault, you can say, in a 
genuine sense, but that is the problem — because there is no 
agent capable of acting. There’s no agent at the moment 
that’s capable of taking responsibility for a problem on the 
scale of the environmental catastrophe that we’re facing. 
Instead, it’s contracted out to us as individuals as if we could 


do anything about it by simply putting plastic in the right bin. 
That won’t solve the environmental catastrophe that we’re up 
against. The only thing that can solve it is the production of 
an agent capable of acting. But of course nothing like that has 
ever existed throughout human history until now — which 
doesn’t mean it can’t exist, but that we’re in very new 
territory. That appeal to individual responsibility, as if 
aggregating up enough individual responsibility will 
substitute the need for this kind of agent. That’s one of the 
pernicious dimensions of the culture behind recycling. 


RC: Towards the end of the first chapter you argue that 
gangster films like Goodfellas and Pulp Fiction offer visions of 
the world that promote capitalism or reinforce capitalist 
realism. Could you explain how they do that because they’re 
often seen as offering a very gritty, realistic portrait of 
modern life? 


MF: Exactly. It’s because of that though, isn’t it? What do we 
mean by realism? That’s very much at stake. I think Ellroy 
also talks about — I think Ellroy is an interesting case because 
he’s pretty open about it in the political dimension of it. 
Ellroy’s project in something like American Tabloid, where he 
wants to take down all of these images of kind of American 
liberal politicians and expose the kind of seedy 
acquisitiveness behind the veneer — Ellroy’s quite open about 
this as a cultural-political project. This sense of precisely 
what is realistic. What is realistic? That people are 
competitive, they naturally struggle against one another, that 
the real world of the streets is described by this kind of 


micro-capitalist — not even micro often — struggle between 
warring families or warring interest groups — quite clearly 
this will feed into capitalist realism, I think, in lots of levels: 
in the assumption of individualism, the assumption of 
competition, also what has disappeared from that picture — 
which is any kind of public world. 


RC: Would you say the American TV series The Wire is a work 
of capitalist realism? 


MF: It’s a fascinating parallel with the book, I think, in that, 
in lots of ways it’s very similar to Capitalist Realism. What is 
the difference between that and large swathes of gangster rap 
or Ellroy is the implicit critique in it, isn’t it? There’s a 
celebration with Ellroy or gangster rap — “this not just how 
things are, but there’s something good about the fact they’re 
like this actually, and that we need to be positive about 
disillusionment”. Behind The Wire, despite this sense of 
massive institutional inertia, and just the impasses of politics, 
the fact that however hard individuals try to act the system 
has either a way of subsuming them or eliminating them — 
although that could be dispiriting, in the same way that 
Capitalist Realism could be dispiriting (and some people do 
read it in that way), for me the message of The Wire is very 
similar to the message of Capitalist Realism, that this is what 
we’re up against now. That was how things were pre-2008. Of 
course one of the many things that interests me about The 
Wire is the emphasis that’s placed on _ post-Fordist 
bureaucracy, the same as I place it in Capitalist Realism — on 
the way that kind of target culture has this inherent kind of 


skewing of facts, the sinister alliance between managerialism 
and target culture, in the way that it sort of blocks out 
initiative and also prevents people from doing their job in a 
way that you’d think they ought to be doing it. 

On the face of it you’d think with The Wire — yeah, it’s a 
negative message, and to that extent it would reinforce 
capitalist realism. The second series about containerisation, 
about the decline, the diminishment of the old forms of 
labour, and their replacement with this kind of post-Fordist 
robotics — computerisation — is very flat with the themes of 
Capitalist Realism the book. But I see it more as describing or 
rather anatomising — diagraphing — capitalist realism, 
rather than it actually reinforcing it, because it quite plainly 
lacks that element of celebration. It does also lack 
resignation, even though it does seem to be a seamless world 
from which there is no escape. The very fact it exists is a form 
of refusal of resignation, I think. Showing the sheer 
systematicity of these processes is something other than 
simply being resigned to them in everyday life and work. 


RC: You mentioned the phrase “privatisation of stress” 
earlier in the interview. Could you talk about your experience 
of this when you worked as a teacher in further education? 


MF: FE in the UK used to be the place where students who 
didn’t really get on that well with conventional education — 
where they would go for a slightly different approach. I 
started teaching there the early part of the 2000s, and one 
could already see that ethos under threat and it became, 
increasingly as the decade wore on, as the kind of Blairite 


business agenda came to dominate life at college more and 
more. Partly what I mean by the “privatisation of stress” in 
relation to education is that people are required to become 
their own workers. There’s a trick that’s been played by 
neoliberalism which we’ve all succumbed to more or less — 
which is the idea that bureaucracy is in the past, bureaucracy 
belongs to this old statist, heavy, top-down, centralised world 
and we’re glad to be rid of it. 

But of course, when we think about what our working 
lives involve now, I’d say for many people it involves more 
bureaucracy, not less. The difference is that the kind of 
bureaucratic surveillance is not performed by external 
parties; it’s increasingly performed by us. We have to fill in 
fifty or sixty page logbooks; we have to fill in endless detailed 
documents assessing our own performance. But this is part of 
a sort of wider privatisation of stress, which is that we’re 
invited to take responsibility for the additional stresses that 
an increased workload and decreased security bring to bear 
on us. Since trade unions are no longer as effective as they 
were, our first recourse often when we’re put under extra 
stress is not to complain to a trade union or get them to act 
on our behalf but to go to a doctor and get anti-depressants, 
or if we’re “lucky” — in inverted commas — get therapy. The 
rise of depression amongst the general population, 
particularly amongst the young, is, I think, a symptom of this 
privatisation of stress. 


RC: In the book you say that in Britain “depression is now the 
condition most treated by the NHS”. 


MF: As far as I’m aware that’s still the case. I haven’t checked 
out the statistics recently, but I can’t imagine that in the 
period we’re in at the moment depression has decreased 
amongst the population. What struck me about this was, 
“Why is this acceptable? Why, particularly in a period in 
which we can look back now and see as a period of boom — 
why in this period of so-called boom were so many people, 
particularly young people, why were so many of them 
depressed? Doesn’t this indicate some fundamental kind of 
affective problem with late capitalism?” It seems to me that 
one aspect of the privatisation of stress is there’s not an 
availability of a kind of cultural language of disaffection and 
discontent, particularly for the young, I think. And one of the 
interesting things about the last year or so, with the student 
militancy at the end of 2010 and the riots this year, is this 
kind of eruption of a negativity, which I don’t think was 
available to young people in lots of ways in the high pomp of 
capitalist realism. 


RC: In the book you talk about students suffering from 
“depressive hedonia”. Could you tell us what this is? 


MF: I was talking about the students I was teaching — so they 
were younger teenagers... not that young, I suppose: sixteen 
to nineteen. Not undergraduates. This does seem to strike a 
chord with them actually. Many of the people who write to 
me about the book, younger people, think that that captures 
something about their experience. Depressive hedonia would 
be just a way of thinking about the form that depression takes 
in a world where stimulus is always available, I think. I don’t 


think we’ve remotely got to grips with the affective 
consequences of the kind of cyberspace-matrix that the 
young especially are embedded in. 

Part of what I’m describing in the book really is the 
tensions between a kind of crumbling disciplinary framework 
— in which teachers are there as these prison-guards of this 
collapsing system. Well, on the one hand they are prison 
guards. On the other hand, they’re required to interface with 
this constant world of stimulus, and be entertainers. There’s a 
tension between being a prison guard and an entertainer — 
it’s pretty difficult to say the least. In terms of depressive 
hedonia, depression is usually described as a case of 
anhedonia, where the sufferer of depression is unable to 
derive pleasure from anything. It seemed to me that there’s 
almost an opposite syndrome in place with teenagers, where 
pleasure is so easily available that, well, that it’s this very 
availability of pleasure that’s depressing in many cases. | 
guess there’s a kind of consumer model of pleasure which is 
involved, which doesn’t build up people’s sense of self- 
esteem, sense of well-being, or perhaps more importantly a 
sense of involvement in things. Instead of that you’ve got this 
kind of rapid-fire small bursts of pleasure. And one of the 
things that’s removed by this is a kind of productive 
boredom. 

The existential crisis posed by boredom in the Seventies — 
when you really could be bored, when there wasn’t a seamless 
stimulus-matrix available — I think there’s a big relation 
between that — the availability of a certain kind of boredom 
— and phenomena like punk. The availability of constant low- 
level stim in twenty-first-century culture precludes that kind 


of boredom, precludes alienation in a certain way, but 
produces this kind of general feeling of unacknowledged 
disaffection I think. These forms of stimulation are not really 
capable of engaging people in a way that takes them out and 
beyond themselves. People are sort of trapped in themselves 
in this form of kind of functional misery, in a sense that 
they’re just miserable enough, as it were, miserable enough to 
carry on — not too miserable that they would either reach a 
point of subjective destitution or just have to question — 
pushed to the point where they have to question the general 
social causes for why they’re like this. So I think it’s just 
enough pleasure to keep them depressed as it were. That’s 
one way of looking at depressive hedonia. 

But of course one of the great things that’s happened over 
the last year or so, that’s significant though, is the student 
protests at the end of 2010. It was students who lead this. 
There’s a sense there of what I was looking for or hoping for 
when I was writing Capitalist Realism — that these forms of 
unacknowledged disavowed discontent would convert into 
forms of public anger. What was so exciting about the student 
protests was seeing that process start. Because I think a lot of 
the older people are much more in that mode that I was 
describing earlier of kind of resignation. I don’t think there’s 
many people who are fans or enthusiastic supporters of the 
coalition government, but I suspect the general attitude is, 
“Well, there’s not much we can do about this”. In other 
words, a form of capitalist realism. What we saw with the 
young is a kind of challenging of that in a very dramatic way. 


RC: In a talk you gave about Capitalist Realism earlier this year 


you called for the development of a “leftist psychotherapy”. 
Could you explain what you mean by this? 


MF: This is really serious, I think. Since there are so many 
people who are depressed — and I maintain that the cause for 
much of this depression is social and political — then 
converting that depression into a political anger is an urgent 
political project. Of course it’s not only about that. It’s also 
about levels of real distress and suffering in society, which 
cannot be handled or dealt with by the individualising, 
privatised assumptions of the dominant forms of treatment in 
mental illness, which are, in this country, cognitive 
behavioural therapy — which is a kind of combination of 
positive thinking and kind of psychoanalysis-light: the focus 
on the family background of the sufferer, and on then of 
converting thought patterns from these negative into 
positive ones. There’s that. And on the other hand, brain 
chemistry focus — the horrible loop whereby massive 
multinational pharmaceutical companies sell people drugs in 
order to cure them from the stresses brought about by 
working in late capitalism. Neither of these things are very 
effective — all they do is largely contain people’s depression 
rather than actually deal with the actual cause of depression. 
One can apply Marx’s arguments about religion very 
directly to this — that religion was the opium of the masses. 
Anti-depressants and therapy are the opium of the masses 
now, in lots of ways. That isn’t to say that they don’t do 
anything at all. They do in many cases relieve intense 
suffering, which people are undergoing. But it’s just the same 
as religion. As Marx said, it’ll make people better in a kind of 


savage and pitiless world — religion wants real comfort to 
people in the same way, in a world of relentless competition, 
of digital hyper-stress, etc. Being able to talk to someone for 
an hour in cognitive behavioural therapy or having 
something which will take the edge of things via anti- 
depressants — that will make people feel better, but just as 
with religion, it doesn’t get to the sources of that sort of 
misery in the first place. It in fact obfuscates it. 

If you want to look at the rise of capitalist realism, one 
can also look at the decline of anti-psychiatry. As anti- 
psychiatry declined, then capitalist realism grew. I think 
there’s a relation there between the two. That normalisation 
of misery as part of the privatisation of stress has been 
absolutely central to the rise of capitalist realism. 

How do we get beyond that? Some kind of return to the 
issues that were raised by anti-psychiatry. I’m not saying 
necessarily that everything anti-psychiatry said was right. 
With anti-psychiatry, as with many other anti-authoritarian 
strands of leftism that emerged in the Sixties — that kind of 
rhetoric became diverted and captured by the neoliberal 
right. When did anti-psychiatry cash-out? Well in some ways, 
Care in the Community, etc. But of course that wasn’t the 
only way it could have gone. Thinking about ways of 
reforming, changing institutional care, of looking at a shift 
beyond this narrow kind of focus either on family background 
or the kind of chemical make-up of people’s brains — this 
could have a very high impact, I think, if we could articulate 
this. 

A reader of Capitalist Realism actually drew my attention to 
the work of someone called David Smail, who’s himself a kind 


of therapist — though I don’t think he’d like the term 
“therapist”. He, in a number of books, has sort of argued for 
the development of a leftist psychotherapy. Smail claims that 
feelings of well-being fundamentally arise from a public 
world — against the background of a public world. And in a 
society in which the concept of the public has been so kind of 
viciously and systematically attacked — it’s no surprise, Smail 
argues, that distress has increased. He argues that — as I 
would — that the dominant forms of treatment in mental 
illness have reinforced that rather than challenged it. I think 
developing Smail’s ideas could be extremely powerful. 


RC: In the book you call French students involved in protests 
against neoliberalism “immobilisers”. What does this term 
mean? 


MF: It’s a term I use myself, like “immobilisation” — to bring 
capitalism to a halt. I think the problem of articulating things 
in that way is that it feeds into the dominance of capitalist 
realism in the sense that it concedes that history belongs to 
capital or history is only going one way — capital. And that all 
we can do is obstruct, resist or delay the inevitable triumph 
of capital. It seems to me there are obvious problems with 
that way of thinking. It’s really still part of capitalist realism. 
It’s part of capitalist realism in a very big way because we’ve 
lost any sense that the future is ours, that we can move 
forward to a future that we’re constructing. Instead all we’re 
doing is putting up barricades against a future that we 
ourselves are conceding belongs to capital. 


RC: How did the student protests in Britain differ from that? 


MF: I’m not sure that they did differ that much from it. As 
with many left-wing protests, there’s a strong sense of what 
they’re against, but not so much sense of what is wanted. 
What’s encouraging about it for me is that at least the British 
young have broken out of that kind of pull of what’s 
conventionally called “apathy”, but I don’t like that term at 
all. In the book I use the term “reflexive impotence”, which I 
think is a better sense of what’s at stake with many British 
young. Why I called it reflexive impotence is that people feel 
they can’t do anything, and they’re sort of aware that their 
feelings that they can’t do anything mean that they can’t do 
anything, or contribute even more to the inability to actually 
act, yet it still doesn’t enable them to act. Reflexive 
impotence is another phrase for depression, I think. That’s 
how a depressive person feels. They know that their own 
attitudes are reinforcing their own inability to do anything, 
and also making them feel worse. Yet knowing that is not 
likely to inspire them to act. Instead it makes them more and 
more depressed. I think that sums up the situation for the 
British young or large swathes of the British young up to 
2008. 

I guess what’s also encouraging about the student protests 
is that politics becomes an available option. I think the level 
of so-called depoliticisation was so strong amongst the young 
that even sort of failed or flawed forms of politicisation are 
encouraging because I think part of depression and part of 
the depression I was talking about really is the disappearance 
of politics as such. Many young people in Britain who take 
capitalist realism for granted don’t see much of a future for 
themselves, don’t see a very interesting future for 


themselves. At best they’ll be indebted in order to get a job 
that isn’t very exciting — that’s probably how they’re seeing 
things. And the idea that one can challenge this politically — I 
don’t think for many of them that it was available as a 
thought. Making it available again was what was encouraging 
about student militancy. 


RC: Do you think more and more students are breaking out of 
the bounds of capitalist realism and becoming more radical? 


MF: I think it is early days. There’s all kinds of things going 
on. I think student militancy — the emergence of it — is 
something that wouldn’t have happened before 2008. After 
the bank crisis of 2008 — this is a major event, a kind of major 
trauma, for capital, and of course we’re still right in the 
middle of it. And it’s evident that capital does not have a 
solution to the problems which lead up to the bank crises of 
2008 at all. I think student militancy is one dimension of it, 
the riots are another. But I think that these are really the 
beginnings of something and we don’t know where it’s going 
to go at all. 

And it’s a shame in a way that this massive efflorescence 
of student militancy before Christmas last year dissipated and 
wasn’t able to be sustained during this year. That doesn’t 
mean that it’s gone away. I think certainly over the next 
course of the month or so, building up to November — in 
November there’s going to be another big flash point. A lot of 
the people who have been politicised by what happened last 
year will be back again. 

The thing is things move so quickly. There’s a strange 


rhythm of events at the moment where you have this massive 
rush of unpredictable kinds of events occurring. I think that’s 
what happened with student militancy at the end of last year, 
then earlier this year we had the whole Murdoch thing, and 
then the riots. These things erupt in an unexpected way, in a 
way that goes far further than people would anticipate before 
they happen. But then things seem to go back to normal, 
seem to stabilise again. But every time things go back to 
normal, so-called normal, then normality is much more 
unstable, I think, than it was before. This tendency of collapse 
at the moment, with what we’re living through, is the 
disintegration of the reality system, quite simply. 

Something that has been built up for over twenty-five 
years, i.e. capitalist realism, in the neoliberal mode — since 
that has been so pervasive, since that has dominated all of the 
assumptions of institutional and organisational life as well as 
the unconscious, it’s not surprising that it doesn’t collapse all 
in one go. People’s expectations, everything they take for 
granted, is shaped by that reality system — that in itself keeps 
it going for some period. But at the same time, we can see it 
really rocking at the moment. I think there’s the opportunity 
for the left at this time. I think, yes, we need things to get 
radical, but we also need to get hold of the mainstream. This 
is where we’re totally disconnected. It’s not only that we are 
totally disconnected from the “mainstream”, so-called. I 
mean I use the mainstream in inverted commas, because 
precisely at moments like this we don’t know what the 
mainstream can be. We’ve know what it was up to 2008. 

Part of the book Capitalist Realism is really about the 
massive decline of mainstream media, mainstream culture, 


under the kind of tyranny of capitalist realism. I just don’t 
think we know what mainstream media or mainstream 
politics can be like in the coming period because everything 
is up for grabs again. We can see that severe crisis that the 
ruling class is in, in the UK, which was made clear by the so- 
called Hackgate thing — a network of complicity between the 
media and the police and politicians, which David Cameron 
had to admit he was right in the middle of. Now you'd think 
that would provide an opportunity for the left, but the 
problem is there’s no presence in the mainstream, no agent 
that can press home this clear advantage. And that’s been 
quite clearly the case since 2008. 


RC: How can the left hope to establish a presence in the 
mainstream media when it almost completely excludes 
genuinely left voices? 


MF: I don’t think it’s inevitable that they would be excluded. I 
think it’s a mistake to think the form of mainstream media is 
fixed — that that kind of neoliberal attuned mainstream 
media with its very narrow bandwidth, with very low 
expectations that it has of its audience. This was something 
that was imposed gradually. It is something that was fought 
for and achieved by neoliberals and their allies in big 
business. But it’s a hegemonic struggle and media and 
mainstream politics are terrain which the political right have 
dominated to the extent that people forget that there’s ever 
anything different to this. But I don’t think we can say in 
advance what will be excluded and what won’t be excluded. 
For instance, with the Labour Party, you can still see them 


acting as if it was before 2008, still acting as if the old so- 
called centre ground still existed. But it just doesn’t exist 
anymore and no one’s testing this out — that’s the problem. 
No one is testing out what would happen if you tried to take a 
more left-wing perspective in the mainstream media. 

Since Ed Milliband and the post-New Labour Labour Party 
has decided to pitch things towards some obsolete centre- 
ground, we just don’t know what would happen. And I think 
that’s what needs to be tested out at the moment. It’s quite 
clear that we’re facing a dilemma, that the UK — what we’ve 
seen with the riots and with the student militancy is these 
kinds of fissures in UK society that we haven’t seen to this 
extent since maybe the poll-tax riots or, even earlier than 
that, the miners’ strike. I think capitalist realist hegemony 
depended upon this kind of production of consensus — or 
rather image of consensus — that had to be kind of 
continually reproduced by the media. Even when the media is 
condemning riots or condemning student protests, 
nevertheless they are visible — the visible cracks in this form 
of consensus or, like I said, appearance of consensus. So, like I 
say, we just don’t know what’s going to happen at this stage 
and we shouldn’t concede any terrain to the enemies 
especially at this time really. 


RC: It’s not in the interest of the mainstream media to 
encourage people to question capitalism, though, is it? 
Newspapers, for example, are profitseeking businesses, 
owned by very wealthy people. 


MF: That’s defeatist because we can’t go anywhere without — 


either the media is reformed or we actually compete on 
terrain which is not favourable to us. I don’t think this means 
we ought to concede to it, I think. Reading Nick Davis’ book, 
Flat Earth News — it’s very interesting. It does vindicate 
everything you’ve said with newspapers. 60% of broadsheet 
content comes from PR. But I guess what’s interesting about 
that though isn’t that the owners of the newspapers collude 
with the PR companies as such. It’s more that it’s a direct 
consequence of the underfunding of journalism. Journalists 
are required to turn around ten stories a day. They won’t be 
out on the streets doing investigative reporting. They'll be 
editing press releases. 

But I think this is susceptible to influence by us as well — 
what Davis calls these “astro-turf” groups, as a play on the 
idea of grassroots organisation. So a lot of things which 
appear in the paper as if they’d come from grassroots 
organisations in fact come from these corporate astro-turf PR 
bodies or whatever. We need our own astro-turf bodies as it 
were to compete into this ecology. What gives us hope here is 
the fact that there isn’t a strong agenda being pushed by 
these journalists, that they’ll accept anything that comes into 
the inbox if it’s pushed there with sufficient kind of vigour. I 
still think a lot of journalism is kind of opportunistic, and it’s 
a question of our organising to intervene into this kind of 
ecology. 

We’ve seen examples recently of Owen Jones, though — 
Owen Jones has got in all kinds of media on the back of Chavs. 
He’s appeared on Daybreak, Sky News — right in the heart of 
this kind of corporate beast. So it can be done. I don’t think 
we can a priori say what can be achieved at this time. Capital 


is in disarray, the ruling class is in disarray at the moment, 
and I think that if we give up in advance and say, “We'll never 
get into mainstream media”, then we’re doing them a favour. 
Of course the other danger is simply constructing everything 
so we adapt to the existing structures of mainstream media. 
That’s also fatal — toning things down so that we can be 
accepted. It’s about a hegemonic struggle so that we can 
change what is acceptable to say on there. And if we can’t do 
that then we have failed. That’s pretty clear and New Labour 
is the most objective lesson in that. If you simply construct 
your project on the basis of what is now acceptable in the 
mainstream and maybe just slightly shifting things over — 
that will fail. 

And not only fail, but will also produce this kind of 
political despondency such as I tried to describe in the book 
really. I think we have to go between these two strategies — 
either staying outside the mainstream media completely or 
just adapting to what the mainstream media is like now. We 
have to learn lessons from neoliberals, really, I think. They 
were capable of changing what the media was in the same 
way we have to imagine that the media can change in our 
direction. Of course they’ve got resources we haven’t got. But 
we ve got resources they haven’t got as well. 

Going back to what I was saying earlier on: We should be 
inspired to the extent to which the triumph of neoliberalism, 
in a way, is showing how things can go from impossible to 
inevitable. That’s the way history goes — that things seem 
completely off the agenda, that there’s no way that things can 
happen; suddenly, things switch where they’re the only thing 
that can happen. That’s how it was with neoliberalism. The 


one thing we can be sure of at the moment is that things can’t 
go back to how they were before 2008. That can’t happen. 
We're in a period of major tumult, major change. The right, 
the kind of neoliberal right, is at its weakest since I can 
remember. 

And we need to think ahead I think about how things can 
be different. And media is really a key part of that. I think it’s 
really significant that the Hackgate thing happened this year, 
because it’s part of this delegitimation process, you might 
say. The delegitimation process has at least two aspects. I 
think one is the discrediting of neoliberalism, although 
neoliberalism is quite plainly going to continue as a kind of 
guiding set of defaults for a while yet. As a political 
programme with a kind of confidence, it disintegrated after 
2008. So we’re in this kind of vacuum at the moment where 
neoliberalism has effectively collapsed, but nothing has come 
to replace it. That is an opportunity. 


RC: In your book you say that the anti-capitalist protests do 
nothing more than provide a “carnivalesque background 
noise to capitalist realism”. Could you explain why? 


MF: There’s this spectacular dimension to anti-capitalist 
protests — this purely petitionary dimension to it. My 
problem with the anti-capitalist thing in a sense is that 
there’s nobody who can meet the demands that are being put 
forward there. It has the form of petition, but there’s no one 
to whom this petition is actually aimed. That’s what’s 
peculiar about it. Let’s imagine at one of these G20 protests — 
let’s imagine everyone inside the G20 goes, “Well, okay, we’ve 


heard this noise. We’ve heard these slogans. That’s it. We 
agree that capitalism is really a bad system.” Then what? 
Even if everybody inside the G20 meeting agreed with that, 
they still couldn’t do anything. It’s this peculiar form of 
spectacular petition, which I think does not expect to win 
because there is no model of what it would be like to win, as it 
were. This is not to say that nothing went on there and those 
protests were completely valueless or insincere. But I do 
think we need a concept of failure on the left. I think that one 
thing that separates the neoliberal right from the left is that 
there’s much less tolerance of failure on the neoliberal right. 

I think built into many of these movements is a kind of 
inbuilt expectation of failure, so that it’s not a problem if 
things actually fail. With the student thing there was at least 
— although it actually did fail, it could have succeeded, at 
least theoretically. It had a determinate aim. The people they 
were exerting pressure on had the power to make the 
decision not to impose those student fees, etc. Unless there 
are determinate winnable goals, a kind of generalised 
despondency will result. It’s what my comrade Alex Williams 
calls “feel-good, feel-bad”. You feel good because you're out 
in a protest doing something. But ultimately you feel bad 
because — and these two things are completely sutured 
together, the feel-good and the feel-bad — you feel bad 
because you don’t expect to achieve anything ever. It’s just a 
kind of carnival of the defeated. It’s those aspects that I think 
are troubling about that kind of protest. 

As I say, the student protest was different because they 
had a determinate goal that produced this criterion of success 
and failure. Also: because of the sustained nature of it. There 


wasn’t just something over in a day. It was something over a 
period of weeks. It built up and had managed to embed itself 
in the structure of universities, by the occupations. That 
produces a very different dynamic to a kind of anti-capitalist 
carnival that happens for a day or a short period of time. The 
problem ultimately was that, as we discussed earlier, that did 
fizzle out. I think that then just poses different challenges 
about how — since people have been politicised by that issue 
— how do we sustain that kind of struggle over a longer 
period, and how do we keep it embedded into everyday life. I 
think that link between people’s working life, or the life of 
students, and politics is crucial — that politics is not 
something that is just performed by a professional class of 
administrators at some spectacular distance. It’s something 
that directly connects with how we live and work. I think that 
that was the power of the student protests by contrast with 
the Nineties-Noughties anti-capitalism — although I’m not 
suggesting a total discontinuity there. 

It seems to me that trade unions were successful in the 
past, as I’ve said, because of Fordism. The collapse of Fordism, 
that’s made the way trade unions operate more difficult. But 
that doesn’t mean that no form of workers organisation 
couldn’t work effectively now. But I do think we need 
imagination and a real shift from the Fordist paradigm. 
Having been an active trade union member in points in my 
life, I've seen the extent to which higher echelons of trade 
unions are still orientated around — many of them are still 
orientated around Fordism, around pay and strikes. I saw this 
particularly with teaching. Many of the issues that I describe 
in the book — the problems of observations, of bureaucracy, 


of self-surveillance — these are things that teachers are kind 
of passionate about, which unions have a very limited 
interest in. I think shifting the terrain of struggle onto things 
that matter to people is a way of re-engaging them. There’s 
no reason, in my view, why trade unions themselves couldn’t 
become major players again if they’re prepared to shift, very 
belatedly, into the post-Fordist world. 


RC: Is the occupy movement taking place in America at the 
moment doing nothing more than providing a “carnivalesque 
background noise to capitalism”? 


MF: Part of what makes things different now from how they 
were in the past, just is the fact that the banking crisis has 
happened and that capital is on the back foot. There’s an 
element of petitionary acting out with those forms of anti- 
capitalism that I describe in the book. In the situation where 
capital is much weaker — but also the situation is much more 
desperate, I think — that has created a different set of 
situations where, you know, “What are people to do faced 
with this kind of ongoing train wreck of the financial 
system?” There’s a sense that anything thrown in front of 
that train is good at this time. We simply don’t know, I think, 
how far things will spread, how things will develop in 
conditions as they are now as opposed to what they were like 
at the end of the twentieth century, at the beginning of the 
twenty-first century. It seems to me that these negative 
protest-based movements — if they’re to have any lasting 
impact — must transform into robust organisations that have 
institutional structures and a positive agenda. But I don’t 


think that we can rule that out at this stage. We just don’t 
know what’s going to happen. 


RC: Some have argued that one of wonderful things about the 
movement is its lack of a central organising system because 
it’s bringing together all kinds of people with different 
problems. 


MF: Okay, that’s a resource. But I think organisation is 
required, though, because otherwise how do we compete with 
capital? I think capital is quite happy facing people who are 
not that organised. It’s good to have a broad-based group of 
people. But there was a broad-based opposition to the Iraq 
War — and that’s a major moment of capitalist realism, I 
think, in the UK. When you have however many millions out 
in the streets in the UK and nothing happened. That shows 
that sheer numbers of people don’t necessarily accomplish 
anything. I think you only accomplish anything when you’ve 
got organisation, goals and structures, in the end. Otherwise 
you've just got some faith in a kind of spontaneity of the 
people somehow. When has that ever yielded anything? 
You’re not up against things which are susceptible to 
spontaneity. There’s a difference between capitalism and 
other forms of kind of political social dominance, isn’t there? 
We can’t just take all of the capitalists out and execute them. 
Capitalism is a structure — it’s as much a cognitive structure 
as it is a social structure. You can’t just take out the ruling 
class. Even imagine this was the case, imagine it was possible 
— you can’t just take out the ruling class and have got rid of 
it. Difficult questions are: How do we organise life differently? 


How do we organise the economy in a way that’s different 
from the way that capitalism has done? That’s not solved by 
executing capitalists. 


RC: What do you think a post-capitalist society look like? 


MF: I’m not sure we’re even close to answering that question 
at the moment, to be honest. I’m not saying that in a defeatist 
way. In a way it’s partly a testament to the power of capitalist 
realism. We have to start by granting the power that it has 
over our imaginations, over our social, political and economic 
imaginations. Part of that power is the way it structures 
oppositions in our minds, so that you think there’s this 
deadlock between either we’ve got state centralisation or 
neoliberalism. It’s imperative that we think beyond this 
deadlock, I think, so that when we’re arguing against 
neoliberal capitalism, then we’re not implicitly arguing to go 
back to social democracy or back to a Stalinist state. We 
might want to go back to elements of social democracy. But 
it’s not going to be enough to say that we just want to retreat 
to how things were a few years ago. I think we need a sense of 
where we’re going to. We can be somewhat emboldened here 
because it’s not as if anyone’s got a very clear idea of where 
things are going at the moment. And the one thing we can be 
certain of is that they won’t carry on as they have been. We 
need this boldness of imagination on our side, willingness to 
engage in thought experiments, science-fictional scenarios — 
because, quite honestly, they’re just as likely as anything else 
that’s going to happen. 


RC: In the last chapter of the book you suggest that one way 


society can be improved is by establishing a “paternalism 
without the Father”. Could you explain what you mean by 
this? 


MF: That’s one challenge to the impasses that we’re in. As we 
were talking about the mainstream media — I do think media 
is crucial. One of the ways in which neoliberal hegemony has 
cemented itself is by an attack on paternalism, because it’s 
saying paternalism is part of this obsolete, bureaucratic, 
centralising, top-down, archaic world that we’re glad to be rid 
of. What’s involved in paternalism? Paternalism is other 
people telling you what you ought to do, and we — we 
neoliberals — don’t believe in that; we believe that you should 
be able to choose for yourselves. Now this whole way of 
setting things up has, I think, been highly successful and for 
that reason deeply pernicious. They also associate 
paternalism with elitism, because they will say, “Paternalism 
then is someone deciding for you what you ought to like and 
what you ought not to like.” One doesn’t simply want to 
reverse the terms there and accept the way the binary is set 
up. We need to think about how paternalism could be 
different from the image that neoliberalism has of it. 

What’s interesting to me is the way in which elements of 
paternalism do survive in neoliberal culture. The smoking 
ban, for instance. It quite clearly runs contrary to the way I 
was characterising — one might say caricaturing — the 
neoliberal appeal. This is quite clearly stopping people from 
making choices. Paternalism survives in a kind of way in 
health. It doesn’t survive in culture, and that’s interesting. 
But it seemed to me that what was at stake in mass media 


when I was growing up, and the paternalistic dimension of it, 
wasn’t people telling me what to do — they’re assuming 
intelligence on my part. They’re assuming that I can cope 
with things that I didn’t already like. 

There’s this different model of desire that’s at stake with 
how I would construct paternalism in a positive way — which 
isn’t about just deciding for people what’s good for them. It is 
about having a wager that there is maybe a desire for the 
strange in people — people don’t already know what they 
want and that the things which they really end up most 
valuing maybe things which surprise them. What I’m arguing 
is that a lot of the features that neoliberalism, neoliberal 
culture claims for itself — which is innovation, the capacity to 
surprise, newness — none of these things are generated by 
neoliberal culture. The exact opposite is the case in fact. 
When you have a consumer model of “choice” — in inverted 
commas — what you get is this kind of bland homogeneity, a 
faux-diversity, concealing an extremely narrow bandwidth of 
options. 

What was it that actually did allow for there to be 
innovation, surprise, and novelty? Well, some kind of 
condition of stability and some kind of removal from 
immediate commercial pressures. That’s how one could think 
about, particularly, how the BBC used to operate, how 
Channel 4 operated in its early days. Nothing is more 
illustrative, I think, the triumph of capitalist realism in the 
UK than Channel 4, which started off showing Tarkovsky 
seasons, had hour-long programmes simply consisting of 
philosophers discussing ideas — to Location, Location, Location 
or whatever else is on Channel 4 at the moment. There’s some 


massive decline that then produces this retrospective 
impossibilisation. That other Channel 4 did exist, but now it 
seems utterly impossible. 

But it is only possible in some kind of model of 
paternalism — of thinking the best of people and thinking 
they deserve the best, not of serving up whatever people 
want, or whatever is held that people want. Part of the notion 
behind this for me would be the plasticity of desire. 
Neoliberalism wants to trap people in where they already are. 
This model of paternalism is about saying people are capable 
of being stranger, of liking things which they don’t know at 
the moment that they would like. That’s the side that we 
should be on — is in inculcating this. Of course, for me, as a 
teacher, there’s a kind of flatness, I think, between this 
concept of paternalism and teaching. Surely teaching must 
involve this kind of wager — that the student can enjoy things 
which are alien to them. That’s some of the issues for me 
about how to think of paternalism differently. 

The reason I don’t like the term paternalism is the 
association with familialism — patriarchy, etc. It’s very 
difficult to think of a word that would work in the same way. 
That’s probably part of the conceptual poverty brought about 
by capitalist realism — that we’re forced back onto this word 
that in many ways is unsatisfactory. Recently, I’ve done a 


pamphlet with Jeremy Gilbert, which will be coming out 


2 There we use the term “democratic 


through Compass. 
paternalism”, partly drawing upon Raymond Williams’ work 
in his book — I think it’s 1961 — Communications. Williams’ 
presciently discusses different models of broadcasting. You 


start off with an authoritarian one, move towards a 


paternalistic one, and then that breaks down under pressure 
from things like the commercial model. What Williams wants 
is a democratic model where everyone participates in the 
production of media. I think that we can’t just directly go 
there. We need this kind of democratic paternalism. The goal 
is more participation than production. The paternalistic 
dimension just acknowledges the fact that there are 
asymmetries of kind of power, knowledge, etc. But the 
democratic side says we can’t be satisfied with these 
differences in power, knowledge — we must aim towards 
equalling them out. That’s how I’d like to think about the 
political project — as one of democratic paternalism. 

One of the problems with paternalism in the way it had 
traditionally been set up was that that was an elite body that 
could sit and decide what was good for everybody. There isn’t 
going to be in any desirable system in the future — there isn’t 
going to be one body that will decide for everybody what is 
good for the rest of them. There’s already a plurality of 
different kinds of knowledge bases and skill bases, etc., which 
will mean that that is avoided. 

Part of what’s involved in re-floating this concept of 
paternalism is defending the concept of education, and also 
defending the concept of authority; and differentiating the 
concept of authority from that of authoritarianism. Authority 
based on expertise, knowledge, skills — there’s nothing 
wrong with that, providing it isn’t abused. That needs to be 
abused to be authoritarianism, which is simply power based 
on fear. Part of a democratic political project is not 
eliminating authority, but constituting authority collectively. 
The best way of fighting authoritarianism is not abandoning 


the question of authority — which will always re-assert itself 
in one form or another, if one simply ignores it — but of 
constituting authority in this collective way. I think that 
returns to this challenge I was suggesting right at the start of 
the interview — that we need to now face up to again, which 
is this question of how do we develop an anti-authoritarian 
left. Like I said, the question was posed in some ways in the 
Seventies and the Eighties. Now we have to answer it. 


RC: What’s to stop a paternalistic state from becoming a 
totalitarian one? 


MF: I think I sort of partly answered that by... Totalitarianism 
is authoritarianism — authority simply being asserted on the 
basis of fiat. And I think that would be very different from the 
model of authority — the paternalistic model of authority — 
that I was suggesting. That’s why, I think, you need definite 
democratic paternalism, rather than just paternalism per se. 
I’m not really saying anything that different from how some 
teaching situation would operate, for instance, where one 
can’t simply impose stuff on the students and expect them to 
accept it. You have to negotiate with them, you have to win 
them over, to start from the level they’re at, etc. 


RC: And if you can’t do that, what do you do then? 


MF: If we can’t do that, then we’re in a severe crisis at that 
point. What are the situations where you can’t do that? All 
I’m saying is that an authoritarian solution won’t help. If you 
can’t bring people round in that situation, then there may be 
nothing you can do. But simply returning to some kind of 


authoritarian solution where you just tell them — that would 
only exacerbate the problems, it won’t solve them. I think 
we'd have to bet on the fact that this sort of can be done and 
you can bring people with you. At a point where we’re forcing 
people to do things, things have already gone wrong very 
severely. 

Let me put it another way: I think we’re very far off leftist 
totalitarianism at the moment, and we’re too frightened of it 
as well. In the Sixties, Stalinism was a clear and present 
danger. Leftist totalitarianism was a real threat that people 
were trying to escape from. It simply isn’t now. It’s not that 
one should entirely dismiss those fears, but I think that we’re 
at the stage where we need to establish a new orthodoxy, a 
strong hegemonic presence, and once we’ve done that, then 
we can worry about the dangers of that being taken too far or 
totalitarianism, etc. 

But I just don’t see that as an issue at this time. What’s 
more of an issue is the kind of soft totalitarianism of 
neoliberal dictatorship, isn’t it? I don’t use those terms 
lightly. This situation where people — where there’s a 
rhetoric of choice and no effective political choice, where 
there’s a general kind of helplessness and people feel they’ve 
got no control over their lives — it seems to me that these are 
what we need to fight against. I’ve never been able to force a 
student to do anything anyway. Let’s say there was the full 
resources of the military and prison service available to me, I 
wouldn’t still be able to bend the student, still, in that way. If 
things have gone past the point of negotiation where you 
can’t, as it were, manipulate people in their own interests, 
then that’s a severely extreme situation. 


RC: Another thing you say needs to happen is for the left to 
“not take over the state but [to] subordinate it to the general 
will”. 


MF: Yeah. Neoliberals don’t really have to run the state as 
such themselves. They get their subordinates to do it. The 
state is clearly an important locus of power. We get some 
theories which already write off the state and I think that is a 
mistake. It’s quite clear that neoliberalism could not have 
achieved the hegemony it has without also being able to 
control states. So I think the state remains an important locus 
of power. 

It’s just the idea of taking over the state, in a way, in the 
classic style of the 1917 Bolshevik revolution, etc. — even if 
you could do that, that wouldn’t achieve the overthrow of 
capitalism anyway, partly because capitalism is a global 
phenomenon. It itself is in the position I say — it subordinates 
the state. It doesn’t have to takeover the state directly. Partly 
what I was thinking there is that we want to differentiate 
ourselves from being old style statists. This is again part of 
this neoliberal binary where they’re for a small state, we’re 
for a big state. I think we need to first distinguish the concept 
of the public from the concept of the state. The two aren’t the 
same — the state facilitates public space, but is not the same 
as the public. The public interest is not synonymous with the 
kind of will of the state. Partly the importance of this move is 
to differentiate us from the caricature of the old left. But at 
the same time it’s important not to go down a certain kind of 
anarchist route where you’re denying the importance of the 
state at all. The state quite clearly retains a massive 


significance. 
RC: How do you get the state to serve the people? 


MF: Why does parliamentary politics serve the interest of 
business? Because business is the only effective agent acting 
upon it. The point is: Why is capitalist realism rife in 
parliamentary politics? You can’t explain that in terms of the 
logic of parliamentary politics itself. Parliamentary politics is 
in many ways responding to the situation outside it, such as 
the decline of trade unions, etc. The classic situation of the 
Seventies was where the politicians were caught between 
business on the one hand and trade unions on the other. 
What we need to do is constitute a force outside of parliament 
strong enough that it becomes a dominant influence on 
parliament. 

Again: learn from neoliberalism. It doesn’t control 
parliament because it has its own people directly in there, 
though that might to some extent be true. The point is that 
even if that were true, how is it possible? It’s possible because 
of the constitution of forces inside society, isn’t it? That’s it at 
its basic behaviourist level, I think. Politicians and 
administrators will bow to the strongest force in a certain 
way. Then what we need in the first instance is to create 
conflict in their own minds. At the moment, it’s just all too 
easy to bow down to business, because it’s only powerful 
force acting upon them. There’s a widespread, inchoate 
discontent, for instance, about the banks — and since there’s 
no agent that’s capable of focusing that discontent and 
bringing it to bear on politicians, then they can ignore it — 


they just make a few moralising gestures towards it. To me 
it’s a question of how you constitute those extra 
parliamentary forces, how we produce these new forms of 
solidarity. 


RC: But business has a very fixed set of things it wants, 
whereas the public want a multitude of different things, don’t 
they? 


MF: That’s why I do think we at least need some determinate 
set of demands, at least provisionally, because otherwise 
things just dissipate. Unless we’ve got a set of demands of 
that sort, and some kind of model for a new orthodoxy — 
that’s the thing about the mainstream — a model for what we 
want the mainstream to look like. If we don’t have that, then 
those, as you say, specific determinate demands that business 
has will continue to dominate. 


RC: In the last chapter of Capitalist Realism you also say that 
strikes in public services are self-defeating. Could you explain 
why? 


MF: I think things have changed — the strikes earlier on this 
year, the TUC one and all of that, and the action that’s coming 
up in November. There’s a difference there because it 
approaches them all almost like a general strike. It’s not just 
that teacher’s are out, but the whole of the public sector. I’m 
still suspicious of one-day strikes, of just how effective they 
can be. Unless the discontent and militancy spreads beyond 
that one day — it’s very easy to contain a one-day strike. As 
happened in the FE college where I worked — you get this 


farcical situation where the principle, on a £120,000, would 
come down and hand out coffee to the people picketing, 
because everyone will claim to be on the side of the workers 
— because it doesn’t really cost anything. Rather, it costs us 
stuff — it costs the workers their wages for the day. It doesn’t 
really cause any lasting damage to the institution — that kind 
of action. Certainly they can easily plan for and, indeed, in 
many ways welcome it, because it lowers the wage bill for the 
year. 

I wouldn’t want to make a definitive statement about the 
modern day situation now. But I think we need to think about 
winning hegemonic influence again. Why have nurses got 
more status than teachers? It’s partly that nurses often go on 
strike. It’s not that one should pander to the image of them in 
the media, but at the same time that’s where we’re starting 
from and why we have to struggle against it. Given that the 
media will use all of its weapons to produce what Alex 
Williams calls “negative solidarity” — turning one set of 
workers against another. With a one-day strike with teachers 
— the classic or standard line from the media is, “Well look at 
how the teachers are inconveniencing the rest of the 
workforce, of childcare and all of that.” I think we just have 
to think of the long-term strategic consequences of these 
things. 

I hope that if one-day strikes happen they would work, 
but I just think that too often they haven’t worked. Rather 
than just kind of going over and over these things that have 
failed, keep doing them, is to look at different forms of 
disruption — _ things which actually inconvenience 
management. Like I say, in terms of teaching — why do things 


that inconvenience the students? Or if it’s children: Why 
inconvenience the pupils and the parents? Why not do 
something that only inconveniences management? I think the 
benefit of the kinds of refusal that would be invisible to the 
students, pupils, parents, etc., is that they show the absolute 
uselessness of this kind of bureaucratic work and the 
extraneous nature of managerialism. If one refuses to 
collaborate with certain managerial initiatives, one can 
perfectly well carry on teaching — just cause problems for 
management. I think more imagination about targeting 
disruption on those who you want it to hurt would be good. 


RC: I interviewed Keith Famish several weeks ago about his 
book, Time’s Up! In it, he argues that the only way to prevent 
global ecological collapse and thus ensure the survival of 
humanity is to rid the world of industrial civilisation. Do you 
have any thoughts on this? 


MF: If that is true it’s very depressing. That’s not a reason to 
object to it in itself, I suppose. We need to hold onto a model 
of the future. That’s something I want to retain from 
Marxism, actually — is a kind of technocratic vision of the 
future. It doesn’t mean it has to be one that’s completely 
indifferent to the environment. I suppose that I am one of 
those people he would attack in the sense that what I would 
hope for is that there’s a managed solution to these things 
that would involve technology. As I sort of mention in the 
book about rationing — I don’t see a problem with a rationing 
of resources at some point. But I don’t see that as necessarily 
meaning that we would be immiserated. People are always 


bleating on about the Second World War, how great that was, 
about how great people felt during the time of rationing, and 
sort of how healthy people were as well. I think we’ve seen in 
a sense the results of the opposite of that — that having 
unlimited access to things doesn’t produce well-being or 
happiness. On the contrary, it produces a kind of generalised 
misery I think. I don’t have any problem with an idea of a 
rationing of resource at some point, which I think could be 
part of the solution here. But I do still believe civilisation is 
possible. I think the question is: How are things to be 
managed? Part of what I want to argue for is a defence of the 
concept of management as opposed to managerialism. It 
seems to me that the only solution to environmental 
catastrophe is a managed one or we’re already betting on the 
catastrophe already having happened, or already acting like 
the catastrophe already has happened. I find libidinally 
alienating these visions of a sort of return to organic 
societies, little villages. 


RC: Some might argue that such societies would be less 
alienating than what we have at present because they offer a 
face-to-face social existence. 


MF: I think there are severe problems at a libidinal level, like 
that. There’s a reason that people don’t want face-to-face 
contact. Sometimes there’s a value in face-to-face contact. 
There’s also a value in impersonality. The achievement of an 
urban modernity was the ability not to have to deal with face- 
to-face contact all the time. I really think this is deeply 
dubious line — because I suspect what is behind the claim 


that it has to be like this and that civilisation can’t carry on is 
this kind of death-wish and this desire to take us back to the 
kind of conditions of a Medieval world. 


RC: Those making the claim would probably argue that the 
death-wish is civilisation itself which is heading towards self- 
destruction. 


MF: Fair enough. I can see that — but there’s two deaths here 
I think, neither of which I want. I really want to avoid this 
binary that either we’re going back to something which | 
think people — there’s a drive to escape those conditions that 
you can’t put back in a box. The only way of eliminating the 
desires for impersonality, for homogeneity, for mass 
production — the only way of ending the desires for that is by 
a post-traumatic forgetting I think. Otherwise those desires 
will maintain. 

I think there’s nothing wrong with those desires actually. 
This makes me a Marxist I think, but I believe in mass 
production, of coordination, etc. Marx is somewhat sanguine 
about many of the issues that we wouldn’t be anymore 
because of — there’s this Promethean model of extracting 
resources from the Earth, and this kind of model of practice 
that was about converting the inert mater into something 
useful for us or whatever. I think we are rightly now 
somewhat suspicious of that kind of Promethean drive that’s 
indifferent to the depletion of resources, etc. Okay, so there’s 
a kind of death logic of that Prometheanism, which just uses 
up all the resources. But we don’t want to be forced between 
these two deaths, I think — a death of modernity and a kind 


of return to village life. “The idiocy of rural life” — that’s the 
great phrase from Marx and Engels. The issue for me is how 
to commensurate an environmental agenda with modernity, 
with the desires for mass production, for the homogenous, for 
the generic. I wouldn’t think these things are the only things 
that should go on in culture. But an important element of 
culture which I think is crucial to maintain. 


RC: Won’t mass production end if you end capitalism? Don’t 
the two go hand-in-hand? 


MF: I don’t think we have to see things in that way. What 
interests me is almost the opposite — the way we see 
elements of communism erupting in capitalism, at the point 
of highest capitalist triumph. Like I always say about 
Starbucks — Starbucks shows the desire for communism 
because everything attributed to Starbucks is everything that 
was said about communism — that it is homogenous, it’s 
generic, etc., etc. What do people want from Starbucks? Not 
the coffee — well, I hope not because it’s horrible. They want 
from it something that is familiar, that’s generic — that is a 
form of public space, kind of homogenous public space. We 
can argue that post-capitalism can deliver this better and 
cheaper than Starbucks does. The desire for public space, the 
desire for the homogenous and replicated can be 
synonymous. But all we’ve got at the moment is degraded 
versions of it, such as Starbucks. 

There’s no reason to think that mass production is just a 
feature of capitalism. You know we’ve got robots and stuff. 
This is one of the concrete challenges about how we would 


construct an economy without capitalism. The difference 
between me and my line of and certain kinds of anarchistic 
approaches, I suppose, is that I just agree with Marx, where 
the global triumph of capitalism is the pre-condition for post- 
capitalism. If capitalism is global, then we need also to be 
global or sufficiently global. It’s not like capitalism operates 
by global government, but it has sufficient systems to 
coordinate its activities around the world which minimise the 
effectiveness of anti-capitalist struggle. I think we need 
similar systems of global coordination, and I think that can 
involve resource management so that we most effectively use 
it, so resources are used in the most effective way. I think 
condemning us back into this world of literary dark ages, 
where we’re in tiny villages and we have a limited sense of 
the world around us is a horrific prospect. I still maintain a 
hope of a rationally organised post-capitalist civilisation. 


preoccupying: 
interviewed by the 
occupied times 


(2012)! 


Occupied Times: Paul Mason recently commented that the 
uprisings of 2011-12 have brought the curtain down on 
capitalist realism. Can you briefly outline what you mean by 
the term “capitalist realism”? And do you believe that the 
financial crisis and the subsequent popular fightback have 
signalled a new beginning? 


Mark Fisher:Capitalist realism can be seen as a belief — that 
there’s no alternative to capitalism, that, as Fredric Jameson 
put it, it’s easier to imagine the end of the world than the end 
of capitalism. Other systems might be preferable to 
capitalism, but capitalism is the only one that is realistic. Or it 


can be seen as an attitude of resignation and fatalism in the 
face of this — a sense that all we can do is accommodate 
ourselves to the dominance of capitalism, and limit our hopes 
to contain its worst excesses. Fundamentally, then, it’s a 
pathology of the left, nowhere better exemplified than in the 
case of New Labour. Ultimately, what capitalist realism 
amounts to is the elimination of left-wing politics and the 
naturalisation of neoliberalism. I think it’s too quick to talk 
about the end of capitalist realism, though what we have been 
seeing for the past couple of years is a challenge to this 
naturalisation of neoliberal concepts. In some ways, the 
austerity measures that have been implemented have 
constituted an intensification of capitalist realism. Those 
measures couldn’t have been introduced unless there was still 
a widespread sense that there is no alternative to neoliberal 
capitalism. The various struggles that have blown up since 
the financial crisis show a growing discontent with the panic 
neoliberalism that has been put in place since 2008, but they 
have yet to propose any concrete alternative to the dominant 
economic model. Capitalist realism is about a corrosion of 
social imagination, and in some ways, that remains the 
problem: after thirty years of neoliberal domination, we are 
only just beginning to be able to imagine alternatives to 
capitalism. But at least now we can imagine imagining such 
alternatives. 


OT:What have you made of the global Occupy movement’s 
role as part of the mass mobilisation against the politics and 
economics of austerity and neoliberalism? From what you’ve 
seen can Occupy and other movements mount a sustained 


opposition to the ruling status quo, continuing with the 
global actions planned throughout May? 


MF: The short answer is that this remains to be seen. There’s 
no doubt the Occupy movement has played a major role in 
the shifting of ideological atmosphere that has happened in 
the last year or so. You’re right that the question of 
sustainability is crucial. In Capitalist Realism, I argued that the 
anti-capitalist movement had become background noise to 
capitalist business as usual — something that it was by and 
large easy for capitalism to ignore. The question is, can 
Occupy provide the basis for a sustainable antagonism? The 
broad problem we’re facing here is, how can this antagonism 
be sustained now that the Communist Party has disappeared 
and trade unions have for the most part become quiescent? 
The party and the union structure provided sustainability, 
continuity and institutional memory. Now, it’s not that these 
are the only institutions that could provide such things, or 
that those older institutions would be fit for purpose, even if 
they had survived into the twenty-first century. But a 
genuinely new force that is capable of struggling against 
twenty-first-century capitalism must be able to fulfil those 
functions. I think we also need to recognise the importance of 
building hegemony — and this means stepping outside the 
activist universe. There’s a danger of the activist’s world 
become very self-contained. We need to reach beyond those 
intensely engaged with politics to those who don’t look to 
politics at all to explain the misery of their lives. It’s those 
people who have been most affected by capitalist realism, and 
who could be mobilised against it, if they could be reached. 


OT:What was your reading of the riots last August? The 
epitome of neoliberal materialism or further evidence of a 
system built on greed breaking down? 


MF:I think those involved in the riots were largely exactly the 
kind of people I was just talking about — those for whom 
“politics” means absolutely nothing. I’m not saying that the 
riots weren’t “political”, that they were an inexplicable 
upsurge of criminality, as the right did. The riots were 
political, but in a negative sense — they were a massive 
symptom of a failure of politics, an expression of discontent 
which lacked political goals or strategy. These are the signs of 
a system verging on collapse; people took part because they 
felt radically excluded. The invisible wall that prevents 
people from acting like this had collapsed — there was so 
little on offer that there was almost no incentive not to riot. 
It’s to be hoped that the discontent that exploded so 
powerfully, and, in many cases so tragically, in the riots, can 
be harnessed. Shortly after the riots, I went to a screening of 
the Black Audio Film Collective’s 1986 film Handsworth Songs, 
an essay-film about the 1980s riots. The film’s director, John 
Akomfrah, said that, if these rioters can bring the British 
state to its knees for three days, they will also be able to 
organise themselves. That is my hope. 


OT: In the sections of the book where you cover the culture of 
work, you describe the combination of marketisation and 
maddening bureaucracy as “Market Stalinism”. This evokes 
the excellent US television series The Wire where the police, 
the politicians, the teachers, etc. are all shown to be focused, 


above all else, on “juking the stats”. Can you describe how 
Market Stalinism works and how we can hope to get rid of it? 


MF: I hadn’t actually seen The Wire at the time I wrote 
Capitalist Realism, which is why there’s no mention of it in the 
book. But you're right, The Wire exemplifies so much of what I 
wanted to say in Capitalist Realism. In fact, if you want to know 
what capitalist realism is, watch The Wire! Market Stalinism 
was my term for the kind of bureaucracy which was typical of 
Blairism, but which, as The Wire demonstrates, was by no 
means confined to Blairism, or to Britain. The neoliberal 
claim was that marketisation obviates the need for the state 
and for bureaucracy. But the result of imposing 
“marketisation” on public services is always a crazed 
proliferation of bureaucracy, via target setting, league tables, 
performance reviews, etc. Just as under Stalinism, everything 
becomes geared towards the production of appearance. In 
these conditions, gaming the system is inevitable. How to get 
rid of Market Stalinism? We need to expose one of the biggest 
lies in neoliberalism: the idea that it is an anti-bureaucratic 
force. This will involve a struggle against managerialism, and 
towards a workplace based on the collective autonomy of 
workers. 


OT: You write in Capitalist Realism: “This battery of 
bureaucratic procedures is by no means confined to 
universities, nor to education: other public services, such as 
the NHS and the police, find themselves enmeshed in similar 
bureaucratic metastases.” Now that the police want to strike, 
do you think they should be seen as just another public 


service, or does their role of enforcing the government’s 
agenda mean we shouldn’t oppose cuts to the police force in 
the same way we do the NHS, education or welfare? 


MF: It’s a difficult question, but one that should be answered 
pragmatically and strategically. If we are involved in fighting 
the police — either literally or at some other level — then the 
police are playing their role as ideological enforcers. Which 
isn’t to say, I must emphasise, that we should ignore police 
brutality and corruption. What happened to Alfie Meadows 
and others is appalling, and needs to be exposed. But we have 
to remember that the police aren’t the enemy, they are the 
servants of the enemy, and if all of our energy is taken up 
struggling against them, then they are doing their job for 
their masters very effectively. Ultimately, it must be far 
better if the servants are turned against their masters. 


OT: A lot of what you write in the book comes from your 
experiences of working as a Further Education teacher. 
Where do you believe the Coalition, and New Labour before 
them, are going wrong with their education policies? 


MF:The broader agenda here is the imposition of what I have 
called business ontology: the idea that only outcomes 
recognised by business count. It’s gradually become accepted 
that the principal — if not the only — role of education is to 
turn out the kind of compliant individuals which “business” 
wants. As systems from the private sector are increasingly 
introduced into education, the influence of managerialism 
grows, and the status of the teacher is downgraded. The 
pretext for the battery of bureaucratic and self-surveillance 


techniques that have been implemented by successive 
governments is that they “increase efficiency”, but their 
effect is to spread anxiety and erode the autonomy of the 
teacher. This isn’t an accident: it’s the real aim of these 
measures. Education has been corralled into naturalising and 
intensifying capitalist competition; it’s easy to forget, for 
example, that league tables were only introduced relatively 
recently. League tables produce the kind of Market Stalinist 
distortions I was talking about earlier. Teaching becomes a 
matter of training students for examinations; anything else is 
a luxury. Contrast this with the much-praised education 
system in Finland, which is fully comprehensive, has no 
league tables or inspectorate, and is based on trust in 
teachers. 


OT: A predominant theme of the book is the issue of mental 
illness in capitalist societies. You write, “what is needed now 
is a politicisation of much more common disorders. Indeed, it 
is their very commonness which is the issue: in Britain, 
depression is now the condition that is most treated by the 
NHS.” It seems that with mental illness scarring the lives of so 
many sufferers and their loved ones in the UK, it should be 
towards the top of the political agenda. How can we begin to 
reduce the stigma, isolation and shame that our society still 
attaches to the issue of mental illness? How can we convince 
people that its cause has roots in the collective, not just the 
individual? 


MF: This is a crucial question. The way in which social and 
political problems are converted into individual pathologies, 


to be explained via chemical imbalances or family history, 
neatly sums up so much of what has happened under 
capitalist realism. It’s what I’ve called the privatisation of 
stress. Depression has been described as a pathology of 
responsibility: you feel intensely responsible for the state 
that you’re in. The excruciating paradox is that, while you 
feel that only you can get yourself out of depression, the 
condition consists precisely in your inability to act. There’s 
more than an analogy with the political hopelessness and 
fatalism that have characterised capitalist realism. 
Depression, after all, is a pathology which centrally involves a 
sense of realism (indeed, there’s a phenomenon called 
depressive realism): the depressive thinks that they are being 
realistic, that they have perceived the real state of things, 
denuded of illusion. This describes the post-utopian tenor of 
capitalist realism perfectly: other societies had their illusions, 
their dreams of something beyond capitalism, but we have 
come to terms with the inevitability of competition and 
precariousness. Yet depression shows the extent to which 
people — even during the boom years — could not come to 
terms with this. With precarity increasing and welfare 
programmes eroding, it’s not surprising that there should be 
an increase in depression and anxiety. But this increase in 
distress has been  pathologised, neuroticised and 
commoditised over the past thirty years. Instead of looking to 
unions when our workload becomes unbearable, we’re invited 
to look for a medical solution. Stressed by too many working 
hours? Take this medication, which will restore the balance 
of your brain chemistry. Worried about losing your job? Tell 
me about your mother. This is a major example of the 


naturalisation process I talked of earlier. What we need is a 
denaturalisation (and consequent politicisation) of mental 
illness. I think the formation of a dedicated pressure group 
could work towards this. We need something like a revival of 
the Anti-Psychiatry movement of the Sixties and Seventies. 
Well, not so much a revival as a re-occupation of the terrain 
that Anti-Psychiatry fought on; you could argue that the 
receding of Anti-Psychiatry correlates very closely with the 
rise of capitalist realism. 


OT: With neoliberal economics being so globalised, so 
strongly enforced by powerful entities on a national, 
international and supranational level, does this not make it 
that much harder for any one nation-state to adopt a new 
economic paradigm? Would there not be credit-rating 
downgrades from the “objective” agencies who missed the 
Enron and sub-prime scandals, a hysterical frenzy among the 
corporate media, veiled threats from the IMF and OECD and, 
quite possibly, stampeding capital flight? Couldn’t there even, 
depending on the extent of the country’s departure from the 
consensus, be hostility from the other neoliberal countries? 


MF:Of course, that would happen, and this kind of threat 
plays a large part in the current mode of capitalist realism. In 
fact, this is pretty much a statement of what capitalist realism 
is at this time. But it presupposes that capital is the most 
powerful force on earth, and it’s this presupposition which 
needs to be undermined. How? By constituting a counter- 
force capable of disciplining capital. We’ve become used to a 
world in which workers fear capital, never the reverse. 


Capitalist realism has never been about direct ideological 
persuasion — it’s not that the population of the UK were ever 
convinced of the merits of neoliberal ideas. But what people 
have been convinced of is the idea that neoliberalism is the 
dominant force in the world, and that, consequently, there is 
little point resisting it. (I’m not suggesting that most people 
recognise neoliberalism by name, but they do recognise the 
policies and the ideological narrative which neoliberalism has 
so successfully disseminated.) This perception has arisen 
because capital has subdued the forces acting against it — 
most obviously, it has crushed unions, or forced them into 
being consumer/service institutions within capitalism. But 
you're right — the situation has changed since the heyday of 
social democracy, and one of the principal ways in which it 
has changed is the globalisation of capital. Indeed, this is one 
way that unions were outmanoeuvred: if your members won’t 
work for these rates, we'll go to a place where workers will. One of 
the strengths of Occupy is that it is a transnational 
movement. But the challenge for Occupy is whether it can 
constitute a force capable of inducing fear into capital. My 
suspicion is that it won’t be able to do that on its own, and 
that it will need other institutions and groups — probably 
including unions — if it is to succeed in being a counter-force 
to capital. Capital isn’t actually global, but it is sufficiently 
global, and therefore any effective opposition to it needs to 
be sufficiently global also. The concrete question — somewhat 
obfuscated by many of the debates about centralisation 
versus networks — concerns coordination. How are disparate 
groups to be coordinated? We can we learn lessons from 
neoliberalism here: its success was based on building a 


patchwork of heterogeneous groups, often with different, 
even conflicting agendas. 


OT: The book ends very optimistically, saying that there is a 
sense that anything was possible again. That was two or three 
years ago now. Still optimistic? More or less than before? 


MF: Well, I think that the optimism has somewhat been borne 
out by what’s happened since I wrote the book. As I said, I 
think it’s going too far to say that capitalist realism is over, 
but the fact that Paul Mason could make such a claim shows 
how much has changed over the past couple of years. Just 
before the student militancy blew up in the UK at the end of 
2010, I spoke at a conference, making the — in retrospect — 
mild claim that there would be shows of public anger against 
austerity, and I was accused of “revolutionary nostalgia”. The 
point is, that it was my accuser that seemed to have the most 
(hah!) realistic handle on things then. But surely there’s not 
anyone now who thinks that public discontent in the UK is at 
an end. Things have got better and worse since 2009: worse, 
in that panic neoliberalism has further attacked the welfare 
state, NHS, education, etc.; better in that opposition is 
coalescing, and the ideological climate has shifted. 


OT: You’ve written a lot about how popular culture has 
reinforced capitalist realism. You show how commercial pop 
and hip-hop music and films like Children of Men and Wall-E, 
even when purporting to critique authority and the system, 
in fact leave only a message of its inevitable perpetuation. Do 
you feel that there is much in the way of popular culture that 
does successfully subvert capitalist realism? What subversive 


music, films and books can you recommend to OT readers? 


MF: I’m not saying that there are no political potentials at all 
in the popular culture I discuss in Capitalist Realism. What I 
was pointing to, though, was the fact that anti-capitalism at 
the level of a film’s message does nothing in itself to disrupt 
the super-hegemony of capital. Anti-capitalism — or at least 
anti-corporatism — is utterly standard within Hollywood 
films: consider something like Avatar, for instance. This is the 
objective irony of capital: nothing sells better than anti- 
capitalism. Or, even more bleakly, late capitalism’s culture is 
anti-capitalist. There is an asymmetry: we struggle against 
capital, but part of capital’s defeat of us is that it can sell our 
books. This isn’t a completely closed circle, though. The issue 
is how culture connects up with struggles, and you can’t 
second guess that. It’s possible that any of the films I talked 
about could contribute to the development of class 
consciousness or inspire people to engage in struggles. 
Conversely, it’s possible that even those films or television 
programs which inventory the features of capitalist realism 
end up reinforcing it. Take something like The Wire: yes, it 
exemplifies practically everything I say about capitalist 
realism, but, for that very reason, you could say that it 
supports, rather than subverts, capitalist realism. You could 
very easily take away the message that struggling to change 
things is pointless; the system wins in the end. But one film I 
would recommend to people, if they haven’t seen it, is Mike 
Judge’s Office Space, which I briefly discuss in Capitalist Realism: 
I’ve seen no film which better captures the bureaucratic 
immiseration of late-capitalist managerialism labour. 


we need a post- 
capitalist vision: 
interviewed by 
anticapitalist 


initiative (2012)! 


AntiCapitalist Initiative: Paul Mason recently argued that in 
light of the Arab revolutions, capitalist realism has come to 


an end.” Do you agree? 


Mark Fisher: I think that is going too far. I understand why 
Paul made that claim, but capitalist realism is very tenacious. 
Certainly, things look very different to how they did a few 
years ago during the high pomp of capitalist realism — when 
it was thought that the age of revolutions was in the past, 


that no great change will ever happen again, that every part 
of the world will eventually end up capitalist. 

These ideas — basically, the theses of Francis Fukuyama’s 
The End of History and the Last Man — were widely accepted at 
an unconscious if not a conscious level, even by those 
opposed to capitalism. It’s that acceptance of capitalist 
dominance, or rather the unthinkablility of any break from 
that dominance, which constitutes what I’ve called capitalist 
realism. But with what has happened in the Arab world, the 
hope for radical, systemic change has been re-ignited. It’s 
part of a shift in ideological atmosphere that we have seen 
manifested this week in the French and the Greek elections, 
with their votes against austerity. 

Austerity, after all, is the deflated yet intransigent form 
that capitalist realism has assumed since the bank crises. 
Before the bank crises, capitalist realism managed to look as 
if it were a post-political condition — not a particular 
ideological constellation, just the way things were. It’s no 
longer able to sustain that post-political mask. But if 
capitalist realism were actually finished, then there wouldn’t 
be any austerity at all; it’s only because people continue to 
accept that there is no alternative, not only to capitalism, but 
to neoliberal capitalism, that the swinging cuts that have 
been imposed in the name of austerity have gone through. As 
it is, in Europe, we are only seeing the beginnings of a 
challenge to austerity. These challenges are by no means 
insignificant, but it’s not yet the end of capitalist realism. 

But there’s another way in which capitalist realism 
persists. Capitalist realism can also be a seen as the inability 
to imagine an alternative to capitalism, and I don’t think 


we’re close to overcoming this yet. Not surprisingly, after 
thirty years of capitalist realism, our capacity to even 
conceive of alternatives to capitalism has atrophied. 
Opposition to neoliberalism is growing, but this new anti- 
capitalist mood has yet to bring forth any powerful vision of 
post-capitalism. Certain tendencies in anti-capitalism are, in 
effect, inversions of capitalist realism — they accept that 
capital controls technological modernity, and offer only 
withdrawal and retreat as an alternative. 


AI: How can the left organise itself today to maximise its 
impact? 


MF: The most important problem the left now faces seems to 
me to be coordination. There are any number of groups 
hostile to capitalism, but the task is to bring them together to 
form a sustainable antagonism. We need to forge greater links 
between those already engaged in struggle — the unions, 
Occupy, the student movement, the various anti-cuts groups 
— and also to reach out to those who aren’t yet politicised. 
The way that the opposition between centralisation and 
decentralisation has dominated discourse on the left recently 
has distracted us from the fact that coordination does not 
entail Stalinist centralisation. Systems can be coordinated 
and decentralised at the same time. After all, that’s how 
capitalism operates! 

A key question is institutional memory; a system that has 
no memory cannot learn and will keep repeating the same 
mistakes. What’s crucial is that we give up any nostalgia for 
previous eras. Leftist politics has been weakened by its 


attachment to superseded forms of economic and political 
organisation. There’s a strange romance of glorious failure 
which we have to give up. 

A major part of grasping the potentials of the present is 
reaching out to precarious workers. We need to think 
creatively about how they can be politicised and organised. 


AI: Do you think that the autonomist critique of classical 
Marxism has any relevance in helping us understand the 
modern world? 


MF: Yes, I do. The autonomist critique of authoritarianism 
and Stalinist bureaucracy is something that we shouldn’t 
forget. Any credible leftist politics now has to take the 
problem of anti-authoritarianism very seriously. At the same 
time, however, we have to recognise that the situation is very 
different from the context in which autonomist ideas first 
emerged in the 1960s and 1970s. Then, the Communist Party 
and the trade unions were very powerful; Stalinism was still 
an oppressive presence. 

None of these things are true today. Whatever the merits 
of autonomism anti-statism, it has to be acknowledged that 
anti-statism is now hegemonic. There’s a congruence between 
the language of neo-anarchism and David Cameron’s Big 
Society, which is not to say that the discourses are identical. 
But one problem with anti-statism — particularly when 
coupled with localism, as it often is — is that it makes any 
defence of institutions like the NHS very difficult. The drive 
of the original autonomists was to escape existing 
institutions, whereas I think our aim today should be to 


produce new institutions. 


AI: Today people talk about “zombie capitalism”?: an undead 
system which people can’t see beyond. Does this chime with 


Owen Hatherley’s Militant Modernism* argument about the 
way the left has to challenge the dominance of neoliberalist 
capitalism as the only modernising force on the planet? 


MF: Yes. Neoliberalism is now undead: it was massively 
discredited after the bank crises, but that hasn’t stopped it 
continuing in zombie form. The default settings of most of 
our institutions remain neoliberal, and will do so until they 
are reset. In claiming there was “no alternative” to 
neoliberalism, the neoliberals were staking a claim that they 
were the only modernisers. Resistance to neoliberalism was a 
resistance to modernisation. 

Neoliberal ideologues have successfully imposed an 
equation between neoliberalisation and modernisation; this 
has been central to capitalist realism. Look at the way that 
something like the Royal Mail disputes are reported in the 
mainstream media: the workers are always said to be 
struggling against “modernisation”, when really they are 
opposed to privatisation. 

At the same time, it’s clear that neoliberalism has in many 
ways arrested modernity. That’s part of the point of Militant 
Modernism: the rise of neoliberalism has seen a turn to 
“postmodern” cultural and political forms, a formal nostalgia 
that is manifested in the refurbishing of familiar modes. It’s 
not for nothing that Fredric Jameson calls postmodernism, 
with its culture of retrospection and pastiche, “the cultural 


logic of late capitalism”. Neoliberalism claims to be the only 
modernising force, but it’s increasingly clear that it is 
incapable of delivering modernity. The current crisis is a 
massive opportunity for the left to reclaim modernity for 
itself. 


“we have to invent 
the future”: an 
unseen interview 
with mark fisher 


(2012)! 


Mark Fisher: Do you drive? 
Sam Berkson: No 


MF: I don’t drive either and I can strongly relate to many of 
the poems [in Life In Transit], having spent so much time on 
public transport. There was something that Mrs Thatcher 
said: “If you are a man over thirty on public transport, you’ve 
failed”. I think that’s really telling actually. The men I know 
don’t drive but often women do — I think with women, it 


might be safety that makes them want to drive. I always find 
it a waste of time being in a car. Whereas on a train you can 
read, write, do something else, and you can listen. But almost 
nobody listens to each other anymore because of the amount 
of headphones, etc. I think what comes out strongly from 
your poems is it is public transport in name only — because 1) 
it isn’t owned publicly, as all these hideous private operators, 
and 2) the space isn’t actually public, as you draw out in a lot 
of the poems, people are engaged much more in their own 
private conversations on mobile phones. To a ridiculously 
embarrassing and excruciating extent sometimes. 


SB: Usually only a few people are listening. It’s ironically 
public because everyone is so much in their own private 
world, what they’re doing is bringing a much more private 
world into the public sphere. Everybody, right- or left-wing, 
doesn’t like the idea of people listening into their private 
conversations. And yet we are at a time when our 
conversations are the most listened into because all the 
creeping technology. And also we’re complicit with things 
like Facebook, we’re quite happy to blurt out what we’re 
doing all the time. 


MF: I think there is a double thing going on — increasingly 
people are concerned about Facebook and its erosion of 
privacy or whatever. I think there is an _ interesting 
doublethink coming out here. In one sense people are talking 
on mobile phones, assuming that people aren’t listening to 
them but sort of knowing at some level that at least one 
person will be. And then there is that Facebook phenomenon 


when you put stuff on there, hoping that people will actually 
look at it — desperately sharing it, looking for an audience 
that you may or may not get. And then neurotically checking 
how many likes or comments you get. 


SB: It is not caring about the audience that is there but 
desperately needing more and more of an audience. 


MF: I think celebrity is important on lots of levels to do with... 
It’s faux intimacy isn’t it? There is a generalisation of the 
female-targeted gossip magazines, the general form of 
culture, TV etc., it is this phenomenon of referring to people 
by their first names, like you get on the cover of these things 
as if you know them. 


Tim Burrows: People reading mags on the train, talking 
about dieting. 


MF: It is bio-control and the model for that is the women’s 
magazine. It is about reducing a certain anxiety. It is not 
about saying you must do this one thing. It is about on one 
page Geri Halliwell is happy with her curves. The next month 
she is feeling much better because she has lost weight. You 
get these double binds being issued all the time by these 
magazines. The function of which is to destabilise and keep 
people in a state of anxiety and also add on solutions to every 
problem which is always that a consumer object will resolve 
this for you. Dieting is bio-power, a form of body control. 
What we have got with this digital culture now is this weird 
thing of hyperordinariness. You have got people who are 
done up to the nines but it isn’t like David Bowie where you 


are playing with some abstract aestheticisation. We have got 
people who have this uber ordinariness — it is a normative 
model: perfect teeth, right skin tone. An utterly conservative 
artificiality. 


SB: You hear people say symmetry is the ideal human beauty, 
and I like to think that symmetry is probably something that 
looks OK. But to deny that there is some sort of beauty in the 
eye of the beholder, that there is something original and 
unique about things and that we each find different things 
beautiful is bringing things back to the power of something 
very conservative, as a way of conforming towards being 
beautiful — and of course it is not normal at all, it’s a really 
freaky look. 


MF: It’s a wash-back from digital, a lot of people are 
photoshopping themselves. The normalisation of cosmetic 
surgery, Botox, etc., is part of this bio-power regime and this 
constant anxiety about appearances, etc. Cosmetic surgery is 
not good — it’s not good! People are concerned about their 
appearance, but they are measuring by the standards of this 
depressing normativity. Neuroses is highly productive, and 
very useful for capitalism. What’s better than inherent 
dissatisfaction? Inherent dissatisfaction can be sold to 
endlessly. That’s why that women’s magazine model is so 
useful for consumer capitalism. 


SB: You see that on the tube — there is an advert at the 
moment about wishing your friends were more beautiful, I 
think it is an advert for a camera — that idea that you want to 
be displayed as beautiful by the fact that you hang around 


with beautiful people. 


TB: That has always been the paradox of the tube — it is 
where you will find the most professional people in London at 
a certain time, but it seems like the least airbrushed place you 
could be. You are up against someone’s face, see every 
imperfection. 


SB: Yeah the lighting’s terrible isn’t it! The light on the tube 
is deliberately meant to be uncomfortable because people are 
less likely to fight each other if they are uncomfortable and 
exposed. If I were designing the tube and I wanted to make it 
comfortable, I wouldn’t do it like I do it. Take things like the 
pubs — they worked out that pubs put people off if you can’t 
see inside. The whole idea of a dark little nook so you come in 
to hide away in a corner; what you really want is big glass- 
fronted windows. People can come in and feel comfortable 
and safe. 


MF: That isn’t a pub to me, that’s a bar. 


SB: It just feels uncomfortable because it feels like you are 
being watched. It’s the panopticon, isn’t it. 


MF: It is second-phase Foucault, a sort of auto-panopticon. I 
remember someone said during the time Big Brother was still 
worth thinking about that the difference between Big Brother 
and Foucault’s panopticon was in Foucault’s panopticon you 
didn’t know whether you are being watched or not, whereas 
contestants on Big Brother know for sure they are. There is 
now this phase with Facebook of the auto-panopticon, as we 


said earlier, where people make themselves the object of 
surveillance and survey themselves in this weird way. 


SB: We can fight back. And we have also got this other 
problem on tubes and buses — there are so many adverts 
around. 


MF: Semiotic pollution as I call it. 


SB: Yeah. And what is the sensible response to that? It is to 
put earphones on — it is to not look at your surroundings, 
just essentially to shut your senses off to your surroundings. 
This is a terrible position for people to be in. I would argue 
that it is actually worse to be unaware of your surroundings. 
Everyone’s advice is to be in the present, look around you, 
experience things, etc. But if you are going to do that all you 
are going to see are adverts and messages and hear all these 
announcements. 


MF: It’s quite stunning. If you go to Europe, I noticed this in 
Sweden, Stockholm, there were no adverts. I thought, 
“What’s going on?” Even in the New York subway doesn’t 
have many. There is something about the massive cyber-blitz 
of adverts in London. It is not that people tune out of public 
space — there is no public space for them to be in anyway. It 
is either a case of a certain kind of immersion or in this 
babble — the babble of competing mobile phone voices, or the 
babble of capital, shouting at you to buy something. 


SB: You can bury yourself in your own personal sand — you 
can shut yourself off. This seems to be a lot of people’s way of 


travelling is to literally disconnect from the world around 
them, and in some ways it makes sense — but at the same 
time you are disconnected from the world around you. 


MF: I think certain kinds of disconnection are needed now. 
Unplugging from certain kinds of networks. I was speaking to 
my students about trying to unplug — we are in a new phase 
of human life I think. In the Seventies, boredom was a big 
problem. Boredom was an existential void, boredom could 
then be thrown back at the entertainment industry and 
mainstream culture and it was also a challenge to ourselves: 
why are we allowing ourselves to be bored? Given that we are 
finite animals and we are gonna die, it was a moral scandal of 
insane proportions that we can ever be bored. But now 
boredom is a luxury we don’t have any more, because of our 
smartphones, even when you are standing in a bus queue or 
waiting for a train, you’ve got this constant low-level 
stimulus. Boredom and fascination are mixed in together 
now, to go back to those celebrity magazines. And a better 
example of this is those free papers in London which have 
thankfully disappeared — thelondonpaper, one word, and the 
totally aptly named London Lite. The Evening Standard and 
Metro are great journalism compared. Those papers were an 
utterly terrifying prospect when they appeared. Talk about 
semiotic pollution, and also just the way they literally clogged 
up the streets and you’ve got really poor immigrants 
responsible for irritating people, to stand in the way of 
commuters and push these things into their hands. But then 
the total compliance of readers, because they operated on a 
tired exhaustion. You’d look down the carriage, every single 


person will be reading those papers. You could feel the 
intellectual and cultural level just sink. Commuting time is 
probably the time when many people are paying the most 
attention to culture. It’s not that I was immune to this — 
you'd see the headline on it, about some celebrity you half 
know and are not even interested in, yet you'd still want to 
know. It was this form of curiosity where you are not even 
interested in it. So you’d read the whole of this paper, not 
even interested in it, but at the same time it had drawn me in. 
This is what I mean about boredom and fascination. I imagine 
many people like myself have had serious books in their bag 
that they would have read if these papers weren’t there. It 
tells you a lot about the way capital takes advantage of the 
worst instincts and exhaustion. 


TB: Which is kind of why Boris Johnson is so popular. He is 
the hero of the [freesheet magazine] Shortlist generation. 


MF: I think the thing with Boris is a bit like Franco Berardi 
said about Berlusconi — the person who mocks the place of 
power while occupying it. That’s also Boris isn’t it. Somebody 
who is weirdly popular around young people in a depressing 
way, because he doesn’t take politics seriously or doesn’t 
seem to. Of course, what he does take extremely seriously is 
that of advancing his own position and own class. This form 
of faux bonhomie and cynical dismissal is an extremely 
dangerous problem by which class power naturalises itself. I 
think Cameron has a version of that, not that he is as popular, 
but he is pretty good at coming across as a friendly sort of 
fellow you can talk to. My sense of the Cameron government 


is a total smash and grab. They know they are not going to get 
in again, but they also know if they change the defaults on 
certain things then no Labour government in the immediate 
future without massive change at the top at the culture of the 
Labour Party is not going to have the capacity of change it 
back. 


SB: I read this recently, I don’t know if it was a quote but 
Thatcher was asked what her greatest achievement was and 
she said New Labour. 


MF: I don’t know if it is a quote but it is certainly true. I 
joined the Labour party. I have never joined a political party 
before but you have to have the same ambition that New 
Labour had and think five years ahead. If a few of us went in 
with a strong agenda you could drive it in a certain direction. 


SB: I thought that and joined the Green Party. 


MF: Fair enough. I don’t want to concede any territory. I 
don’t want to put all my eggs in that basket. There was no 
point joining the Labour Party during the Nineties. They were 
set on one direction, towards New Labour, neoliberalisation, 
there was no way it was going in any other place, whereas 
now I don’t know where it’s going. It might carry on with this 
desperately banal soft neoliberalism or it may become 
something else in the end. 

Two years ago UEL was totally festooned with lots of 
revolutionary banners, all of that — it was the time of the 
student cuts, it was an incredible effervescence of 
militantism, which seemed to come out of nowhere. Now 


when you go to UEL and you walk down the central corridor 
where all the banners were hanging off is Costa and Starbucks 
and the biggest sign you can see is an office with Credit 
Control on the side. There is a parable of what happens to 
every public space there. The public space that was asserted 
failed so now we are back into these corporate monoliths and 
Credit Control in big letters right in the centre of the 
corridor. 


TB: There are Costa Coffees in every NHS Hospital waiting 
room these days. 


MF: My wife’s from Gravesend and in a hospital near 
Dartford, McDonald’s bid for the franchise of the restaurant. 
It is such a Philip K. Dick world to me where you can have 
shops in hospitals. I don’t intrinsically object to change — I 
just object to the fact that everybody’s change is shit. The 
thing about capitalism is that it provides things that nobody 
likes. When people talk about choice and capitalism — 
Microsoft, that sums up everything. Nobody wants it, 
everybody has to have it. It is the same with chains. Who is a 
big fan of them? Almost nobody, but we all have to go in 
them. 


SB: People used to complain about British Rail being late all 
the time because we thought we had more ownership over it. 
Now we accept the fact that of course they are going to 
charge too much, because they can, and of course it is going 
to be crap, because we haven’t got any other choice. Before 
we felt it was closer to us. 


MF: There was a case for modernisation of those publicly 
owned industries — they were run at a massive inefficiency, 
but that was just a pretext of privatisation. They should have 
been improved while being publicly owned. It costs a lot more 
now it is privatised. It is some kind of ridiculous fee, how 
much more the tube costs the public purse since it was part 
privatised. It is a destruction of ethos with the workers 
themselves — the same with hospitals, why aren’t they 
cleaned properly? Because you bring in private contractors 
whose only incentive is to deliver it as cheaply as possible, to 
pay their cleaners as cheaply as possible. If you don’t have 
that public service ethos then everything of course will 
become shoddier. It’s glossy shoddiness, isn’t it. That is the 
reality. 


SB: Again and again you come up with the same paradox. It is 
almost exactly the opposite to the thing it says. You’ve got 
more choice; you’ve got no choice. It’s shinier, it’s better; it’s 
worse. It’s cheaper; it’s more expensive. I think realistically 
we are not going to go back to nationalisation — it may not be 
a good idea. 


MF: The one poem that really pulled me in was that early one 
about people not having a ticket. So powerful on so many 
levels I think. The class dynamic of it. Having been in lots of 
those positions — either sitting there [watching], or being the 
person who hasn’t got a ticket... 


TB: It reminded me of George Osborne being caught out in 
first class without a first-class ticket. He said he didn’t want 
to waste taxpayers’ money on a first-class ticket. 


MF: Nice! You’ve got to respect the improvisational verve of 
that ludicrous excuse. Nothing sums up capitalism more than 
that, the fact that first class persists. The other day I went to 
Liverpool and it seemed like I was walking endlessly to get 
past first class. And of course, no one is in first class. Is it even 
economic to run, or does it have to be there because the class 
system demands it? 


SB: That is the attraction of first class, there is no one in it. 
The whole idea of competition in train travel was completely 
flawed — it is not like you can go on the other line on the 
other train that leaves at exactly the same time — there isn’t 
one. 


MF: The one thing I think that most people would 
unequivocally nationalise overnight is the railways. 


SB: It is expensive for the government to run, because they 
are just giving loads of public money to private companies 
who then charge loads of money. It hasn’t liberated things, it 
hasn’t given us freedom. I want to renationalise public space 
— not necessarily for the state. 


MF: I think we have got to distinguish public space from the 
state. The state is legitimate, I would argue, insofar as it 
facilitates public space, but the public must be thought of as 
separate from the state. The state might be a precondition for 
the public, but it isn’t the same. People want public space, 
which is why Starbucks is popular because it offers a generic 
sociality. It is a form of anonymous, generic kind of space, 
and even things like the X Factor, why people like it is because 


people are publicly, collectively, communing in something. So 
it shows that even in these conditions, where ideologically 
everything is opposed to the public, there is still a desire for 
the public and all we are getting is degraded forms. What 
communism would offer is you can have these generic spaces 
where people can come in but you don’t have to pay for shit 
coffee. That’s the kind of public space we need in the future 
really, where people can get together but don’t have the 
parasitic add-ons of capital really. 


SB: I think this whole thing about the means not the ends, 
just saying this is the step that I like. I'll go this way because I 
like this way. I find it hard to imagine what my ideal future is 
like but I just think: What things work? And let’s do more of 
those things that work. 


MF: I think it is an imaginative task now is for us to think, 
what is the future of the public? If we can accept that the 
neoliberal story that the public is over — that story is now 
over. If the public isn’t going to be just old-style nationalised 
state industries, state centralization, all of that, what is it 
going to be like in the future? We don’t know, we have to 
invent it. 


hauntology, 
nostalgia and lost 
futures: interviewed 
by valerio mannucci 
and valerio mattioli 


for nero (2014)! 


NERO: Let’s start from your last book, Ghosts of My Life... 


Mark Fisher: Well, the overall theme of the book is the 
disappearance of the future, at least in culture. For me, the 
failure of the twenty-first century is that the twenty-first 
century has yet to really start — so, in a way, it’s a 


disappearance of both the present and the future. This is 
something that is quite evident in music. In Ghosts of My Life I 
mainly collected a number of pieces that have already 
appeared in a variety of different places, together with some 
specific articles written especially for the book; it’s an 
augmented collection, you can say. I wrote a number of pieces 
concerning hauntology, which is a term originally conceived 
by Jacques Derrida that started to regain currency in 2006: I 
picked up on and used it in relation to a number of different 
musicians such as Ariel Pink, Jessica Rylan, the Focus Group 
and the whole Ghost Box label... So, in Ghosts of My Life I tried 
to explicate how this concept had been gaining a new 
currency, especially in relation to music. 


N: Talking about hauntology, there’s one excerpt in your 
book that sounds like a recap of this kind of aesthetic, even if 
it’s not about music: that is, when you describe the typical 
atmosphere of a British TV show from the Seventies. Now, 
musicians such as the ones from Ghost Box heavily rely on 
this kind of memory — you know, of BBC educational 
programs, TV series from the Sixties and Seventies and so on. 
And they often spread a sort of melancholic feeling, which is 
quite different from the simple nostalgia of the past... 


MF: Melancholia is one of the great threads running through 
my book. I think that what happened after the Seventies — 
and particularly during the Eighties, when the occupying 
forces of neoliberalism arose — was this sense that things 
were shifting. But probably the extent to which they would 
have shifted was not that clear at the time — at least not to 


me. I guess this is partly about the age that I am, and the 
expectations that I’ve formed, being born at the end of the 
Sixties, into a culture that was vibrant and experimental. It 
was something you could describe as an “informal education 
system”. I didn’t like school too much myself, but I didn’t 
need to like it because the source of education could come 
from elsewhere. Music culture was a big part of that: it was in 
music press — like NME and so on — that I first encountered 
the work of continental theorists like Derrida and 
Baudrillard. It’s this kind of wide and interconnected network 
that I call “popular modernism”, a kind of infrastructure for 
disseminating and distributing experimental theory and 
culture. At the time it was just right, you just expected things 
to be like that, there was nothing special about it. But during 
the Eighties, this network slowly disappeared. At first, I 
thought it was just a temporary blip and that it would have all 
come back. But I was wrong: it was an irreversible shift. So 
you see, things that are taken for granted just disappear. And 
this brings us to a melancholia, a hauntological melancholia. 


N: This is interesting, because if we take the classic idea of 
melancholia — as proposed, for example, by iconologists and 
so on — we can describe it as the painful consciousness of our 
limits in contrast to our desires. How does this “hauntological 
melancholia” differ from that? 


MF: First of all, let me tell you that I try to distinguish this 
kind of melancholia from standard depression, which is 
another important issue to me. Because you know, standard 
depression is fairly spread: it’s not very acknowledged, at 


least not as a political and cultural problem; instead, it’s 
treated as a chemical problem, or as the result of people’s 
family history. In other words, it’s highly privatised. I think 
depression is manifesting itself in terms of low self- 
expectations. Depressive people don’t expect much from life. 
Things are getting worse and they are changing only to stay 
the same in a more intense form — and that’s what capitalism 
is. So you have this kind of sadness or depression that is 
basically a consequence of adjusting to such things. But the 
melancholia I’m describing is a completely different thing. 
That’s why I’m opposing it to depression: it’s a much more 
conscious articulation, an aestheticised process. I would 
actually say that if depression is taken for a granted state, as 
a form of adjustment to what is now taken for reality, then 
melancholia is the refusal — or even the inability — to adjust 
to it. It’s holding on to an object that should officially be lost. 
So instead of saying, “Well, Public Service Broadcasting was 
like that, but now things have changed”, you simply refuse to 
accept the loss of the object. 


N: And why is that “hauntological’? 


MF: Let’s put it this way: it’s easy to say, “Oh, things were 
great in the Seventies, let’s go back to the Seventies”, but I 
think the real issue is “What kind of future did we expect 
from the Seventies?” I mean, there was a trajectory, and this 
trajectory was interrupted. And now we find ourselves 
haunted by this future that we vaguely expected at the time, 
and that was terminated somewhere during the Eighties by 
the values related to neoliberalism. From this point of view, 


it’s no coincidence that the Eighties saw a traumatic and 
violent defeat of the left, at least in the UK. 


N: You’re introducing another major theme of hauntology: 
the so called “nostalgia of the future”... 


MF: I think that the concept of “nostalgia of the future” 
partly illustrates one of the paradoxes that I’m trying to get 
across through the book; for example, hauntological music is 
often accused of being nostalgic. To a certain extent this is 
true, but the point is: “nostalgic compared to what?” I mean, 
the whole twenty-first-century music scene could be 
described as nostalgic: where is the sense of the future now? 
Today, if you ask people what is “futuristic music”, they 
would reply electronic music from the Nineties, or even 
Kraftwerk, and stuff like that. In a way, we still rely on an old 
future. 


N: What do you think of recent phenomena such as 
vaporwave and the “pop art of the virtual plaza”? According 
to music critic Adam Harper, artists such as James Ferraro or 
Fatima Al Qadiri are at least trying to reconsider the concept 
of future in music, taking inspiration from virtual 
technologies and the whole late-capitalism imagery... 


MF: I actually think that vaporwave still relies on a 
twentieth-century vision of the future. The sound texture and 
even the imagery is derived from Nineties corporate sources. 
The fact that vaporwave has been perceived as an example of 
“futuristic music” shows a kind of diminished expectations: 
can we really compare that to, let’s say, Kraftwerk? Or to 


jungle music? Or to BBC Radiophonic Workshop? All of these 
things clearly delivered a sense of future-shock, like “Where 
does this thing come from?” After listening to such artists, 
people had to reconstruct the whole sense of the music that 
was around them. Unfortunately, I just don’t think there’s 
anything like that in relation to vaporwave... 


N: But it’s nonetheless interesting how these artists relate to 
a typical twenty-first-century imagery. To quote the Wire’s 
review of Fatima Al Qadiri’s album, this music “imagines a 
world of frantically animate matter with no life outside of the 
iPad.” You can’t deny that such a description sounds like a 
mirror of our time. 


MF: I think Fatima Al Qadiri mirrors this time by also not 
having a specific relationship with our time, at least in a way 
previous music did. Don’t get me wrong, I sincerely think this 
music deserves attention: it was very interesting when I was 
in Berlin at the CTM Festival and somebody played some 
vaporwave stuff over big speakers, and you could just hear 
that it wasn’t meant to be heard that way. You know, the 
compression, the sounds... it really seemed music made for 
smartphones and tablets. 


N: The relation between music and smart technology also 
resembles what happened with the visual aspects of our 
everyday lives: the idea of “image” can no longer be 
completely detached from the devices on which it is 
displayed... 


MF: Indeed, smartphones and tablets are increasingly 


becoming — if not exclusively — the image of what the 
present is; of the extent to which communication technology 
has completely colonised our sense of what technology is. 
This is another symptomatic phenomenon of the twenty-first 
century. Now, think about it: how much did we really care 
about communication devices in the twentieth century? We 
cared a lot about music technology because we could hear 
that... But phone calls and stuff like that: who really cared? 


N: These communication technologies are also affecting our 
idea of representation. Let’s make an example: the concept of 
realism in presentday horror movies is often based on the 
idea of “digital footage” (i.e. amateur footage that depicts 
supernatural events, etc.) In a few words: it is “real” what 
could be captured through an amateur camera. All that 
considered, how much do you think these technologies are 
influencing our understanding of reality and our relation 
with imagination? 


MF: It looks as though, for example, we forgot the grand 
visions that science-fiction once had about technology: I 
mean, we used to talk about terraforming, transforming 
planets, altering solar systems! And from terraforming now 
we are discussing how to improve our access to the internet. 
That’s a kind of reduction in itself, I think. Anyway, speaking 
schematically and overgeneralising, I think that there’s far 
too much emphasis on online digitality. It has totally 
colonised our sense of what the present and the future are, 
and I think the actual phenomenological reality is engaging 
with what I prefer to call “capitalist cyberspace”. So I’d rather 


not talk about technology as such, but more about the way 
technology operates within our economic system. For 
example, I think one of the key elements of digital technology 
is this sense of being slightly late all the time. Let’s think 
about social media like Twitter: you’re in a perennial state of 
reactivity, by the very fact you’re there, you’re always late, 
and therefore you’re always in a state of slight and intense 
anxiety. I think we kind of normalised this as part of our 
nervous system, where even if something is perceived as 
instantaneous, it isn’t quite. And this is part of a general 
sense of lack, of things lagging behind, which is a feature of 
the digital as such. Capitalist cyberspace demands a constant 
dispersion of attention, you’re always solicited to respond 
and to react, so it’s very difficult to be absorbed in anything. 
Also, the basic form of digital communication is command: 
every time you pick up your smartphone, you’ve been told to 
do things. And even if they are friendly commands, 
nevertheless it’s a massive stress on the nervous system. Just 
dealing with these commands, or even ignoring these 
commands, blocks us with a constructive relationship to the 
future: that’s the other side of the destruction of time- 
perspective. 


N: And then there is also the inundation of information. Do 
you think that when you see a lot of things, it makes you feel 
like you’ve already seen everything? 


MF: Well yes, it does. But back in the day, it wasn’t just the 
lack of exposure to things that made people think that they 
were experiencing something new. They were really 


experiencing something new, it wasn’t just an illusion. 


N:But don’t you think that these technologies somehow affect 
our imagination? For example, for a long time the future was 
envisioned by humans through the invention of new 
technologies (i.e. Leonardo da Vinci, Isaac Asimov, etc.), and 
in the Nineties technology was seen as a tool for change on an 
aesthetic and political level (techno music, cyberpunk, etc.). 
Today, instead, technology itself has become the subject 
who’s “telling us what the future is”, bringing about an 
inability to imagine it... 


MF: I agree. If you think about it, nowadays we don’t have 
“the future”: we have upgrades. And in a way it’s a pre- 
postmodernist thing. The whole experience of modernity was 
this double perception that whatever your current 
experience is, it’s already obsolete; because modernity is a 
process which never reaches an end: there’s no resting, no 
point of equilibrium, only this endless upgrading. And then 
today you have corporations such as Apple, whose business 
model is entirely based on this: obsolescence. You don’t 
expect to own an iPod for very long, if only because they 
don’t last that much... I’ve had five or six already! 


N: So what’s the difference between the modernist approach 
and this let’s say post-postmodern way of being modernist? 


MF: Well, I mean that the degree in which modernism 
survives is the sense of newness, as in traditional modernism, 
but it’s been transformed in terms of upgrades. In the past, 
the grand vision of the future was essentially a great 


dislocation from the present: that grand vision is no longer 
available to us. Look at science fiction: I think already in the 
Eighties there was a crisis of the genre, but anyway, the last 
great science-fiction movies are from that time. Today, we’re 
still locked into Blade Runner, dystopian cities, or even 
William Gibson’s cyberpunk... I would say that The Matrix 
itself, with its vision of a fully simulated society, couldn’t 
update this vision. Perhaps Minority Report, with its pop-up 
corporate advertisings, captures the reality of capitalist 
cyberspace even better than William Gibson: today 
cyberspace is like those continuous pop-up windows that 
constantly appear as advertising, commanding us to do 
something, in which we are not fully immersed in; it’s more 
like a background noise from everyday life. 


N:Let’s go back, then, to the years when — according to your 
analysis — the trajectory toward the future was interrupted: 
the Eighties. Perhaps, one thing we shouldn’t underestimate, 
is that the Eighties is also the decade where postmodernist 
aesthetics became a common language; we come from thirty 
years of temporal pastiches, past and present anachronisms, 
double codes, quotations and appropriations from different 
eras... Wasn’t that a negation of the future itself? 


MF: Absolutely. Also, if you read texts like The Ecstasy of 
Communication by Baudrillard, which is from 1987, you find 
out that things like the overwhelming flow of messages, the 
inability to constitute a distinction between the inside and 
the outside, to deal with having no halo or private protection 
anymore... Well, he’s basically talking about Twitter and 


Facebook! And if you think about another author such as 
Frederic Jameson, his texts from the Eighties are 
astonishingly prophetic. What was the specificity of 
postmodernism in the Eighties, is now the dominant aesthetic 
paradigm; to the degree that it’s very hard to see anything 
else. One of the most penetrating things of Jameson’s analysis 
is this awareness of a particular form of anachronism that 
was emerging and calling attention to itself: if you think 
about a film like Body Heat, it was set in the Eighties and it had 
a contemporary aesthetic, but the feel was something from 
film noir of the Thirties and Forties. Now, that mixture of 
contemporary settings and out-of-date references is exactly 
the standard for so much culture of the twenty-first century. 
We naturalised anachronism. 


N: What about physical spaces? We talked about how 
postmodernism reshaped our relationship with time, but if 
you think about it, the term “postmodern” first emerged in 
architecture as a reaction against modernist architectural 
movements. 


MF: I think that the defeat of modernism in architecture, as 
described by Owen Hatherley in his book Militant Modernism, 
is part of the picture I’m describing. Just consider a city like 
London: the most futuristic parts of the city are the brutalist 
ones. You go to the Barbican Centre and you spontaneously 
think about the future, precisely because of the modernism of 
the buildings. Fashion is another example: it seems to be 
stuck, they’re cyclically re-modernising old styles. It’s not 
even fashion as it used to be. 


N:In that sense, what’s your opinion of Simon Reynolds’ 
Retromania, his book about the obsession that pop culture has 
in relation with its own past? 


MF: I mostly agree with Simon’s analysis, but I guess that the 
main difference is that he sees retromania as an internet- 
related phenomenon. Of course the internet changed our 
lives, and of course the idea of timeless time deeply affected 
our habits, even in music; but we also have to bear in mind all 
the consequences of the naturalisation of anachronism and 
its side effects, which are issues related not only with the 
possibility of accessing a space like the internet: it’s also a 
political matter, it’s the way in which we use the internet and 
the way in which the internet functions in our economic 
society. 


N: We started by talking about the “informal education 
system” you grew up with during the Seventies, and how it 
shaped a common idea of “popular modernism”. How do you 
think younger generations relate to that? How does their idea 
of “future” compare to the old one? 


MF: I think that they still feel a need for futurism, but it’s in 
terms of a spectral, virtual presence of the former sense of it. 
I think that this leads to the fact that there’s no specific 
discontent about the present. But when you produce 
something and you have the feeling that everything’s already 
been done... it’s sad, you know? 


PART SIX 


WE ARE NOT 
HERE TO 

ENTERTAIN YOU: 

REFLECTIONS 


one year later... 


K-PUNK IS ONE YEAR OLD! 

Contrary to the plague of miserabilism that seems to have 
descended on blogdom (as identified by Robin), I know 
EXACTLY why I blog... 

For much of the last year, especially when things got 
REALLY BAD, it’s been my only connection to the world, my 
only outside line... It’s reinvigorated my enthusiasm for so 
many things, and pricked my enthusiasm for things I’d never 
previously considered... (I say this especially to the currently 
disenchanted Marcello, who has done both; I remember being 
drawn out of a catatonic depression last year by reading 
through the entire Church of Me archives.) 

It’s made me many valued friends, both online and 
(thanks to Luke’s brilliant walks) off too... Plus it’s put me 
back in touch with friends I’d lost contact with. (Yeh, there’s 
the occasional wanker, but I can honestly say, very few, almost 
none really, certainly there’s far fewer of them than the 
excellent, high quality correspondents.) 

In short, and no exaggeration, it’s made life worth living... 

I know it’s an awful cliché, but it’s really true, a blog is 
what you make it... 


So heartfelt thanks to all of those who have contributed, 
by linking, commenting, reading or inspiring... 


spinoza, k-punk, 


neuropunk! 


Being a Spinozist is both the easiest and the hardest thing in 
the world. 

Easy, because it is simply a matter of acting in such a way 
as to produce joyful encounters. Hard, because the defaults of 
the Human Operating System (OS) are, in one of nature’s most 
deliciously cruel tricks, set against this. The principal 
question which Deleuze and Guattari’s Anti-Oedipus set out to 
answer was deeply Spinozistic: “Why is it that people are so 
prepared to fight for their own servitude?” Meanwhile, 
Burroughs’ Spinozistic abstract model of addiction — ie., 
very much NOT a metaphor, what could be more literal? — 
describes humanity’s enslavement to a vast immiserating 
machine whose interests are not its. 

All of which, to come back to Radar_Anomalous’ Badiou- 


doubts’ leads to another positive way in which we can wrest 
reason/rationality back from what Robin Undercurrent calls, 
hilariously, “boredom-mongering epistemonauts”. According 
to Spinoza, to be free is to act according to reason. To act 


according to reason is to act according to your own interests. 
Finally, however, we have to recognise that, on Spinoza’s 
account, the best interests of the human species coincide with 
becoming-inhuman. 

Many of the problems with Human OS come from its 
inefficient bio/ neuro-packaging. By contrast with very 
simple organisms that are set up to be attracted to what is 
beneficial to them and to flee from what is hostile to them, 
human beings have a convoluted system for processing 
exogenous and endogenous stimuli, routed/rooted in the 
arborescent central nervous system running out of the spine 
and overseen by the brain. Actually, according to 
neurologists, the brain is in effect, three distinct brains — the 
“reptilian brain”, which is responsible for basic survival 
functions, such as _ breathing, sleeping, eating; the 
“mammalian brain”, which encompasses neural units 
associated with social emotions; and the “hominid” brain, 
which is unique to humans and includes much of our 
oversized cortex — the thin, folded, layer covering the brain 
that is responsible for such “higher” functions as language, 
consciousness and long-term planning. Neurology also gives a 
rigorously materialist account of the thanatoidal confusions 
between desire and prohibition that Lacan and Zizek have 
described. 

Crucially for Burroughs’ analysis, it provides an account 
of why humans are so endemically prone to addictive 
behaviour. This is because there are actually two separate 
circuits, one for motivation and one liking. In the latter 
stages of addiction, you want to consume the drug, but it is 
improbable that you will also like jacking up. Add all this up, 


and you pretty much have a neuronic recipe for the 
unremitting misery, hatred and violence that have 
characterised human history. Nietzsche said that if animals 
could describe the human species they would call it “the sad 
creature”. 

Yet, precisely because of this hideously collocated morbid 
assemblage, the human _ contains a_ potential for 
destratification which the functionally streamlined simple 
organism lacks. This is where Spinoza converges with 
cyberpunk, and hence with Deleuze and Guattari, cyberpunk’s 
main theoretical program. One of the consequences of 
Spinoza’s analysis, as I said before, is that human beings’ 
emotion-generating hardware can be understood using the 
same causal framework that is applied to the so-called 
natural world. In the twentieth century, cybernetics will 
make the same discovery. 

But let’s dispense with one of the lazy, hazy assumptions 
we're all prone to fall into whenever we hear the word 
“cybernetics”. Cybernetics does not only refer to technical 
machines. Wiener call it the study of control and 
communication in animals and machines (btw: why leave out 
plants?). Its principal discovery is “feedback” — a system’s 
capacity to reflect and act upon its own performance. So, as 
Luke and I were discussing the other day, the whole point of 
cybernetics is that nothing is “more cybernetic” than anything 
else. There are only systems with more or less feedback, and 


different types of feedback. So if the word “cybernetics” calls 
up only gleaming steel you have the wrong association. 

If cyborgianism is oriented towards a maintenance and 
reproduction of the organism and its homeostatic control 


circuitries, Cyberpunk or k-punk (one of the motivations for 
the “k” btw is the origin of the word “cyber” in the Greek 
“kuber’) flees towards a cybernetics of organic disassembly. 
Again, let’s be clear here. You don’t disassemble the human 
organism by replacing its parts with metal or silicon 
components. (That’s why the term “cyborg” — or “cybernetic 
organism” is misleadingly redundant. All organisms are 
already cybernetic). What matters is the overall organisation 
of the parts. Do the parts operate as hierarchically organised 
and functionally-specified “organs” within a cybernegatively 
construed interiority or do they operate as deterritorialised 
potentials pulling from/towards the Outside? 

This latter arrangement is what Deleluze and Guattari, 
following Artaud, designate as the Body without Organs. As 
Nick pointed out long ago, the BwoO is an essentially Spinozist 
concept: “when it is a matter of the body without organs it is 
always a matter of Spinoza”. 

One of the sublimely ruthless (=machinically efficient) 
aspects of the behaviour of Aliens, predators and shoggoths 
from which the organism recoils in horror is their readiness 
to ditch body parts when they are damaged or redundant. 
The BwO quickly dispenses with any features that either 
inhibit its flatlining slide towards the zero intensity of pure 
potentiality or which draw it back towards the closed-down 
depotentiation of the organism. (I have sometimes wondered 
about the k-punk potential of “If thine own eye offend thee, 
pluck it out.”) This, astonishingly perhaps, is Spinozist 
reason. 

We can now see why becoming inhuman is in the best 
interests of humanity. The human organism is set up to 


produce misery. What we like may be damaging for us. What 
feels good may poison us. 

The _ fascinatingly — destratifying potential in 
neuroeconomics, then, lies in the possibility of using it 
against its ostensible purposes. As yet another of Kapital’s 
slave-programs, the purpose of neuroeconomics is to induce 
the kinds of idiot-repetition-compulsion Burroughs and 
Downham delineate. According to Rita Carter in Mapping the 
Mind, “where thought conflicts with emotion, the latter is 


designed by the neural circuitry in our brains to win”.* The 
Spinozist body without organisation program is aimed at 
reversing this priority, providing abstract maps for imposing 
the goals of reason upon emotional default. So k-punk is also 
neuropunk: an intensive rewiring of humanity’s neural 
circuits. 

Even if they have often repressed the knowledge, all 
cultures have understood that being a subject is to be a 
tortured monkey in hell, hence religion, shamanic practices, 
etc., geared towards the production of BwOs. Paradoxically, 
the ultimate interests of any body lie in having no particular 
interests at all — that is in identifying with the cosmos itself 
as the BwO, the Spinozist God, the Lemurian body of uttunul. 

To get super-immanent, then, let’s think about blogging. 
As Undercurrent described it over on hyperstition, at its best, 
blogging can be a “participative molecular collective of truly 
K+ processes (i.e. buying materials to write about so other 
people reply and recommend other things which you then 
write about...)”.? What has begun to emerge on the most 
destratifying elements of the blogosphere is a 
depersonalising, desubjectifying network producing more 


joyful encounters in a positive feedback process in which 
mammal-reptilian conflict defaults are disabled. 

On the side of the BwO, everything is positive, so what use 
can be made of this animal-in-a-trap howl of outraged 
subjectivism? Well, at the moment, Marcello is functioning as 
a morbidly compelling example of how not to be a good 
Spinozist. Spinoza’s rigorous analysis of sorrow shows how 
the sad are typically not engaging directly and sensitively 
with the world but with their own frozen images (think of 
these as being like outdated data caches). Consider, if you can 
bear it, the way in which Marcello tilts at the windmills of his 
own phantasms in a flailing, pathetically resentful hunger for 
attention that is exemplary of how to produce sad 
encounters. It is a display of that Romantic fetishisation of 
self-destruction that, far from being subversive or 
transgressive, is the Human OS in person. (n.b. It is crucial to 
distinguish the intricate art of self-disassembly from the 
gruesome thanatropic processes of self-destruction.) 

Still, in the words of Deleuze’s favourite Spinozist 
formula, no one knows what a body can do. Maybe there will 
come a time when even Marcello will join us in this only-just- 
beginning, inciting experiment in collective identity- 
shutdown. What reasonable person wouldn’t? 


why dissensus?? 


The word “dissensus” came to me while I was sitting on the 


28" floor of Centrepoint a few weeks ago. 

They took me to the top of the mountain. 

The view was of course stunning, literally sublime: 
London in all its unmanageable vastness, seen from both 
above and from its very heart. It was high, so high, and with 
the long table in front of you and the metropolis below, you 
felt like you should be crushing the economies of Third World 
countries. 

I was there for a meeting about Moodle, which is a 
“Virtual Learning Environment”, a fairly new — and, so it 
would turn out, very exciting — open source educational 
software application. I knew nothing about it and when were 
“put into groups” by the Blairite Komissar in charge, I simply 
asked what were the merits of Moodle as opposed to using 
html. Cue black looks and frowns from the initiates. The 
Komissar, who has joined our group, tells me, in the nicest 
possible way of course, that I “seemed to be sceptical and 
might like to think about my attitude.” 

Aha! So being sceptical is pathological now. Rude. I geddit. 


Course, quick as a flash, I replied. “Yeh... and you ‘might 
like to think about’ being a Blairite managerialist.” 

“Blairite?” he replied, clearly stunned at having his 
politesse challenged. At being counter-pathologised. 

Later, a woman from Dublin College, also in our group, 
launches a notbefore-time assault on PowerPoint (“death by 
bullet point...” “something used by people with no 
charisma...”, as someone rightly said on Danny Baker’s radio 
show this week). She pointed out that she had done a 
presentation a few weeks ago and people had been appalled 
and outraged that SHE DID NOT HAVE POWERPOINT. As she 
rightly argued, if you have an organised mind, there really is 
little need for PowerPoint. 

Cue Komissar, again. “PowerPoint? Rubbish? It’s just a tool 
isn’t it?” 

I didn’t say the following, but I wish I had: Well, not really 
Mr Progtech Microsoft, that’s a rather naive view of 
technology donchathink... Technology, especially MS 
technology, has a tendency to induce behaviours, it does not 
“enable” some pre-existent human “creativity”... (Sure, there 
can be innovative uses of PowerPoint, but we all know what 
the standard use of PowerPoint involves... total redundancy... 
banal bullet points apologetically talked through.. sentences 


? 


tailing off... “well, as you can see...” all in the name of 
“professionalism”...) 

Blairite power IS Microsoft... in every sense... diffuse... 
emolliating... blandly inescapable... 

And you only see its real face when you challenge it, step 
outside the smothering consensus of politeness. 


The English master class are the only people for whom 


hypocrisy is not only acceptable, but obligatory. 

“Yes, yes, you have a grievance, yes, of course things are 
totally unjust. But there are ways of going about things, old 
chap. Procedures. Aggression, confrontation, they never get 
anything done, do they? (And after all, they are a little vulgar, 
don’t you think?) Now, that’s not what I’m saying, I think your 
intensity is admirable, but other people, well. They’re not 
quite so intelligent. They won’t understand. So I would advise 
moderating it a bit. For your own sake. Carry on like this and 
things might get uh difficult for you...” 

Stupidity and cowardice are always the stupidity and 
cowardice of the other. 

Power is always the power of the big other, that which 
speaks through you and of whom you speak. 


new comments 


policy! 


Please note: feminazis, cult studs guilt mongers, passive 
consumer-whingers, “friends” who occupy the moral high 
ground, misanthropes, gliberals, stoner pacifists, therapy- 
pushers... 

Whilst I disagree with Luke’s idea that comments boxes 
should be closed entirely, I have decided to institute a new 
policy on comments. 

Only comments deemed to be positive by the Kollektive 
will be left up. The purpose of the site is to build the 
Kollektive, so comments by those intrinsically hostile to the 
notion of collectivity or those hostile to the k-punk project 
per se will be deleted as soon as possible, so as not to waste 
the energy of the collective on distracting, egocratic 
nonsense. 

Clearly, Iam at work throughout the day, and unlike some 
UK public service managers, my job does not allow me to 
spend all day in front of the computer. I am hoping though 
that, when I am not available to delete comments, others in 


the Kollektive can be deputed to take over. 

Maybe another solution would be to only allow registered 
users to comment. Commenting here is a privilege that has 
been abused. 

k-punk is not a “liberal” or “democratic” “free for all” (cf. 
The Prisoner). There are plenty of other ill-disciplined forums 
where people can air their resentments, ill-thought bile, and 
tedious ego-defence opinionism. 

Or of course you can say what you like on your own blog. 
They really are very easy to set up. 

What could be easier than sitting on the sidelines and 
carping? I know some people get a nice warm feeling in the 
stomachs from their sense of innate superiority to all 
“sroups” and “gangs”. Perhaps what those people should do 
is follow the logic of their position to its logical conclusion 
and utterly withdraw from public forums and indeed public 
life altogether. 

Perhaps even more egregious though is the passive- 
consumer whinger. Think, really, how outrageous it is for the 
likes of “Roger” to appear in the comments box and assure 
me that I am “coming off like a prick”. On my own site. I don’t 
say that k-punk is my site in a possessive sense. I just mean it 
is space that has taken me a great deal of time, stress and 
anguish to build. It really is like inviting someone into your 
own house and having them abuse you. If anything makes me 
a “prick”, it is accepting a situation like that. 

After all, Roger, and others, you have paid absolutely 
NOTHING for access to this site. Nor, naturally, have I 
received any financial remuneration for producing it. That 
isn’t to say that I haven’t received massive positive affect 


from doing it — what could be better than being part of a 
collective network? But it really has reached the point where 
I dread coming to k-punk to see what irrational spleen or 
spoilt boy/girl moodiness I will have to waste energy on 
dealing with next. 


comments policy 
(latest)1 


Basically the situation atm is this... 

The comments boxes have become almost completely 
unproductive. Almost all of the worthwhile discussion 
happens between members of the Kollelktive, who, if the 
comments boxes weren’t there, might be inspired to produce 
their own posts. 

The comments boxes have heated things up — and 
SPEEDED things up. 

They need to cool down and slow down. 

Yesterday, when I closed most of the current comments 
boxes down, you can’t imagine the relief I felt. I could come to 
k-punk without feeling sick with anxiety about what 
unthought-out oedipalised rage, overgrown adolescent boy 
sulks and gliberal stupid American platitudes (“hey man, all 
that Marxist lingo makes my cringes cringe...”) I would have 
to deal with. 

It was definitely more stressful than work. And I have a 
very stressful job. 


My problem is that I attribute rationality to positions and 
people who clearly are incapable of exhibiting it. It’s partly to 
do with my background, which persists at a neuronic level, in 
the insistence: YOU ARE INFERIOR, BEND YOUR HEAD. So 
even when I am faced with clinically deranged second- 
stringer stalker-obsessive autists with delusions of relevance, 
part of me thinks, hmmm maybe they are right. 

They most certainly are not. 

There is no more urgent task on this hell planet than the 
production of rational collectivities. 

These are not fascist gangs with “leaders”. Nor are they 
perfectly functioning neurobotic Spinozist networks. No, but 
they can be on the way to this latter, if there is a commitment 
amongst the collective to a STARTING FROM WHERE YOU 
ARE. 

Demanding perfection before you are prepared to commit 
is Prog Tech SF. Starting to build a way out of hell HERE, NOW 
is kyberpunk. 

The Kollektive takes priority. In the comments boxes as 
they have developed in the last few weeks (k-punk as New 
ILM... yeucccchhhhhhhh!), the Kollektive has struggled to 
make itself heard over the howls of outraged subjectivists, 
Conflict-Addicted Organisms (CAOs), and, worst and most 
pitiful of all, ILM-style one-liner one-upmen. 

Do you feel alienated by this? 

Good. 

And goodbye, then. 

The comments will be restored if there is a way of 
restricting them to registered users only. 

We are not here to entertain you. 


chronic 


demotivation! 


What is supposed to be good about dope? The problem with it 
is not just the resultant psychosis but the ACTUAL STATE it 
puts people into in the first place — chronically demotivated, 
lethargic, filled with the kind of idiot porcine self-satisfaction 
that is the dialectical obverse of feeling paranoid. “Better to 
be Socrates dissatisfied than a pig satisfied...”: not for stoners, 
whose only commitment is to the pleasure principle, to the 
shortest route to total relaxation. Thought, thought requires 
effort man, stop oppressing me, let me sit here and babble 
senselessly, coz that’s creative, right, don’t mess with my 
mojo, but buy me some munchies when you go to the shop, 
yeh? 

What could be better proof of Lacan’s claim that the 
nirvana principle — the drive towards the total extirpation of 
all tension — is not the death drive proper but merely the 
highest expression of the pleasure principle? Stoner 
stupefaction seeks only to remove tension, to become a 
zombified consumer, shambling to the fridge or the late-night 


garage to satisfy the constant craving of the insatiable 
Tungsten Carbide stomach of Kapital opened up in your 
organism by the dope. 

The meat, and all it wants... 

Thought, meanwhile, begins beyond the pleasure 
principle. As Houellebecq says in relation to Lovecraft, only 
those who are dissatisfied with life want to read and think. 
What from the perspective of those slaved to the pleasure 
principle is the introduction of a discordant and 
dysfunctional element (“hey, Infinite Thought, why you going 
to the library? Why don’t you mong along here with us? Come 
and play with us, Nina, FOREVER...”) is from the POV of anti- 
naturalist kommunist konstructivism the positive libidinal 
motor of an ever-complicating process of intelligence- 
production. 

I know someone, probably Gleebot, will immediately leap 
on what I’m about to say and produce some counter-examples 
which will allegedly disprove it, but most stoners are males, 
aren’t they? More than that, and here’s why any empirical 
refutation won’t wash, smoking makes you male. Self- 
satisfied, concerned only with yourself, unable to care about 
others even if you wanted to. 

One of the many myths about stoners is that they are not 
aggressive. It’s true that, in themselves, they don’t FEEL 
aggressive. Their blissed out idiot state of hyper-relaxed 
slackness precisely wipes away any feeling that would 
interrupt their communion with their own organism. But 
when this onanistic self-involvement is threatened, well, then 
we see how irascible, irritable and bad tempered stoners can 
be. Stoners demand the right to their own (passive) 


aggression, but detest any show of aggression from others, 
precisely because any antagonism — particularly political 
antagonism, my god antagonism and rationality, what could 
be more of a DOWNER? — disrupts their “right” to take 
pleasure. Bad vibes, man. 

I need hardly underline the point that young people 
voluntarily subordinating themselves to this pacification 
program is not exactly politically positive. It’s not only 
because they all smoked it themselves when they lolled about 
on a full grant or because their kids are all smokers that the 
government is in favour of relaxing the legal penalties on the 
smoking of the supposedly harmless drug. It’s because it is 
politically expedient. What could be better for the Komissars 
of Kapital than if half the population spends all their spare 
time (i.e. convalescence from reproduction of Kapital time) 
smoking dope and the other half spends it on SSRI anti- 
depressants? 

Fukuyama’s Brave New World inspired argument against 
SSRIs was that, in producing a feeling of well-being, they 
remove the psychological motivation for action, for proving 
yourself. Though Fukuyama’s argument is obviously 
advanced in the services of pro-Kapital enterprise, its logic 
can also be used by communists. You will not struggle against 
Kapital — you will not struggle against anything — if you are 
emolliated by narcotics. 

Of course, the obvious counter-example that people will 
reach for is Rastas and dub. But the Rasta relationship to dope 
was very different to that of most white workers toking on 
their time off, or students spending all day in what the Fall, 
gloriously, called “a State-subsidised cannabis haze”. It was 


not only that the level of downpression to which the Rastas 
was much greater than the “hard week” of the white worker, 
it was that their consumption of drugs was part of a 
disciplined religious and political ritual. Exactly the opposite, 
then, of those who turn to dope as a means of fugging out the 
world. 


how to keep oedipus 


alive in cyberspace! 


1. Contaminate k-space with the monkey superstition that 
there are such things as “persons”. 


2. Reject rationality and promote the propagation of 
Opinionist virus (= Nietzschean  perspectivism = 
mbodied/embedded subjectivism = Kapitalist ideology). 


3. Ensure the continued disengagement of reason by 
personalising all discourse. “You’re only saying that because 
you are... [insert sex/ethnic/ sexuality/abuse/marital status 
here as applicable].” 


4, Promote the use of certain common fallacies of reasoning, 
in particular: Irrelevant appeal to tradition/ authority — 
“We've always done that here...” — or to popularity — “Some 
people might like it...” 

The Ad hominem fallacy — attacking the arguer instead of 
the argument (this is especially popular amongst lawyer- 


politicians and their defenders). 

The straw man fallacy — invent a deliberately weakened 
version of your opponent’s position, demolish it, then claim 
to have refuted their argument. 

The Spinoza Agents (the Cold Rationalist equivalent of 
Gibson’s Turing Cops, who, unlike the Turing Police, are 
dedicated not to the curbing of AI but to its acceleration) 
report that a new and dangerously virulent form of artificial 
stupidity is spreading unchecked throughout k-space. This is 
a nasty combination of the ad hominem and straw man 
irrationalist mind viruses, provisionally codenamed “straw ad 
hominem”. This oedipalising idiocy proceeds thus: given that 
this argument challenges commonsense and what is 
consensually accepted, the person who presented it must be 
[insert allegedly derogatory remark about mental 
health/marital status/ upbringing here], therefore anything 
they say is to be dismissed. No need to refute their arguments 
substantively, natch. 

The SAs warn: “this is unusually moronic even given the 
low standards we expect of you jumped-up monkeys. Watch 
it.” 


we dogmatists! 


No, Iam not tolerant. 

No, I do not want to “debate” or “enter into dialogue 
with” liberal democrats, PoMoSophists, opnionists, carnalists, 
hedonists, mensheviks, individualists... 

No, I don’t respect you, nor do I solicit such respect for 
myself from you. 

The defenders of tolerance, debate, dialogue and respect 
advertise their bourgeois credentials with such advocacy. I’m 
sorry, apologists for exploitation of labour, but, no, I don’t see 
it as my duty to provide the enemy with a space to express 
itself. You already have the global videodrome, the judiciary, 
the police, the psychiatric establishment and the most 
powerful armies of the world on your side. If that isn’t 
enough, you could always make the effort to build your own 
profile and audience so you can add to the chorus of approval 
for the Satanic-worldly. (Too much like hard work? Thought 
so.) 

Be under no illusions: differends, incommensurability, 
language games, forms of life, very far from disrupting the 
Dominant Operating System are that operating system in 
person. Zizek is right about Rorty being right: for all their 


apparent philosophical wrangles, the political upshot of the 
theories of Derrida and Habermas (and one can presumably 
add in Lyotard here) is exactly the same: defence of the 
liberal values of respect for Otherness, etc., etc. 

Yes, I want to leave all that behind. One of the scandals of 
Badiou’s thought is to announce the blindingly obvious: 
difference is not suppressed by the established order, it is its 
banal currency. Fragmentation, deconstruction, cut-up are 
the very stuff of which mediocracy is made. 

So, yes, hold on tight and spit on me, I am a dogmatist. 

But what does being a dogmatist entail? 

Briefly, it involves commitment to the view that there are 
Truths. One can add to this, the view that there is a Good. 


It’s no accident that, since Kant,” rationalism has been 
held to be synonymous with dogmatism. Post-Kant, we have 
grown accustomed to the view that critique rather than 
dogma is the only acceptable ethical and philosophical 
position, so that “rational dogmatism” sounds like the worst 
imaginable insult. 

But where does this attack come from? Fundamentally, 
four interrelated positions: authoritarianism, mysticism, 
egotism and relativism. 

Far from being equivalent to authoritarianism, as the 
postmodern liberal doxa would have it, dogmatism is the only 
effective alternative to authoritarianism. Authoritarianism 
and postmodern “forms of life” entail one another. The 
familiar PoMo relativist insistence that it is neither possible 
nor desirable to arbitrate between the different ethical and 
ontological claims of “incommensurate” “language games” 
surrenders reason to mysticism. Unlike rationalist systems, 


which proceed from stateable axioms or principles, these 
“forms of life” are unable to point to any reasoning which 
founds them. The sheer existence of these “discursive 
communities” is held to be the justification for any traditions 
and beliefs to which such communities might subscribe. It 
should come as no surprise that Spinoza was feared and 
reviled by the authorities of all established religions, since 
Spinoza used reason alone to prove that the core belief upon 
which traditional theism was based — that there is a personal, 
transcendent God who performs miracles and has free will — 
was irrational nonsense. In other words, it was Spinoza’s 
dogmatism that allow him to overthrow the “authority” of the 
Torah. 

In terms of contemporary academic philosophy, 
rationalism is beset not only by Nietzschean-Wittgensteinian- 
Lyotardianism and Heideggerian Nazi poetico-mysticism, but 
also by the qualia cult of consciousness. This “philosophy” 
replaces the ineffable mystery of God with the ineffable 
mystery of consciousness. It consists solely in the negative 
claim that consciousness cannot be explained by either 
science or philosophy. This is religion in the worst sense. 

But dogmatism is religion in the best sense. It is only 
through dogmatism — ruthless subordination of your Self to 
an impersonal system — that his majesty the Ego can be 
crushed. This has been the appeal of nontheistic religion 
throughout the ages. The Ego is simply authority in miniature 
(just as political authoritarianism is Egotism writ large), a 
micro-despot which can only be pushed off his throne by a 
commitment to sober systematicity. 

Finally, it is a mistake to oppose dogmatism to 


pragmatism. Postmodernism advocates pragmatism at every 
level: not only at the level of how to get things done (the 
realm of praxis) but also at the level of what is to be done. But 
dogmatism is capable of distinguishing between what is to be 
done — what the goal is — from how this is to be achieved. 


london litened! 


The free paper plague is infesting all areas of London life. 
From dawn to dusk... Arriving at the station in the morning, 
the Metro already piled up, waiting. Leaving the train, slipping 
into your somnambulant self, commuter character armour 
freezing into place, automatically making the Waste Land 
walk across London Bridge (“I had not thought that death had 
undone so many”), the way already blocked by reps proffering 
City AM. (London Bridge is a film set now (hyperreal city): 
there’s barely a day where there isn’t a camera crew or some 
out of work actors playing a bit part in some promotional 
pantomime.) And in the evening, rushing to escape the black 
hole of the city, you have to play live-action Pac Man with the 
London Lite and thelondonpaper drones blocking the pavement 
every few yards. As if London needed people — poorly paid 
members of the city’s immigrant subproletariat, at that — 
actually being employed to obstruct the pavement. In the 
train, the free papers are everywhere, their dull gloss a lurid 
temptation for the drained mind... cut and pasted PR... 
nothing happening forever... cocaine celebrities... a survey 
says... join in the debate... vote: more or bore... your texts... 
consume it and feel lulled and sullied... Semiotic parasites 


designed to prey upon hypnagogic drift. Weapons against the 
city’s intelligence. Almost no one reads books anymore. 
London litened, littered, public transport desolated into a 
time waste land. Look around the carriage, snapshot of a 
Myspaced city: diversity without difference, homogeneity 
without communality — bodies reduced to claustrophobic 
zombie meat fighting for space, background hum of mutual 
hostility simmering, yet everyone is reading the same thing... 


no future 2012! (for 
nick kilroy) 


There was no future, but it wasn’t like anyone expected. 


2003. We’re wandering through the industrial spectres and 
overgrown dereliction of the Lea Valley. It’s like the world 
has ended. A world has ended here, in fact. But now non- 
human worlds teem and thrive amid the deserted factories 
and the waste-strata. Feral plants, algae so thick and 
artificial-looking you’d swear you could walk across the canal 
on it. It is not a space that humans live in anymore. But it is a 
space they explore. Most of us there that day had alternative 
names. K-space names. Nick K, Woebot, Heronbone. 
Heronbone shows us a social history in the form of 
discarded packaging from defunct commodities. They call 
Heronbone the bard of Stratford — this is his patch, his Waste 
Land, and many of his words are assembled from discards, 
fragments of grime lyrics recalled from the pirates, 
observations of insect colonies, flights of fancy prompted by 
this desolated space. Nick K is ablaze with projects and 


schemes, his photographers eye captured by images every 
few minutes. Photography is a darker art than most people 
routinely suspect. The visionary photographer can find the 
image, but they cannot necessarily see everything that is 
recessed in it. Most photographs act as mirrors, reflecting 
back the past into a frozen present. But some make contact 
with more mysterious dimensions of time. The “traces and 
clues of things to come”. Futures bleeding back. Omens that 
can only be read retrospectively. 

Sometimes there are signs but no one who can read them. 


2007. Other stalkers are moving through the scurf space we 
had traversed four years before. 
Repetition, with a difference: 


“Right,” said Sinclair, straightening up. “Are you ready for 
the zone? From here on in it’s pure Tarkovsky.” And so it was. 
Light-industrial spaces, car-wrecker’s yards, square- 
windowed studios, haulage depots. Then, a mile further on, 
we hit the fence. 

The perimeter of the Olympic site is now secured by a 
plywood fence that is 10ft high, around four miles long, 
bright blue in colour and chinkless. In places it is double- 
banked, in others it is topped by razor- or barbed-wire. The 
ODA began its construction last spring, and the last sections 
were put into place in July. 

The fence is a barrier designed to exclude not only access, 
but also vision. There are no viewing windows built into it, no 
portholes for the curious stakeholder. To see inside the zone, 
you must ascend a Stratford towerblock, hire a helicopter, or 


— the desideratum — visit the ODA’s website, which provides 
stills of the construction process and mockedup futuramas of 
the park (light-glinted buildings, sparkling water features, 


happy munchkin people). 
Nothing Again Nothing 


The “mocked-up futuramas of the park” surrender East 
London to the eventless horizon of the end of history, in 
which nothing happens forever. Nothing happens, again and 
again. Nothing happens. And every time it does, its 
announced with a press release. 

In between our many visits to the Lea Valley in 2003 and 
Iain Sinclair and Robert Macfarlane’s expedition there in 
2007, what happened, of course, was the awarding of the 
Olympic games to London. In that period, Nick K died, the 
photograph he took that day in 2003 now looking more than 
ever like an eerie pre-echo both of his own fate, and the fate 
of the whole area, which has now been consumed by the CGI- 
shadow of 2012. 

The first signs of a coming non-event is always the CGI. 


Ghost Marketing 


The CGI simulations that ringfence the Lea Valley project 
forward fake futures which will never arrive but which are 
immediately effective, already re-organising space in East 
London, already diverting resources from public to private. 
What this constitutes is a kind of negative hauntology, 
operating according to the familiar hype-dynamics of 
corporate capital. (Cybercapital relies on its own ethereal 


entities, of course.) We are not dealing with the spectres of 
lost possibilities, the ghosts of things that never happened, or 
the traces of forgotten events photoshopped out of the end of 
history. Instead, we are confronting the CGlI-signs of a 
massive pseudo-event. A pre-scripted PR initiative disguised 
as an authentic happening. 

According to some interpreters, 2012 is the year of the 
Mayan apocalypse. (Don’t worry, though, its scheduled for 
December, so it shouldn’t disrupt the Olympics.) The 
Olympics are now correlated with the end of time in quite a 
different way. 

The arrival of the Olympics in China is not just a 
ratification of the Chinese regime, it’s also another moment 
in the end of history. 2008 is a symbolic threshold, much like 
1989. Anti-modernist protests against China obscure the fact 
that the Olympics, like the People’s Republic of China, is now 
inherently meshed with global capital. 2008 will celebrate this 
integration, which may well presage a new mode of 
capitalism, in which authoritarian state control co-exists with 
PKD-like piratical capital. Victorian vampirism reformatted 
for cyberspace. The spectre of ultrapostmodernism, in which 
everything can be mass-replicated, but nothing new will ever 
be invented. 


Memory Disorders 


Both in Derrida’s original articulation of the concept, and its 
current recirculation, fifteen years after Specters of Marx, 
“hauntology” must be understood in _ relation to 
postmodernity. Postmodernism, in turn, has to be 


understood, as Jameson has taught us, as “the logic of late 
capitalism”. Postmodern temporality is captured by 
Fukuyama’s claim — everywhere officially disavowed, even by 
Fukuyama itself, even as, surreptitiously, it is universally 
accepted, operating as a kind of presupposition of the 
contemporary cultural unconscious — that we have reached 
the “end of history”. This is not only the conclusion of the 
process, but also the final cause to which everything has 
always been tending. End, then, in a double, appropriately 
Hegelian, sense: the terminus and the teleological goal. 

The logic of late capitalism awaits the disintegration of 
the old Soviet bloc to find its fullest expression. Jameson’s 
great contribution was to have grasped the way in which, far 
from leading to an efflorescence of cultural innovation, the 
unprecedented dominion of capitalism over the globe and the 
unconscious would lead only to a cultural situation given over 
to previously inconceivable levels of stagnation and inertia. 
Shorn of the confidence that an elite modernism could 
provide a_ revolutionary alternative to  pacifying 
entertainment, no longer capable of believing that there was 
any form of detournement which could not in turn be re- 
incorporated and commodified, Jameson is the successor to 
both the Frankfurt School and the Situationists. 

Jameson’s Marxism, in other words, had taken cognizance 
of Baudrillard’s critique. It was Baudrillard who anticipated 
the fusion of the opinion poll and reality TV in the seamless 
system of cultural “interactivity” which disarms any 
oppositional impulse by not only interpellating the consumer, 
but inducting them into its circuits. You decide. Text your 
response. Vote online. Join the debate. More or bore. 


Jameson and Baudrillard understood that this user- 
generated content, together with the concomitant retreat of 
the cultural elite that has enabled it, would not lead to new 
kinds of creativity, but to pastiche and retrospection. Just as 
the capitalist language of “diversity” is a cover for new modes 
of homogeneity. The duplicity that operates here is more a 
strange structural effect than any deliberate attempt at 
mystification, Jameson observes. 

What Jameson calls the “nostalgia mode” is one 
expression of this homogeneity. This remains one of 
Jameson’s most ingenious formulations — the nostalgia in 
question is not manifested in a psychological state but in a 
kind of unacknowledged formal reiteration. 

Hauntology is the counterpart to this nostalgia mode. The 
preoccupation with the past in hauntological music could 
easily be construed as “nostalgic”. But it is the very 
foregrounding of temporality that makes hauntology differ 
from the typical products of the nostalgia mode, which 
bracket out history altogether in order to present themselves 
as new. Post-post-punk, indie’s equivalent of mock Tudor. 

The great sonic-theoretical contribution of the Caretaker 
to the discourse of hauntology was his understanding that the 
nostalgia mode has to do not with memories but with a 
memory disorder. The Caretaker’s early releases seemed to be 
about the honeyed appeal of a lost past: Al Bowlly’s aching 
croon in the Strand ballroom in prewar tearoom London, 
buried beneath the sound which constitutes something like 
the audio-correlate of hauntology itself: crackle. In veiling 
the past, crackle also makes the dimension of time audible. It 
is through this scratching of the scanner-lens that we can 


hear the time-wound, the chronological fracture, the 
expression of the sense, crucial to hauntology, that “time is 
out of joint”. Dyschronia. 

As the Caretaker project has developed, though, it has 
become more about amnesia than memory. Theoretically 
pure anterograde amnesia is not about the inability to 
remember, so much as the incapacity to make new memories. 
The inability to distinguish the present from the past. The 
cultural pathology of a clip-show culture locked into endless 
rewind. 

It as if the Caretaker has taken us from an Overlook 
Hotel/Dennis Potter theme park into a simulation of 
neurological disorder. Fragments of tunes providing minimal 
orientation in an labyrinth of abstract sound. Have you heard 
this before? You can never be sure. 


Nostalgia for Modernism 


But if there is one act which makes a case for the supreme 
pertinence of the concept of hauntology in relation to music 
today, it is Burial. Precisely because Burial deals with 
nostalgic longings, his music does not belong to the nostalgia 
mode. What you hear in Burial’s two LPs is a craving for a 
past which nevertheless appears irretrievably lost, veiled 
behind a relentless drizzle of crackle. Beyond the longing for 
a particular moment or a particular musical genre is a 
longing for the ceaseless forward motion of a culture which 
once appeared capable of infinite renewal, but which is now 
used up, involuted. The nostalgia for modernism resists the 
postmodern nostalgia mode. 


Burial’s music is possessed by an extraordinary sense of 
space. This isn’t only a question of the production, which 
recalls Martin Hannett as much as King Tubby or Basic 
Channel. It is also about what images the music evokes — very 
vivid audio-vignettes of South London in this decade. Edward 
Hopper sound paintings of London after the rave. A city 
populated by ex-ravers gone to seed, like Nigel Cooke’s 
dejected vegetables. The long comedown after all the highs. 
Serotonin crash and anti-depressants. The spaces that are the 
correlates of such disaffected states. All day cafes and night 
buses glowing like diving bells in the undersea murk of the 
early hours. What haunts here is not only the past but 
possible futures. A drowned world catastrophe leaking back 
in time. 

Haunting is about space as much as time — about the 
spaces where the time rift becomes perceptible, and, with 
Burial’s debut LP in particular, it was as if you were hearing 
double: hearing both the current dereliction and the former 
collective ecstasy. Flashbacks flaring in the gloom. What you 
are attuned to is a specific sense of place, as opposed to the 
“third place” — the space that is neither home nor work, but 
which combines elements of both. Spaces of consumer 
convalescence which could be anywhere. Burial’s “In 
McDonald’s” relocates the spatially-indifferent multinational 
capsule of the corporate franchise in a specific city: London, 
once again the capital of Capital. Once the sooty, smoggy 
centre of industrial capital, now the main hub of cybercapital. 
Open for business. Closed to almost anything else. 


Is This Burning an Eternal Flame? 


The arrival of the Olympic flame in London a few weeks ago 
was a pseudoevent on the grandest of scales, given content 
only by its subversion. 

The CGI shadows of 2012 already enclose us. Present time 
captured into the performance of pre-scripted PR 
opportunities forever. But 2012 is an opportunity for dissent 
too. A focus for disaffection. Burial’s second LP includes a 
sample from Lynch’s Inland Empire: “I saw your light, it burns 
forever.” 

You could hear this as the secret key to Burial’s whole 
sensibility. Like Lynch, Burial is attuned to the muffled, 
muted light flashes of the numinous that can be fleetingly 
glimpsed through the mundane. Distant lights, or lights that 
can be apprehended only from a distance. 

Can we be guided by these lights, instead of by the 
Olympic flame, a symbol of a capital now more globalised 
than ever, the ultra-bright striplights drawing planetary 
destiny into an eternal shopping mall surrounded by a 
sweatshop? 


ridicule is nothing 
to be scared of 


(slight return)! 


Like David Stubbs, I’m of course delighted to have been 
shopped to the commissars of commonsense who compile 
Private Eye’s “Pseud’s Corner”. It’s always bracing to be 
middlebrow-beaten; a pleasure I can expect to enjoy fairly 
regularly from now on, since, if the section from the Mark 
Stewart feature that they selected is considered fair game, 
then they might as well open up a permanent spot for me. 

It’s difficult to know what the alleged problem is: the 
conjoining of politics and music? Well, it’s hardly stretching a 
point to argue that a record such as For How Much Do We 
Tolerate Mass Murder? might, y’know, have had some 
connection with geopolitical developments at the end of the 
Seventies. Would the same objection be made to linkages 
between politics and other areas of culture? But of course 
what is objected to is as much a question of tone as of 


content. The default expectation in British media is that 
writers perform a homely matiness: writing must be light, 
upbeat and irreverent, never taking itself or anything else too 
seriously. 

The function of “Pseud’s Corner” — to punish writing that 
in some way overreaches itself, that gets ideas above its 
station or gets carried away — has now been taken up by 
online discussion boards and comments facilities everywhere. 
The effect on any writer who internalises the critique is to be 
intimidated into colourless mediocrity. But the problem with 
most published writing today is not that it is “pretentious”, it 
is that is unreflective PR hackwork. David Stubbs is right to 
invoke a certain Orwell as the patron of bluff, plain-speaking 
John Bull prose — but the Orwell of “Politics and the English 
Language” also attacked the mechanical circulation of dull, 
dead language. If only that Orwell were more heeded. “Never 
use a metaphor, simile, or other figure of speech which you 
are used to seeing in print”, he demanded, optimistically 
hoping that “if one jeers loudly enough, send some worn-out 
and useless phrase — some jackboot, Achilles’ heel, hotbed, 
melting pot, acid test, veritable inferno, or other lump of 
verbal refuse — into the dustbin where it belongs.” 

Over sixty years later, such “verbal refuse” continues to 
circulate with impunity, and is supplemented by a whole 
inventory of PR commonplaces and consumer-affect babble 
(journeys, rollercoaster rides). Surely any amount of 
“pretentiousness” is preferable to these soporific linguistic 
screensavers? 


break through in 


grey lair! 


“Instead of tripping and beating a philosophy for its supposed 
faults only to end up with the same range of mediocre biases 
with which we began, we ought to find a more vigorous 
means of engagement with philosophers. The method I 
propose is to replace the piously overvalued ‘critical thinking’ 
with a seldom-used hyperbolic thinking. For me at least, it is 
only books of the most stunning weakness that draw 
attention to non sequiturs and other logical fallacies. The 
books that stir us most are not those containing the fewest 
errors, but those that throw most light on unknown portions 
of the map. In the case of any author who interests us, we 
should not ask ‘where are the mistakes here?’, as if we hoped 
for nothing more than to avoid being fooled. We should ask 
instead: ‘what if this book, this thinker, were the most 
important of the century? How would things need to change? 
And in what ways would we feel both liberated and 
imprisoned?’ Such questions restore the proper scale of 
evaluation for intellectual work: demoting the pushy 


careerist sandbagger who remains within the bounds of the 
currently plausible and prudent, and promoting the gambler 
who uncovers new worlds. Nietzsche makes far more 
‘mistakes’ than an average peer-reviewed journal article, but 
this does not stop intelligent adults from reading him all 
night long, while tossing the article aside for a day that never 
comes.” 


— Graham Harman, Prince Of Networks? 


This is one of the most stirring passages in Prince Of Networks, 
and it’s particularly worth citing just now, when the topic of 


grey vampires? has come up again*. The mention of Nietzsche 
reminds me that he is one of the great scourges of grey 
vampirism, nowhere more than in the following passage from 
Part Six of Beyond Good And Evil: 


“Aren’t people’s ears all full enough already of wicked 
noises?” says the sceptic, as a friend of peace, almost as 
a sort of security police: “This subterranean No is 
terrifying! Be quiet at last, you pessimistic moles!” For 
the sceptic, this tender creature, is frightened all too 
easily. His conscience has been trained to twitch with 
every No, even with every hard, decisive Yes —to 
respond as if it had been bitten. Yes! And No! —that 
contradicts his morality. Conversely, he loves to 
celebrate his virtue with a noble abstinence, by saying 
with Montaigne, “What do I know?” Or with Socrates, “I 
know that I know nothing.” Or “Here I don’t trust 
myself. There is no door open to me here.” Or “Suppose 
the door was open, why go in right away?” Or “What 


use are all rash hypotheses?” Not to make any 
hypotheses at all could easily be part of good taste. [...] 
In this way a sceptic consoles himself, and he certainly 
needs some consolation. For scepticism is the spiritual 
expression of a certain multifaceted physiological 
condition which in everyday language is called weak 
nerves and infirmity. 


Baron Mordant wrote to me a while back asking if grey 
vampirism wasn’t a symptom of mental illness, and it is — but 
of the widespread, normalised and normalising pathology 
that Nietzsche describes here. As is wont, Nietzsche attributes 
the rise of the “spider scepticism” to racial intermixing but 
we needn’t follow his ethnicising logic in order to utilise his 
analysis, which applies with uncanny acuity to the impasses 
of postmodern relativism and the stale corridors of the 
academy, tyrannised by the Fear — where the worst thing 
that could happen was that you are caught out in an error or 
a mis-cited quotation, rather than that you have wasted your 
life in endless equivocation, quibbling and deferral (while 
crying in your state-subsidised beer that you are doing so...) 

Vampires do not appear in mirrors. In the case of grey 
vampires — and remember that there are vampires that are 
not grey; there are other kinds of energy piracy altogether, 
some more lustrous and ferocious — this means both that 
they cannot recognise themselves as vampires and that their 
existence is entirely dependent upon the attention of the 
Other. Grey vampires do not see themselves as vampires; they 
sincerely think that it is a duty to deflate enthusiasm and 
puncture projects. One sure sign of a grey vampire is the airy 


dismissal of concepts such as energy vampirism — no matter 
what their theoretical commitments might be in their 
published intellectual work, GVs are _ resolutely 
commonsensical in their everyday ontologies. But make no 
mistake about it, there is no more Real level to human life 
than that of energy and its distribution. As Burroughs more 
than anyone else realised, persons and the social are just 
masks covering up a terrain populated by energy predators 
and propagators. 

Remember that you have to invite a vampire over your 
threshold — and grey vampires, like trolls, lose all their 
power once you cease to pay them attention or think about 
them. That is why, when they feel that your attention is gone, 
GVs will try any trick to regain it — the appeal to 
“democratic” values is a particularly scurrilous tactic (“you 
must give me your attention! It’s your duty”). Trolls 
shamelessly try the same thing, of course, and it must be 
remembered that GVs are enablers of trolls — they like to 
position themselves as scrupulously neutral, uncommitted 
(whilst proffering all sorts of promissory notes about the 
commitments that they will make in future, what they will do 
once X or Y have stopped, the bad faith fantasies that prevent 
them from seeing the trap they are in) but the grey vampire’s 
secret sympathies are always with the troll. For the troll 
actually articulates the resentment and spite which the grey 
vampires feel but are not able to express. They share the 
trolls’ justification for their action — the belief that some 
people are getting ahead of themselves, that there is rather 
too much unseemly excitement about X or Y... As if what was 
required in intellectual life is more bent heads, more 


bitterness, less enthusiasm... Some teachers and lecturers do 
think that way, see it as their role duty to pass on the arid 
petrification which calcified their spirit usually sometime 
during their postgraduate career... Remember: all vampires 
are victims of vampirism... 

But I see motivating students, passing on enthusiasm, as 
the first and most important task of a teacher. (Which isn’t to 
say that one has to blindly encourage everything a student 
says or writes; far from it.) That’s why I would say that one of 
the most despicable figures in the academic bestiary is the 
Troll-Master: the figure who feeds on the crushed enthusiasm 
of belittled students. The easiest way to win a cheap kind of 
respect is by adopting a nothing-can-impress-me hyper- 
critical stance, doused in cool weltweltschmerz, finding fault 
everywhere handing out praise and encouragement only very 
rarely; it’s a transparent tactic, but one that works 
surprisingly well, and not only on jejune students, but also on 
very accomplished people, even those who have written a 
number of books. Often, the Troll-Master’s own intellectual 
project will be mediocre and/or suspended — it’s clear that 
all their libidinal energy is tied up in enslaving students into 
neurotic servitude. Troll-Masters can permanently insinuate 
themselves into students’ heads, but usually their power 
depends upon the hothouse claustrophobia of the university 
department — they are village despots, whose charismatic 
tyranny seldom works outside their own turf. If they have a 
long-term effect, it is only to produce more grey vampires. 

Graham is absolutely right to note that grey vampires 
tend to operate on a one-to-one basis, whereas trolls always 
require an audience. That’s because trolls want the attention 


of the big Other, whereas grey vampires want to directly 
identify with the big Other — to become the voice of neutrality 
and authority, the voice from nowhere, which doesn’t make 
any refutable claims and therefore cannot be caught out. The 
reason that there is a close fit between grey vampirism and 
the academy — now more than ever — is that the academy 
seeks to inculcate precisely this kind of neurotic neutrality 
(the other side of careerist sandbaggery), where the most 
important thing is that footnotes are correctly formatted. It is 
usually liberating to actually read the work of GVs and Troll- 
Masters: from their endless, refined critique, you’re led to 
believe that what they produce will be the most sophisticated, 
error-free, immaculate work you could imagine; it’s quite a 
shock when you actually read it and see how contestable and 
(often) mediocre it is. 

The alternative to these traps is not the heroic solitary 
genius, but the network, another reason that Graham’s new 
book is so important. As Nick Srnicek has been arguing, 
political theory now has to deal with the question of 
networks. (Incidentally, one of the reasons that Speculative 
Realism can contribute so much to political theory is that the 
areas SR opens up do not come already pre-packed in 
supersaturated pseudo-political “meaning”, as in the 
exhausted, dustbowl terrains presided over by trad 
continental philosophy.) The toxicity of grey vampires and 
trolls is so important to think about because they it is 
essentially network toxicity. Troll-jouissance is derived 
precisely from their capacity to corrupt networks — the 
troll’s usual MO is enter a thriving network and destroy it by 
diverting all its energy to dealing with them. The grey 


vampire, as ever, is more subtle — and, for that reason and 
for so many others, more dangerous. They sap the network’s 
energy, not only by defending trolls, but by also defending 
equivocation itself, by construing any decision or 
determinate position as oppressive (deconstruction is a grey 
vampire pathology). Their preferred model for discussion is 
the fruitless combat of the comments box/discussion board 
“debate”. This is the energy-swamp of web 2.0; but other 
kinds of network can grow here too. 


real abstractions: 
the application of 
theory to the 


modern world! 


At a recent symposium at the University of East London 
devoted to dance music and theory, some dissenting 
journalists declared that they would much rather be “buffoon 
empiricists” than credulous dupes of theory. This kind of 
dismissal of theory, by way of ostensibly plain-speaking 
selfdeprecation, is nothing new in British culture. It’s a 
certain attitude that practically defines itself by its disdain 
for theoretical abstractions, a disdain which once informed 
empiricism, the philosophy with which the Englishspeaking 
world is most associated. But, precisely because it aimed to 
reject supposedly unprovable abstractions, the empiricism of 
philosophers such as George Berkeley and David Hume ended 


up undermining rather than ratifying the categories of given 
experience: Berkeley famously denied the existence of the 
material world itself, while Hume argued against the 
existence of the self. In contrast with their rarefied 
weirdness, buffoon empiricists see their own role as shoring 
up the way the world appears to us in our unreflective 
moments. They claim to privilege “evidence”, but really this 
is no more than a self-evident appeal to the very categories 
that empiricist philosophers denied: persons and (physical) 
things. And if only persons and physical things are real, what 
do buffoon empiricists think just happened in the global 
economy? Understanding the credit crunch and the recession 
demands the acknowledgement that abstractions are real. 

It’s no accident that the countries which bought into 
neoliberalism and financialisation most enthusiastically were 
the US and the UK. The “continental” theoretical tradition 
that buffoon empiricism defined itself against was often 
guilty of the kind of intricately nebulous, reality-denying 
textualism of which Anglo-Saxon nominalism accused it. The 
type of theory that has percolated through the art world and 
cultural studies in recent years — a confection of diluted 
postmodernism and degraded Deleuzianism, with its 
menagerie of vague anti-concepts such as difference, 
sensation and multiplicity — is not so far from buffoon 
empiricism. What this kind of antitotalising thinking shares 
with it is a profound hostility towards systematicity; it holds 
the widespread view that making any kind of determinate 
claim is dogmatic, oppressive, even totalitarian. 

As Fredric Jameson has argued, this pick-and-mix 
approach to theoretical propositions has rather too close a fit 


with consumerism — in fact, Jameson famously goes so far as 
to say, it’s an expression of the “cultural logic of late 
capitalism”. What is certain is that vague rhetorics of 
diversity do not have the cold lucidity necessary to give an 
account of the real abstractions of capital. In his 1966 essay, 
“Cremonini, Painter of the Abstract”, Louis Althusser made a 
distinction between “abstract painting” and “the painting of 


abstraction”.* The painter Leonardo Cremonini, Althusser 
argued, managed to expose the abstractions of capital not by 
directly depicting them — such a thing is impossible — but by 
showing “the determinate absence which governs [us]”. As 
Benjamin Noys puts it in a commentary on Althusser’s essay 
in his forthcoming book The Persistence Of The Negative: 


We have no image of capital, capital itself is a kind of 
pure relationality, a pure abstraction of value, labour, 
and accumulation, which can only be “seen” in 
negative. This is why the negation of real abstractions 
demands further abstraction, as abstraction is the only 
possible means to reveal this pure relationality which 


conceals itself in plain sight.° 


Getting to this real abstraction entails an analysis of what 
I call capitalist realism. Capitalist realism — which by no 
means collapsed with the banks last year; on the contrary, 
there is no greater testament to its continuing power than 
the scale of the bank bailouts — is the notion that capitalism 
is the only viable political-economic system. It maintains that 
there is an inherent relation between capitalism and reality. 
Capitalist realism is a kind of anti-mythical myth: in claiming 


to have deflated all previous myths on which societies were 
based, whether the divine right of kings or the Marxist 
concept of historical materialism, it presents its own myth, 
that of the free individual exercising choice. The distrust of 
abstractions — summarised by Margaret Thatcher’s famous 
denial: “there is no such thing as society” — finds expression 
in a widespread reduction of cultural ideas and activities to 
psychobiography. We are invited to see the “inner life” of 
individuals as the most authentic level of reality. Much of the 
appeal of reality television, for instance, consists in its 
seductive claim to show participants for what they “really 
are”. The media is a sea of faces that we are encouraged to 
feel we are on first name terms with. Feature interviews in 
mainstream papers and magazines are invariably structured 
around biographical chat and photographs. In Britain, now 
more than ever, artists and musicians are faced with the 
choice of representing themselves in this biographical way or 
not appearing at all. Attempts to appeal to abstract ideas 
alone — either in the art itself or the forces it is dealing with 
— are habitually greeted with a mixture of contempt and 
incomprehension. 

This is not restricted to the tabloid press — whose outing 
last year of the determinedly “faceless” musician Burial is 
only one example of its aggressive insistence upon 
psychobiographical reduction. The default settings of the 
British broadsheet press are just as dismissive of abstraction. 
Witness Nick Cohen’s recent fulmination against Frieze’s own 
Dan Fox in the Observer, criticising a blog Fox had written 
analysing mainstream newspaper’ reports of the 
“Altermodern” exhibition at Tate Britain, London. Cohen’s 


article included a priceless sideswipe against “the type of 
French intellectual who makes the English wish the Channel 
was a thousand miles wide.” With its guiding assumption that 
theory is some continental toxin for which the antidote is 
Anglo-Saxon common sense, Cohen’s piece was a manifesto 
for buffoon empiricism, making its standard complaint that 


theory is “unsupported by anything as mundane as 


evidence’’.4 


But empiricism is not the same as the empirical — any 
worthwhile theory must account for empirical data, but, in 
order to do so, it cannot remain at the same level of the data 
it is seeking to explain. Besides, empirical facts typically have 
little to do with the phenomenological experience of 
individuals. Althusser’s description of his own theory as 
“scientific” has been derided, not only by Anglo-Saxon 
nominalism but also by much post-Structural theory, which 
has tended to prefer poetry and discourse to the natural 
sciences. But Althusser’s conception of the individual subject 
as a product of ideology is far more scientific than buffoon 
empiricism’s unthinking dissemination of the concepts of 
persons and things. In his book Nihil Unbound, which draws 
upon neuroscience as well as the work of “continental” 
theorists, the philosopher Ray Brassier argues that science 
exposes human beings’ everyday understandings of 
themselves and the world around them to be banal fictions. 
The kind of philosophical realism that Brassier advocates has 
nothing to do with capitalist “realism” — indeed, it has the 
resources to expose this so-called realism as nothing of the 
sort. Developing from the work of neurophilosophers such as 
Paul Churchland and Thomas Metzinger, who argue that all of 


the seemingly self-evident furniture of inner life (emotions, 
the self itself) are mystificatory superstitions, Brassier’s work 
is part of a renewed theoretical assault on a buffoon 
empiricist ideology that calls itself reality. 


no i’ve never had a 
job...+ 


I should have pointed out that Ivor Southwood has his own 
blog: here he is on the Fairy Jobmother;” and here’s Digital 


Ben? with more on the same theme. Ben’s post is, in the best 
possible way, sad. The key line is: Why can everyone else do it 
and not me? When I was unemployed, I was convinced that an 
absolute ontological gulf separated me from work. Work — 
which, like “being in a relationship” — would automatically 
confer on me the status of being a Real Person. But the 
horrific irony was that one couldn’t achieve this status. You 
couldn’t become a Real Person by getting a job. It was the 
other way round: only Real People could get work. Being 
unemployed wasn’t a cause of shame; rather the sense of 
shame which I carried around as if it was the core of my being 
was what prevented me getting a job. So my job applications 
and interviews had an air of total hopelessness about them. I 
know there’s no way you would give the job to an insect like me, and 
we both know I couldn’t do it even if by some miracle you offered it 


to me, but... It took me years to realise that job interviews were 
a ritualised exchange where the point was to determine 
whether you knew what the right communicative etiquette 
was, and that telling the truth made you some weirdo. Surely 
even those who have not been in the Castle know that one doesn’t 
behave like that... 

Being a postgraduate student was little better than being 
unemployed — not least because it was regarded (by me as 
much as anyone else) as a way of avoiding work. (A friend 
once remarked that, in most circles in Britain, it would be less 
shameful to confess to being a drug addict than to admit you 
were a postgraduate student in an arts subject.) But I only 
“avoided work” because I didn’t think I could do it. Ben 
writes: 


I can’t quite make up my mind whether this missing 
quality is a rulingclass privilege (for which see the 
discussions collected here a few years back), or more of 
a stereotypical working class thing — hustle, graft, with 
its suggestions of not-entirely-legitimate activity. 
Perhaps it’s something possessed by people at both 
ends, but lost by those in-between? Rather like the 
ridiculous etiquette books of early Victorian times — 
real aristocrats didn’t worry about that type of thing, 
they just did what the hell they pleased (knowing that 
they were immovably established and that being seen 
using the wrong kind of spoon wasn’t going to affect 
them at all). Only the upwardly mobile bourgeoisie 
cooked up these arcane rules and customs to try and 
monopolise the road up and discreetly kick the bulk of 


the population off the ladder. 


For me, it was absolutely a question of being projected 
into a space between classes. When I did work in factories, I 
was either pitied or pilloried. Every job seemed impossible: 
manual work because of my feckless diliatoriness, graduate 
jobs because, well, I wasn’t the sort of person who could do 
them. Me, a teacher, a journalist or a lawyer — surely not. 

Is there anyone who has caught the agony of this state of 
worklessness better than Morrissey? The useless jouissance of 
refusing what was anyway impossible: “No I’ve never had a 
job/because I’ve never really wanted one”, “No, I’ve never had a 
job because I’m too shy...” I do sometimes think that the 
implicit political position in those handful of early Smiths 
songs was one of the most powerful of the Eighties. Singing 
“England is mine and it owes me a living” at the time of three 
million unemployed and the Miners’ Strike... Rejecting the 
masculine destiny of Fordist worker at the very moment 
when that destiny was being denied to the working class 
(“No, we cannot cling to the old dreams any more”)... 
Rejecting, that is to say, all of those working-class homilies 
about the dignity of labour... If there was a militant dysphoria 
in Morrissey it was here... and the dysphoria was absolutely 
integral to the militancy: incapacity as refusal. Failure as 
negative capability. I’d rather be me miserable and shy than a 
successful communicative capitalist... All of this when the 
Wildean defiance was shaped by _ gaucheness and 
awkwardness, rather than staged as a PoMo panto turn. 
“There are brighter sides to life/and I should because I’ve 
seen them/but not very often”. The “but not very often” is 


the genius touch, of course. Without that, the gesture of 
refusal could seem like empty breast-beating; it would just be 
the swagger of “Wham Rap”... With it, there is just enough 
suggestion of other worlds, other ways of being, which no one 
in the current state of things has more access to than the 
unemployed dysphoric... And no one sees the total system of 
capital — the way that work, sexual _ relationships, 
commodities all intermesh and entail one another — no one 
sees that more clearly than the person excluded from work... 
Morrissey represented the desire for a proletarian 
bohemia at the moment when — after the Sixties, after glam, 
after punk and post-punk — that possibility was being closed 
down. There’s an excellent chapter in Jim McGuigan’s 
excellent Cool Capitalism about the history of bohemia, which 
McGuigan connects with Marcuse’s concept of art as the Great 
Refusal. It seems to me that the installation of business 
ontology over the last thirty years has centrally involved the 
defeat of bohemia: art schools returning to largely being 
places for the privileged; the reduction of the print music 
press to indie Smash Hits; TV becoming populist trash or 
middlebrow mediocrity. The business culture of “selling 
yourself” (which I, like every right thinking person still 
regard as the height of vulgarity) has engendered the 
mandatory, seamless positivity that Ben and Ivor talk about: 
the Great Acceptance, as opposed to the Great Refusal. The 
aspiration to enter into bohemia was always the wrong kind 
of ambition from the perspective of a certain working-class 
way of thinking. Still is... many members of my family have 
never encouraged me to write, and continue to regard it as a 
“hobby”, doing everything they can to put pressure on me to 


get “proper work”... Contrast this with the bourgeois kids 
doing unpaid internships for years on end... 


fear and misery in 


neoliberal britain! 


The passage I’ve pasted below — the introduction to a 


ce 


presentation, which was entitled “‘We’re not all in this 
together’: Public Space and Antagonism in the Wake of 
Capitalist Realism” — was intended to be a kind of minimally 
fictionalised phenomenological tuning-up exercise, to give a 
predominantly non-UK audience a sense of what it has been 
like to live in the UK under capitalist realism. Everything here 
is based on genuine experiences, although some experiences 
have been compressed and condensed, and the experiences 


are not necessarily mine. 


Now: The swipe card doesn’t work. The machine senses 
anxiety, you’re sure of it. It knows the card is not yours. You 
try the card again. Nothing. Same red light. The card isn’t 
yours, but you should have access to the building. You had to 
borrow someone else’s card because it is only possible to get 
swipe cards between the hours of 9 and 1 and you are 
working at these times. 


Someone is behind you. You feel uncomfortable. Will they 
notice that the card does not belong to you? You try the card 
again. Again nothing. Red light. 

Your phone rings. You struggle to get it out of the bag. By 
the time you have it, the call has gone through to the 
answering service. You see that the call has come from 
another of your employers. A familiar anxiety grips you: what 
have you done wrong now? But you have no time to worry 
about that at the moment. 

You try the swipe card again. At last, the green light 
comes on. You’re through the door. 

Rushing down the corridor. Which floor were you 
supposed to be on? You rifle through your bag until you find 
the documentation. You should be on this floor, but at the 
other end of the corridor. You walk towards the room 
number. But suddenly your progress is blocked. There is a no 
entry sign: an office that cuts the corridor in half and through 
which there is no access. 

It’s a nightmare topology. Every time you seem to get 
close, another obstacle appears. You will have to go out of the 
corridor, down the stairs and up to the next set of stairs, 
facing a number of swipe card-access doors on the way. 

By now the five minutes you hoped to have before you 
start is evaporating rapidly. 

By the time you reach the room you were heading for, you 
are already late. You log-on to the computer. Or you try to. 
The log-in is rejected. You try again. No luck. Then you 
remember: you’re trying a log-in from one of the other 
institutions that you work at. It’s difficult to keep track 
sometimes. You remember the correct log-in, quickly scan 


one of your email accounts. See an email from an 
administrator. Have you filled in your bank details form? Yes, 
you've filled it in, you think. Weeks ago. But of course you 
can’t be sure — maybe you only thought you had filled it in. 
Have they lost it? Flash of anxiety: will I not be paid this 
month? Last year, when you filled in all the same forms that 
you have to complete again this year, you were not paid for a 
whole fifty-hour contract, until you pointed out the mistake. 
Will the same thing happen again? 

But there’s no time to worry about this now. 

You have a room of seventy students waiting to be taught. 

Such is life in the UK’s bloated and over funded public 
institutions. 

Welcome to Liberty City. The busier you are, the less you 
see. 


Ten years ago: the New-Path Institute 

The psychiatrist asks you if your mood has improved. 

You Say no. 

The psychiatrist says that the dose needs to be increased. 

You don’t respond. You can’t. The drugs you’re taking and 
the condition you are suffering from give you the cottonhead 
response time of a zombie. The psychiatrist feels very far 
away, like you are seeing him through a fish-eye lens. 

You don’t need to respond. It’s not about your responses. 

Besides, there’s a sneering voice in your head constantly 
shouting at you. 


Of course the drugs won't work. 


Of course you won’t get better. 


Because there’s nothing wrong with you. 


Just give up. 


But that’s easier said than done. 


The best you can hope for is a coma. 

After the consultation, you return to your bed. Everything 
feeling very heavy, as if a crushing undersea pressure is 
bearing down on you. You lie on the bed, absolutely 
convinced that this is the truth — the raw unvarnished Real. 
Strangely, that remorseless glacial sense of certainty does not 
lessen your anxiety or bring you any relief. You cannot rest, 
even though you are catatonically immobile. Your heart is 
pounding. Jackhammer thud out of a Poe story. It gets faster 
and louder until the only thing louder is the voice in your 
head. 

Later, you say to a nurse: 

So that’s what the treatment amounts to? Drugging and 
incarceration. 

They nod. In the background, someone is howling. 


Now: Rush away to one of the other places you work. You are 
supposed to photocopy some texts. 

But by the time you arrive in the corridor, all the doors 
are locked. No one there. 

This is the second time this has happened. Last time the 
photocopier wasn’t working. 

You should have come earlier today. But there wasn’t 
time then. Defeated, but trying to ensure that the two-hour 
round trip is not a complete waste of time, you go to the 


library, using the temporary swipe card that you were given 
because your contract has not been prepared yet. You take 
some books off the shelf and try to check them out. No dice. 
Your library record has not yet been prepared. 

Can you come back later? 

Yes, you can come back later. 

On the train home. Claustrophobia-inducing crush. You’re 
so anxious about having your iPod or your phone stolen that 
it would almost come as a relief if they were. 

Exhausted, still standing up because there is no space to 
sit, you think about reading the book in your bag. But the 
temptation of the free paper is too great. Its headlines fix on 
your tired mind like predators that have eyed a stricken 
animal. The little oedipal-celebrity narratives hook you in. 
Everything collapsing into the universal form of the tabloid. 
Idle chatter subsuming all other news. Politics as a family 
soap opera. Nothing going on except ambition, intrigue, envy. 
You're bored even as you are fascinated. 


Six years ago: In the office of the occupational therapist. 

You are being asked to prove that you are mentally fit. 

Because — as the Human Resources manager kindly 
pointed out — you have suffered from stress in the past. (The 
thought flashes through your mind — not that they cared 
when you were suffering.) But now people are concerned. 

The anger that you’ve been showing towards management 
can only be a sign that you are unwell. A little unbalanced. 

Don’t worry. No one is attacking you. We’re all here to 
help. 


You say to the occupational therapist: 


If I say management is conspiring against me will that 
prove I am mad? 


Now: Stepping over the vomit, you remember too late: only a 
fool would go out into a provincial English town centre late in 
the evening. It’s night of the living dead out here. 

Screams that sound like they come from the Dante- 
damned. And that’s just from the people who are enjoying 
themselves. 

The lurching zombie threat of violence simmering. 

Try not to catch anyone’s eye. 

When you go by Accident and Emergency, you see all the 
walking wounded, and some who are not walking. All the 
casualties of the UK’s many happy hours. 

You remember a doctor saying that twenty years ago, the 
night shift was so boring that the medics would engage in 
wheelchair races with one another. Not anymore. Not with all 
the knives, gun crime, fights, alcoholrelated accidents, 
stomach pumps... 

And all the superbugs breeding in the wards... 

You reach home, switch on the TV. Emollient patrician 
voices crying crocodile tears. Public services to be massively 
cut back. 30%, 40%. 

A new age of austerity. 

Aristocrats and millionaires telling us: we’ve all got to do 
our bit. 

We’re all in this together. 


exiting the vampire 


castle! 


This summer, I seriously considered withdrawing from any 
involvement in politics. Exhausted through overwork, 
incapable of productive activity, I found myself drifting 
through social networks, feeling my depression and 
exhaustion increasing. 

“Left-wing” Twitter can often be a miserable, dispiriting 
zone. Earlier this year, there were some high-profile 
twitterstorms, in which particular leftidentifying figures 
were “called out” and condemned. What these figures had 
said was sometimes objectionable; but nevertheless, the way 
in which they were personally vilified and hounded left a 
horrible residue: the stench of bad conscience and witch- 
hunting moralism. The reason I didn’t speak out on any of 
these incidents, I’m ashamed to say, was fear. The bullies 
were in another part of the playground. I didn’t want to 
attract their attention to me. 

The open savagery of these exchanges was accompanied 
by something more pervasive, and for that reason perhaps 


more debilitating: an atmosphere of snarky resentment. The 
most frequent object of this resentment is Owen Jones, and 
the attacks on Jones — the person most responsible for 
raising class consciousness in the UK in the last few years — 
were one of the reasons I was so dejected. If this is what 
happens to a left-winger who is actually succeeding in taking 
the struggle to the centre ground of British life, why would 
anyone want to follow him into the mainstream? Is the only 
way to avoid this drip-feed of abuse to remain in a position of 
impotent marginality? 

One of the things that broke me out of this depressive 
stupor was going to the People’s Assembly in Ipswich, near 
where I live. The People’s Assembly had been greeted with 
the usual sneers and snarks. This was, we were told, a useless 
stunt, in which media leftists, including Jones, were 
aggrandising themselves in yet another display of top-down 
celebrity culture. What actually happened at the Assembly in 
Ipswich was very different to this caricature. The first half of 
the evening — culminating in a rousing speech by Owen Jones 
— was certainly led by the top-table speakers. But the second 
half of the meeting saw working-class activists from all over 
Suffolk talking to each other, supporting one another, 
sharing experiences and strategies. Far from being another 
example of hierarchical leftism, the People’s Assembly was an 
example of how the vertical can be combined with the 
horizontal: media power and charisma could draw people 
who hadn’t previously been to a political meeting into the 
room, where they could talk and strategise with seasoned 
activists. The atmosphere was anti-racist and anti-sexist, but 
refreshingly free of the paralysing feeling of guilt and 


suspicion which hangs over left-wing twitter like an acrid, 
stifling fog. 

Then there was Russell Brand. I’ve long been an admirer 
of Brand — one of the few big-name comedians on the current 
scene to come from a working-class background. Over the last 
few years, there has been a gradual but remorseless 
embourgeoisement of television comedy, with preposterous 
ultra-posh nincompoop Michael McIntyre and a dreary 
drizzle of bland graduate chancers dominating the stage. 

The day before Brand’s now famous interview with 
Jeremy Paxman was broadcast on Newsnight, I had seen 
Brand’s stand-up show the Messiah Complex in Ipswich. The 
show was defiantly pro-immigrant, pro-communist, anti- 
homophobic, saturated with working-class intelligence and 
not afraid to show it, and queer in the way that popular 
culture used to be (i.e. nothing to do with the sour-faced 
identitarian piety foisted upon us by moralisers on the post- 
structuralist “left”). Malcolm X, Che, politics as a psychedelic 
dismantling of existing reality: this was communism as 
something cool, sexy and proletarian, instead of a finger- 
wagging sermon. 

The next night, it was clear that Brand’s appearance had 
produced a moment of splitting. For some of us, Brand’s 
forensic take-down of Paxman was intensely moving, 
miraculous; I couldn’t remember the last time a person from 
a working-class background had been given the space to so 
consummately destroy a class “superior” using intelligence 
and reason. This wasn’t Johnny Rotten swearing at Bill 
Grundy — an act of antagonism which confirmed rather than 
challenged class stereotypes. Brand had outwitted Paxman — 


and the use of humour was what separated Brand from the 
dourness of so much “leftism”. Brand makes people feel good 
about themselves; whereas the moralising left specialises in 
making people feed bad, and is not happy until their heads 
are bent in guilt and self-loathing. 

The moralising left quickly ensured that the story was not 
about Brand’s extraordinary breach of the bland conventions 
of mainstream media “debate”, nor about his claim that 
revolution was going to happen. (This last claim could only be 
heard by the cloth-eared petit-bourgeois narcissistic “left” as 
Brand saying that he wanted to lead the revolution — 
something that they responded to with typical resentment: “I 
don’t need a jumpedup celebrity to lead me”.) For the 
moralisers, the dominant story was to be about Brand’s 
personal conduct — specifically his sexism. In the febrile 
McCarthyite atmosphere fermented by the moralising left, 
remarks that could be construed as sexist mean that Brand is 
a sexist, which also meant that he is a misogynist. Cut and 
dried, finished, condemned. 

It is right that Brand, like any of us, should answer for his 
behaviour and the language that he uses. But such 
questioning should take place in an atmosphere of 
comradeship and solidarity, and probably not in public in the 
first instance — although when Brand was questioned about 
sexism by Mehdi Hasan, he displayed exactly the kind of 
good-humoured humility that was entirely lacking in the 
stony faces of those who had judged him. 


I don’t think I’m _ sexist, But I remember my 
grandmother, the loveliest person I’ve ever known, but 


she was racist, but I don’t think she knew. I don’t know 
if I have some cultural hangover, I know that I have a 
great love of proletariat linguistics, like “darling” and 
“bird”, so if women think I’m sexist they’re in a better 
position to judge than I am, so Ill work on that. 


Brand’s intervention was not a bid for leadership; it was 
an inspiration, a call to arms. And I for one was inspired. 
Where a few months before, I would have stayed silent as the 
PoshLeft moralisers subjected Brand to their kangaroo courts 
and character assassinations — with “evidence” usually 
gleaned from the right-wing press, always available to lend a 
hand — this time I was prepared to take them on. The 
response to Brand quickly became as significant as the 
Paxman exchange itself. As Laura Oldfield Ford pointed out, 
this was a clarifying moment. And one of the things that was 
clarified for me was the way in which, in recent years, so 
much of the self-styled “left” has suppressed the question of 
class. 

Class consciousness is fragile and fleeting. The petit 
bourgeoisie which dominates the academy and the culture 
industry has all kinds of subtle deflections and pre-emptions 
which prevent the topic even coming up, and then, if it does 
come up, they make one think it is a terrible impertinence, a 
breach of etiquette, to raise it. I've been speaking now at left- 
wing, anticapitalist events for years, but I’ve rarely talked — 
or been asked to talk — about class in public. 

But, once class had re-appeared, it was impossible not to 
see it everywhere in the response to the Brand affair. Brand 
was quickly judged and-or questioned by at least three ex- 


private school people on the left. Others told us that Brand 
couldn’t really be working class, because he was a millionaire. 
It’s alarming how many “leftists” seemed to fundamentally 
agree with the drift behind Paxman’s question: “What gives 
this working class person the authority to speak?” It’s also 
alarming, actually distressing, that they seem to think that 
working class people should remain in poverty, obscurity and 
impotence lest they lose their “authenticity’. 

Someone passed me a post written about Brand on 
Facebook. I don’t know the individual who wrote it, and I 
wouldn’t wish to name them. What’s important is that the 
post was symptomatic of a set of snobbish and condescending 
attitudes that it is apparently alright to exhibit while still 
classifying oneself as left-wing. The whole tone was 
horrifyingly high-handed, as if they were a schoolteacher 
marking a child’s work, or a psychiatrist assessing a patient. 
Brand, apparently, is “clearly extremely unstable... one bad 
relationship or career knockback away from collapsing back 
into drug addiction or worse.” Although the person claims 
that they “really quite like [Brand]”, it perhaps never occurs 
to them that one of the reasons that Brand might be 
“unstable” is just this sort of patronising faux-transcendent 
“assessment” from the “left” bourgeoisie. There’s also a 
shocking but revealing aside where the individual casually 
refers to Brand’s “patchy education [and] the often wince- 
inducing vocab slips characteristic of the auto-didact” — 
which, this individual generously says, “I have no problem 
with at all” — how very good of them! This isn’t some colonial 
bureaucrat writing about his attempts to teach some 
“natives” the English language in the nineteenth century, or a 


Victorian schoolmaster at some private institution describing 
a scholarship boy, it’s a “leftist” writing a few weeks ago. 

Where to go from here? It is first of all necessary to 
identify the features of the discourses and the desires which 
have led us to this grim and demoralising pass, where class 
has disappeared, but moralism is everywhere, where 
solidarity is impossible, but guilt and fear are omnipresent — 
and not because we are terrorised by the right, but because 
we have allowed bourgeois modes of subjectivity to 
contaminate our movement. I think there are two libidinal- 
discursive configurations which have brought this situation 
about. They call themselves left-wing, but — as the Brand 
episode has made clear — they are in many ways a sign that 
the left — defined as an agent in a class struggle — has all but 
disappeared. 


Inside the Vampires’ Castle 


The first configuration is what I came to call the Vampires’ 
Castle. The Vampires’ Castle specialises in propagating guilt. 
It is driven by a priest’s desire to excommunicate and 
condemn, an academic-pedant’s desire to be the first to be seen 
to spot a mistake, and a hipster’s desire to be one of the in- 
crowd. The danger in attacking the Vampires’ Castle is that it 
can look as if — and it will do everything it can to reinforce 
this thought — that one is also attacking the struggles against 
racism, sexism, heterosexism. But, far from being the only 
legitimate expression of such struggles, the Vampires’ Castle 
is best understood as a bourgeois-liberal perversion and 
appropriation of the energy of these movements. The 


Vampires’ Castle was born the moment when the struggle not 
to be defined by identitarian categories became the quest to 
have “identities” recognised by a bourgeois big Other. 

The privilege I certainly enjoy as a white male consists in 
part in my not being aware of my ethnicity and my gender, 
and it is a sobering and revelatory experience to occasionally 
be made aware of these blind-spots. But, rather than seeking 
a world in which everyone achieves freedom from 
identitarian classification, the Vampires’ Castle seeks to 
corral people back into identi-camps, where they are forever 
defined in the terms set by dominant power, crippled by self- 
consciousness and isolated by a logic of solipsism which 
insists that we cannot understand one another unless we 
belong to the same identity group. 

I’ve noticed a fascinating magical inversion projection- 
disavowal mechanism whereby the sheer mention of class is 
now automatically treated as if that means one is trying to 
downgrade the importance of race and gender. In fact, the 
exact opposite is the case, as the Vampires’ Castle uses an 
ultimately liberal understanding of race and gender to 
obfuscate class. In all of the absurd and _ traumatic 
twitterstorms about privilege earlier this year it was 
noticeable that the discussion of class privilege was entirely 
absent. The task, as ever, remains the articulation of class, 
gender and race — but the founding move of the Vampires’ 
Castle is the dis-articulation of class from other categories. 

The problem that the Vampires’ Castle was set up to solve 
is this: how do you hold immense wealth and power while 
also appearing as a victim, marginal and oppositional? The 
solution was already there — in the Christian Church. So the 


VC has recourse to all the infernal strategies, dark 
pathologies and _ psychological torture instruments 
Christianity invented, and which Nietzsche described in The 
Genealogy of Morals. This priesthood of bad conscience, this 
nest of pious guilt-mongers, is exactly what Nietzsche 
predicted when he said that something worse than 
Christianity was already on the way. Now, here it is... 

The Vampires’ Castle feeds on the energy and anxieties 
and vulnerabilities of young students, but most of all it lives 
by converting the suffering of particular groups — the more 
“marginal” the better — into academic capital. The most 
lauded figures in the Vampires’ Castle are those who have 
spotted a new market in suffering — those who can find a 
group more oppressed and subjugated than any previously 
exploited will find themselves promoted through the ranks 
very quickly. 

The first law of the Vampires’ Castle is: individualise 
and privatise everything. While in theory it claims to be in 
favour of structural critique, in practice it never focuses on 
anything except individual behaviour. Some of these working 
class types are not terribly well brought up, and can be very 
rude at times. Remember: condemning individuals is always 
more important than paying attention to impersonal 
structures. The actual ruling class propagates ideologies of 
individualism, while tending to act as a class. 


(Many of what we call “conspiracies” are the ruling class 
showing class solidarity.) The VC, as dupe-servants of the 
ruling class, does the opposite: it pays lip service to 
“solidarity” and “collectivity”, while always acting as if the 


individualist categories imposed by power really hold. 
Because they are petit-bourgeois to the core, the members of 
the Vampires’ Castle are intensely competitive, but this is 
repressed in the passive aggressive manner typical of the 
bourgeoisie. What holds them together is not solidarity, but 
mutual fear — the fear that they will be the next one to be 
outed, exposed, condemned. 

The second law of the Vampires’ Castle is: make 
thought and action appear very, very difficult. There must 
be no lightness, and certainly no humour. Humour isn’t 
serious, by definition, right? Thought is hard work, for people 
with posh voices and furrowed brows. Where there is 
confidence, introduce scepticism. Say: don’t be hasty, we have 
to think more deeply about this. Remember: having 
convictions is oppressive, and might lead to gulags. 

The third law of the Vampires’ Castle is: propagate as 
much guilt as you can. The more guilt the better. People 
must feel bad: it is a sign that they understand the gravity of 
things. It’s OK to be class-privileged if you feel guilty about 
privilege and make others in a subordinate class position to 
you feel guilty too. You do some good works for the poor, too, 
right? 

The fourth law of the Vampires’ Castle is: essentialise. 
While fluidity of identity, pluarity and multiplicity are always 
claimed on behalf of the VC members — partly to cover up 
their own invariably wealthy, privileged or bourgeois- 
assimilationist background — the enemy is always to be 
essentialised. Since the desires animating the VC are in large 
part priests’ desires to excommunicate and condemn, there 
has to be a strong distinction between Good and Evil, with the 


latter essentialised. Notice the tactics. X has made a remark/ 
has behaved in a particular way — these remarks/ this 
behaviour might be construed as transphobic/sexist etc. So 
far, OK. But it’s the next move which is the kicker. X then 
becomes defined as a transphobe/sexist, etc. Their whole 
identity becomes defined by one ill-judged remark or 
behavioural slip. Once the VC has mustered its witchhunt, the 
victim (often from a working-class background, and not 
schooled in the passive aggressive etiquette of the 
bourgeoisie) can reliably be goaded into losing their temper, 
further securing their position as pariah/ latest to be 
consumed in feeding frenzy. 

The fifth law of the Vampires’ Castle: think like a 
liberal (because you are one). The VC’s work of constantly 
stoking up reactive outrage consists of endlessly pointing out 
the screamingly obvious: capital behaves like capital (it’s not 
very nice!), repressive state apparatuses are repressive. We 
must protest! 


Neo-Anarchy in the UK 


The second libidinal formation is neo-anarchism. By neo- 
anarchists I definitely do not mean anarchists or syndicalists 
involved in actual workplace organisation, such as the 
Solidarity Federation. I mean, rather, those who identify as 
anarchists but whose involvement in politics extends little 
beyond student protests and occupations, and commenting 
on Twitter. Like the denizens of the Vampires’ Castle, neo- 
anarchists usually come from a petitbourgeois background, if 
not from somewhere even more class-privileged. 


They are also overwhelmingly young: in their twenties or 
at most their early thirties, and what informs the neo- 
anarchist position is a narrow historical horizon. Neo- 
anarchists have experienced nothing but capitalist realism. 
By the time the neo-anarchists had come to political 
consciousness — and many of them have come to political 
consciousness remarkably recently, given the level of bullish 
swagger they sometimes display — the Labour Party had 
become a Blairite shell, implementing neo-liberalism with a 
small dose of social justice on the side. But the problem with 
neo-anarchism is that it unthinkingly reflects this historical 
moment rather than offering any escape from it. It forgets, or 
perhaps is genuinely unaware of, the Labour Party’s role in 
nationalising major industries and utilities or founding the 
National Health Service. Neo-anarchists will assert that 
“parliamentary politics never changed anything”, or the 
“Labour Party was always useless” while attending protests 
about the NHS, or retweeting complaints about the 
dismantling of what remains of the welfare state. There’s a 
strange implicit rule here: it’s OK to protest against what 
parliament has done, but it’s not alright to enter into 
parliament or the mass media to attempt to engineer change 
from there. Mainstream media is to be disdained, but BBC 
Question Time is to be watched and moaned about on Twitter. 
Purism shades into fatalism; better not to be in any way 
tainted by the corruption of the mainstream, better to 
uselessly “resist” than to risk getting your hands dirty. 

It’s not surprising, then, that so many neo-anarchists 
come across as depressed. This depression is no doubt 
reinforced by the anxieties of postgraduate life, since, like the 


Vampires’ Castle, neo-anarchism has its natural home in 
universities, and is usually propagated by those studying for 
postgraduate qualifications, or those who have recently 
graduated from such study. 


What is to be done? 


Why have these two configurations come to the fore? The 
first reason is that they have been allowed to prosper by 
capital because they serve its interests. Capital subdued the 
organised working class by decomposing class consciousness, 
viciously subjugating trade unions while seducing “hard- 
working families” into identifying with their own narrowly 
defined interests instead of the interests of the wider class; 
but why would capital be concerned about a “left” that 
replaces class politics with a moralising individualism, and 
that, far from building solidarity, spreads fear and insecurity? 

The second reason is what Jodi Dean has called 
communicative capitalism. It might have been possible to 
ignore the Vampires’ Castle and the neoanarchists if it 
weren’t for capitalist cyberspace. The VC’s pious moralising 
has been a feature of a certain “left” for many years — but, if 
one wasn’t a member of this particular church, its sermons 
could be avoided. Social media means that this is no longer 
the case, and there is little protection from the psychic 
pathologies propagated by these discourses. 

So what can we do now? First of all, it is imperative to 
reject identitarianism, and to recognise that there are no 
identities, only desires, interests and identifications. Part of 
the importance of the British Cultural Studies project — as 


revealed so powerfully and so movingly in John Akomfrah’s 
installation “The Unfinished Conversation” (currently in the 
Tate Britain) and his film The Stuart Hall Project — was to have 
resisted identitarian essentialism. Instead of freezing people 
into chains of alreadyexisting equivalences, the point was to 
treat any articulation as provisional and plastic. New 
articulations can always be created. No one is essentially 
anything. Sadly, the right act on this insight more effectively 
than the left does. The bourgeois-identitarian left knows how 
to propagate guilt and conduct a witch hunt, but it doesn’t 
know how to make converts. But that, after all, is not the 
point. The aim is not to popularise a leftist position, or to win 
people over to it, but to remain in a position of elite 
superiority, but now with class superiority redoubled by 
moral superiority too. “How dare you talk — it’s we who speak 
for those who suffer!” 

But the rejection of identitarianism can only be achieved 
by the reassertion of class. A left that does not have class at 
its core can only be a liberal pressure group. Class 
consciousness is always double: it involves a simultaneous 
knowledge of the way in which class frames and shapes all 
experience, and a knowledge of the particular position that 
we occupy in the class structure. It must be remembered that 
the aim of our struggle is not recognition by the bourgeoisie, 
nor even the destruction of the bourgeoisie itself. It is the 
class structure — a structure that wounds everyone, even 
those who materially profit from it — that must be destroyed. 
The interests of the working class are the interests of all; the 
interests of the bourgeoisie are the interests of capital, which 
are the interests of no-one. Our struggle must be towards the 


construction of a new and surprising world, not the 
preservation of identities shaped and distorted by capital. 

If this seems like a forbidding and daunting task, it is. But 
we can start to engage in many prefigurative activities right 
now. Actually, such activities would go beyond pre-figuration 
— they could start a virtuous cycle, a selffulfilling prophecy in 
which bourgeois modes of subjectivity are dismantled and a 
new universality starts to build itself. We need to learn, or re- 
learn, how to build comradeship and solidarity instead of 
doing capital’s work for it by condemning and abusing each 
other. This doesn’t mean, of course, that we must always 
agree — on the contrary, we must create conditions where 
disagreement can take place without fear of exclusion and 
excommunication. We need to think very strategically about 
how to use social media — always remembering that, despite 
the egalitarianism claimed for social media by capital’s 
libidinal engineers, that this is currently an enemy territory, 
dedicated to the reproduction of capital. But this doesn’t 
mean that we can’t occupy the terrain and start to use it for 
the purposes of producing class consciousness. We must 
break out of the “debate” that communicative capitalism in 
which capital is endlessly cajoling us to participate in, and 
remember that we are involved in a class struggle. The goal is 
not to “be” an activist, but to aid the working class to activate 
— and transform — itself. Outside the Vampires’ Castle, 
anything is possible. 


good for nothing! 


I’ve suffered from depression intermittently since I was a 
teenager. Some of these episodes have been highly 
debilitating — resulting in self-harm, withdrawal (where I 
would spend months on end in my own room, only venturing 
out to sign-on or to buy the minimal amounts of food I was 
consuming), and time spent on psychiatric wards. I wouldn’t 
say I’ve recovered from the condition, but I’m pleased to say 
that both the incidences and the severity of depressive 
episodes have greatly lessened in recent years. Partly, that is 
a consequence of changes in my life situation, but it’s also to 
do with coming to a different understanding of my 
depression and what caused it. I offer up my own experiences 
of mental distress not because I think there’s anything special 
or unique about them, but in support of the claim that many 
forms of depression are best understood — and _ best 
combatted — through frames that are impersonal and 
political rather than individual and “psychological”. 

Writing about one’s own depression is_ difficult. 
Depression is partly constituted by a sneering “inner” voice 
which accuses you of self-indulgence — you aren’t depressed, 
you're just feeling sorry for yourself, pull yourself together — 


and this voice is liable to be triggered by going public about 
the condition. Of course, this voice isn’t an “inner” voice at all 
— it is the internalised expression of actual social forces, 
some of which have a vested interest in denying any 
connection between depression and politics. 

My depression was always tied up with the conviction that 
I was literally good for nothing. I spent most of my life up to 
the age of thirty believing that I would never work. In my 
twenties I drifted between postgraduate study, periods of 
unemployment and temporary jobs. In each of these roles, I 
felt that I didn’t really belong — in postgraduate study, 
because I was a dilettante who had somehow faked his way 
through, not a proper scholar; in unemployment, because I 
wasn’t really unemployed, like those who were honestly 
seeking work, but a shirker; and in temporary jobs, because I 
felt I was performing incompetently, and in any case I didn’t 
really belong in these office or factory jobs, not because I was 
“too good” for them, but — very much to the contrary — 
because I was over-educated and useless, taking the job of 
someone who needed and deserved it more than I did. Even 
when I was on a psychiatric ward, I felt I was not really 
depressed — I was only simulating the condition in order to 
avoid work, or in the infernally paradoxical logic of 
depression, I was simulating it in order to conceal the fact 
that I was not capable of working, and that there was no place 
at all for me in society. 

When I eventually got a job as lecturer in a Further 
Education college, I was for a while elated — yet by its very 
nature this elation showed that I had not shaken off the 
feelings of worthlessness that would soon lead to further 


periods of depression. I lacked the calm confidence of one 
born to the role. At some not very submerged level, | 
evidently still didn’t believe that I was the kind of person who 
could do a job like teaching. But where did this belief come 
from? The dominant school of thought in psychiatry locates 
the origins of such “beliefs” in malfunctioning brain 
chemistry, which are to be corrected by pharmaceuticals; 
psychoanalysis and forms of therapy influenced by it 
famously look for the roots of mental distress in family 
background, while Cognitive Behavioural Therapy is less 
interested in locating the source of negative beliefs than it is 
in simply replacing them with a set of positive stories. It is 
not that these models are entirely false, it is that they miss — 
and must miss — the most likely cause of such feelings of 
inferiority: social power. The form of social power that had 
most effect on me was class power, although of course 
gender, race and other forms of oppression work by 
producing the same sense of ontological inferiority, which is 
best expressed in exactly the thought I articulated above: that 
one is not the kind of person who can fulfill roles which are 
earmarked for the dominant group. 

On the urging of one of the readers of my book Capitalist 
Realism, I started to investigate the work of David Smail. Smail 
— a therapist, but one who makes the question of power 
central to his practice — confirmed the hypotheses about 
depression that I had stumbled towards. In his crucial book 
The Origins of Unhappiness, Smail describes how the marks of 
class are designed to be indelible. For those who from birth 
are taught to think of themselves as lesser, the acquisition of 
qualifications or wealth will seldom be sufficient to erase — 


either in their own minds or in the minds of others — the 
primordial sense of worthlessness that marks them so early 
in life. Someone who moves out of the social sphere they are 
“supposed” to occupy is always in danger of being overcome 
by feelings of vertigo, panic and horror: 


[...] isolated, cut off, surrounded by hostile space, you 
are suddenly without connections, without stability, 
with nothing to hold you upright or in place; a dizzying, 
sickening unreality takes possession of you; you are 
threatened by a complete loss of identity, a sense of 
utter fraudulence; you have no right to be here, now, 
inhabiting this body, dressed in this way; you are a 


nothing, and “nothing” is quite literally what you feel 
2 


you are about to become. 

For some time now, one of the most successful tactics of 
the ruling class has been responsibilisation. Each individual 
member of the subordinate class is encouraged into feeling 
that their poverty, lack of opportunities, or unemployment, is 
their fault and their fault alone. Individuals will blame 
themselves rather than social structures, which in any case 
they have been induced into believing do not really exist 
(they are just excuses, called upon by the weak). What Smail 
calls “magical voluntarism” — the belief that it is within 
every individual’s power to make themselves whatever they 
want to be — is the dominant ideology and unofficial religion 
of contemporary capitalist society, pushed by reality TV 
“experts” and business gurus as much as by politicians. 
Magical voluntarism is both an effect and a cause of the 


currently historically low level of class consciousness. It is the 
flipside of depression — whose underlying conviction is that 
we are all uniquely responsible for our own misery and 
therefore deserve it. A particularly vicious double bind is 
imposed on the long-term unemployed in the UK now: a 
population that has all its life been sent the message that it is 
good for nothing is simultaneously told that it can do 
anything it wants to do. 

We must understand the fatalistic submission of the UK’s 
population to austerity as the consequence of a deliberately 
cultivated depression. This depression is manifested in the 
acceptance that things will get worse (for all but a small 
elite), that we are lucky to have a job at all (so we shouldn’t 
expect wages to keep pace with inflation), that we cannot 
afford the collective provision of the welfare state. Collective 
depression is the result of the ruling-class project of 
resubordination. For some time now, we have increasingly 
accepted the idea that we are not the kind of people who can 
act. This isn’t a failure of will any more than an individual 
depressed person can “snap themselves out of it” by “pulling 
their socks up”. The rebuilding of class consciousness is a 
formidable task indeed, one that cannot be achieved by 
calling upon ready-made solutions — but, in spite of what our 
collective depression tells us, it can be done. Inventing new 
forms of political involvement, reviving institutions that have 
become decadent, converting privatised disaffection into 
politicised anger: all of this can happen, and when it does, 
who knows what is possible? 


PART 
SEVEN 


ACID 
COMMUNISM 


acid communism 
(unfinished 


introduction)! 


“The spectre of a world which could be free” 


“(T]he closer the real possibility of liberating the 
individual from the constraints once justified by 
scarcity and immaturity, the greater the need for 
maintaining and streamlining these constraints lest the 
established order of domination dissolve. Civilisation 
has to protect itself against the spectre of a world 
which could be free. 


[...] In exchange for the commodities that enrich 
their lives [...] individuals sell not only their labour but 
also their free time. [...] People dwell in apartment 
concentrations — and have private automobiles with 
which they can no longer escape into a different world. 
They have huge refrigerators stuffed with frozen foods. 


They have dozens of newspapers and magazines which 
espouse the same ideals. They have innumerable 
choices, innumerable gadgets which are all of the same 
sort and keep them occupied and divert their attention 
from the real issue — which is the awareness that they 
could both work less and determine their own needs 
and satisfactions.” 


— Herbert Marcuse, Eros and Civlisation” 


The claim of the book is that the last forty years have been 
about the exorcising of “the spectre of a world which could be 
free”. Adopting the perspective of such a world allows us to 
reverse the emphasis of much recent left-wing struggle. 
Instead of seeking to overcome capital, we should focus on 
what capital must always obstruct: the collective capacity to 
produce, care and enjoy. We on the left have had it wrong for 
a while: it is not that we are anti-capitalist, it is that 
capitalism, with all its visored cops, its teargas, and all the 
theological niceties of its economics, is set up to block the 
emergence of this Red Plenty. The overcoming of capital has 
to be fundamentally based on the simple insight that, far 
from being about “wealth creation”, capital necessarily and 
always blocks the production of common wealth. 

The principal, though by no means the sole, agent 
involved in the exorcism of the spectre of a world which 
could be free is the project that has been called neoliberalism. 
But neoliberalism’s real target was not its official enemies — 
the decadent monolith of the Soviet bloc, and the crumbling 
compacts of social democracy and the New Deal, which were 
collapsing under the weight of their own contradictions. 


Instead, neoliberalism is best understood as a project aimed 
at destroying — to the point of making them unthinkable — 
the experiments in democratic socialism and libertarian 
communism that were efflorescing at the end of the Sixties 
and the beginning of the Seventies. 

The ultimate consequence of the elimination these 
possibilities was the condition I have called capitalist realism 
— the fatalistic acquiescence in the view that there is no 
alternative to capitalism. If there was a founding event of 
capitalist realism, it would be the violent destruction of the 
Allende government in Chile by General Pinochet’s American- 
backed coup. Allende was experimenting with a form of 
democratic socialism which offered a real alternative both to 
capitalism and to Stalinism. The military destruction of the 
Allende regime, and the subsequent mass imprisonments and 
torture, are only the most violent and dramatic example of 
the lengths capital had to go to in order to make itself appear 
to be the only “realistic” mode of organising society. It wasn’t 
only that a new form of socialism was terminated in Chile; the 
country also became a lab in which the measures which 
would be rolled out in other hubs of neoliberalism (financial 
deregulation, the opening up of the economy to foreign 
capital, privatisation) were trialled. In countries like the US 
and the UK, the implementation of capitalist realism was a 
much more piecemeal affair, involving inducements and 
seductions as well as repression. The ultimate effect was the 
same — the extirpation of the very idea of democratic 
socialism or libertarian communism. 

The exorcising of the “spectre of a world which could be 
free” was a cultural as well as a narrowly political question. 


For this spectre, and the possibility of a world beyond toil, 
was raised most potently in culture — even, or perhaps 
especially, in culture which didn’t necessarily think of itself 
as politically-orientated. 

Marcuse explains why this is the case, and the declining 
influence of his work in recent years tells its own story. One- 
Dimensional Man, a book which emphasises the gloomier side 
of his work, has remained a reference point, but Eros and 
Civilisation, like many of his other works, has long been out of 
print. His critique of capitalism’s total administration of life 
and subjectivity continued to resonate; whereas the claims 
Marcuse’s conviction that art constituted a “Great Refusal, 


the protest against that which is’? came to seem like 
outmoded Romanticism, quaintly irrelevant in the age of 
capitalist realism. Yet Marcuse had already forestalled such 
criticisms, and the critique in One-Dimensional Man has 
traction because it comes from a second space, an “aesthetic 
dimension” radically incompatible with everyday life under 
capitalism. Marcuse argued that, in actuality, the “traditional 
images of artistic alienation” associated with Romanticism do 
not belong to the past. Instead, he said, in... formulation, they 
“recall and preserve in memory belongs to the future: images 


of a gratification that would destroy the society that 


suppresses it.”” 


The Great Refusal rejected, not only capitalist realism, but 
“realism” as such. There is, he wrote, an “inherent conflict 
between art and political realism”? Art was a positive 
alienation, a “rational negation” of the existing order of 
things. His Frankfurt School predecessor, Theodor Adorno, 


had placed a similar value on the intrinsic alterity of 
experimental art. In Adorno’s work, however, we are invited 
to endlessly examine the wounds of a damaged life under 
capital; the idea of a world beyond capital is despatched into 
a utopian beyond. Art only marks our distance from this 
utopia. By contrast, Marcuse vividly evokes, as an immediate 
prospect, a world totally transformed. It was no doubt this 
quality of his work that meant Marcuse was taken up so 
enthusiastically by elements of the Sixties counterculture. He 
had anticipated the counterculture’s challenge to a world 
dominated by meaningless labour. The most politically 
significant figures in literature, he argued in One-Dimensional 
Man, were “those who don’t earn a living, at least not in an 


ordinary and normal way”.® Such characters, and the forms 
of life with which they were associated, would come to the 
fore in the counterculture. 

Actually, as much as Marcuse’s work was in tune with the 
counterculture, his analysis also forecast its ultimate failure 
and incorporation. A major theme of One-Dimensional Man was 
the neutralisation of the aesthetic challenge. Marcuse 
worried about the popularisation of the avant-garde, not out 
of elitist anxieties that the democratisation of culture would 
corrupt the purity of art, but because the absorption of art 
into the administered spaces of capitalist commerce would 
gloss over its incompatibility with capitalist culture. He had 
already seen capitalist culture convert the gangster, the 
beatnik and the vamp from “images another way of life” into 
“freaks or types of the same life”.’” The same would happen to 
the counterculture, many of whom, poignantly, preferred to 
call themselves freaks. 


In any case, Marcuse allows us to see why the Sixties 
continue to nag at the current moment. In recent years, the 
Sixties have come to seem at once like a deep past so exotic 
and distant that we cannot imagine living in it, and a moment 
more vivid than now — a time when people really lived, when 
things really happened. Yet the decade haunts not because of 
some unrecoverable and unrepeatable confluence of factors, 
but because the potentials it materialised and began to 
democratise — the prospect of a life freed from drudgery — 
has to be continually suppressed. To explain why we have not 
moved to a world beyond work we have to look at a vast 
social, political and cultural project whose aim has been the 
production of scarcity. Capitalism: a system that generates 
artificial scarcity in order to produce real scarcity; a system 
that produces real scarcity in order to generate artificial 
scarcity. Actual scarcity — scarcity of natural resources — 
now haunts capital, as the Real that its fantasy of infinite 
expansion must work overtime to repress. The artificial 
scarcity — which is fundamentally a scarcity of time — is 
necessary, as Marcuse says, in order to distract us from the 
immanent possibility of freedom. (Neoliberalism’s victory, of 
course, depended upon a cooption of the concept of freedom. 
Neoliberal freedom, evidently, is not a freedom from work, 
but freedom through work.) 

Just as Marcuse predicted, the availability of more 
consumer goods and devices in the global North has obscured 
the way in which those same goods have increasingly 
functioned to produce a scarcity of time. But perhaps even 
Marcuse could not have anticipated twenty-first-century 
capital’s capacity to generate overwork and to administer the 


time outside paid work. Maybe only a mordant futurologist 
like Philip K. Dick could have predicted the banal ubiquity of 
corporate communication today, its penetration into 
practically all areas of consciousness and everyday life. 

“The past is so much safer”, observes one of the narrators 
of Margaret Atwood’s dystopian satire, The Heart Goes Last, 
“because whatever’s in it has already happened. It can’t be 


changed: so, in a way there’s nothing to dread”.® Despite what 
Atwood’s narrator thinks, the past hasn’t “already 
happened”. The past has to be continually re-narrated, and 
the political point of reactionary narratives is to suppress the 
potentials which still await, ready to be re-awakened, in older 
moments. The Sixties counterculture is now inseparable from 
its own simulation, and the reduction of the decade to 
“iconic” images, to “classic” music and to _ nostalgic 
reminiscences has neutralised the real promises that 
exploded then. Those aspects of the counterculture which 
could be appropriated have been repurposed as precursors of 
“the new spirit of capitalism”, while those which were 
incompatible with a world of overwork have been condemned 
as so many idle doodles, which in the contradictory logic of 
reaction, are simultaneously dangerous and impotent. 

The subduing of the counterculture has seemed to 
confirm the validity of the scepticism and hostility to the 
kind of position Marcuse was advancing. If “the 
counterculture led to neoliberalism”, better that the 
counterculture had not happened. In fact, the opposite 
argument is more convincing — that the failure of the left 
after the Sixties had much to do with its repudiation of, or 
refusal to engage with, the dreamings that the counterculture 


unleashed. There was no inevitability about the new right’s 
seizure and binding of these new currents to its project of 
mandatory individualisation and overwork. 

What if the counterculture was only a_ stumbling 
beginning, rather than the best that could be hoped for? 
What if the success of neoliberalism was a not an indication of 
the inevitability of capitalism, but a testament to the scale of 
the threat posed by the spectre of a society which could be 
free? 

It is in the spirit of these questions that this book shall 
return to the 1960s and 1970s. The rise of capitalist realism 
could not happened without the narratives that reactionary 
forces told about those decades. Returning to those moments 
will allow us to continue with the process of unpicking the 
narratives that neoliberalism has woven around them. More 
importantly, it will enable the construction of new narratives. 

In many ways, re-thinking the 1970s is more important 
than revisiting the 1960s. The 1970s was the decade that 
neoliberalism began a rise that it would retrospectively 
narrate as irresistible. However, recent work on the 1970s — 
including Jefferson Cowie’s Stayin’ Alive: The Last Days of the 
Working Class, Andy Beckett’s When the Lights Went Out and 
John Medhurst’s That Option No Longer Exists — has emphasised 
that the decade wasn’t only about the draining away of the 
possibilities that had exploded in the Sixties. The Seventies 
was a period of struggle and transition, in which the meaning 
and legacy of the previous decade was one of the crucial 
battlegrounds. Some of the emancipatory tendencies that had 
emerged during the Sixties intensified and proliferated 
during the Seventies “[Flor many politicised Britons”, Andy 


Beckett has written, “the decade was not the hangover after 
the Sixties; it was the point when the great Sixties party 


actually started”.? 


The successful Miners’ Strike of 1972 saw an alliance between 
the striking miners and students that was echoed similar 
convergences in Paris 1968, with the miners using the 
University of Essex’s Colchester campus as their East Anglian 
base. 

Moving far beyond the simple story that the “Sixties led 
to neoliberalism”, these new readings of the 1970s allow us to 
apprehend the bravura intelligence, ferocious energy and 
improvisational imagination of the neoliberal counter- 
revolution. The installation of capitalist realism was by no 
means a simple restoration of an old state of affairs: the 
mandatory individualism imposed by neoliberalism was a 
new form of individualism, an individualism defined against 
the different forms of collectivity that clamoured out of the 
Sixties. This new individualism was designed to both surpass 
and make us forget those collective forms. So to recall these 
multiple forms of collectivity is less an act of remembering 
than of unforgetting, a counter-exorcism of the spectre of a 
world which could be free. 

Acid Communism is the name I have given to this spectre. 
The concept of acid communism is a provocation and a 
promise. It is a joke of sorts, but one with very serious 
purpose. It points to something that, at one point, seemed 
inevitable, but which now appears impossible: the 
convergence of class consciousness,  socialist-feminist 
consciousness-raising and psychedelic consciousness, the 


fusion of new social movements with a communist project, an 
unprecedented aestheticisation of everyday life. 

Acid communism both refers to actual historical 
developments and to a virtual confluence that has not yet 
come together in actuality. Potentials exert influence without 
being actualised. Actual social formations are shaped by the 
potential formations whose actualisation they seek to 
impede. The impress of “a world which could be free” can be 
detected in the very structures of a capitalist realist world 
which makes freedom impossible. 

The late cultural critic Ellen Willis said that the 
transformations imagined by the counterculture would have 
required “a social and psychic revolution of almost 


inconceivable magnitude”.!° It’s very difficult, in our more 
deflated times, to re-create the counterculture’s confidence 
that such a “social and psychic revolution” could not only 
happen, but was already in the process of unfolding. But we 
need now to return to a time when the prospect of universal 
liberation seemed imminent. 


No More Miserable Monday Mornings 


Let’s begin with a moment that is all the more richly 
evocative because of its apparent modesty: 


It was July 1966 and I was newly nine years old. We had 
holidayed on the Broads and the family had recently 
taken possession of the gorgeous wooden cruiser that 
was to be our floating home for the next fortnight. It 
was called The Constellation and, as my brother and I 
breathlessly explored the twin beds and curtained 


portholes in our cabin built into the boat’s bow, the 
prospect of what lay ahead saw the life force beaming 
from us like the rays of a cartoon sun. [...] I [...] made 
my way up to through the boat to take up position in 
the small area of the stern. On the way, I pick up sister 
Sharon’s teeny pink and white Sanyo transistor radio 
and switched it on. I looked up at the clear blue 
afternoon sky. Ike and Tina Turner’s “River Deep, 
Mountain High” was playing and a sort of rapturous 
trance descended on me. From the limitless blue sky I 
looked down into the churning, crystal-peaked wake 
our boat was creating as we motored along, and at that 
moment, “River Deep” gave way to my absolute 
favourite song of the period: “Bus Stop” by the Hollies. 
As the mock flamenco guitar flourish that marks its 
beginning rose above the deep burble of the 
Constellation’s engine, I stared into the tumbling waters 


and said aloud, but to myself, “This is happening now. 
11 


THIS is happening now. 

This account comes from Going To Sea in a Sieve, the 
memoirs of the writer and broadcaster Danny Baker. It ought 
to go without saying that this was nothing more than a 
snapshot, one sun-saturated image from a period that 
contained more than enough misery and horror. The Sixties 
were not a realised utopia, just as the opportunities that lay 
ahead for Baker would not be available to most working-class 
people. Similarly, it would be easy to discount Baker’s reverie 
as nostalgia for lost childhood, the kind of golden memories 
that practically anyone from any historical period or social 


background might have. 

Yet there is something very specific about this moment, 
something that means it could have only happened then. We 
can enumerate some of the factors that made it unique: a 
sense of existential and social security that allowed working- 
class families to take holidays at all; the role that new 
technology such as transistor radios played in both 
connecting groups to an outside and enabling them to 
luxuriate in the moment, a moment that was somehow 
exorbitantly sufficient; the way that genuinely new music — 
music that wasn’t imaginable a few months never mind a few 
years before — could crystallise and intensify this whole 
scene, imbue it with a sense of casual but not complacent 
optimism, a sense that the world was improving. 

This sense of exorbitant sufficiency could be heard in the 
Kinks’ “Sunny Afternoon”, which Baker might well have also 
heard on the same transistor radio that day, or in the Beatles’ 
“T’m Only Sleeping”, which would come out a month later; or 


> 


in later releases like the Small Faces’ “Lazy Sunday”. These 
tracks apprehended the anxiety-dream toil of everyday life 
from a perspective that floated alongside, above or beyond it: 
whether it was the busy street glimpsed from the high 
window of a late sleeper, whose bed becomes a gently idling 
rowing boat; the fog and frost of a Monday morning abjured 
from a sunny Sunday afternoon that does not need to end; or 
the urgencies of business airily disdained from the eyrie of a 
meandering aristocratic pile, now occupied by working-class 
dreamers who will never clock on again. 

“I’m Only Sleeping” (“stay in bed, float upstream”) was 
the twin of Revolver’s most self-consciously psychedelic track, 


“Tomorrow Never Knows” (“switch off your mind, relax and 
float downstream”). If the lyrics to “Tomorrow Never 
Knows”, minimally adapted from The Psychedelic Experience: A 
Manual Based on the Tibetan Book of the Dead, seem somewhat 
pat, the music, the sound design, retain the power to 
transport. “It wasn’t like anything else we’d ever heard”, John 
Foxx recalls of “Tomorrow Never Knows”, 


but somehow seemed instantly recognisable. Sure, the 
words were a bit suspect, but the music, the sound — 
organic electricity, disintegrated transmissions, lost 
radio stations, Catholic/Buddhist mass from a parallel 
universe, what being stoned ought to be like — 
weightless, timeless, revelation, moving over luminous 
new landscapes in serene velocity. It communicated, 


innovated, infiltrated, fascinated, elevated — it was a 
2 


road map for the future.? 

These “luminous new landscapes” were worlds beyond 
work, where drudgery’s dreary repetitiveness gave way to 
drifting explorations of strange terrains. Listened to now, 
these tracks describe the very conditions necessary for their 
own production, which is to say, access to a certain mode of 
time, time which allows a deep absorption. 

The refusal of work was also a refusal to internalise the 
systems of valuation which claimed that one’s existence is 
validated by paid employment. It was, that is to say, a refusal 
to submit to a bourgeois gaze which measured life in terms of 
success in business. “I didn’t come from a background where 
people had ‘careers’, Danny Baker writes. “You went to 


work, you had different jobs at different times, but it was all 
in a jumble. It did not define you or plot your course in life — 
and thank God for that.” Baker left school in South East 
London with no qualifications. Yet he is careful that his 
picaresque journey from record shop assistant, to fanzine 
producer, music journalist and television and radio presenter 
should not be seen as either a hard luck nor a hard work 
story. He doesn’t tell it as a petit-bourgeois narrative of 
“betterment”, but of recklessness rewarded. This 
“recklessness” came out of a sense that fulfilment wasn’t to 
be expected from work, and from an immense confidence, 
which allows him to _ consistently rebuff bourgeois 
imperatives and anxieties. The two volumes of Baker’s 
memoirs lay out very clearly the factors which allowed this 
confidence to grow: the comparative stability of his father’s 
work, in thriving docks that seemed as if they would remain 
at the heart of British economic life forever; the family’s 
embedding in a working-class network that supplemented 
wages with “bunce”; its acquisition of a brand-new council 
flat with a garden. His own movement into writing and 
broadcasting was facilitated not by any entrepreneurial drive, 
but by a newly emerging public sphere — constituted out of 
parts of television, radio and print media — in which 
working-class perspectives were validated and valued. But 
this was not a working class which could be understood 
according to the protocols of kitchen-sink or socialist realism 
anymore than it was limited by ruling-class caricature. It was 
a working class that no longer knew its place, that had gotten 
above itself. Even the old redoubts of the bourgeoisie were no 
longer secure. In the Sixties, Ted Hughes had become one of 


Britain’s leading poets, Harold Pinter one of its most exciting 
new dramatists, both of them producing work which 
reflected working-class experience in challenging and 
difficult ways, and taking it — via television — into the living 
rooms of a mass audience. 

In any case, we are a long way from the disappearance of 
class later that would later be trumpeted by neoliberal 
ideologues. The settlements that labour and capital had come 
to in societies like the US and the UK accepted that class was 
a permanent feature of social organisation. They assumed 
that there were different class interests which had to be 
reconciled, and that any effective, not to mention just, 
governance of society would have to involve the organised 
working class. Trade unions were strong, emboldened in their 
demands by low unemployment. Working-class expectations 
were high — gains had been made, but more were surely on 
the way. It was easy to imagine that the uneasy truces 
between capital and labour would end, not with a resurgence 
of the right, but with an embrace of more socialistic policies, 
if not quite the “full communism” that Nikita Krushchev 
thought would be in place by 1980. After all — or so it seemed 
— the right was on the backfoot, discredited and perhaps 
fatally damaged in the US because of the protracted and 
horrific failure of the Vietnam War. The “establishment” no 
longer commanded automatic deference; instead, it came to 
seem exhausted, out of touch, obsolete, limply awaiting to be 
washed away by any or all of the new cultural and political 
waves which were eroding all the old certainties. 

Where the new culture was not being driven by those 
from working-class backgrounds, it seemed that it was being 


led by class renegades such as Pink Floyd, young people from 
bourgeois families who had rejected their own class destinies 
and identified “downwards”, or outwards. They wanted to do 
anything but go into business and banking: fields whose 
subsequent libidinisation would have boggled the expanded 
minds of the Sixties. 

Working-class aspiration did not equate to class mobility, 
where the dubious reward was gradual and grudging 
acceptance by “betters”. Instead, the new bohemia seemed to 
point to the elimination of the bourgeoisie and its values. 
Indeed, it was the conviction that this was imminent which 
was one of the few areas of overlap between the 
counterculture and the traditional revolutionary left, who 
seemed in many other respects to be at variance with one 
another. 

Ellen Willis certainly felt that the dominant forms of left- 
wing politics were incompatible with the desires and 
ambitions triggered and tranduced by music. While the music 
that she listened to spoke of freedom, socialism seemed to be 
about centralisation and state control. The counterculture’s 
politics might have been opposed to capitalism, Willis 
thought, but this did not entail a straightforward rejection of 
everything produced in the capitalist field. Her “polemic 
against standard leftist notions about advanced capitalism” 
rejected at best only half-true the ideas “that the consumer 
economy makes us slave to commodities, that the function of 


the mass media is to manipulate our fantasies, so we will 


equate fulfilment with buying the system’s commodities”. 


Mass culture — and music culture in particular — was a 
terrain of struggle rather than a dominion of capital. The 


relationship between aesthetic forms and politics was 
unstable and inchoate — aesthetic forms did not simply 
“express” some already-existing capitalist reality, they 
anticipated and actually produced new possibilities. 
Commodification was not the point at which this tension 
would always and inevitably be resolved in favour of capital; 
rather, commodities could themselves be the means by which 
rebellious currents could propagate: 


the mass media helped to spread rebellion, and the 
system obligingly marketed products that encouraged 
it, for the simple reason that there was money to be 
made from rebels who were also consumers. On one 
level the sixties revolt was an impressive illustration of 
Lenin’s remark that the capitalist will sell you the rope 


to hang him with.'* 


In the UK, Stuart Hall felt similar frustrations with much 
of the existing left — frustrations that were all the more 
intense in his case because he thought of himself as a 
socialist. But the socialism that Hall wanted — a socialism 
that could engage with the yearnings and dreamings that he 
heard in Miles Davis’ music — was yet to be created, and its 
arrival was obstructed as much by figures from the left as 
from the right. 

The first obstructive figure of the left was the complacent 
steward of Cold War organised labour or social democracy: 
backward-looking, bureaucratic, resigned to the 
“inevitability” of capitalism, more interested in preserving 
the income and status of white men than in expanding the 


struggle to include..., this figure is defined by compromise 
and eventual failure. 

The other figure — what I want to call the Harsh Leninist 
Superego — is defined by its absolute refusal of compromise. 
According to Freud, the superego is characterised by the 
quantitatively and qualitatively excessive nature of its 
demands: whatever we do, it’s never enough. The Harsh 
Leninist Superego mandates a militant ascesis. The militant 
will be single-mindedly dedicated to the revolutionary event, 
and unflinchingly committed to the means necessary to bring 
it about. The Harsh Leninist Superego is as indifferent to 
suffering as it is hostile to pleasure Lenin’s phobic response to 
music is instructive here: “I can’t listen to music too often. It 
affects your nerves, makes you want to say stupid nice things 
and stroke the heads of people who could create such beauty 
while living in this vile hell.” 

While the complacent leaders of organised labour were 
invested in the status quo, the Harsh Leninist Superego stakes 
everything on a world absolutely different to this one. It was 
this post-revolutionary world which would redeem the 
Leninist, and it was from the perspective of this world that 
they judged themselves. In the meantime, it is legitimate and 
indeed necessary to cultivate an indifference towards current 
suffering: we can and must step over homeless people, 
because giving to charity only obstructs the coming of the 
revolution. 

But this revolution had little in common with the “social 
and psychic revolution of almost inconceivable magnitude” 
that Ellen Willis thought was seeded in the counterculture’s 
dreamings. The revolution as she conceived of it would at 


once be more immediate — it would fundamentally concern 
how care and domestic arrangements were organised — and 
more far-reaching: the transformed world would be 
unimaginably stranger than anything Marxist-Leninism had 
projected. The counterculture thought it was already 
producing spaces where this revolution could already be 
experienced. 

To get some sense of what those spaces were like, we can 


> 


do no better than listen to the Tempations’ “Psychedelic 
Shack”, released in December 1969. The group play the role of 
breathless ingénues who have just returned from some kind 
of Wonderland: “Strobe lights flashin’ way till after 
sundown... There ain’t no such thing as time... Incense in the 
air...” 

For all the familiarity of these signifiers, listening to 
“Psychedelic Shack” now can actually bring us up short. 
Invited to think about the psychedelic, our first associations 
might be with solipsistic withdrawal (the lyrics of a track like 
“Tomorrow Never Knows” invite just such an association). 
Yet “Psychedelic Shack” describes a space that is very 
definitely collective, that bustles with all the energy of a 
bazaar. For all its carnivalesque departures from everyday 
reality, however, this is no remote utopia. It feels like an 
actual social space, one you can imagine really existing. You 
are as likely to come upon a crank or a huckster as a poet or 
musician here, and who knows if today’s crank might turn 
out to be tomorrow’s genius? It is also an egalitarian and 
democratic space, and a certain affect presides over 
everything. There is multiplicity, but little sign of resentment 
or malice. It is a space for fellowship, for meeting and talking 


as much for having your mind blown. If “there’s no such 
thing as time” — because the lighting suspends the 
distinction between day and night; because drugs affect time- 
perception — then you are not prey to the urgencies which 
make so much of workaday life a drudge. There is no limit to 
how long conversations can last, and no telling where 
encounters might lead. You are free to leave your street 
identity behind, you can transform yourself according to your 
desires, according to desires which you didn’t know you had. 

The crucial defining feature of the psychedelic is the 
question of consciousness, and its relationship to what is 
experienced as reality. If the very fundamentals of our 
experience, such as our sense of space and time, can be 
altered, does that not mean that the categories by which we 
live are plastic, mutable? Understood in individual terms, this 
quickly leads to the facile relativism and a naive voluntarism 
that the Temptations themselves had targeted on their first 
psychedelic soul single, “Cloud Nine”. Sure, you can be what 
you want to be, but only by being a million miles from reality, 
only by leaving behind all your responsibilities. This 
superegoic appeal could have been endorsed by conservatives 
as well as a certain brand of radical: conservatives, who 
wanted everyone to knuckle down to work; militants, who 
demanded commitment to revolution, which — they said — 
entailed an attention to the horrors of the world, not a quick 
fix flight from the real. 

Yet the claim that altered states of consciousness took you 
a “million miles away from reality” was question-begging. It 
foreclosed the idea that altered state of consciousness could 
offer a perception of the systems of power, exploitation and 


ritual that was more, not less, lucid than ordinary 
consciousness. In the Sixties, when consciousness was 
increasingly besieged by the fantasies and images of 
advertising and capitalist spectacle, how solid was the 
“reality” from which psychedelic states fled in any case? 
Wasn’t the state of consciousness susceptible to spectacle 
more like somnambulance than alertness or awareness? 

In retrospect, one of the most remarkable features of the 
psychedelic culture of the 1960s was the way it mainstreamed 
such metaphysical questions. The psychedelic was not new — 
many pre-capitalist societies had incorporated psychedelic 
visions and the use of hallucinogens into their ritual practice. 
What was new was the break out of the psychedelic from 
particular ritualised spaces and times, and from the control of 
particular practitioners, such as shamans and sorcerers. 
Experiments with consciousness were now in principle open 
to anyone. Despite all the mysticism and pseudo-spiritualism 
which has always hung over psychedelic culture, there was 
actually a demystificatory and materialist dimension to this. 
Widespread experiments with consciousness promised 
nothing less than a democratisation of neurology itself — a 
newly widespread awareness of the brain’s role in producing 
what was experienced as reality. Those on acid trips were 
externalising the workings of their own brain, and potentially 
learning to use their brains differently. 

Yet psychedelic experiences were not confined to those 
who had taken drugs. The very mass media which 
mainstreamed psychedelic concepts along with the Vietnam 
War was itself a massive experiment in altering 
consciousness. With television, the breakdown of the 


distinction between dreams and waking life that film had 
begun now entered “private” domestic space. Television was 
at the centre of a media landscape that was still only just 
assembling, and which no one understood because nothing 
like it had ever existed before. The Beatles released their first 
album only a few months before the assassination of John F. 
Kennedy. Television was channel for contagion 
(Beatlemania!), trauma and hysteria as much as paternalistic 
messages or commercial huckstering. No one had been as 
famous in their own lifetime as the Beatles, because the 
infrastructure for such a fame was only just being created, 
and the Beatles themselves were playing a part in building it, 
as if — at one and the same time — the world had become an 
extension of their own electronic dream, and they had 
become characters in everyone else’s dream. 

You might say that the Beatles’ own psychedelic turn was 
an attempt to convert all of this into a lucid dream. This is the 
quality of Sgt Pepper’s “A Day in the Life”, which plays out the 
difference between Lennon’s lucid dream calm and the 
urgencies of work life (McCartney’s breathless commuter, 
who reaches the bus in seconds flat). Yet escape from 
urgencies is always achingly proximate — once on the bus, 
McCartney’s immediately character falls into a dream. 

Lennon sounds dispassionate but not detached; there is 
humour but no blokish familiarity. His vocal seems to 
intimate that the ordinary somnambulance of the workaday 
world can only be properly apprehended from the 
perspective afforded by a different kind of trance. Or is it, 
rather, that a voice disconnected from the imperatives of 
working/waking life comes off as catatonic? The tracks shows 


us the inside seen from outside, as Lennon takes us on 
journey through the different ways in which consciousness is 
electronically mediated (by newspapers, film, television): “1 
read the news today, oh boy”. 

This contrast between urgency and lucidity was 
everywhere in Jonathan Miller’s television adaptation of 
Alice’s Adventures in Wonderland. It was broadcast on BBC 
television in December 1966, and reflected the influence of 
the Beatles even as it would go on to influence the Beatles in 
turn. Shot in black and white, the film has a strangely sober, 
almost austere visual style, devoid of any special effects or 
florid imagery. This fits with the adaptation’s most striking 
innovation, its rendering of the characters not as animals, but 
as human beings. “Once you take the animal heads off”, 
Miller told Life, “you begin to see what it’s all about. A small 
child, surrounded by hurrying, worried people, thinking: ‘is 
this what being grown up is like?’” 

The film is pervaded by an atmosphere of lassitude, of 
languor and catatonia that sometimes lurches into sudden 
panic and helplessness. Miller again: “The book, by dressing 
things up in animal clothes, presents a disguised — a dream- 
disguised — domestic charade. [...] All the levels of authority 


and order-giving and obedience are reflected.” The 
ordinary world appears as a _ tissue of Nonsense, 
incomprehensibly inconsistent, arbitrary and authoritarian, 
dominated by bizarre rituals, repetitions and automatisms. It 
is itself a bad dream, a kind of trance. In the solemn and 
autistic testiness of the adults who torment and perplex Alice, 
we see the madness of ideology itself: a dreamwork that has 
forgotten it is a dream, and which seeks to make us forget 


too, by sweeping us up in its urgencies, by perplexing us with 
its lugubrious dementia, or by terrifying us with its sudden, 
unpredictable and insatiable violence. 

The laugher that this Alice provokes — sometimes uneasy, 
sometimes uproarious — is a laughter that comes from the 
outside. It is a psychedelic laughter, a laughter that — far 
from confirming or validating the values of any status quo — 
exposes the bizarreness, the inconsistency, of what had been 
taken for common sense. Is this not the laugher that Michel 
Foucault describes in a justly renowned passage from the 
Preface to The Order of Things, a book that was originally 
published in the same year that Miller’s version of Alice was 
broadcast? Foucault refers there to a story by Borges in which 


he quotes a ‘certain Chinese encyclopaedia’ in which it 
is written that “animals are divided into: (a) belonging 
to the Emperor, (b) embalmed, (c) tame, (d) suckling 
pigs, (e) sirens, (f) fabulous, (g) stray dogs, (h) included 
in the present classification, (i) frenzied, (j) 
innumerable, (k) drawn with a very fine camelhair 
brush, (I) et cetera, (m) having just broken the water 
pitcher, (n) that from a long way off look like flies”. In 
the wonderment of this taxonomy, the thing we 
apprehend in one great leap, the thing that, by means 
of the fable, is demonstrated as the exotic charm of 
another system of thought, is the limitation of our own, 


the stark impossibility of thinking that.'® 


This perspective, this laughter from the outside, runs 
through all Foucault’s work. For all its intricacy, its density 


and opacity, Foucault’s major work from The History of 
Madness at the beginning of the 1960s, in the... through to the 
books on sexuality he would publish after the Death Valley 
seem to revolve around and repeat a fundamental insight, or 
outsight. ... the arbitrariness and contingency of any system, 
its plasticity. 

If this outside vision was consonant with the psychedelic 
consciousness, in Foucault’s case it did not have its origins in 
drugs. Foucault wouldn’t consume LSD until nearly a decade 
later, when he headed out to Death Valley and took acid at 
Zabriskie Point, the site of Michelangelo Antonioni’s film 
about the counterculture. 

Foucault, seldom comfortable in his own skin, was always 
looking for a way out of his own identity. He had memorably 
claimed that he wrote “in order not to have a face”, and his 
prodigious exercises in rogue scholarship and conceptual 
invention, the textual labyrinths he meticulously assembled 
from innumerable historical and philosophical sources, were 
one way out of the face. Another route was what he called the 
limit-experience, one version of which was his encounter 
with LSD. The limit-experience was paradoxical: it was an 
experience at and beyond the limits of “ordinary” experience, 
an experience of what cannot ordinarily be experienced at all. 
The limit-experience offered a kind of metaphysical hack. The 
conditions which made ordinary experience possible could 
now be encountered, transformed and escaped — at least 
temporarily. Yet, by definition, the entity which underwent 
this could not be the ordinary subject of experience — it 
would instead be some anonymous X, a faceless being. 

Much of the music that came out of the counterculture 


gave voice to this entity from the outside, and Foucault’s turn 
to the limit-experience paralleled popular experimentations 
with consciousness. “[T]he problem”, Foucault said, in one of 
the interviews collected in the book Remarks on Marx, 


is not to recover our “lost” identity, to free our 
imprisoned nature, our deepest truth; but instead, the 
problem is to move towards something radically Other. 
The center, then, seems still to be found in Marx’s 
phrase: man produces man. [...] For me, what must be 
produced is not man identical to himself, exactly as 
nature would have designed him or according to his 
essence; on the contrary, we must produce something 
that doesn’t yet exist and about which we cannot know 


how and what it will be.!” 


In a commentary on Foucault’s text, Michael Hardt has 
argued that “the positive content of communism, which 
corresponds to the abolition of private property, is the 


autonomous production of humanity — a new seeing, a new 


hearing, a new thinking, a new loving.” ® 


A new humanity, a new seeing, a new thinking, a new 
loving: this is the promise of acid communism, and it was the 
promise that you could hear in “Psychedelic Shack” and the 
culture that inspired it. Only five years separated 
“Psychedelic Shack” from the Tempations’ early signature hit 
“My Girl”, but how many new worlds had come into being 
then? In “My Girl”, love remains sentimentalised, confined to 
the couple, in “Psychedelic Shack”, love is collective, and 
orientated towards the outside. 


With “Psychedelic Shack”, the Temptations were a year 
into the new sound that the group’s unofficial leader, Otis 
Williams, had persuaded producer Norman Whitfield to 
develop. Whitfield had initially been reluctant to change the 
Temptations’ sound but his eventual conversion would lead 
to some of the most stunning productions in popular music 
history: productions that would build on the promise that 
“Tomorrow Never Knows” evoked, but which the Beatles 
themselves would rarely make good on. Whitfield became so 
entranced by the psychedelic soundscapes he worked on in 
the studio that he would push for The Temptations to release 
tracks that were eight or nine minutes long, with space for 
extended instrumental passages. He formed the group the 
Undisputed Truth specifically as a lab to try out these long- 
form lysergic productions. Whitfield’s experimentation with 
the studio as a compositional tool paralleled what Lee 
“Scratch” Perry was doing in Jamaica with dub. The sonic 
spaces they opened up were also about a particular 
experience of time: a distended time, a time that was at once 
denuded, and populated with strange audio unlike forms, 
which enticed the listener into a deep immersion in the 
moment, even as they enfolded us into rhythmic patterns and 
pulses. This new space-time would later be revisited and 
refurbished by new explorers such as Tom Moulton, Larry 
Levan and Walter Gibbons: the inventors of the extended 
dance track, which would in turn form the basis of the 
psychedelic genres such as house, techno and jungle. 

The template for the new Temptations’ sound had been 
Sly and the Family Stone, with traces of James Brown and Jimi 
Hendrix: a febrile matrix, composed of elements which were 


already interacting with one another. The change in sound 
was more than a shift in style; it was also responded to a new 
set of demands and expectations of what music could be. No 
longer confined to love-song balladeering or good-time 
cheerleading, popular music could now be social comment; 
even better, it could feed off and feed back into the social 
transformations that were dissolving former certainties, 
prejudices, assumptions. It could take its bearings from the 
confidence, anger and assertiveness that was brimming out of 
the Civil Rights movement, and it could perform a new set of 
social relations that gave a heady taste of what the world 
might look like once the movement had succeeded. That is 
what Greil Marcus heard and saw in Sly and the Family Stone 
in his great 1975 essay, “The Myth of Staggerlee”: 


Sly’s real triumph was that he had it both ways. Every 
nuance of his style, from the razzle dazzle of his 
threads to the originality of his music, made it clear 
that we was his own man. If the essence of his music 
was freedom, no one was more aggressively free than 
he. Yet there was also room for everyone in the 
America made up of blacks and whites, men and 
women, who sang out “different strokes for different 


folks” and were there on stage to show what such an 
4.19 


idea of independence mean 
Sly and the Family Stone did indeed seem to have it every 
way: with a sound that was somehow ramshackle, improvised, 
and yet sinuously danceable; a music that was neither 
sentimental, nor sanctimonious, but humorous and deadly 


serious all at the same time. 

The laughter of Alice, the ludic freedom and daring 
embodied by Sly and the Family Stone: they might have been 
performed by an advanced guard, but there was no necessity 
for them to be confined to an elite. On the contrary, the 
question that their presence on radio and TV insistently 
posed was: why shouldn’t this bohemia be open to everyone? 


Despite much of the traditional left’s deafness and hostility to 
these currents, the counterculture did have an impact on the 
workplace, in struggles conducted by a new kind of worker. 
“It’s a different generation of workingmen”, explained J.D. 
Smith, a union treasurer at the Chevy Vega plant in 
Lordstown, Ohio. “None of these guys came over from the old 
country, grateful for any job they could get. None of them 
have been through a depression. They’ve been exposed — at 
least through television — to all the youth movements of the 


last ten years and they don’t see the disgrace of being 


unemployed.””° 


In 1972, the Lordstown Plant was embroiled in a struggle 
over working conditions which reflected the new intolerance 
towards drudgery and authoritarianism. “The Lordstown 
workers”, Jefferson Cowie writes, 


became a collective national symbol for the new breed 
of worker and emblematic of a widespread sense of 
occupational alienation. People gravitated to the 
refreshing vision of youth, vitality, inter-racial 
solidarity hidden from the public behind the likes of 
television’s Archie Bunker, prowar labor leadership, 


and the growing politics of the blue-collar backlash.”1 


Lordstown was part of a wave of activism in which this 
“new breed of worker” struggled for democratic control of 
their own trade unions and of the places in which they 
worked. Seen in the light of such struggles, the egalitarian 
social space projected in “Psychedelic Shack” could not be 
dismissed as a passive pipe-dream or a distraction from 
actual political activity. Rather, music such as this was an 
active dreaming which arose out of real social and cultural 
compositions, and which fed back into potent new 
collectivities, and a new existential atmosphere, which 
rejected both drudgery and traditional resentments. “The 
young black and white workers dig each other”, said the 
Lordstown Local president Gary Bryner, “There’s an 
understanding. The guy with the Afro, the guy with the 
beads, the guy with the goatee, he doesn’t care if he’s black, 
white, green or yellow.” These new kinds of workers — who 


“smoked dope, socialised interracially, and dreamed of a 


"22 _ wanted 


democratic control of both their workplace and their trade 
unions. 


world in which work had some meaning 


Something of the same ferment was building in Italy, where a 
new kind of worker was increasingly visible. “This new 
generation of workers did not have so much to do with the 
old tradition of the labor parties”, says Franco Berardi of the 
situation in Turin in 1973. “Nor anything to do with the 
socialist ideology of a state-owned system. A massive refusal 
of the sadness of work was the leading element behind their 


protest. Those young workers had much more to do with the 


hippy movement; much more to do with the history of the 


avant-garde.” 


By 1977, a whole new social mix, a “mass avant-garde”, 
was in place in Bologna. It was here, perhaps more than 
anywhere else, that acid communism came together as an 
actual formation. The city seethed with the energy and 
confidence that erupts when new ideas commingle with new 
aesthetic forms. 


The university was filled with terroni (people 
originating from the South), Germans, comedians, 
musicians and cartoonists like Andrea Pazienza and 
Filippo Scozzari. Artists were squatting houses in the 
center of the city, and running creative places such as 
Radio Alice and Traumfabrik. Some people were 
reading books like Anti-Oedipus, some were reciting 
poems by Majakovski and Artaud, listening to the music 


of Keith Jarrett and The Ramones, and inhaling dream 
24 


inducing substances. 
As In February, A/traverso, the zine published by Berardi and 
others young militants, produced an issue entitled “The 
revolution is just, possible and necessary: look comrades, the 
revolution is probable”: 


We want to expropriate all the assets of the Catholic 
Church 

Cut the working hours, increase the number of jobs 

Increase the amount of the salary 


Transform production and place it under workers’ control 

Liberation of the huge amount of intelligence that is 
wasted by capitalism: Technology has been used so far as a 
means of control and exploitation. 

It wants to be turned into a tool for liberation. 

Working less is possible thanks to the application of 
cybernetics and informatics. 

Zerowork for income 

Automate all production 

All power to living labor 

All work to dead labor. 


In 1977, such demands seemed not only realistic but 
inevitable — “look comrades, the revolution is probable”. Of 
course, we now know that the revolution did not happen. But 
the material conditions for such a revolution are more in 
place in the twenty-first century than they were in 1977. 
What has shifted beyond all recognition since then is the 
existential and emotional atmosphere. Populations are 
resigned to the sadness of work, even as they are told that 
automation is making their jobs disappear. We must regain 
the optimism of that Seventies moment, just as we must 
carefully analyse all the machineries that capital deployed to 
convert confidence into dejection. Understanding how this 
process of consciousness-deflation worked is the first step to 
reversing it. 


notes 


Editor’s Introduction 


10 
11 


12 


13; 
14. 
15. 
16. 


17. 


- From the 2010 interview 


‘ Tim Burrows, “‘We Have To Invent The Future’: An Unseen Interview With Mark Fisher”, Quietus, (22 


January 2017), http://thequietus.com/articles/21616-mark-fisher-interview-capitalist-realism-sam- 
berkson (Also in this volume, pp. 675-682) 


666 


They Can Be Different in the Future Too’: Interviewed by Rowan Wilson for 
Ready Steady Book (2010)” (Also in this volume, pp. 627-636) 


- k-punk, “One Year Later”, (17 May 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/002926.html 


(Also in this volume, p. 693) 


- k-punk, “Why K?”, (16 April 2005), http://k-punk.org/why-k/ (Also in this volume, pp. 31-32) 
 k-punk, “Book Meme”, (28 June 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005771.html (Also 


in this volume, pp. 37-41) 


‘ Mark Fisher, “Exiting the Vampire Castle”, North Star, (22 November 2013), 


http://www.thenorthstar.info/?p=11299, (Also in this volume, pp.737-745) 


 k-punk, “New Comments Policy”, (5 September 2004), http://k-punk.org/new-comments-policy/ (Also 


in this volume, pp. 701-702) 


- k-punk, “We Dogmatists”, (17 February 2005), http://k- 


punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005025.html (Also in this volume, pp. 709-710) 


- k-punk, “Noise as Anti-Capital”, (21 November 2004), http://k- 


punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/004441.html (Also in this volume, pp. 285-289) 


* See the Zer0 Books manifesto in this volume, p. 103 
‘ David Stubbs, “Remembering Mark Fisher”, Quietus, (16 January 2017), 


http://thequietus.com/articles/21572-mark-fisher-rip-obituary-interview 


- Mark Fisher (ed.), The Resistable Demise of Michael Jackson, (Zer0, 2009); Mark Fisher, Kodwo Eshun and 


Gavin Butt (eds.), Post-Punk Then and Now, (Repeater Books, 2016) 
k-punk, “Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan”, (13 June 2004), (Also in this volume, pp. 47-51) 
Mark Fisher, “What is Hauntology?”, Film Quarterly, 66:1, 2012 
Frederic Jameson, Postmodernism or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism, (Verso, 1992), p. 48 
Ibid., pp. 48-49 
Ibid., p. 159 


Why K? 


1. k-punk, (16 April 2005), http://k-punk.org/why-k/ 


“Well, I’m still enough of a neophyte to be thrilled by a mention in Village Voice. I suppose it is ironic that 


Geeta describes k-punk as ‘cultural studies’, given my notorious antipathy to cult studs. On the other 
hand, though, k-punk is cultural studies as I’d always thought it should be practised (much of my 


hostility to cult studs stems from a disappointment when faced with the depressing, guilt-mongering 
reality of cultural studies in the academy). Anyway, this is the full text that I sent to Geeta”. See Geeta 
Dayal, “PH.Dotcom”, Village Voice, (5 April 2005), https://www.villagevoice.com/2005/04/05/ph- 
dotcom/ 


PART ONE 

METHODS OF DREAMING: BOOKS 

Book Meme 

1. k-punk, (28 June 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005771.html 
Space, Time, Light, All the Essentials — Reflections on J.G. Ballard Season (BBC Four) 


1. k-punk, (8 October 2003), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/000590.html 


2 See Jean Baudrillard, Simulacra and Simulation, (Michigan, 1994) 


3- “The Enormous Space” was published in Ballard’s 1990 anthology, War Fever, (Collins, 1990) 


4- Sigmund Freud, Civilisation and its Discontents, (1930) 


5» The American illusionist David Blaine undertook Above the Below in 2003, an endurance stunt in which 


he was sealed inside a transparent Plexiglas case suspended mid-air in London, and where he fasted for 
forty-four days. 


Why I Want to Fuck Ronald Reagan 


1. k-punk, (13 June 2004), http://k-punk.org/why-i-want-to-fuck-ronald-reagan/ 

2. Published as Chapter 14 of J.G. Ballard’s The Atrocity Exhibition (Jonathan Cape, 1970) 

3- Ballard, The Atrocity Exhibition, p. 170 

4- Jean Baudrillard, Symbolic Exchange and Death, (Sage, 2007), p. 92 

>- Ballard, The Atrocity Exhibition, p. 165 

‘ Frederic Jameson, Postmodernism, or, The Cultural Logic of Late Capitalism, (Verso, 1991), p. 17 

' See Ibid., pp. 155-180 and Jameson, Archaeologies of the Future: The Desire Called Utopia and Other Science 
Fiction, (Verso, 2005) 


‘ It appears in a section of Burroughs’ Naked Lunch titled “Meeting of International Conference of 
Technological Psychiatry”, where Doctor “Fingers” Schafer presents his “Master Work: The Complete 
All American Deanxietized Man...” 


: J.G. Ballard, Crash, (Jonathan Cape, 1973); Jean Baudrillard, Simulacra and Simulation, (University of 
Michigan Press, 1994), p. 111-120 


A Fairground’s Painted Swings 


 k-punk, (24 February 2005), http://k-punk.org/a-fairgrounds-painted-swings/ 

‘ Infinite Thought, aka Nina Power. The blog is no longer available online. 

- Auguste Villiers de l’Isle-Adam, L’Eve Future, translated as Tomorrow’s Eve (University of Illinois Press, 
1982), p. 68 


‘ Gregory Bateson, “The Cybernetics of ‘Self: A Theory of Alocoholism”, Steps to an Ecology of Mind: 
Collected Essays in Anthropology, Psychiatry, Evolution and Epistemology, (University of Chicago Press, 2000), 
pp. 309-337. Also available online: http://ift-malta.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/07/Thecybernetics- 


of-self-A-theory-of-alcoholism.pdf 


What Are the Politics of Boredom? (Ballard 2003 Remix) 


1. k-punk, (8 March 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005135.html 
2. J.G. Ballard, Millenium People, (Fourth Estate, 2003) 

3- Tbid., p. 61 

4- Ibid. 

>- Ibid., p. 63 

6. Ibid., p. 140 

‘ Francis Fukuyama, The End of History and the Last Man, (Penguin, 1993), p. 305 
8. Ballard, Millenium People, p. 175 

9. Thid., p. 176 

10. Tbid., p. 149 

11. Thid., p. 166 

12. Thid., p. 249 

13. Thid., p. 85 

14. Thid., p. 104 

15. Thid., p. 109 


Let Me Be Your Fantasy 


1. k-punk, (27 August 2006) http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/008304.html 
2. Renata Select, (Per)Versions of Love and Hate, (Verso, 2000) 

3. Jean Baudrillard, Seduction, (St Martins Press, 1991) 

4- Tbid., pp. 31-32 


‘ Indeed, in a 1999 interview Ballard says, 


He has created this extremely imaginative world in a way that I don’t think any other figurative artist 
on this planet could match. I think that Newton is the greatest figurative artist working today. I don’t 
think there’s anybody anywhere who remotely approaches him in his creative achievement. 

6 From Ballard’s piece “The Lucid Dreamer” in Bookforum, 1999 

7. See Rodley (ed.), Cronenberg on Cronenberg, (Faber and Faber, 1997), p. 194 

8: Tain Sinclair, Crash, (BFI Film Classics, 1999) 


Fantasy Kits: Steven Meisel’s “State of Emergency” 


1. Guest post on Ballardian, (25 September 2006), http://www.ballardian.com/fantasy-kits-steven-meisels- 


state-of-emergency 
' “State Of Emergency” editorial, Vogue Italia September 2006. Photographer: Steven Meisel. Model: 
Hilary Rhoda & Iselin Steiro, https://trendland.com/state-of-emergency-by-steven-meisel/ 
3- k-punk, “Let Me Be Your Fantasy”, (27 August 2006), http://k- 
punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/008304.html (Also in this volume, pp. 63-67) 
4. See k-punk, “My Card: My Life: Comments on the AMEX Red Campaign”, (4 September 2006), 
http://www.any-body.org/anybody_vent/2006/9/4/my-cardmy-life-your-comments.html (Also in this 
volume, pp. 455-456) 


>- Joanna Bourke, “A Taste for Torture?”, Guardian, (13 September 2006), 


https://www.theguardian.com/artanddesign/2006/sep/13/photography.pressandpublishing 


- Simon Sellars,“JGB’s Sinister Marriage”, Ballardian, (14 September 2006), 


http://www.ballardian.com/jgbs-sinister-arriage 


7. J.G. Ballard, The Atrocity Exhibition, (Jonathan Cape, 1970), p. 12 


8. 


See MOMA profile of Martha Rosler, https://www.moma.org/artists/6832? 
-undefined&page=1 &direction= 


* See review of Weiss’ film on Ballardian, http://www.ballardian.com/weiss-atrocity-exhibition-review 


The Assassination of J.G. Ballard 


1. 


Ballardian, (28 April 2009), http://www.ballardian.com/rip-jgb-tributes-from-theballardosphere-part-4 


2. J.G. Ballard, The Atrocity Exhibition: Annotated Edition, (Flamingo, 1993), p. 17 
3. J.G. Ballard, “Myth-Maker of the 20th Century” in New Worlds 142 (1964) 


A World of Dread and Fear 


1. 
Ze 
3. 


k-punk, (13 September 2005), http://k-punk.org/a-world-of-dread-and-fear/ 
David Peace, GB84, (Faber & Faber, 2004) 


See Andy Beckett’s review of Peace’s GB84 in London Review of Books, Vol. 26, No. 18, (23 September 2004), 
https://www.I|rb.co.uk/v26/n18/andy-beckett/political-gothic 


‘ Frederic Jameson, “Culture and Finance Capital”, The Cultural Turn: Selected Writings on Postmodernism, 


1983-1998, (Verso, 2009), p. 154 


* See Joseph Brooker, “Orgreave Revisited: David Peace’s GB84 and the return to the 1980s”, Radical 


Philosophy, Volume 133, https://www.radicalphilosophy.com/article/orgreave-revisited 


" Peace, GB84, p. 7 
: Ibid., p. 176 
' Ibid., p. 320 


Ripley’s Glam 


 k-punk, (1 July 2006), http://k-punk.org/ripleys-glam/ 
' Patricia Highsmith, The Talented Mr Ripley, (Vintage, 1999), p. 164 
‘ Slavoj Zizek, “When Straight Means Weird and Psychosis is Normal”, 


http://www.lacan.com/ripley.html 


‘ Highsmith, The Talented Mr Ripley, p. 78 
‘ Thornstein Veblen, The Theory of the Leisure Class, (Dover, 1994), p 13 
- Ibid., p. 10 


Methods of Dreaming 


1. 


k-punk, (10 October 2008), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/010739.html 


Atwood’s Anti-Capitalism 


1. 


2. 


k-punk, (26 September 2009), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011314.html 


Fredric Jameson, “Then You Are Them (review of Margaret Atwood’s The Year of the Flood)”, London 


Review of Books, Vol. 31, No.17, (10 September 2009) 


‘ Guy Sorman,“Economics Does Not Lie”, City Journal, Summer 2008, https://www.city- 
journal.org/html/economics-does-not-lie-13099.html 


4- Margaret Atwood, Oryx and Crake, (Bloomsbury, 2009), p. 165 

>- Tbid., p. 305 

6 Margaret Atwood, The Year of the Flood, (Bloomsbury, 2009), p. 316 

7. Immanuel Kant, Critique of Judgment, (Hackett, 1987), p. 342 

- Guy Sorman, cited in ZiZek’s First as Tragedy, Then as Farce, (Verso, 2009), p. 24 


Toy Stories: Puppets, Dolls and Horror Stories 


ray 


' Frieze, (1 September 2010), https://frieze.com/article/toy-stories 

* Thomas Ligotti, The Conspiracy Against the Human Race: A Contrivance of Horror, (Hippocampus, 2011) 

‘Ian Penman, “Notes Towards a Ritual Exorcism of the Dead King” in Mark Fisher (ed.), The Resistible 
Demise of Michael Jackson, (Zer0, 2009) 

4- Giovanni Tiso, “The Unmaking of Pinocchio”, Bat, Bean, Beam, (3 August 2010), https://bat-bean- 

beam.blogspot.co.uk/2010/08/unmaking-of-pinocchio.html 


>- Richard Seymour, “Chattel Story”, Lenin’s Tomb, (8 August 2010), 
http://www.leninology.co.uk/2010/08/chattel-story.html 


6 Giovanni Tiso, “Useful Life”, Bat, Bean, Beam, (19 July 2010), https://bat-bean- 
beam.blogspot.co.uk/2010/07/useful-life.html 


Zer0 Books Statement 


' This is the mission statement written by Mark Fisher at the inception of the radical publisher Zer0 
Books which he co-founded with his friend Tarig Goddard in 2009. It was reprinted in each of the books 
published by Zer0, through their leaving to form Repeater in 2014, until January 2018 when a modified 
version was adopted by the new management. In addition to all of his writing, it is important to 
remember the vital role Mark played in helping to revolutionise the existing British publishing 
industry, and theoretical writing in particular, that was in the absolute doldrums leading up to the 
formation of Zer0. 


PART TWO 
SCREENS, DREAMS AND SPECTRES: FILM AND TELEVISION 


A Spoonful of Sugar 


1. k-punk, (5 April 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/002354.html 


She’s Not My Mother 


1. k-punk, (10 June 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/003227.html 


2. andrew O’Hehir, “The Baron of Blood does Bergman”, Salon, (28 February 2003), 
https://www.salon.com/2003/02/28/cronenberg_3/ 


3- Joy Division, “Decades”, Closer, (Factory Records, 1980) 


4- O’Hehir, “The Baron of Blood does Bergman” 


Stand Up, Nigel Barton 


1. k-punk, (13 June 2004), http://k-punk.org/stand-up-nigel-barton/ 
2. Dennis Potter, The Nigel Barton Plays, (Penguin, 1967), p. 31 

3- Friedrich Nietzsche, Beyond Good and Evil, (Penguin, 2009) 

4- Potter, The Nigel Barton Plays, p. 21 


Portmeirion: An Ideal for Living 


1. k-punk, (31 August 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/004048.html 


2. Peter Stallybrass and Allon White, “The Fair, the Pig, Authorship”, The Politics and Poetics of 
Transgression, (Cornell University Press, 1986), p. 30 


- The complete text of which is available here: http://www.bopsecrets.org/SI/Chtcheglov.htm 
* Taken from https://www.portmeirion-village.com/visit/clough-williams-ellis/ 


‘ See https://www.portmeirion-village.com/visit/clough-williams-ellis/ 
Golgothic Materialism 


1. Hyperstition, (15 October 2004), http://hyperstition.abstractdynamics.org/archives/004275.html 


2. Slavoj ZiZek,“Passion in the Era of Decaffeinated Belief’, The Symptom: Online Journal for lacan.com, Issue 
5, Winter 2004, http://www.lacan.com/passionf.htm 


This Movie Doesn’t Move Me 


1. k-punk, (13 March 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005171.html 


2. Rachel Cooke,“What’s Up Doc”, Observer, (6 March 2005), 
https://www.theguardian.com/theobserver/2005/mar/06/features.review17 


3- Justin Barton, http://scanshifts.blogspot.co.uk/ 


Fear and Misery in the Third Reich ‘n’ Roll 


1. k-punk, (9 June 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005664.html 

2. Gilles Deleuze and Félix Guattari, Capitalism and Schizophrenia: A Thousand Plateaus, (Continuum, 1987), p. 
230 

3- See Christoph Cox, “On Evil: An Interview with Alenka Zupancié”, Cabinet Magazine, Issue 5, Winter 
2001/2, http://www.cabinetmagazine.org/issues/5/alenkazupancic.php 


We Want It All 


1. k-punk, (12 February 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/007348.html 


2. “Celebrity Big Brother — Autopsy or Prologue?”, The Church of Me, (1 February 2006), 
http://cookham.blogspot.co.uk/2006_02_01_archive.html 


Gothic Oedipus: Subjectivity and Capitalism in Christopher Nolan’s Batman Begins 


1. ImageTexT: Interdisciplinary Comic Studies, 2:2, 2006 


2. For asummary of the ethical assumptions of this world, look no further than K.W. Jeter’s Noir (Orion, 
1998) (a novel that is heavily indebted to both Gibson and Blade Runner). Jeter has his hardboiled 
novelist, Turbiner, define the essence of noir as follows: 


The looks, the darkness, the shadows, all those trite rain-slick streets — that was the least of it. That had 
nothing to do with it. [...] It’s betrayal [...] That’s what it’s always been. That’s what makes it so realistic, 
even when it is at its most dreamlike and shabby, when it feels like it’s happening on another planet. 
The one we lost and can’t remember, but we can see it when we close our eyes... (p. 192) 


For an (unfavourable) comparison of Miller’s Sin City with Forties noir, see Patterson, 2005. 


- Alan Moore is an interesting parallel case to Miller. Moore, too, made his name with comics that put 
superheroes in a more “realistic” context. He seemed similarly ambivalent about the superhero genre, 
drawn to work within it but also driven by a desire to reform and to some extent demythologise it. 
However, Moore’s more recent work — on The League of Extraordinary Gentlemen and Promethea — has 
explicitly dealt with the concept of mythologisation (although, naturally, this is quite different from 
actually producing a character that attains a mythological status). Moore also retains a place for a kind 
of egalitarian critique of State power which is lacking in Miller: see for instance his depiction of 
aristocratic corruption and conspiracy in From Hell. 

‘ Alain Badiou, Ethics: An Essay on the Understanding of Evil, (Verso, 2002), p. 7 

* Christoph Cox and Molly Whalen, “On Evil: An Interview with Alain Badiou”, Cabinet, Issue 5, Winter 
2001/2, http://www.cabinetmagazine.org/issues/5/alainbadiou.php 

6. Tbid. 


‘ Otherwise, Badiou would be contradicting himself, claiming on the one hand that capitalism is “ideal” 

and that it destroys any reference to the ideal. 

‘ Kim Newman, “Cape Fear”, Sight & Sound, July 2005. As Newman’s piece establishes, with a detailed 

scholarly survey of the origin of the film’s characters and set pieces. 

‘ For an explanation of the concept of hyperstition, see http://hypersti...tractdynamics.org, especially 

“How Do Fictions Become Hyperstitions”, http://hypersti...chives/003345.html 

10. This modification is in fact prompted by Miller’s Dark Knight Returns. 

11. It is significant that perhaps the three greatest American superheroes — Batman, Superman, and 
Spiderman — are orphans, but the Oedipal torment is most intense in Batman. (It is displaced in 
Spiderman onto his Aunt, the mother-substitute for and to whom he is eternally responsible, and 
Uncle, for whose death he feels guilty.) 

12. Newman,“Cape Fear”. As Newman’s piece establishes, with a detailed scholarly survey of the origin of 

the film’s characters and set pieces. 


13. Alena Zupanti¢, Ethics of the Real: Kant, Lacan, (Verso, 2000), p. 245. She goes on to say: 


That which brings the story of Oedipus close to the noir universe is, of course, the fact that the hero — 
the detective — is without knowing it, implicated in the crimes he is investigating. One could even say 
that the story of Oedipus lies at the heart of the” “new wave” of film noir — films such as Angel Heart and 
Blade Runner (the director’s cut), where it emerges at the end that the hero is himself the criminal he is 
looking for. (pp. 245-6) 

14. Thid., p. 193 


15. In this respect, as in so many others, it compares favourably with Tim Burton’s Batman. Burton 
pioneered a kind of psycho-biographically-inclined” “Dark-Lite”, and his account of the Joker’s origin 
— man falls into bath of acid and goes psychotic — traded in the cheapest and shallowest psycho- 
biographical cliché. 

16. Slavoj Zizek, “Revenge of Global Finance”, In These Times, (21 May 2005), 
http://inthesetimes.com/article/2122/revenge_of_global_finance 


17. He was also, according to Newman, “perhaps the first upper middle-class black character in comics” 


(Newman, “Cape Fear”). 


18. which suggests, perhaps, a looping of cyberpunk (to which Batman in many ways now belongs) back 
to (one of) its origins in German Expressionism. 


19. China Miéville, comment on a post at Lenin’s Tomb. Newman also spotted a 9/11 parallel: 


Batman Begins finally feeds back into the world of 2005, even as it picks up threads from 1939 and 1986. 
Fear (phobos), the limited realm of the bat-phobic Bruce and phobia-expert Crane, has been subsumed 
by terror (deimos). This America is riven by injustice, and is haunted by a fanatic eastern sect witha 
charismatic but impossible-to-catch figurehead bent on crashing a mode of transport into a skyscraper 
to trigger an explosion of panic that will destroy society. (Newman, “Cape Fear”, p. 21) 


20. For an analysis of which, see Fisher and Mackay, Pomophobia (1996) 


When We Dream, Do We Dream We’re Joey? 


1. k-punk, (1 October 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/006484.html 
2. David Cronenberg (dir.), A History of Violence, (2005) 


3- Jacques Lacan, “The Split Between the Eye and the Gaze”, The Four Fundamental Concepts of 


Psychoanalysis, (Norton, 1973) 

Peter Bradshaw, “Review of A History of Violence”, Guardian, (30 September 2005), 
https://www.theguardian.com/culture/2005/sep/30/2 

‘ Slavoj ZiZek, Looking Awry: An Introduction to Jacques Lacan through Popular Culture, (October, 1992), pp. 
89-90 

6 Graham Fuller, “Good Guy Bad Guy”, Sight and Sound, 15, October 2005 


7. JG. Ballard, “The Killer Inside”, Guardian, (23 September 2005), 
https://www.theguardian.com/film/2005/sep/23/jgballard 


8. Slavoj Zizek, Welcome to the Desert of the Real, (Verso, 2002), p. 12 
?. Graham Fuller, “Good Guy Bad Guy” 
10. Slavoj Zizek, The Universal Exception, (Bloomsbury, 2006), pp. 308-9 


Notes on Cronenberg’s eXistenZ 


1. Unpublished k-punk notes on David Cronenberg’s eXistenZ which formed the later essay “Work and 
Play in eXistenZ” in Film Quarterly, Vol. 65, No. 3 (Spring 2012), pp. 70-73 


2. Nick Land, “Meltdown”, Fanged Noumena: Collected Writings 1987- 2007, (Falmouth: Urbanomic), p. 456 


I Filmed It So I Didn’t Have to Remember It Myself 


1. k-punk, (21 October 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/006647.html 


2. Jean Baudrillard, Simulacra and Simulation, (University of Michigan, 1994) 


Spectres of Marker and the Reality of the Third Way 


1. k-punk, (18 February 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/007392.html 


2. Seamus Milne, “Communism may be dead, but clearly not dead enough”, Guardian, (16 September 2006), 
https://www.theguardian.com/Columnists/Column/0,,1710891,00.html 


Dis-identity Politics 


1. k-punk, (25 April 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/007709.html 


2. Steven Shaviro, “V for Vendetta”, http://www.shaviro.com/Blog/?p=488#comments 

3- See Jenni Russell, “Tony Blair’s authoritarian populism is indefensible and dangerous”, Guardian, (24 
April 2006), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2006/apr/24/comment.labour 

4. Fredric Jameson, “Marx’s Purloined Letter”, in Sprinker (ed.), Ghostly Demarcations: A Symposium on 
Jacques Derrida’s Spectres of Marx (Verso, 1999) 

>. Giovanni Tiso, https://bat-bean-beam.blogspot.co.uk/ 


“You Have Always Been the Caretaker”: The Spectral Spaces of the Overlook Hotel 


1. Perforations, 29, (2007), http://noel.pd.org/Perforations/perf29/perf29_index.html 


2. Frederic Jameson, “Historicism in The Shining”, Signatures of the Visible, (Psychology Press, 1992), p. 90 


2 Sigmund Freud, “Moses and Monotheism”, James Strachley (ed.), The Origins of Religion: Totem and Taboo, 

Moses and Monotheism and Other Works, (Penguin, 1990) 

4. Stephen King, The Shining, (Penguin, 1997), p. 356 

>- David A. Cook, “America Horror: The Shining”, Literature/Film Quarterly, 12.1, 1984 

®- King, The Shining, p. 356 

‘ Walter Metz, “Toward a Post-Structural Influence in Film Genre Study: Intertextuality and The 
Shining”, Film Criticism, Vol. XXII, 1, Fall 1997 

‘ Metz in fact argues that the situation is more complex, arguing that Horror, as well as melodrama, has 
taken the family as its subject. 

‘ See, for instance, Lisa Gye’s hypertext project “Half Lives” 
(http://pandora.nla.gov.au/pan/30305/20020815-0000/halflives.adc.rmit.edu.au/index.html), which 
explores the concept of hauntology through her own family history. 

10. See Zizek, Slavoj, “The Big Other Doesn’t Exist”, Journal of European Psychoanalysis, Spring - Fall 1997, 

online at 

11. King, The Shining, p. 437 

12. Thid., p. 362 

13. Thid., p. 319 

- Freud, “Moses and Monotheism”, p. 374 

‘ Metz, “Toward a Post-Structural Influence in Film Genre Study: Intertextuality and The Shining”, p. 57 

16. King, The Shining, p. 437 


17. Metz, “Toward a Post-Structural Influence in Film Genre Study: Intertextuality and The Shining”, p. 57 


Coffee Bars and Internment Camps 


1. k-punk, (26 January 2007), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/008956.html (A truncated 
and reworked version of this piece provides the opening pages of Capitalist Realism (Zer0, 2009)) 

2. Jeff Nuttall, Bomb Culture, (Paladin, 1968). A book about the London counter-culture which reflected the 
omnipresent threat of nuclear annihilation. 

3- David Edelstein, “Review of Children of Men”, New York Magazine, 2006, 
http://nymag.com/movies/listings/rv_51038.htm 


Ge Oe 


‘ Latin for “the sacred man” or“ “the accursed man” — a figure of Roman law, a person who is banned 
and may be killed by anybody. See Giorgio Agamben, Homo Sacer: Sovereign Power and Bare Life, (Stanford, 


1998) 
>. T.S Eliot, “Tradition and Individual Talent”, The Sacred Wood (1920) 


Rebel Without a Cause 


1. k-punk, (6 August 2008), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/010555.html 


2. Andrew Klavern, “What Bush and Batman Have in Common”, Wall Street Journal, (25 July 2008), 
https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB121694247343482821 

‘ Slavoj ZiZek and Geert Lovink, “Japan Through a Slovenian Looking Glass: Reflections of Media and 
Politic and Cinema”, InterCommunication, 14, 1995 

‘ Inspersal’s blog is no longer online. 


>. Matthew Yglesias, “Dark Knight Politics”, Atlantic, (24 July 2008), 
https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2008/07/-em-dark-knight-em-politics/49451/ 


Robot Historian in the Ruins 


1. k-punk, (27 August 2008), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/010636.html 

* Voyou, “Ideology critics are a superstitious, cowardly lot”, Dangerous and Lazy, (4 August 2008), 

https://blog.voyou.org/2008/08/04/ideology-critics-are-a-superstitious-cowardly-lot/ 

3. See Wayne Wedge’s comments on k-punk post, “Bat Mailbag”, (11 August 2008), http://k- 
punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/010572.html (Wedge writes of The Dark Knight: “A lucrative kiddie 
icon self-consciously invoking the nightmares of history. 
TimeWarnerAolHalliburtonBlackwaterWayneenterprises demanding that we gather in our millions to 
watch, re-watch, discuss and argue about this corporate meta-product arguing with itself.” 


4- Kyle Smith, “WALL-E: A Gloom-E Satire”, Free Republic, (27 June 2008), 
http://www.freerepublic.com/focus/f-chat/2037224/posts 


>- Paul Edwards, “WALL-E’s Indictment of Liberalism”, Townhall, (2 July 2008), 
https://townhall.com/Columnists/pauledwards/2008/07/02/wall-es-indictment-ofliberalism-n1062814 


Review of Tyson 


1. Sight and Sound, April 2009 


2. Joyce Carol Oates, “Kid Dynamite: Mike Tyson is the most exciting heavyweight fighter since 
Muhammad Ali”, Life, March 1987 


“They Killed Their Mother”: Avatar as Ideological Symptom 


1. k-punk, (6 January 2010), http://k-punk.org/they-killed-their-mother-avatar-as-ideological-symptom/ 

2. Greg Egan, “Avatar Review”, (20 December 2012), 
http://www.gregegan.net/ESSAYS/AVATAR/Avatar.html 

3- Slavoj Zizek, First as Tragedy, Then as Farce, (Verso, 2009), p. 97 


Precarity and Paternalism 


1. k-punk, (11 February 2010), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011486.html 

2. Taylor Parkes, “Review: Life on Earth Soundtrack”, Quietus, (17 December 2009), 
http://thequietus.com/articles/03440-life-on-earth-trunk-records-compilation-review 

‘ JJ. Charlesworth, “Crisis at the ICA: Ekow Eshun’s Experiment in Deinstitutionalisation”, Mute, (10 
February 2010), http://www.metamute.org/editorial/articles/crisis-ica-ekow-eshuns-experiment- 
deinstitutionalisation 


‘ Alex Williams, “On Negative Solidarity and Post-Fordist Plasticity”, Splintering Bone Ashes, (31 January 


5: 


2010), http://splinteringboneashes.blogspot.co.uk/2010/01/negative-solidarity-and-post-fordist.html 


Tobias van Even, “Business Ontology (or why Xmas gets you fired)”, Fugitive Philosophy, (29 December 
2009), http://fugitive.quadrantcrossing.org/2009/12/business-ontology/ 


Return of the Gift: Richard Kelly’s The Box 


1. 
2. 


k-punk, (14April 2010), http://k-punk.org/return-the-gift-richard-kellys-the-box/ 
See Graham Harman, “Duel”, Object-Oriented Philosophy, (8 January 2010), 
https://doctorzamalek2.wordpress.com/2010/01/08/duel/ 


‘ See interview with Richard Kelly: “Richard Kelly Cracks Open THE BOX For Mr. Beaks!”, Aint It Cool 


News, (18/06/09), http://www.aintitcool.com/node/41449 


‘ Norbert Wiener, God and Golem, Inc.: A Comment on Certain Points Where Cybernetics Impinges on Religion, 


(MIT, 1963) 


- Nina Power’s Infinite Thought blog is no longer online. See Jean-Paul Sartre, Critique of Dialectical Reason, 


Book III, (Routledge, 2000), p. 320 


Contributing to Society 


 k-punk, (4 August 2010), http://k-punk.org/contributing-to-society/ 


‘ “PeoplePlus”, a trading name for “A4e”, formerly known as Action for Employment, is a for-profit 


welfare-to-work company based in the UK. 


* Thornbridge Hall, http://www.thornbridgehall.co.uk/ 

‘ See http://watchinga4e.blogspot.co.uk/ 

: http://watchinga4e.blogspot.co.uk/2010/08/who-knows-best.html 

‘ Digital Ben, “Fairy Jobmother Deconstructed”, Third Class on a One Class Train, (24 July 2010), 


http://ridingthirdclass.blogspot.co.uk/2010/07/fairy-jobmotherdeconstructed.html 


‘ See http://theviewfromcullingworth.blogspot.co.uk/ 
‘ Ivor Southwood, Non-Stop Inertia, (Zer0, 2010) 


“Just Relax and Enjoy It”: Geworfenheit on the BBC 


* k-punk, (4 August 2010), http://k-punk.org/just-relax-and-enjoy-itgeworfenheit-on-the-bbc/ 
‘ Neil Young, “Down At The World’s End: David Rudkin’s Artemis 81”, Neil Young’s Film Lounge, (20 October 


2007), https://www.jigsawlounge.co.uk/film/reviews/down-at-the-world-s-end-david-rudkin-s- 
artemis-81-tv-1981-8-10/ 


‘ Phillip Challinor, “Artemis 81”, The Curmudgeon, 


http://thecurmudgeonly.blogspot.co.uk/2007/12/artemis-81.html 


Star Wars Was a Sell-Out from the Start 


1. 


Guardian, (1 November 2012), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2012/nov/01/star-wars- 
disney-sell-out 


Gillian Wearing: Self Made 


1. 


Sight and Sound, June 2012 


Batman’s Political Right Turn 


1. 


Guardian, (22 July 2012), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2012/jul/22/batman-political- 


right-turn 


* On 20 July 2012 a mass shooting occurred in a cinema in Aurora, Colorado during a midnight screening 


of the film The Dark Knight Rises. The shooter, James Egan Holmes, killed twelve people and injured 
seventy others. 


‘ John Nolte, “Occupy Wall Street in Damage Control Mode Over Dark Knight Rises”, Breitbart, (19 July 


2012), http://www.breitbart.com/big-hollywood/2012/07/19/occupy-damage-control-dark-kinght/ 


Remember Who The Enemy Is 


* k-punk, (25 November 2013), http://k-punk.org/remember-who-the-enemy-is/ 
‘ Unemployed Negativity, “Primer for the Post-Apocalypse: The Hunger Games Trilogy”, (5 September 


2011), http://www.unemployednegativity.com/2011/09/primer-for-post-apocalypse-hunger- 
game.html?spref=fb 


* See Mark Fisher, “Precarious Dystopias: The Hunger Games, In Time, and Never Let Me Go”, Film 


Quarterly, Vol. 65, No. 4, Summer 2012, pp. 27-33 


‘ Franco Bifo Berardi, Precarious Rhapsody: Semiocapitalism and the Pathologies of the Post-alpha Generation. 


(Minor Compositions, 2009), p. 55 


Beyond Good and Evil: Breaking Bad 


1. 


New Humanist, (18 December 2012) 


Classless Broadcasting: Benefits Street 


1. 
23 


New Humanist, (17 February 2014) 


Tracey Jensen, “A Summer of Television Poverty Porn”, Sociological Imagination, (9 September 2013), 
http://sciologicalimagination.org/archives/14013 


* See John Corner, “Performing the Real: Documentary Diversions”, Television & New Media, (1 August 


2002), http://journals.sagepub.com/doi/abs/10.1177/152747640200300302 


‘ Beverley Skeggs and Helen Wood, Reacting to Reality Television: Performance, Audience and Value, 


(Routledge, 2012) 


Rooting for the Enemy: The Americans 


1. 


New Humanist, (1 October 2014) 


How to Let Go: The Leftovers, Broadchurch and The Missing 


1. 


New Humanist, (2 March 2015) 


The Strange Death of British Satire 


iL, 
Ze 
3. 


New Humanist, (24 August 2015) 
Author of Wounded Leaders: British Elitism and the Entitlement Illusion, (Lone Arrow Press, 2014) 


Nick Duffell, “Why Boarding Schools Produce Bad Leaders”, Guardian, (9 June 2014), 
https://www.theguardian.com/education/2014/jun/09/boarding-schoolsbad-leaders-politicians- 
bullies-bumblers 


‘ Jonathan Coe, “Sinking Giggling into the Sea”, London Review of Books, Vol. 35, No. 14, July 2013, 


https://www.Ilrb.co.uk/v35/n14/jonathan-coe/sinking-gigglinginto-the-sea 


>- Franco Berardi, After the Future, (AK Press, 2011) 


Review: Terminator Genisys 


1. sight and Sound, (September 2015) 


The House that Fame Built: Celebrity Big Brother 


1. New Humanist, (16 December 2015) 


2. Andreas Hillen, 1973 Nervous Breakdown: Watergate, Warhol, and the Birth of Post-Sixties America, 
(Bloomsbury, 2008) 


Sympathy for the Androids: The Twisted Morality of Westworld 


1. New Humanist, (30 November 2016) 
PART THREE 
CHOOSE YOUR WEAPONS: WRITING ON MUSIC 


The By Now Traditional Glasto Rant 


1. k-punk, (28 June 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/003459.html 

2. simon Frith, “Afterthoughts” (1985), Taking Popular Music Seriously: Selected Essays, (Routledge, 2017) 

3- Ian Penman (The Pill Box), “Include Me Out” (10 July 2003), 
http://apawboy.blogspot.co.uk/2003_07_06_apawboy_archive.html#105783432477159439 


4- Tan Penman (The Pill Box), comments (28 June 2003), 
http://apawboy.blogspot.co.uk/2003_06_22_apawboy_archive.html#105679442481295648 


Art Pop, No, Really 


1. k-punk, (5 July 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/003519.html 


k-punk, or the Glampunk Art Pop Discontinuum 


1. k-punk, (11 November 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/004115.html 

2. Leopold von Sacher-Masoch, Venus in Furs, (CreateSpace, 2010) 

3- Simon Reynolds, Blissblog, (20 June 2003), 

http://blissout.blogspot.co.uk/2003_06_15_blissout_archive.html#95865180 

4. Jeff Nuttall, Bomb Culture, (Paladin, 1968), p. 33 

‘ Ian Penman, “The Shattered Glass: Notes on Bryan Ferry”, Zoot Suits and Second-Hand Dresses: An 
Anthology of Fashion and Music, ed. McRobbie, (Macmillan, 1989), pp. 103-17 

6 Nuttall, Bomb Culture, p. 34 

7. Kodwo Eshun, More Brilliant than the Sun: Adventures in Sonic Fiction, (Quartet, 1998), p. 95 


8. k-punk, “Art Pop, No, Really”, (5 July 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/003519.html 
(Also in this volume, pp. 269-272) 


Noise as Anti-Capital: As the Veneer of Democracy Starts to Fade 
1. k-punk, (21 November 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/004441.html 


This was k-punk’s contribution to the NOISETHEORYNOISE#2 event on 20 November 2004 at Middlesex 
University, organised by Andy McGettigan and Ray Brassier. 


2. Slavoj Zizek, “The Matrix: Or, The Two Sides of Perversion”, The Matrix and Philosophy: Welcome to the 
Desert of the Real, ed. William Irwin, (Open Court,2002), p. 246 


3- william S Burroughs, The Ticket that Exploded, (John Calder, 1968), p. 44 
4. Jean-Francois Lyotard, Libid.inal Economy, (Continuum, 2004), p 113 


Lions After Slumber, or What is Sublimation Today? 


1. k-punk, (25 March 2005), http://k-punk.org/lions-after-slumber-or-what-issublimation-today/ 


2. Slavoj Zizek, “The Deadlock of Repressive Desublimation”, The Metastases of Enjoyment: Six Essays on 


Women and Causality, (Verso, 2005), p. 16 
‘ Green Gartside, Welsh singer/songwriter and frontman of Scritti Politti 


4- Marcello Carlin, “Scritti Politti: Early”, (12 January 2005), 
http://hemingwoid.blogspot.co.uk/2005/01/scritti-politti-early.html 


>- Alena Zupanti€, The Shortest Shadow: Nietzsche’s Philosophy of the Two, (MIT, 2003), p. 77 
6 Zupancié, The Shortest Shadow, p. 77 


7. Ian Penman, The Pill Box, (13 May 2003), 
http://apawboy.blogspot.co.uk/2003_05_11_apawboy_archive.html#94280226 


The Outside of Everything Now 


1. k-punk, (01 May 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005449.html 
2. Simon Reynolds, Rip it Up and Start Again: Postpunk 1978-1984, (Faber and Faber, 2006) 


For Your Unpleasure: The Hauter-Couture of Goth 


1. k-punk, (01 June 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005622.html 


2. k-punk, “Continuous Contact”, (23 January 2005), http://k- 
punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/004826.html 


: LT. - fellow blogger and friend Infinite Thought (Nina Power) 


4. Tim de Lisle, “Roxy is the Drug”, Guardian, (20 May 2005), 
https://www.theguardian.com/music/2005/may/20/roxymusic.popandrock 


>- Alena Zupancic, The Shortest Shadow: Nietzsche’s Philosophy of the Two, (MIT, 2003), p. 179 


6 Simon Reynolds and Joy Press, The Sex Revolts: Gender, Rebellion, and Rock ‘n’ Roll, (Harvard UP, 1996), p. 
344 


7. Jean Baudrillard, Seduction, (St Martin’s Press, 1991), p. 94 


See Gilles Deleuze and Félix Guattari, “1933: Micropolitics and Segmentarity”, Capitalism and 
Schizophrenia: A Thousand Plateaus, (Continuum, 2002), pp. 229-255 


?- Baudrillard, Seduction, p. 96 
10. Reynolds and Press, The Sex Revolts, p. 344 
11. Jean Baudrillard, Simulacra and Simulation, (University of Michigan Press, 1994), pp. 114-115 


It Doesn’t Matter If We All Die: The Cure’s Unholy Trinity 


1. k-punk, (3 August 2005) — http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/006087.html 
2. Michael Bracewell, England is Mine: Pop Life in Albion from Wilde to Goldie, (Flamingo, 1998), pp. 119-120 


3s 


4. 


Ibid., p. 115 
Ibid., p. 117 


>- James Oldham, “Bad Medicine”, Uncut, (2 January 2000) 


6. 


Bracewell, England is Mine, pp. 115-116 


Look at the Light 


1. 


k-punk, (16 November 2005), http://k-punk.org/look-at-the-light/ 


Is Pop Undead? 


1. 


2. 


3. 


k-punk, (31 January 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/007289.html 

Hannah Pool, “Whiteout”, Guardian, (28 January 2006), 
https://www.theguardian.com/music/2006/jan/28/popandrock 

Simon Reynolds, “Music 2005”, Frieze, Issue 96, Jan-Feb 2006, https://frieze.com/article/music-2005? 
language=en 


Memorex for the Kraken: The Fall’s Pulp Modernism 


Part I 


1. 


7. 


k-punk, (8 May 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/007759.html A version of this 
piece was previously published in Michael Goddard and Benjamin Halligan, Mark E. Smith and The Fall, 
(Ashgate, 2010) 


‘ The Fall, Dragnet, (Step-Forward, 1979) 

‘ The Fall, “Spector Vs. Rector”, Dragnet, (Step-Forward, 1979) 

‘ Mark Sinker, “Look Back In Anguish”, NME, (2 January 1988) 

‘ Peter Stallybrass and Allon White, “The Fair, the Pig, Authorship”, The Politics and Poetics of 


Transgression, (Cornell University Press, 1986) 


' A passage in T.S. Eliot’s “The Waste Land” which, on his own admission, was influenced by Stoker’s 


novel: 


And bats with baby faces in the violet light 
Whistled and beat their wings 
And crawled head downward down a blackened wall. 


Ian Penman, “All Fall Down”, NME, (5 January 1980), http://thefall.org/gigography/80jano05.html 


8. Jean Baudrillard, “The Ecstasy of Communication”, The Anti-Aesthetic, (The New Press, 2002), p. 153 


Part II 


1. 
2. 
3. 


k-punk, (04 February 2007), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/008993.html 
The Fall, “City Hobgoblins”, Grotesque (After the Gramme), (Rough Trade, 1980) 
Mark Sinker, “Watching the City Hobgoblins”, Wire, August 1986 


‘ H.P. Lovecraft, “Supernatural Horror in Literature”, 


http://www.hplovecraft.com/writings/texts/essays/shil.aspx 


: §.T. Joshi, “Introduction” to M.R. James, Count Magnus and Other Ghost Stories: The Complete Ghost Stories of 


M.R. James, Vol. 1 (Penguin, 2004) 


- Mark Sinker, “England: Look Back In Anguish”, NME, (02 January 1988) 
- Ibid. 


8. Patrick Parrinder, James Joyce, (Cambridge University Press, 1984) 

?. Mark E Smith, The Fall: Lyrics, (The Lough Press, 1985) 

10. Philip Thompson, The Grotesque, (Routledge, 1972), p. 2 

11. The Fall, “The N.W.R.A”, Grotesque (After the Gramme), (Rough Trade, 1980) 


Part III 

1. k-punk, (16 February 2007), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/009039.html 
2. Gerard Genette, Paratexts, (Cambridge UP, 1997) 

3- Michael Moorcock, The Final Programme, (HarperCollins, 1971) 


Scritti’s Sweet Sickness 


ay 


‘ k-punk, (5 July 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/008010.html 


2. John Lewis, “Scritti Politti: Interview”, Time Out, (30 May 2006), 
https://www.timeout.com/london/music/scritti-politti-interview 


‘ Paul Oldfield, “After Subversion: Pop Culture and Power”, in Angela McRobbie (ed.), Zoot Suits and 
Second-Hand Dresses: An Anthology of Fashion and Music, (Macmillan, 1987) 


4. Interview with Green Gartside by Simon Reynolds, http://bibbly-o-tek.com/2006/06/16/green/ 
‘ Mladen Dolar, A Voice and Nothing More, (MIT Press, 2006), p. 16 
6 Ibid., p. 161 


Ww 


nn 


Postmodernism as Pathology, Part 2 


1. k-punk, (17 February 2007), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/009043.html 


Choose Your Weapons 


1. k-punk, (12 August 207), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/009633.html 


Frank Kogan, “Rules of the Game Follow Up #2: Paris Is Our Vietnam”, Las Vegas Weely, (29 June 2007), 
https://lasvegasweekly.com/news/archive/2007/jun/29/rules-of-the-game-followup-2-paris-is-our- 
vietnam/ 

3- Frank Kogan, “What’s Wrong with Pretty Girls?”, Las Vegas Weekly, (04 July 2007), 
https://lasvegasweekly.com/news/archive/2007/jul/04/whats-wrong-with-pretty-girls/ 


bi 


- Lawrence Miles’ blog, http://beasthouse-lm.blogspot.co.uk/ 


Variations on a Theme 


1. Frieze, (19 March 2008), https://frieze.com/article/variations-theme-0 


2. alan Kirby, “The Death of Postmodernism and Beyond”, Philosophy Now, Issue 58, 2006, 
https://philosophynow.org/issues/58/The_Death_of_Postmodernism_And_Beyond 


Running on Empty 
1. New Statesman, (30 April 2008) 


You Remind Me of Gold: Dialogue with Mark Fisher and Simon Reynolds 


1. Kaleidoscope Magazine, 2010, http://markfisherreblog.tumblr.com/post/32185314385/you-remind-me- 
of-gold-dialogue-with-simon 


Militant Tendencies Feed Music 


1. New Statesman, (29 March 2010) 


Autonomy in the UK 


1. Mark Fisher’s reflections on music and politics at the end of 2011, first appeared in the Wire, Issue 335, 
January 2012 


2. Franco Berardi, After the Future (AK Press, 2011), p. 12 


The Secret Sadness of the Twenty-First Century: James Blake’s Overgrown 
1. Electronic Beats, (18 April 2013) 


2. angus Finlayson, “Review of Overgrown”, FACT, (4 April 2013), 


http://www.factmag.com/2013/04/04/james-blake-overgrown-fact-review/ 


' Mark Fisher and Simon Reynolds, “You Remind Me of Gold”, Kaleidoscope Magazine, 
http://markfisherreblog.tumblr.com/post/32185314385/you-remind-me-of-gold-dialogue-with-simon 
(Also in this volume, pp. 675-682) 


‘ See http://www.futurebombe.com/james-drake.html 


Review: David Bowie’s The Next Day 


1. The Wire, Issue 351, May 2013 


The Man Who Has Everything: Drake’s Nothing Was the Same 


1. Flectronic Beats, (24 September 2013) 


2. Drake, “All Me”, Nothing Was the Same, (OVO Sound/Young Money Entertainment/Cash Money 
Records/Republic Records, 2013) 


Break it Down: DJ Rashad’s Double Cup 


1. Flectronic Beats, (22 October 2013) 


2. Tristram Vivian Adams, “Analemmic VO1CES (Distracted from the Darkness)”, Notes from the 
Vomitorium, (September 2013), http://notesfromthevomitorium.blogspot.co.uk/2013/09/analemmic- 
vOlces-distracted-from.html 


3- william S. Burroughs, The Ticket that Exploded, (Calder, 1968) 

Start Your Nonsense! On eMMplekz and Dolly Dolly 

1. Electronic Beats, (28 November 2013) 

Review: Sleaford Mods’ Divide and Exit and Chubbed Up: The Singles Collection 
1. The Wire, Issue 362, April 2014 

Test Dept: Where Leftist Idealism and Popular Modernism Collide 


1. Frieze, (25 September 2015), https://frieze.com/article/music-41 
2. Cynthia Rose, Design After Dark: The Story of Dancefloor Style, (Thames and Hudson, 1991) 


No Romance Without Finance 


1. Bamn: An Unofficial Magazine of Plan C, (9 November 2015) 

‘ Jennifer M. Silva, Coming Up Short: Working-Class Adulthood in an Age of Uncertainty, (Oxford University 
Press, 2015), p. 19 

3- Ibid., p. 142 

4- Nancy C.M. Hartsock, The Feminist Standpoint Revisited, and Other Essays, (Basic Books, 1999) 

>- Nona Willis Aronowitz (ed.), The Essential Ellen Willis, (University of Minnesota Press, 2014) 

‘ Ellen Willis, Beginning to See the Light, (University of Minnesota Press, 2012) 

7. Cynthia Rose, Design After Dark: The Story of Dancefloor Style, (Thames and Hudson, 1991) 


PART FOUR 

FOR NOW, OUR DESIRE IS NAMELESS: POLITICAL WRITINGS 

Don’t Vote, Don’t Encourage Them 

1. k-punk, (4 May 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005462.html 
October 6, 1979: Capitalism and Bipolar Disorder 


1. k-punk, (9 June 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005660.html This piece was 
reworked and incorporated into chapter 5 of Capitalist Realism (Zer0, 2009) 

2. Johan Hari, “Don’t be fooled: advanced and rational societies can commit environmental suicide”, 
Independent, (7 June 2005), http://www.independent.co.uk/voices/commentators/johann-hari/johann- 
hari-dont-be-fooled-advancedand-rational-societies-can-commit-environmental-suicide-493371.html 

3- Christian Marazzi, author of Capital and Language (Semiotext(e), 2008) and Capital and Affects 
(Semiotext(e), 2011) 


What If They Had A Protest and Everyone Came 


1. k-punk, (4 July 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005806.html 
A reworked and truncated version of this piece forms Chapter 2 of Capitalist Realism (Zer0, 2009) 

2. Live 8 was a string of benefit concerts, founded and co-organised by Bob Geldof, that took place on 2 
July 2005. It was run in support of the aims of the UK’s Make Poverty History campaign and the Global 
Call for Action Against Poverty. 


Defeating the Hydra 


1. k-punk, (11 July 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005847.html This is one of two 
pieces written by k-punk in the aftermath of the 7 July 2005 London suicide bombings, where a series of 
coordinated terrorist attacks targeted the city’s public transport system during the morning rush hour. 

UK Foreign and Commonwealth Office/Home Office, Draft Report on Young Muslims and Extremism, (April, 
2004), quoted in Robert Winnet and David Leppard, “Leaked No 10 dossier reveals Al Qaeda’s British 
recruits”, Sunday Times, (10 July 2005), https://www.thetimes.co.uk/article/leaked-no-10-dossier- 
reveals-al-qaedas-british-recruits-9lpg68xw93r 

3- Editorial, “London Under Attack”, Economist, (7 July 2005), https://www.economist.com/node/4166694 

4. Nick Cohen, “Face up to the truth”, the Guardian, (10 July 2005), 

https://www.theguardian.com/uk/2005/jul/10/july7.guardiancolumnists 


>- Richard Seymour, “Nick Cohen’s brains have turned to slush”, Lenin’s Tomb, (10 July 2005), 
http://www.leninology.co.uk/2005/07/nick-cohens-brains-haveturned-to.html 


The Face of Terrorism Without a Face 
1. k-punk (13 July 2005), http://k-punk.org/the-face-of-terrorism-without-a-face/ 
Conspicuous Force and Verminisation 


1. k-punk, (2 August 2006), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/008166.html 


My Card: My Life: Comments on the AMEX Red Campaign 


1. k-punk, comments on any-body.org (4 September 2006), http://www.any- 


body.org/anybody_vent/2006/9/4/my-card-my-life-your-comments.html An image of the AMEX RED 
advertising campaign can be viewed on this webpage. 


‘ Product Red is a licensed brand owned by (RED) that seeks to involve the private sector in raising 
awareness and money to help in eliminating HIV/AIDS in eight African countries. In 2006 American 
Express launched the AMEX RED card, where 1% of spending would be donated to the Global Fund to 
Fight AIDS, Tuberculosis and Malaria. 


3- Slavoj ZiZek, “Nobody has to be vile”, London Review of Books, Vol. 28 No. 7, 6 April 2006, 
http://www.Irb.co.uk/v28/n07/ziseise01_.html 


4- See http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/business/4650024.stm 
The Great Bullingdon Club Swindle 


1. k-punk, (22 October 2010), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011707.html 
2. John Gray, “Progressive, like the 1980s”, London Review of Books, Vol. 32 No. 20, 21 October 2010, 
https://www.Ilrb.co.uk/v32/n20/john-gray/progressive-like-the-1980s 
‘ China Mieville, “Letter to a progressive Liberal Democrat”, 21 October 2010, 
http://chinamieville.net/post/1361955242/letter-to-a-progressive-liberal-democrat 
4- Seumas Milne, “The Bullingdon boys want to finish what Thatcher began”, Guardian, (20 October 2010), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2010/oct/20/bullingdon-boys-want-to-finish-what- 
thatcher-began 


‘ Laurie Penny, “Labour let us down yesterday”, New Statesman, (21 October 2010), 
https://www.newstatesman.com/blogs/laurie-penny/2010/10/labour-partyanswers-today 


The Privatisation of Stress 


‘ This essay first appeared in Soundings, No. 48: The Neoliberal Revolution, Summer 2011, and was 
reproduced on the New Left Project website, (7 September 2011), 
http://www.newleftproject.org/index.php/site/article_comments/the_privatisation_of_stress 


2. Ivor Southwood, Non-Stop Inertia, (Zer0, 2010), p. 72 
3- Tbid., p. 15 
‘ Atilio Boron, “The Truth About Capitalist Democracy”, Socialist Register, 2006, pp. 28-59, p. 32 


‘ As argued by Jeremy Gilbert in, “Elitism, Philistinism and Populism: the Sorry State of British Higher 
Education Policy”, openDemocracy, 2010 
‘ See Stuart Hall and Martin Jacques (eds), New Times: The Changing Face of Politics in the 1990s, (Lawrence 


and Wishart, 1989) 
7. Antonio Negri, Art and Multitude, (Polity, 2010), p. 10 
‘ Savonarola, “Curriculum Mortis”, Institute for Conjectural Research, (4 August 2008), 
conjunctural.blogspot.com/2008/08/curriculum-mortis.html 
- Phillip Blond, The Ownership State: Restoring Excellence, Innovation and Ethos to Public Service, 
(ResPublica/Nesta, 2009), p. 10 
10. Tobias van Veen, “Business Ontology (or why Xmas Gets You Fired)” Fugitive Philosophy, (29 Deceember 
2009), fugitive.quadrantcrossing.org/2009/12/business-ontology/ 
11. Franco Berardi, Precarious Rhapsody: Semiocapitalism and the Pathologies of the Post-Alpha Generation, 
(Minor Compositions, 2009), p. 32 
12. Thid., p. 40 
13. Sherry Turkle, Alone Together: Why We Expect More From Technology and Less from Each Other, (Basic, 
2011), p. 264 
14. Jodi Dean, Blog Theory: Feedback and Capture in the Circuits of Drive, (Polity, 2010) 
15. Dan Hind, The Return of the Public, (Verso, 2010), p. 146 
16. David Smail, Power, Interest and Psychology: Elements of a Social Materialist Understanding of Distress, (PCCS, 
2009), p. 11 
17. Thid., p. 7 
18. Eva Illouz, Cold Intimacies: The Making of Emotional Capitalism, (Polity, 2007) 


Kettle Logic 


1. k-punk, (29 November 2010), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011728.html 

2. Richard Seymour, “Students lead, NUS follows”, Lenin’s Tomb, (28 November 2010), 
http://www.leninology.co.uk/2010/11/students-lead-nus-follows.html 

‘ Polly Toynbee, “Sorry, students, but you’re low in the pain pecking order”, Guardian, (5 November 
2010), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2010/nov/05/students-low-pain-pecking-order; 
and “Thatcher’s children can lead the class of 68 back into action”, Guardian, (26 November 2010), 


https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2010/nov/26/student-protest-publicsector-cuts 


4- Richard Seymour, “Spontaneous, massive and militant”, Lenin’s Tomb, (25 November 2010), 


http://www.leninology.co.uk/2010/11/spontaneous-massive-and-militant.html 
>- See https://universityforstrategicoptimism.wordpress.com/ 

6 Jan Moir, “Not so jolly hockey sticks at the St Trinian’s riots”, Daily Mail, (26 November 2010), 
http://www.dailymail.co.uk/columnists/article-1333175/JANMOIR-Not-jolly-hockey-sticks-St- 
Trinians-riots.html 

7. Digital Ben, “Solidarity”, Third Class on a One-Class Train, (27 November 2010), 
http://ridingthirdclass.blogspot.co.uk/2010/11/solidarity.html 


8. Ibid. 
Winter of Discontent 2.0: Notes on a Month of Militancy 


1. k-punk, (13 December 2010), http://k-punk.org/winter-of-discontent-2-0-notes-on-a-month-of- 
militancy/ 

2. Deborah Orr, “Protesting against the cuts is pointless”, Guardian (2 December 2010), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2010/dec/02/protestingcuts-pointless-deborah-orr 

3- Paul Mason, “Dubstep rebellion — the British banlieue comes to Millbank”, BBC, (9 December 2010), 


http://www.bbc.co.uk/blogs/newsnight/paulmason/2010/12/9122010_dubstep_rebellion_-_br.html 


4- Dan Hancox, “This is our riot: POW!”, A Miasma Of Lunatic Alibis, (10 December 2010), http://dan- 
hancox.blogspot.co.uk/2010/12/this-is-our-riot-pow.html 


nn 


‘ Jeremy Gilbert, “A Report on the ‘The Hardcore Continuum?’ symposium held at the University of East 
London, April 29th 2009”, Dancecult: Journal of Electronic Dance Music Culture, 1:1, 2009, 
https://dj.dancecult.net/index.php/dancecult/article/view/274/238 


‘ Simon Reynolds, “Slipping into Darkness”, Wire, No. 48, June 1996, https://www.thewire.co.uk/in- 
writing/essays/the-wire-300_simon-reynolds-on-thehardcore-continuum_4_hardstep_jump- 
up_techstep_1996_ 


7. Ibid. 


‘ Dominic Fox, “Nova Criminals”, Poetix (Old Content), (12 December 2010), 
http://codepoetics.com/octoblog/blog/2010/12/12/nova-criminals/ 


?- Michel Foucault, Discipline and Punish: The Birth of the Prison (Penguin, 1991) 


10. Alex Williams,“On Negative Solidarity and Post-Fordist Plasticity”, Splintering Bone Ashes, (31 January 
2010), http://splinteringboneashes.blogspot.co.uk/2010/01/negative-solidarity-and-post-fordist.html 


11. Dave Osler, “Thrashing Royal Rollers: Some Public Relations Tips”, Liberal Conspiracy, (10 December 
2010), http://liberalconspiracy.org/2010/12/10/thrashing-royal-rollers-some-public-relations-tips/ 


Football/Capitalist Realism/Utopia 


1. k-punk, (6 July 2010), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011626.html 
2. Chris Petit, “Review: The Damned United”, Guardian, (19 August 2006), 
https://www.theguardian.com/books/2006/aug/19/sportandleisure.shopping 


The Game Has Changed 
1. The Visual Artists’ News Sheet, January/February 2011 
Creative Capitalism 


1. The Visual Artists’ News Sheet, March-April 2011 
2. Antonio Negri, Art and Multitude, (Polity, 2007), p. 9 


Reality Management 


1. k-punk, (5 July 2011), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011851.html 
2. See https://www.youtube.com/watch?v-wCem9EZb-YA 


3- Deterritorial Support Group, “Hari Kari/Hackery”, (17 June 2011), 
https://deterritorialsupportgroup.wordpress.com/2011/06/17/hari-karihackery/ 


4. Peter Preston, “Johan Hari’s anonymous attackers have spun foolishness into dishonesty”, Guardian, (3 
July 2011), https://www.theguardian.com/media/2011/jul/03/johann-hari-quotes-honesty-foolish 


>- Dan Hind, “The Limits of Acceptable Controversy”, The Return of the Public (25 October 2010), 
https://thereturnofthepublic.wordpress.com/2011/07/05/the-limits-of-acceptable-controversy/ 


UK Tabloid 


1. k-punk, (8 July 2011), http://k-punk.org/uk-tabloid/ 


2. See the transcript of Cameron’s press conference on phone hacking here: 


https://www.gov.uk/government/speeches/prime-ministers-press-conference 


3- Unemployed Negativity, “Clerks and Cynicism”, (29 July 2006), 
http://www.unemployednegativity.com/2006_07_01_archive.html 


4- adam Curtis, “Rupert Murdoch — A Portrait of Satan”, BBC, (30 January 2011), 
http://www.bbc.co.uk/blogs/adamcurtis/2011/01/rupert_murdoch_-_a_portrait_of.html 


The Future is Still Ours: Autonomy and Post-Capitalism 


1. We Have Our Own Concept of Time and Motion, (Auto Italia South East, 2011), pp. 5-7, 
https://monoskop.org/images/d/dd/Auto_Italia_eds_We_Have_Our_Own_Concept_of_Time_and_Motion.pdf 

2. Philip Blond, “The Ownership State”, ResPublica, October 2009, http://www.respublica.org.uk/wp- 
content/uploads/2015/01/Ownership-state.pdf 

3- Gilles Deleuze, “Postscript on the Societies of Control”, October, Vol. 59, Winter 1992, pp. 3-7 

4- Antonio Negri, Art and Multitude, (Polity, 2007), p. 9 


Aesthetic Poverty 


1. The Visual Artists’ News Sheet, September 2011 


2. adrian Shaughnessy, “The Politics of Desire and Looting”, Design Observer, (15 August 2011), 
https://designobserver.com/feature/the-politics-of-desire-andlooting/29508 


The Only Certainties are Death and Capital 


1. The Visual Artists’ News Sheet, May/June 2012 
2. Hari Kunzru, “Damien Hirst and the great art market heist”, Guardian, (16 March 2012), 
https://www.theguardian.com/artanddesign/2012/mar/16/damien-hirst-art-market 


Why Mental Health is a Political Issue 


1. Guardian, (16 July 2012), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2012/jul/16/mental-health- 
political-issue 
‘ See http://calumslist.org/ 


‘ Isabel Hardman, “Welfare suicides are awful, but they’re still a red herring”, Spectator, (5 July 2012), 
https://blogs.spectator.co.uk/2012/07/welfare-suicides-are-awful-but-theyre-still-a-red-herring/ 

‘ Brendan O’Neill, “This exploitation of suicidal people is a new low for campaigners against welfare 
reform”, Telegraph, (3 July 2012), http://journalisted.com/article/3xla7 


‘ Helen Nugent, “Suicide on the rise among older men”, Guardian, (15 July 2012), 
https://www.theguardian.com/society/2012/jul/15/suicide-rise-older-men 


The London Hunger Games 


1. k-punk, (8 August 2012), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011918.html 

‘ Oliver Burkeman, “The Power of Negative Thinking”, New York Times, (4 August 2012), 
http://www.nytimes.com/2012/08/05/opinion/sunday/the-positive-powerof-negative-thinking.html 

3- Charlie Brooker, “The Olympics: better than they looked on the tin”, Guardian, (5 August 2012), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2012/aug/05/olympics-better-than-looked-on-tin 

‘ Mike Marqusee, “London 2012: spare us the jingoistic Olympic hype”, Guardian, (7 August 2012), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2012/aug/07/london-2012-olympic-hype 


5. 


6. 


Douglas Murphy, “Towers of Babble”, Frieze, (1 May 2012), https://frieze.com/article/towers-babble/ 
Juliet Jacques, “The ArcelorMittal Orbit: London’s Eiffel Tower?”, New Statesman, (11 July 2012), 
https://www.newstatesman.com/blogs/art-and-design/2012/07/arcelormittal-orbit-londons-eiffel- 
tower 


Time-Wars: Towards an Alternative for the Neo-Capitalist Era 


1. 


Gonzo Circus, Issue 110, 2012, http:/ / www.gonzocircus.com/ exclusive-essay-time-wars-towards-an- 
alternative-for-the-neo-capitalist-era/ 


- Richard Sennett, The Corrosion of Character: The Personal Consequences of Work in the New Capitalism 


(Norton, 1998), p. 30 


: Ibid., p. 31 
‘ Federico Campagna, “Radical Atheism”, Through Europe, http://th-rough.eu/writers/campagna- 


eng/radical-atheism. 


‘ Carl Cederstrém and Peter Fleming, Dead Man Working, (Zer0, 2012), p. 2 
‘ Franco Berardi, Precarious Rhapsody, (Minor Compositions, 2009), p. 41 


Not Failing Better, but Fighting To Win 


1. 


Weekly Worker, (1 November 2012), http://weeklyworker.co.uk/worker/936/mark-fisher-not-failing- 
better-but-fighting-to-win/ 


* Mark Bolton, “Work isn’t working”, New Left Project, (31 August 2012), 


www.newleftproject.org/index.php/site/article_comments/work_isnt_working 


‘ Kwasi Kwarteng, Priti Patel, Dominic Raab, Chris Skidmore and Elizabeth Truss, Britannia Unchained: 


Global Lessons for Growth and Prosperity, (Palgrave Macmillan, 2012) 


The Happiness of Margaret Thatcher 


1. 


* Ramona, 


Verso blog, (8 April 2013), https://www.versobooks.com/blogs/1272-the-happiness-of-margaret- 
thatcher 


* Toby Helm and Daniel Boffey, “Labour plans radical shift over welfare state payouts”, Guardian, (6 April 


2013), https://www.theguardian.com/politics/2013/apr/06/labour-plans-shift-welfare-payouts 


‘ John Harris, “We have to talk about why some people agree with benefit cuts”, Guardian, (31 March 


2013), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2013/mar/31/we-have-to-talk-why-some-want- 
benefit-cuts 


‘ Alex Williams, “On Negative Solidarity and Post-Fordist Plasticity”, Splintering Bone Ashes, (31 January 


2005), http://splinteringboneashes.blogspot.co.uk/2010/01/negative-solidarity-and-post-fordist.html 


Peter Walker, “Government using increasingly loaded language in welfare debate”, Guardian, (5 April 


2013), https://www.theguardian.com/society/2013/apr/05/goverment-loaded-language-welfare 


“The Revolution starts in the ATOS smoking area’ — On Welfare, Addiction, and Dependency”, 
libcom.org, (2 April 2013), https://libcom.org/blog/%E2%80%9C-revolution-starts-atos-smoking- 


area%E2%80%9D-welfare-addiction-dependency-02042013 


* Wendy Brown, “Moralism as Anti-politics”, Politics Out of History, (Princeton, 2001), p. 36 
‘ Adam Kotsko, “Weaponised debate”, An und fur sich, (12 August 2012), 


https://itself.blog/2012/08/12/weaponiseised-debate-2/ 


Suffering With a Smile 


1. Occupied Times, (22 June 2013), http://theoccupiedtimes.org/?p=11586 

2. Tim Dowling, Laura Barnett and Patrick Kingsley, “What Time Do CEOs Wake Up?”, Guardian, (1 April 
2013), https://www.theguardian.com/money/2013/apr/01/what-time-ceos-start-day 

3- Gilles Deleuze and Félix Guattari, Capitalism and Schizophrenia: Anti-Oedipus, (Continuum, 2004), p. 254 


How to Kill a Zombie: Strategising the End of Neoliberalism 


1. openDemocracy, (18 July 2013), https://www.opendemocracy.net/mark-fisher/how-to-kill-zombie- 
strategising-end-of-neoliberalism 

2. Mark Fisher and Franco “Bifo” Berardi, “Give Me Shelter”, Frieze, (1 January 2013), 
https://frieze.com/article/give-me-shelter-mark-fisher 


Getting Away With Murder 


1. k-punk, (9 January 2014), http://k-punk.org/getting-away-with-murder/ 


2. Stafford Scott, “This perverse Mark Duggan verdict will ruin our relations with the police”, Guardian, (9 
January 2014), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2014/jan/09/mark-duggan-verdict- 
relations-police 
' See http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/law-and-order/10315329/London-Riots-Police- 
marksman-shot-Mark-Duggan-in-self-defence.html 
4. See http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/crime/8687804/Tottenham-riot-bullet-lodged-in- 
officers-radio-at-time-of-Mark-Duggan-death-was-police-issue.html 


No One is Bored, Everything is Boring 


1. The Visual Artists’ News Sheet, (21 July 2014) 
2. Plan C, “We are all very anxious”, (4 April 2014), https://www.weareplanc.org/blog/we-are-all-very- 
anxious/ 


A Time for Shadows 


‘ Visual Artists’ News Sheet, January/February 2015 


i) 


‘ Jean Baudrillard, The Ecstasy of Communication, (Semiotext(e), 1998) 


* Sherry Turkle, Alone Together: Why We Expect More from Technology and Less from Each Other, (Basic Books, 
2011), p. 2. The full manifesto can be read and downloaded from: networkcultures.org 


cs 


‘ Geert Lovink, Sebastian Olma and Ned Rossiter, “On the Creative Question — Nine Theses”, Institute of 
Network Cultures, (20 November 2014), http://networkcultures.org/geert/2014/11/20/the-creative- 
question-nine-theses/ 


Limbo is Over 


1. k-punk, (26 April 2015), http://k-punk.org/limbo-is-over/ 

2. Jonathan Jones, “Something new is happening in British politics. This image captures it”, Guardian, (17 
April 2015), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2015/apr/17/tv-election-debate-new- 
british-politics-image 

3. Plan C, https://www.weareplanc.org/about/#.VTkXhqbKbFI 

4. Craig McVegas, “Last Night’s Leaders’ Debate Was a Vision of the Clusterfuck That British Politics Is 
About to Become”, Vice, (17 April 2015), https://www.vice.com/en_uk/article/vd8pva/craig-election- 


leaders-debate-number-3-733 


‘ See the image here: https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2015/apr/17/tv-election-debate- 


new-british-politics-image 


‘ The Free Association, “Talkin’ ‘Bout a Revolution”, (2015), http://www.freelyassociating.org/wp- 


content/uploads/2015/02/talkin%27%20%27bout%20a%20revolution.pdf 


- Aditya Chakrabortty, “The three big election questions that all the parties are simply ignoring”, 


Guardian, (20 April 2015), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2015/apr/20/three-big- 
election-questions-politicians-ignoring-real-challenges 


* The Sun ran a story that as a child Scotland’s First Minister Nicola Sturgeon is said to have “devilishly 


hacked the hair from her sister’s beloved doll”. For the Sun this was “an early sign of the ruthlessness 
which propelled her to the top of Scottish — and potentially British — politics.” 


- Eduardo Maura of Podemos interviewed by Andrew Dolan, Red Pepper, (22 February 2015), 


http://www.redpepper.org.uk/podemos-politics-by-the-people/ 


10. Plan C, “On Social Strikes and Directional Demands”, (7 May 2015), 


https://www.weareplanc.org/blog/on-social-strikes-and-directional-demands/#.VTvv3qbKbFK 


11. Mark Fisher and Jeremy Gilbert, Reclaim Modernity: Beyond Markets Beyond Machines, (Compass, 2015), 


http://www.compassonline.org.uk/wp-content/uploads/2014/10/Compass-Reclaiming-Modernity- 
Beyond-markets_-2.pdf 


Communist Realism 


1. 


k-punk, (5 May 2015), http://k-punk.org/communist-realism/ 


2. Jean Baudrillard, Seduction, (St Martin’s Press, 1991), p. 66 


3. 


See https://www.theguardian.com/politics/2015/may/01/david-cameron-election-career-defining- 
moment 


* Paul Krugman, “The Austerity Delusion”, Guardian, (29 April 2015), 


https://www.theguardian.com/business/ng-interactive/2015/apr/29/the-austerity-delusion 


Philip Mirowski, Never Let a Serious Crisis Go to Waste: How Neoliberalism Survived the Financial Meltdown, 


(Verso, 2013), p. 35 


* The Jam, “Funeral Pyre”, (Polydor, 1981) 
: Ibid., pp. 35-6 


Pain Now 


1. 
2 


3: 


k-punk, (7 May 2015), http://k-punk.org/pain-now/ 
See https://www.theguardian.com/uk/2010/jun/22/budget-2010-vat-austerity-plan 


Mark Fisher, “Good for Nothing”, Occupied Times, (19 March 2014), https://theoccupiedtimes.org/? 
p=12841 (Also in this volume, pp. 747-750) 


Abandon Hope (Summer is Coming) 


1. 


k-punk, (11 May 2015), http://k-punk.org/abandon-hope-summer-is-coming/ 


2. Jeremy Gilbert, “3:00am thoughts on another General Election Defeat”, (8 May 2015), 


3 


https://jeremygilbertwriting.wordpress.com/2015/05/08/300-am-thoughts-on-another-general- 
election-defeat/?fb_action_ids=10155759772135314&fb_action_types=news.publishes&fb_ref=pub- 
standard 


Laura Oldfield Ford, “Seroxat, Smirnoff, THC”, Savage Messaish, (9 October-29 November 2014), 


http://lauraoldfieldford.blogspot.co.uk/2014/09/seroxatsmirnoff-thc-9-october-29.html?gq=seroxat 


* Shaun Lawson, “The polls and (moots) the forecasts are wrong. Ed Miliband will not be the next Prime 
Minister”, Open Democracy, (5 May 2015), https://www.opendemocracy.net/ourkingdom/shaun- 
lawson/polls-and-most-of-forecasts-are-wrong-ed-miliband-will-not-be-next-prime-min 


* Paul Mason, “Labour haven’t just failed to win — it’s worse than that”, Channel 4, (8 May 2015), 
https://www.channel4.com/news/by/paul-mason/blogs/labour-failed-win-worse 

6. Tim Burrows, “Meme Politics and Apathy in UKIP-on-Sea”, Vice, (5 May 2015), 
https://www.vice.com/en_uk/article/qbx4qm/meme-politics-and-apathy-in-ukipon-sea 

7. William S. Burroughs, The Place of Dead Roads, (Penguin, 2015) 

8. Jodi Dean, “The Lingering of the Party”, Open!, (6 March 2014), http://www.onlineopen.org/the- 
lingering-of-the-party 

?- Gilles Deleuze, “Postscript on the Societies of Control”, October, Vol. 59, Winter 1992, p. 5 

10. Benedict Spinoza, Ethics, (Moonrise Press, 2015), p. 144 

11. Tbhid., p. 145 

12. David Smail, The Origins of Unhappiness: A New Understanding of Personal Distress, (Routledge, 2015), p. 45 

13. Jason Read, “The Order and Connection of Ideology is the Same as the Order and Connection of 

Exploitation: Or, Towards a Bestiary of the Capitalist Imagination”, Philosophy Today, 59:2, Spring 2015, 

pp. 175-89 (Also available online at: 

http://www.academia.edu/11159929/The_Order_and_Connection_of_Ideology_Is_the_Same_as_the_Order_anc 


14. Mark Fisher, Ghosts Of My Life: Writings on Depression, Hauntology and Lost Futures, (Zer0, 2014) 

15. Simon Reynolds, Retromania: Pop Culture’s Addiction to its Own Past, (Faber and Faber, 2010) 

16. Ewa Jasiewicz, “Our Commons are Being Privatised — it’s Time for More Time”, Novara Media, (10 May 
2015), http://novaramedia.com/2015/05/10/election-reactions-our-commons-are-being-privatised-its- 
time-for-more-time/ 

17. k-punk, “Communist Realism”, (5 May 2015), http://k-punk.org/communist-realism/(Also in this 
volume, pp. 559-566) 


For Now, Our Desire is Nameless 


1. European, (20 May 2015), http://www.theeuropean-magazine.com/mark-fisher--2/8480-is-there-an- 
alternative-to-capitalism 


2. Francis Spufford, Red Plenty, (Faber and Faber, 2011), p. 4 
3- Michael Hardt, “The Common in Communism”, Rethinking Marxism, 22:3, 2010, pp. 346-356 


Anti-Therapy 


1. This is a previously unpublished English transcript of a 2015 talk, which was translated and published 


in German as “Anti-therapie” in Felix Klopotek and Peter Scheiffele ed., Zonen der Selbstoptimierung: 
Berichte aus der Leistungesellschaft (Matthes & Seitz, 2016) 


‘ Kathryn Ecclestone and Dennis Hayes, The Dangerous Rise of Therapeutic Education, (Routledge, 2008) 


‘ Jennifer M. Silva, Coming Up Short: Working-Class Adulthood in an Age of Uncertainty, (Oxford University 
Press, 2015), p. 19 


4. Tbid., pp. 16-17 
‘ Gilles Deleuze and Felix Guattari, Capitalism and Schizophrenia:Anti-Oedipus, (Continuum, 2004), p. 53 
e Wendy Brown, “Wounded Attachments”, Political Theory, Vol. 21, No. 3, (August 1993), pp. 290-410 


‘ Laura Kipnis, “Sexual Paranoia Strikes Academe”, Chronicle of Higher Education, (27 February 2015), 


http://laurakipnis.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/08/Sexual-Paranoia-Strikes-Academe.pdf 

8. David Smail, Power, Interest and Psychology: Elements of a Social Materialist Understanding of Distress, (PCCS 
Books, 2005), p. 39 

?- Tbid., pp. 39-40 

10. Tbid., p. 46 

11. Silva, Coming Up Short, p. 142 


Democracy is Joy 


1. k-punk, (13 July 2015), http://k-punk.org/democracy-is-joy/ 

2. Plan C, “The Meaning of Oxi”, (8 July 2015), https://www.weareplanc.org/blog/the-meaning-of-oxi/ 

3- Plan C, “On Social Strikes and Directional Demands”, (7 May 2015), 
https://www.weareplanc.org/blog/on-social-strikes-and-directional-demands/ 

‘ Media Mole, “What’s this? Is lain Duncan Smith visibly excited by prospect of hurting the poor?”, New 
Statesman, (8 July 2015), https://www.newstatesman.com/politics/2015/07/whats-iain-duncan-smith- 
visibly-excited-prospect-hurting-poor 

>- John Lanchester, “The Robots are Coming”, London Review of Books, Vol. 37 No. 5, March 2015), 
https://www.Ilrb.co.uk/v37/n05/john-lanchester/the-robots-are-coming 

‘ Stewart Lee, “It’s too late to save our world, so enjoy the spectacle of doom”, Guardian, (5 July 2015), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2015/jul/05/too-late-to-save-world-heathrow-runway- 
stewart-lee 

* Anna Kornbluh, “On Marx’s Victorian Novel”, Mediations: Journal of the Marxist Literary Group, Vol. 25, No. 
1, Fall 2010, http://www.mediationsjournal.org/articles/on-marx-s-victorian-novel 

8. David Graeber, “Of Flying Cars and the Declining Rate of Profit”, Baffler, No. 19. March 2012, 

https://thebaffler.com/salvos/of-flying-cars-and-the-declining-rate-of-profit 

?- See Barton, Hidden Valleys: Haunted by the Future, (Zer0, 2015) 

10. Nick Land, Suspended Animation, (Urbantomy Electronic, 2013) 

‘ Graeber, “Of Flying Cars and the Declining Rate of Profit” 

12. @dpjhodges, 5 July 2015, https://twitter.com/DPJHodges/status/617775404049399808 

13. @simon_schama, 6 July 2015, https://twitter.com/simon_schama/status/617956623718449152 

‘ From Ursula Le Guin’s speech at the National Book Awards, 2014, where she was accepting the 

National Book Foundation’s Medal for Distinguished Contribution to American Letters. Watch the 

whole speech here: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Et9Nf-rsALk 


15. Lanchester, “The Robots are Coming” 


Cybergothic vs. Steampunk 


1. Urbanomic, (2016), https://www.urbanomic.com/document/cybergothic-vssteampunk-response-to- 


badiou/ 


* See http://www.bbc.co.uk/news/av/uk-politics-34991402/hilary-benn-is-hold-our-democracy-in- 
contempt 


3- Alain Badiou, Our Wound is Not So Recent: Thinking the Paris Killings of 13 November, (Polity, 2016) 


- Scott Atran, “Mindless terrorists? The truth about Isis is much worse”, Guardian, (15 November 2015), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2015/nov/15/terrorists-isis 


> Ibid. 
6 Karen Armstrong, “Wahhabism to ISIS”, New Statesman, (27 November 2014), 


https://www.newstatesman.com/world-affairs/2014/11/wahhabism-isis-how-saudi-arabia-exported- 
main-source-global-terrorism 

7. Mark Fisher and Jeremy Gilbert, Reclaim Modernity: Beyond Markets Beyond Machines, (Compass, 2015), 
http://www.compassonline.org.uk/publications/reclaiming-modernity-beyond-markets-beyond- 
machines/ 


Mannequin Challenge 


1. k-punk’s final, unfinished and unpublished post, (15 November 2016). There are some incomplete and 


fragmentary sections in the piece. 

‘ Gary Young, “How Trump Took Middle America”, Guardian, (16 November 2016), 
https://www.theguardian.com/membership/2016/nov/16/how-trump-took-middletown-muncie- 
election 

3- Simon Reynolds, “Is Politics the New Glam?”, Guardian, (14 October 2016), 

https://www.theguardian.com/books/2016/oct/14/politics-new-glam-rock-power-brand-simon- 
reynolds 

4. bid. 

‘ Francis Fukuyama, “American Political Decay or Renewal: The Meaning of the 2016 Election”, Foreign 
Affairs, Vol. 95, No. 4, July/August 2016, https://ceulau. files.wordpress.com/2016/08/fa-politcal-decay- 
or-renewal-aug-2016.pdf 

‘ Martin Jacques, “The Death of Neoliberalism and the Crisis in Western Politics”, Guardian, (21 August 
2016), https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2016/aug/21/death-of-neoliberalism-crisis-in- 
western-politics 

‘ Christian Parenti, “Listening to Trump”, Jacobin, (22 November 2016), 
https://www.jacobinmag.com/2016/11/trump-speeches-populism-war-economics-election 

‘ Francis Fukuyama, “American Political Decay or Renewal? The Meaning of the 2016 Election”, Foreign 
Affairs Journal, July/August 2016, p. 68 

?- Joan C. Williams, “What So Many People Don’t Get About the US Working Class”, Harvard Business 

Review, (10 November 2016), https://hbr.org/2016/11/what-so-many-people-dont-get-about-the-u-s- 
working-class 


PART FIVE 
WE HAVE TO INVENT THE FUTURE: INTERVIEWS 


They Can Be Different in the Future Too: Interviewed by Rowan Wilson for Ready Steady Book (2010) 


1. In 2010, Rowan Wilson interviewed Mark for Ready Steady Book 


2. Roy Mayall, “Not Nostalgia”, London Review of Books blog, (3 December 2009), 
https://www.Ilrb.co.uk/blog/2009/12/03/roy-mayall/not-nostalgia/ 


Capitalist Realism: Interviewed by Richard Capes (2011) 


1. Mark Fisher interviewed by Richard Capes for www.moretht.blogspot.com, (14 October 2011) 

2. Mark Fisher and Jeremy Gilbert, Reclaim Modernity: Beyond Markets Beyond Machines (Compass, 2015), 
http://www.compassonline.org.uk/publications/reclaiming-modernity-beyond-markets-beyond- 
machines/ 


Preoccupying: Interviewed by the Occupied Times (2012) 


1. Mark Fisher interviewed by Occupied Times, (3 May 2012), https://theoccupiedtimes.org/?p=3454 
We Need a Post-Capitalist Vision: Interviewed by AntiCapitalist Initiative (2012) 


1. Mark Fisher interviewed by AntiCapitalist Initiative, (11 May 2012), 
http://anticapitalists.org/2012/05/11/mark-fisher-we-need-a-post-capitalist-vision/ 

‘ Paul Mason, “These revolts have ended the period of capitalist realism”, Guardian, (23 January 2012), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/video/2012/jan/23/paul-mason-revolts-capitalist- 
realism-video 


‘ Chris Harman, “Zombie Capitalism”, Socialist Worker, (23 June 2009), 
https://socialistworker.co.uk/art/17914/Zombie%20capitalism 


4- Owen Hatherley, Militant Modernism, (Zer0, 2009) 


“We Have to Invent the Future”: An Unseen Interview with Mark Fisher (2012) 


1. Mark Fisher interviewed by Tim Burrows and Sam Berkson, posthumously published in Quietus, (22 
January 2017), http://thequietus.com/articles/21616-mark-fisher-interview-capitalist-realism-sam- 
berkson 


Hauntology, Nostalgia and Lost Futures: Interviewed by Valerio Mannucci and Valerio Mattioli for 
Nero (2014) 


1. Mark Fisher interviewed by Valerio Mannucci and Valerio Mattioli for Nero Magazine, Summer 2014, 
http://www.neromagazine.it/n/?p=20620 


PART SIX 
WE ARE NOT HERE TO ENTERTAIN YOU: REFLECTIONS 


One Year Later... 


1. k-punk, (17 May 2004), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/002926.html 
Spinoza, k-punk, Neuropunk 


1. k-punk, (13 August 2004), http://k-punk.org/spinoza-k-punk-neuropunk/ 


2. Radar_Anomalous, “A Fragment of Badiou”, (5 August 2004), 
http://radar_anomalous.blogspot.co.uk/2004/08/fragment-of-badiou.html 
‘ See http://hyperstition.abstractdynamics.org/archives/003698.html 

4. Rita Carter, Mapping the Mind, (Weidenfeld and Nicholson, 1998) 


- See http://hyperstition.abstractdynamics.org/archives/003824.html 


Why Dissensus? 


1. Mark Fisher writing on why the name “Dissensus” was chosen for the forum he co-founded with Matt 
Ingram (Woebot), (24 October 2004), http://www.dissensus.com/showthread.php?t=64 


New Comments Policy 


1. k-punk, (5 September 2004), http://k-punk.org/new-comments-policy/ 


Comments Policy (Latest) 

1. k-punk, (10 September 2004), http://k-punk.org/comments-policy-latest/ 

Chronic Demotivation 

1. k-punk, (3 December 2004), http://k-punk.org/chronic-demotivation/ 

How to Keep Oedipus Alive in Cyberspace 

1. k-punk, (9 December 2004), http://k-punk.org/how-to-keep-oedipus-alive-in-cyberspace/ 
We Dogmatists 


1. k-punk, (17 February 2005), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/005025.html 


2. Kant, who begins as a Leibnizian rationalist, is famously “awoken from his dogmatic slumber” by 


Hume. The Kantian turn is away from dogma and into critique. Reason is not so much surpassed as 
arrested. Kant seeks to establish the limits of the thinkable, curbing Reason’s alleged hubris, and laying 
the groundwork for the aporetic pathos-poetics piously peddled by the tragedians of deconstruction 
and postmodernism. Yet, Kant has himself been surpassed, by mathematics. Whilst it might appear that 
the mathematical paradoxes discovered by Cantor and Godel comfortably fit into Kantianism — the 
idea that “the Real itself is fundamentally unrepresentable; we can only become aware of “this outer 
limit of the symbolic” — Badiou allows us to see that the reverse is the case. For Badiou, that is to say, 
the mathematical paradoxes 


demonstrate not that what we thought was coherent is actually not, but that what we thought 
was incoherent is actually rigorously understandable. Unconstructible sets, unique unnameable 
objects and unprovable statements all seem like they are impossible, but maths shows us that 
they’re actually perfectly acceptable objects we can talk about without incoherence. 


London Litened 


1. k-punk, (11 April 2008), http://k-punk.org/london-litened/ 


No Future 2012 


1. k-punk, (13 May 2008), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/010368.html “My presentation 
from yesterday’s astonishingly successful Hauntology event at the Museum of Garden History. Thanks 
to everyone who attended...” 


2. Robert Macfarlane, “London Fields”, Guardian, (8 December 2007), 
https://www.theguardian.com/books/2007/dec/08/photography 


Ridicule Is Nothing to Be Scared Of (Slight Return) 


1. Wire Blog, (15 July 2008), https://www.thewire.co.uk/in-writing/themire/20640/ridicule-is-nothing-to- 
be-scared-of_slight-return_ 


Break Through in Grey Lair 


1. k-punk, (16 August 2009), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011269.html 
2. Graham Harman, Prince of Networks: Bruno Latour and Metaphysics, (re:press, 2009), p. 120 


3- Graham Harman, “Why Socrates Was Not a Grey Vampire”, Object-Oriented Philosophy, (15 August 2009), 
https://doctorzamalek2.wordpress.com/2009/08/15/why-socrates-was-not-a-grey-vampire/ 


4. Graham Harman, “Another Quick Point on Trolls/Grey Vampires”, Object-Oriented Philosophy, (3 August 
2009), https://doctorzamalek2.wordpress.com/2009/08/03/another-quick-point-on-trollsgrey- 
vampires/ 


Real Abstractions: The Application of Theory to the Modern World 


1. Frieze, Issue 125, (September 2009) 


‘ Louis Althusser, “Cremonini, Painter of the Abstract”, Lenin and Philosophy, and Other Essays, (Monthly 
Review Press, 2001) 


‘ Benjamin Noys, The Persistence of the Negative: A Critique of Contemporary Continental Theory, (Edinburgh 
University Press, 2010), p. 168 


‘ Nick Cohen, “Why the Tate’s posing curator is so passe”, Observer, (1 March 2009), 
https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2009/mar/01/tate-britain-bourriaud-art-market 


No I’ve Never Had a Job... 


1. k-punk, (6 August 2010), http://k-punk.org/no-ive-never-had-a-job/ 
2. Ivor Southward, “As if By Magic”, Screened Out, (4 August 2010), http://screened- 
out.blogspot.co.uk/2010/08/as-if-by-magic.html 


' Digital Ben, “Writing Fiction”, Riding Third Class on a One-Class Train, (6 August 2010), 
http://ridingthirdclass.blogspot.co.uk/2010/08/writing-fiction.html 


4. k-punk, (18 November 2010), http://k-punk.abstractdynamics.org/archives/011723.html 


Exiting the Vampire Castle 


1. North Star, (22 November 2013), http://www.thenorthstar.info/?p=11299 This piece has proven to be 
one of the most controversial pieces written during Mark’s lifetime. At the time of publication it 
attracted a large number of vociferous detractors, and it continues to do so to this day. The issues he 
was trying to address in the piece remain largely and sadly unresolved. However, it is worth bearing in 
mind the extent to which this piece remains entirely in keeping with Mark’s preferred rhetorical style 
and directions of thought, which is clearly evident when looked at within the context of the earlier k- 
punk posts reproduced here. 


Good for Nothing 


1. Occupied Times, (19 March 2014), https://theoccupiedtimes.org/?p=12841 
2. David Smail, The Origins of Unhappiness: A New Understanding of Personal Distress, (Routledge, 2015), p. 46 


PART SEVEN 
ACID COMMUNISM 


Acid Communism (Unfinished Introduction) 


1. This is the previously unpublished introduction to a proposed new book project, written in 2016. It is 
all that remains of this proposed work. 


2. Herbert Marcuse, Eros and Civilisation, (Routledge, 1987), p. 93 


‘ Herbert Marcuse, One-Dimensional Man, (Routledge, 2002), p. 66 

4. Tbid., p. 63 

‘ Herbert Marcuse, The Aesthetic Dimension (Beacon Press, 1979), p. 36 

‘ Marcuse, One Dimensional Man, p. 62 

7 Ibid. 

8. Margaret Atwood, The Heart Goes Last, (Virago, 2016), p. 189 

9. Andy Beckett, When the Lights Went Out: Britain in the Seventies, (Faber and Faber, 2010), p. 209 

10. Ellen Willis, Beginning To See The Light: Sex, Hope and Rock-and-Roll, (Wesleyan University Press, 1992), p. 
158 

11. Danny Baker, Going to Sea in a Sieve, (Phoenix, 2012), pp. 49-50 


12. John Foxx, “The Golden Section: John Foxx’s Favourite Albums”, Quietus, (3 October 2013), 
http://thequietus.com/articles/13499-john-foxx-favourite-albums?page=5 


13. willis, Beginning To See The Light, p. xvi 

14. Thid. 

15. Jonathan Miller, cited in Life, (25 November 1968), p. 100 

16. Michel Foucault, The Order of Things, (Routledge, 2001), p. xvi 
17. Michel Foucault, Remarks On Marx, (Semiotext(e), 1991), p. 121 


‘ Michael Hardt, “The Common in Communism”, in Costas Douzinas and Slavoj Zizek (eds), The Idea of 

Communism, (Verso, 2010), p. 141 

19. Greil Marcus, “The Myth of Staggerlee”, in Mystery Train: Images of America in Rock ‘n’ Roll Music, 
(Penguin, 1997), p. 82 

20. Jefferson R. Cowie, Stayin’ Alive: The 1970s and the Last Days of the Working Class, (The New Press, 2012), p. 
46 

21. Thid., p. 48 

22. Thid. 

23. Franco Berardi, After the Future, (AK Press, 2011), p. 48 

24. Ibid., p. 23 


acknowledgements 


Sincere thanks to: 


Tariq Goddard, Josh Turner, Tamar Shlaim and Johnny Bull 
(Repeater Books) 


Zoe Fisher 

Siobhan McKeown 

Simon Reynolds 

John Doran (The Quietus) 

Tim Burrows and Sam Berkson 

Tony Herrington (The Wire) 

Joanne Laws (Visual Artists’ News Sheet) 
Richard Capes 

Valerio Mannucci 


Rowan Wilson 


Repeater Books 


is dedicated to the creation of a new reality. The landscape of 
twenty-firstcentury arts and letters is faded and inert, riven 
by fashionable cynicism, egotistical self-reference and a 
nostalgia for the recent past. Repeater intends to add its voice 
to those movements that wish to enter history and assert 
control over its currents, gathering together scattered and 
isolated voices with those who have already called for an 
escape from Capitalist Realism. Our desire is to publish in 
every sphere and genre, combining vigorous dissent and a 
pragmatic willingness to succeed where messianic abstraction 
and quiescent co-option have stalled: abstention is not an 
option: we are alive and we don’t agree. 


Repeater 


Published by Repeater Books 
An imprint of Watkins Media Ltd 


19-21 Cecil Court 
London 

WC2N 4EZ 

UK 


www.repeaterbooks.com 
A Repeater Books paperback original 2018 
1 


Text copyright © Mark Fisher 2018 
Foreword copyright © Simon Reynolds 2018 
Introduction copyright © Darren Ambrose 2018 


Mark Fisher asserts the moral right to be identified as the author of 
this work. 


Cover design: Johnny Bull 
Typography and typesetting: Frederik Jehle 
Typefaces: Meridien LT Std, Aleo 


ISBN: 9781912248285 
Ebook ISBN: 9781912248292 


All rights reserved. No part of this publication may be reproduced, 
stored in a retrieval system, or transmitted, in any form or by any 
means, electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording or otherwise, 
without the prior permission of the publishers. 


This book is sold subject to the condition that it shall not, by way of 
trade or otherwise, be lent, re-sold, hired out or otherwise circulated 
without the publisher’s prior consent in any form of binding or cover 
other than that in which it is published and without a similar 
condition including this condition being imposed on the subsequent 
purchaser. 


